<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20030502164502.txt.gz
TIME:20030502164502
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
Item 5.    Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure
 
On April 16, 2003, ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2003.  The press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 12 of Form 8-K and is being presented under Item 9 as provided in the Commission's interim guidance regarding Form 8-K Item 11 and Item 12 filing requirements (Release No. 34-47583).
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(c)    Exhibits
 
99.1    Text of Press Release, dated April 16, 2003.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
:
For Immediate Release
 
ARQULE REPORTS FIRST QUARTER 2003 FINANCIAL RESULTS
 
Conference call and webcast scheduled for today at 9 a.m. Eastern Time
 
Woburn, Mass. April 16, 2003 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced results for its first quarter ended March 31, 2003.
 
For the quarter, ArQule's revenues were $15,653,000, compared with $13,968,000, for the same period of 2002.  The Company reported a net loss of $750,000, or $0.03 per share, for the first quarter of 2003, compared with a net loss of $8,375,000, or $0.40 per share, for the first quarter of 2002.  Net loss for the first quarter of 2002 included stock-based compensation and amortization of purchased intangibles of $1,767,000 and $844,000, respectively.
 
ArQule ended the first quarter of 2003 with approximately $83 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
"ArQule delivered a remarkable performance this quarter," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and CEO. "This is a tribute to our employees who, despite the turmoil of the current economic, social and biotechnology investment climate, remained focused on achieving business and science expectations in our core chemistry services business and our internal drug discovery programs."
 
Dr. Hill continued, "We met all expectations of our pharmaceutical collaborators, which underscores our belief in the value of our core chemistry technology and its potential for further revenue generation.  Other highlights of the quarter include ArQule's success in initiating lead optimization with one chemical series in our internal p38 Map kinase program.  Our next milestone in this program will be to select an Optimal Chemical Entity to advance to a pilot toxicity study before beginning a GLP-toxicity study. Meanwhile, our partnered programs with Wyeth and Solvay continue to progress according to those companies' internal schedules.
TM
 
"In addition, during the first quarter, we continued to assess a number of clinical candidates.  We are evaluating and prioritizing in-licensing and acquisition opportunities based on scientific, development and financial criteria," concluded Hill.
 
David C. Hastings, Vice President and CFO, commented, "Our financial results this quarter demonstrate our ability to meet our revenue goals and to progress our internal drug discovery programs while tightly managing our costs.  In addition, we announced in March that Pfizer made a $5 million equity investment in ArQule based upon the successful achievement of all production goals for 2002. We are delighted by the outcome of the first year of this seven-year collaboration."
 
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO, David C. Hastings, Vice President and CFO, and Dr. Andrew C.G. Uprichard, Vice President and COO, will participate in the call.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112, and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820.  The access code is 724118.
 
ArQule, Inc., a recognized leader in small-molecule chemistry, is pursuing a strategy to become an efficient drug discovery and development company.  ArQule provides high quality library design and compound production to pharmaceutical collaborators.  The Company also is building a discovery portfolio of small-molecule compounds, or Optimal Chemical Entities (OCEs), that possess the best balance of drug-like properties. In addition, ArQule is focused on acquiring or in-licensing clinical candidates to build a clinical portfolio in a defined therapeutic area.
TM
TM
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ability to successfully integrate acquired technologies and assets; the ability to successfully satisfy milestones and deliver compounds to corporate collaborators; the ability to design OCEs; the ability to successfully generate compounds using computational compound design technology and predictive models; the progress of product research and development activities in our present portfolio and projected expenditures; the ability to enter into future collaborations with pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies; the ability to raise additional funds in uncertain equity markets; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
TM
 
March 31, 2003.  The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 
 
 
(A)  Basic and diluted net loss per share amounts were equal in both periods presented.
(B)  In 2002, acquisition related charges include amortization of intangible assets and stock-based compensation.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20030721130417.txt.gz
TIME:20030721130417
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
Item 5.    Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure
On July 17, 2003, ArQule, Inc. announced that it signed a definitive agreement to acquire Cyclis Pharmaceuticals, Inc. The press release announcing the execution of the agreement is filed as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
  Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c)  Exhibits
99.1 Text of Press Release, dated July 17, 2003.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
For Immediate Release:
Woburn, Mass., July 17, 2003  ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced that it has signed a definitive agreement to acquire Cyclis Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a Norwood, Mass., privately-held, cancer therapeutics company. The acquisition is expected to close in August 2003.
Cyclis is discovering and developing small-molecule cancer drugs based on a novel technology designed to selectively kill cancer cells and preserve normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints known to be defective in cancers. ArQule believes that Cyclis' approach, "Activated Checkpoint Therapy" (ACT), has the potential for improved activity and reduced toxicity over other molecular approaches and traditional cancer chemotherapy. Cyclis' lead compound, CO-501, is expected to enter Phase I clinical trials in 2003. The Investigational New Drug application was filed with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration this month. In addition, there is a second-generation program based on a similar mechanism of action. Cyclis also is applying the ACT technology to multiple discovery programs targeted at other checkpoint pathways.
Under the terms of the agreement, ArQule will issue approximately 4.6 million common shares and pay $5 million in cash upon closing the transaction in exchange for all of Cyclis' outstanding shares on a fully diluted basis. This results in a transaction value of approximately $25 million, based on ArQule's recent share price. In addition, ArQule will assume all of the outstanding debt and liabilities of Cyclis, which are estimated to range between $5 and $6 million. CIBC World Markets Corp. served as the financial advisor to ArQule on this transaction. Legg Mason served as financial advisor to Cyclis. Closing of the transaction is subject to approval by the stockholders of Cyclis and customary closing conditions.
 
ArQule/2
"This is an exciting opportunity to advance the strategies of ArQule and Cyclis and one that we believe is in the best interest of the shareholders of each company," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and CEO. "Consistent with ArQule's 2003 objectives, the acquisition of Cyclis defines our therapeutic focus in oncology, provides a near-term clinical candidate and a robust discovery pipeline, and strengthens ArQule's biological expertise. We believe that this technology, complemented by ArQule's strengths in small-molecule chemistry and intelligent drug design, has potential to produce highly selective, broad-spectrum cancer therapies without the well-known side effects of current treatment protocols."
Cyclis is distinguished by its research scientists, most of who will become part of the ArQule team. Cyclis has focused its research on discovering and developing novel small-molecule drugs based on technology that emanates from cell-cycle research conducted by world-class researchers from Dana-Farber Cancer Institute, Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center and The Johns Hopkins University School of Medicine. In contrast to the broad cytotoxicity of traditional chemotherapy, and unlike the current generation of targeted therapy that is limited by narrow spectrum against heterogeneous cancer cells, ACT compounds have been shown in animal models to selectively kill cancer cells across a broad spectrum of cancers. Cyclis' first proprietary candidate, CO-501, has undergone nine pilot and GLP-toxicology studies. The results of these and prior studies form the basis of ArQule's goal of commencing Phase I clinical trials in 2003.
"The treatment of cancer is undergoing a scientific revolution," said Dr. Samuel K. Ackerman, Cyclis President and CEO. "I expect that the combination of Cyclis' cutting-edge discovery research with ArQule's strength in chemistry will produce an outstanding anti-cancer drug development platform. I look forward to working with ArQule as its full potential is realized." Following the merger, Dr. Ackerman will become an advisor to ArQule.
Product Profile CO-501
     Cyclis' ACT approach to cancer therapy involves the activation of cell cycle checkpoint pathways and the resultant apoptosis, or programmed death of abnormal cells. Cyclis' lead clinical candidate, CO-501, was co-invented by Dr. Chiang J. Li at Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center and Dr. Arthur B. Pardee at Dana-Farber Cancer Institute. It works at the cell cycle checkpoints in G1 and S phases by selectively activating E2F-mediated apoptosis. In preclinical studies, CO-501 has been tested as monotherapy and co-administered with various chemotherapeutic agents. To date, CO-501 has demonstrated anti-cancer activity in a wide range of animal tumor models at levels well below those associated with toxicity. This wide therapeutic index should give ArQule flexibility in choosing doses for its initial Phase I trial and may allow development of anti-cancer agents with less toxicity than conventional approaches.
 
 
 
ArQule/3
 
ArQule's Expanded Pipeline
Cyclis has two other discovery-stage programs that target different ACT mechanisms. The first of these comprises a series of proteins known collectively as Cancer Survival Proteins, or CSPs, known to block checkpoint-mediated apoptosis. Inhibition of CSPs is thought to restore checkpoint-mediated apoptosis. Cyclis is currently working on a novel chemical series that ArQule hopes to expand with its discovery-driven chemistry expertise.
Another Cyclis' research effort is aimed at restoring the p53 pathway to cancer cells. The laboratory of Drs. Bert Vogelstein and Kenneth Kinzler at The Johns Hopkins University School of Medicine has recently discovered a new intracellular protein named PUMA, an acronym for 53-pregulated odulator of poptosis. Produced in response to p53, PUMA has shown in assays to be a highly potent stimulator of apoptosis in cancer cells. Cyclis has acquired exclusive worldwide rights to this program and ArQule intends to pursue this work post acquisition.
p
U
M
A
in vitro
In addition to cancer discovery and development programs, ArQule plans to continue to advance its p38 MAP Kinase program for which the initial indication will be rheumatoid arthritis. In its first quarter 2003 press release ArQule announced that it had initiated lead optimization with one chemical series. After a short period of lead optimization, the Company announced in mid-June that a lead compound had demonstrated functional oral activity in a rat model of rheumatoid arthritis. In this established animal model, the data showed that ArQule's compound reduced joint swelling in a dose-dependent manner and was well tolerated at all doses studied. As a next step for this series, ArQule will select at least two compounds for pilot-toxicology studies in order to meet the Company's previously stated goal of identifying a GLP-toxicology candidate by the end of the year.
Financial Guidance
Excluding the purchase accounting relating to this transaction, ArQule is not changing its previously given 2003 revenue and total operating expense guidance. The Company's weighted average shares for the year are now expected to range from 24.5 to 25 million.
ArQule now expects net cash usage to range between $24 and $26 million for the year. This is an increase from previous guidance of a net use of cash of between $12 and $14 million for 2003 and includes payments of substantially all Cyclis' assumed liabilities.
ArQule will update its financial and purchase accounting guidance when it releases its second quarter financial results, which is currently scheduled for July 24, 2003.
 
 
 
ArQule/4
 
Conference Call Information
ArQule will hold a conference call today at 8:30 a.m. Eastern Time. Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO, David C. Hastings, Vice President and CFO, and Dr. Andrew Uprichard, Vice President and COO, will participate in the call.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112, and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820. The access code is 130184.
ArQule, Inc., a recognized leader in small-molecule chemistry, is pursuing a strategy to become an efficient drug discovery and development company. ArQule provides high quality library design and compound production to pharmaceutical collaborators. The Company also is building a discovery portfolio of small-molecule compounds, or Optimal Chemical EntitiesTM (OCEsTM), that possess the best balance of drug-like properties. In addition, ArQule is focused on building a clinical portfolio in oncology and inflammation.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: unforeseen delays in the consummation of the Cyclis transaction; the ability to successfully integrate acquired technologies and assets; that positive early stage preclinical results may not be repeated in later studies or in humans; as a result of unforeseen delays ArQule may not be able to identify a p38 MAP Kinase candidate for GLP-toxicology testing by the end of 2003; that other compounds in the series may not demonstrate favorable characteristics; the ability to successfully satisfy milestones and deliver compounds to corporate collaborators; the ability to design OCEsTM; the progress of product research and development activities in ArQule's present portfolio and projected expenditures; that the ACT approach may not improve efficacy nor reduce toxicity; that the therapeutic index for CO-501 may prove narrower than expected giving ArQule less flexibility in selecting doses for the Phase I trial; that due to the inability to enter into future collaborations with pharmaceutical or biotechnology companies or raise additional funds in uncertain equity markets, ArQule may not be able to commence clinical trials for CO-501 in 2003 or ever; Cyclis' next-generation programs may fail and the acquisition of Cyclis may not create value for ArQule's shareholders; ArQule's chemistry expertise may not contribute to advancing Cyclis' pipeline; the market opportunity for Cyclis' compounds may disappoint and competition may become more challenging than anticipated; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 31, 2003. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20030728172307.txt.gz
TIME:20030728172307
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c)
Exhibits
99.1
Text of Press Release, dated July 24, 2003.
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
        On July 24, 2003, ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2003. The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: July 28, 2003
QuickLinks
SIGNATURES

QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
'
Exhibit 99.1
For Immediate Release:
Woburn, Mass., July 24, 2003
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL), a drug discovery and development company, today reported its results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2003.
For the second quarter, ArQule reported revenues of $15,482,000 compared with $16,231,000 for the same period of 2002. For the second quarter, the Company reported net income of $1,038,000, or $0.04 per share. This compares with a net loss of $4,928,000, or $0.23 per share, for the quarter ended June 30, 2002. Net loss for the second quarter of 2002 included stock-based compensation and amortization of intangibles charges of $480,000 and $843,000, respectively.
Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2003 were $31,135,000 compared with revenues of $30,199,000 for the first six months of 2002. For the six months ended June 30, 2003, ArQule reported net income of $285,000, or $0.01 per share. This compares with a net loss of $13,304,000, or $0.63 per share, for the six months ended June 30, 2002. Net loss for the first half of 2002 included stock-based compensation and amortization of intangibles charges of $2,190,000 and $1,687,000, respectively.
ArQule ended the second quarter of 2003 with approximately $83 million in cash and marketable securities.
"ArQule's solid achievements during the second quarter reinforce our strategy to transform ArQule into an efficient drug discovery and development company," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and Chief Executive Officer. "While pursuing opportunities to expand our pipeline and biological expertiseculminating in last week's announcement regarding the proposed acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticalswe continued to efficiently meet all of our collaborators' expectations. In addition, we progressed our lead internal discovery program involving p38 MAP Kinase."
David C. Hastings, ArQule's Chief Financial Officer, summarized the Company's second quarter, "ArQule's strong financial performance was driven by continued operating efficiencies and tight cost controls. This performance gives ArQule a strategic advantage as we invest in our drug discovery and development programs."
Financial Guidance
As stated in last week's announcement, ArQule anticipates the acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticals will not affect ArQule's previous guidance for revenue and total operating expenses, excluding purchase accounting.
For the year, ArQule still expects revenues to range between $56 and $58 million. The total cost of revenue is expected to range between $37 and $38 million, an improvement from previous guidance of
between $40 and $41 million, due to increased operating efficiencies. ArQule now expects total research and development expense to range between $20 and $21 million, an increase from previous guidance of between $17 and $18 million. This reflects the anticipated increase in development spending as ArQule expects to commence Phase I clinical trials with Cyclis' lead compound CO-501 this year, provided the acquisition of Cyclis closes successfully. In addition, ArQule's research and development expense includes the cost of the research scientists expected to join ArQule as a result of the Cyclis acquisition. ArQule's marketing, general and administrative expenses are still expected to range between $10 and $11 million, unchanged from previous guidance. ArQule's net investment income is now expected to range between $500,000 and $600,000, a slight reduction from previous guidance of between $600,000 and $700,000. ArQule's weighted average shares for the year are expected to range between 24.5 and 25 million.
With respect to the purchase accounting for the Cyclis acquisition, ArQule expects to incur a charge of approximately $30 million related to the in-process research and development of Cyclis. This represents substantially all of the purchase price paid and is subject to audit and change depending on the final valuation of the transaction.
ArQule now expects its net loss for 2003 to range from $40 to $42 million. This includes the impact of the estimated in-process research and development charge of approximately $30 million to be recorded at the close of the Cyclis acquisition.
The Cyclis acquisition, which is subject to the approval of the stockholders of Cyclis and to customary closing conditions, is expected to close in August 2003.
ArQule now expects its net use of cash this year to range between $24 and $26 million. This is an increase from previous guidance of a net use of cash of between $12 and $14 million for 2003 and includes payments of substantially all Cyclis' liabilities of between $5 and $6 million and the cash portion of the purchase price of $5 million.
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time. Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO, and David C. Hastings, Vice President and CFO, will lead the call.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112, and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820. The access code is 534785.
ArQule, Inc., a recognized leader in small-molecule chemistry, is pursuing a strategy to become an efficient drug discovery and development company. ArQule provides high quality library design and compound production to pharmaceutical collaborators. The Company also is building a discovery portfolio of small-molecule compounds, or Optimal Chemical Entities (OCEs), that possess the best balance of drug-like properties. In addition, ArQule is focused on building a clinical portfolio in oncology and inflammation.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: that ArQule may never
successfully transform itself into an efficient drug discovery and development company; that ArQule may not be able to successfully close the acquisition of Cyclis in August 2003 or ever; the ability to successfully integrate the acquired technologies and assets; the possibility that anticipated efficiencies resulting from the Cyclis transaction may not be realized; unforeseen circumstances or events relating to the progress of product research and development activities in ArQule's portfolio and projected expenditures relating thereto; that due to the inability to enter into future collaborations with pharmaceutical or biotechnology companies, raise additional funds in uncertain equity markets, or other unforeseen circumstances, ArQule may not be able to commence clinical trials for CO-501 in 2003 or ever; the possibility that ArQule may not be able financially or otherwise to complete clinical trials for CO-501 and may not be able to come to terms on a commercially reasonable out-license or sale of CO-501; that as a result of unforeseen delays ArQule may not be able to identify a p38 MAP Kinase candidate for GLP-toxicology testing by the end of 2003; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 31, 2003. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward- looking statement except to the extent required by law.
QuickLinks
ARQULE REPORTS SECOND QUARTER 2003 FINANCIAL RESULTS Conference call and webcast scheduled for today at 9 a.m. Eastern Time
ArQule, Inc. Condensed Statement of Operations (In Thousands, Except Per Share Amounts) (Unaudited)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20030819164424.txt.gz
TIME:20030819164424
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
This Current Report on Form 8-K is being submitted solely to re-file certain exhibits subject to a request for confidential treatment.
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c)  Exhibits
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
     THIS AGREEMENT ("Agreement") is made and entered into effective as of the 16th day of June, 1995 ("Effective Date"), by and between ABBOTT LABORATORIES, an Illinois corporation having a principal place of business at 100 Abbott Park Road, Abbott Park, Illinois 60064 ("Abbott") and ARQULE, INC., a Delaware corporation having a principal place of business at 200 Boston Avenue, Suite 3600, Medford, Massachusetts 02155 (ArQule").
     WHEREAS, ArQule has expertise relating to the modification of pharmaceutical compounds by use of combinatorial chemistry methods utilizing rapid parallel synthesis;
     WHEREAS, Abbott has expertise in the discovery, development, marketing and sale of pharmaceuticals and other health care products;
     WHEREAS, Abbott desires to have ArQule generate large numbers of ArQule's own compounds as well as compounds derived from specifically targeted parallel synthesis of Abbott provided compounds;
     WHEREAS, Abbott desires to perform screening of ArQule's compounds and compounds derived by ArQule from Abbott provided compounds for possible further research and development by Abbott;
[*]=CERTAIN INFORMATION IN THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN OMITTED AND FILED SEPARATELY WITH THE COMMISSION. CONFIDENTIAL TREATMENT HAS BEEN REQUESTED WITH RESPECT TO THE OMITTED PORTIONS. OMITTED TEXT IS INDICATED BY A "*".
 
     WHEREAS, as part of such research and development effort and contingent upon ArQule performing research and development activities under a mutually agreed upon research and development plan, Abbott shall provide certain funding to ArQule for its research and development activities; and
     WHEREAS, if Abbott commercially develops any such compounds, Abbott shall pay ArQule milestone payments on such compounds which achieve certain commercial milestones as well as royalties on commercial sales of pharmaceutical products containing such compounds, all on the terms and conditions stated below;
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing premises and mutual covenants contained herein, Abbott and ArQule hereby agree as follows:
     For the purposes of this Agreement, the terms defined in this Article 1 shall have the respective meanings set forth below:
     1.1 "" shall mean an Abbott Core Compound (as defined below) or an Abbott Derivative Compound (as defined below).
Abbott Compound
     1.2 "" shall mean a core chemical compound supplied to ArQule by Abbott pursuant to Section 2.1.
Abbott Core Compound
     1.3 "" shall mean a chemical compound generated by ArQule for Abbott by use of chemical modification methods from an Abbott Core Compound pursuant to Section 2.1.
Abbott Derivative Compound
 
     1.4 "" shall mean *.
Abbott Field
     1.5 "" shall mean an ArQule Array (as defined below) that contains at least one (1) Active ArQule Compound (as defined below).
Active ArQule Array
     1.6 "" shall mean an ArQule Compound that * in the relevant assay at a concentration of *, or such higher concentration level demonstrating significant biological activity as the parties may mutually agree upon.
Active ArQule Compound
     1.7 "" shall mean, with respect to a party, any other business entity which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, such party. A business entity or party shall be regarded as in control of another business entity if it owns, or directly or indirectly controls, more than fifty percent (50%) of the voting stock or other ownership interest of the other business entity. For purposes of this Agreement, Abbott Affiliates shall also include the following entities: Abbott Laboratories (India) Ltd. and Abbott Laboratories Nigeria Limited.
Affiliate
     1.8 "" shall mean a set of at least * ArQule Core Compounds (as defined below) provided by ArQule to Abbott for screening pursuant to Section 5.1.
ArQule Array
     1.9 "" shall mean an ArQule Core Compound or an ArQule Derivative Compound (as defined below).
ArQule Compound
     1.10 "" shall mean a core chemical compound from an ArQule Array supplied by ArQule to Abbott pursuant to Section 5.1.
ArQule Core Compound
 
     1.11 "" shall mean a chemical compound generated by ArQule for Abbott or by Abbott, its Affiliates or contractors by use of chemical modification methods from an ArQule Core Compound.
ArQule Derivative Compound
     1.12 "" shall mean *.
ArQule Field
     1.13 "" shall mean a period of three (3) Contract Years (as defined below) commencing on the Effective Date.
Array Screening Period
     1.14 "" shall mean a period of two (2) Contract Years commencing on the Effective Date.
Array Transfer Period
     1.15 "" shall mean each of the three (3) month periods beginning on January 1, April 1, July 1 and October 1 of each year.
Calendar Quarter
     1.16 "" shall mean a pharmaceutical product containing a Product (as defined below) and at least one (1) other therapeutically active ingredient.
Combination Product
     1.17 "" shall mean any national or European Union patent(s) of either party or their Affiliates issued anywhere in the Territory (as defined below) which claims an Abbott Derivative Compound or an ArQule Compound, including any patent(s) issuing from any divisions, continuations, continuations-in-part, reexaminations, or reissues thereof, and any additions, renewals, and extensions of such patent(s).
Composition of Matter Patent
     1.18 "" shall mean the three (3) month period beginning on the Effective Date and each subsequent three (3) month period during the Research Term.
Contract Quarter
 
     1.19 "" shall mean the twelve (12) month period beginning on the Effective Date and each subsequent twelve (12) month period during the term of this Agreement.
Contract Year
     1.20 "" shall mean the United States Food and Drug Administration or any successor entity thereto.
FDA
     1.21 "" shall mean one (1) or more employees of a party who, collectively, spend time and effort working on a specified project or task equivalent to the time and effort of one (1) full-time employee of a party working on such project or task.
FTE
     1.22 "" shall mean a specific ArQule Compound from a Licensed Compound Set that Abbott commercially develops, markets and/or sells pursuant to Section 5.9.
Licensed Final Compound
     1.23 "" shall mean a list of specific ArQule Compounds licensed to Abbott by ArQule, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 5.6, as well as all prodrugs, esters and salt forms of such ArQule Compounds.
Licensed Compound Set
     1.24 "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5.6(a).
Licensed Set Core
     1.25 "" shall mean a period of ten (10) Contract Years commencing on the Effective Date.
License Option Period
     1.26 "" shall mean a New Drug Application filed with the FDA with respect to a Product.
NDA
     1.27 "" shall mean:
Net Sales
 
 
 
 
     1.28 "" shall mean (a) all patent applications filed anywhere in the Territory by either party or their Affiliates having claims relating to a Product, Abbott Derivative Compound or ArQule Compound, or the process of manufacture or use thereof, together with any patents issuing therefrom (including but not limited to Composition of Matter Patents), and (b) all divisions, continuations, continuations-in-part, reexaminations, reissues, additions, renewals and extensions of such patent applications and patents. Patent Rights owned by Abbott shall be referred to as "Abbott Patent Rights", Patent Rights owned by ArQule shall be referred to as "ArQule Patent Rights", and Patent Rights owned by ArQule and Abbott jointly shall be referred to as "Joint Patent Rights", with ownership of Patent Rights to be determined in accordance with United States patent laws and practice.
Patent Rights
 
     1.29 "" shall mean a program of clinical studies approved by the FDA or other equivalent national or supranational regulatory agencies outside of the United States which, if successfully completed to the satisfaction of the FDA or equivalent agencies outside of the United States, is intended to enable the sponsor of the studies to file an NDA and/or other equivalent applications for Regulatory Approval (as defined below).
Phase Ill Studies
     1.30 "" shall mean any product containing an Abbott Derivative Compound or an ArQule Compound.
Product
     1.31 "" shall mean the Research and Development Committee established by the parties pursuant to Article 3.
R & D Committee
     1.32 "" shall mean the twelve (12) month rolling plan of ArQule research and development activities to be developed by the R & D Committee pursuant to Article 3.
R & D Plan
     1.33 "" shall mean the research and development program funded by Abbott at ArQule as described in Article 3.
R & D Program
     1.34 "" shall mean all governmental approvals required to market and sell a Product in any given country or multinational region in the Territory (e.g., the European Union), including but not limited to, product registrations, medical approvals, and price/marketing approvals.
Regulatory Approval
     1.35 "" shall mean the two (2) year program of collaborative research by Abbott and ArQule hereunder, which may be extended by Abbott pursuant to Section 2.3 for up to three (3) additional successive one (1) year periods.
Research Term
 
     1.36 "" shall mean one (1) or more Active ArQule Array(s) for which Abbott exercises a Target Reservation (as defined below) in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 5.5.
Reserved Array(s)
     1.37 "" shall mean, with respect to each Product in each country of the Territory where Abbott's obligation to pay royalties pursuant to Section 6.3 is in effect, the period of time commencing with the first commercial sale of such Product by Abbott, its Affiliates and/or sublicensees to an unrelated third party in such country and continuing until Abbott's obligation to pay royalties pursuant to Section 6.3 ceases in such country.
Royalty Term
     1.38 "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5.5.
Target
     1.39 "" shall mean an Abbott's designation of one (1) or more Active ArQule Arrays as Reserved Arrays for a specified Target pursuant to Section 5.5.
Target Reservation
     1.40 "" shall mean the entire world.
Territory
     1.41 "" shall mean a claim of an issued and unexpired Composition of Matter Patent which neither has been held unenforceable or invalid by a decision of a court or governmental agency of competent jurisdiction, unappealable or unappealed within the time allowed for appeal, nor has been admitted by the holder of the Composition of Matter Patent to be invalid or unenforceable through reissue, reexamination, disclaimer, abandonment or otherwise.
Valid Claim
     Additional terms used in specific sections of this Agreement shall be defined in such sections.
 
     2.1 . Under the direction of the R & D Committee, during the Research Term ArQule shall synthesize Abbott Derivative Compounds from Abbott Core Compounds and/or other Abbott Derivative Compounds supplied to ArQule by Abbott. ArQule shall deliver such Abbott Derivative Compounds to Abbott in a format suitable for use by Abbott in accordance with the R & D Plan, together with structure and purity information and such other information and documentation as Abbott may reasonably request concerning the structural changes ArQule has made to (a) Abbott Core Compounds to synthesize Abbott Derivative Compounds and/or (b) Abbott Derivative Compounds to synthesize further Abbott Derivative Compounds. Except as otherwise agreed by the parties or the R & D Committee, ArQule shall supply Abbott with all quantities of Abbott Derivative Compounds synthesized by ArQule. ArQule shall supply Abbott with mutually agreed upon quantities of each Abbott Derivative Compound in accordance with the R & D Plan, as determined by the R & D Committee, provided that Abbott has supplied ArQule with the necessary quantities of Abbott Core Compounds in accordance with the R & D Plan. ArQule shall conduct the research and development activities described in this Section in a good scientific manner and in compliance with all applicable federal, state and local laws and regulations.
ArQule Research and Development Activities
     2.2 . Unless otherwise agreed in writing by the R & D Committee or the parties, within thirty (30) days after the Effective
ArQule FTE Requirements
 
Date and thereafter for the remainder of the Research Term, ArQule shall maintain a minimum of * FTE scientists to perform research and development activities for Abbott Derivative Compounds and such other activities as the R & D Committee may designate in accordance with the R & D Plan. ArQule employees performing such activities shall be competent, reasonably qualified and adequately trained for their respective duties, and ArQule shall provide Abbott with such information and documentation as Abbott may reasonably request concerning the qualifications and job performance of such ArQule employees, as well as the time they spend performing such activities. The number of FTEs may be increased or decreased by mutual written agreement of the parties upon such terms as may be mutually agreed upon.
     2.3 . The Research Term shall commence on the Effective Date and continue for a period of two (2) Contract Years thereafter. In accordance with Section 2.4, Abbott may, at its option, extend the Research Term for up to three (3) additional Contract Years, exercisable one (1) Contract Year at a time, upon written notice to ArQule at least six (6) months prior to the then scheduled expiration of the Research Term.
Research Term
     2.4 . In consideration of the research and development activities to be performed by ArQule pursuant to Section 2.1, Abbott shall make the following payments to ArQule:
Research Term Payments
 
     3.1 . The parties hereby establish an R & D Committee to monitor the ArQule research and development activities conducted under this Agreement.
Establishment
     3.2 . The R & D Committee shall develop an initial R & D Plan covering the first twelve (12) months of the Research Term within thirty (30) days of the Effective Date and, thereafter for the remainder of the Research Term, shall update the R & D Plan to provide for a rolling twelve (12) month R & D Plan at least once per Contract Quarter. The R & D Plan shall contain performance goals for ArQule's research and development activities under
R & D Plan
 
Section 2.1, including but not limited to minimum numbers of Abbott Derivative Compounds to be developed from Abbott Core Compounds and supplied to Abbott, a timetable and budget for key research and development activities, and such other items as may be agreed upon by the R & D Committee. ArQule shall use commercially reasonable efforts to achieve the performance goals specified in the R & D Plan.
     3.3 . In addition to developing and updating the R & D Plan pursuant to Section 3.2, the R & D Committee shall also have the following responsibilities during the Research Term: (a) monitoring ArQule's research and development activities in accordance with the R & D Plan, (b) recommending changes in the number of FTEs and Abbott's level of research and development funding, if necessary or appropriate to accomplish the objectives of the R & D Plan, provided that any such changes shall require the prior written approval of both parties, and (c) reporting the status of ArQule's research and development activities hereunder to both parties at least once per Calendar Quarter.
Additional Responsibilities
     3.4 . The R & D Committee shall consist of six (6) members, with three (3) members being appointed by each party. The initial R & D Committee members are:
Membership
 
Each party may remove and replace its R & D Committee members at any time, without cause, upon written notice to the other party. An alternate member designated by a party in writing shall be entitled to vote only in the absence of a permanent member designated by such party. All references to "members" in this Agreement refer to the permanent members of the R & D Committee and any alternate member when acting in the place of a permanent member, unless the context requires otherwise.
     3.5 . Any action or decision by the R & D Committee must be approved by a majority of the members present at a duly convened meeting of the R & D Committee, including at least one (1) member appointed by each party, or, pursuant to Section 3.8, approved by written consent of a majority of the members, including at least one (1) member appointed by each party. If the R & D Committee cannot agree on a particular matter within the scope of its responsibilities, the matter shall be submitted for dispute resolution in accordance with Article 12.
Actions
     3.6 . The R & D Committee shall meet within thirty (30) days after the Effective Date and, thereafter for the remainder of the Research Term, according to a schedule of regular meetings established by the members of the R & D Committee. In no event, however, shall the R & D Committee meet less frequently than once every Contract Quarter during the Research Term. Additional meetings of the R & D Committee may be called by any two (2) members, one (1) of which shall have been appointed by each party. Notice of the date, time and place of each regular or additional meeting and a proposed
Meetings
 
agenda for the meeting shall be provided to the members, when practicable, at least fifteen (15) days prior to the scheduled date of the meeting (unless notice is waived in writing by a member or party).
     3.7 . Except as otherwise provided in Section 3.8 or as otherwise mutually agreed by the parties, the regular and additional meetings of the R & D Committee shall alternate between the principal business locations of each party.
Locations of Meetings
     3.8 . Any regular or additional meeting of the R & D Committee may be conducted in person or by telephone conference. The R & D Committee may act without a meeting if prior to such action a written consent to the action is signed by a majority of the members, including at least one (1) member appointed by each party. Minutes reflecting actions taken at meetings shall be maintained at a mutually agreed upon location, together with any other books and records of the R & D Committee, and such minutes shall be distributed to the parties upon request.
Conduct of Meetings
     3.9 . Each party shall furnish to the R & D Committee all information and documentation that are reasonably required for purposes of this Agreement, which disclosures shall be subject to the confidentiality obligations specified in Section 8.1. In addition, it is anticipated that the parties will engage in frequent informal communications regarding the research and development activities conducted under this Agreement.
Cooperation of Parties
     3.10 . R & D Committee members shall have the right to visit the facilities where ArQule's research and development activities
Visits to ArQule Facilities
 
hereunder are being conducted at any time during ArQule regular business hours upon reasonable prior notice. Other Abbott representatives may also visit such facilities upon reasonable prior notice with ArQule's prior written consent, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. Abbott shall bear its own expenses relating to visits to such facilities by its representatives.
     4.1 . All Abbott Core Compounds supplied to ArQule hereunder shall be the sole and exclusive property of Abbott, except to the extent of any rights held by third parties who have licensed or supplied Abbott Core Compounds to Abbott. ArQule shall not acquire any licenses or intellectual property rights in or relating to Abbott Core Compounds hereunder, and ArQule, its Affiliates, employees and agents shall execute such documents and take such other actions as Abbott deems appropriate to establish or protect Abbott's proprietary rights in Abbott Core Compounds. With respect to any Abbott Core Compounds that are not proprietary to Abbott, ArQule's acceptance of such Abbott Core Compounds and synthesis of Abbott Derivative Compounds from such Abbott Core Compounds shall not preclude ArQule from: (a) entering into an agreement with a third party with respect to research, development and commercialization of such Abbott Core Compounds if they are lawfully in the possession of such third party or (b) having an internal ArQule program (including programs with academic collaborators) concerning the research, development and commercialization of
Ownership of Abbott Core Compounds
 
such Abbott Core Compounds, provided that ArQule does not use any Abbott Confidential Information (as defined in Section 8.1) in connection with such research, development and commercialization pursuant to (a) or (b) above.
     4.2 . All Abbott Derivative Compounds synthesized by ArQule, its Affiliates or contractors hereunder shall be the sole and exclusive property of Abbott, except to the extent of any rights held by third parties who have licensed or supplied Abbott Core Compounds to Abbott. Ownership of intellectual property rights in or relating to Abbott Derivative Compounds shall be determined in accordance with Article 10. ArQule hereby grants Abbott a worldwide, royalty-free, irrevocable, exclusive license (with the right to sublicense) under any ArQule Patent Rights and Joint Patent Rights in or relating to any Abbott Derivative Compounds to make, have made, use, import, offer to sell, and sell any product that contains an Abbott Derivative Compound.
Ownership of Abbott Derivative Compounds
     4.3 . Abbott may perform such further research and development activities on Abbott Compounds as Abbott deems appropriate in its sole discretion. Except for payments of royalties and milestone payments on Abbott Derivative Compounds pursuant to Article 6, Abbott shall have no obligations to ArQule with respect to Abbott Compounds hereunder.
Further Research and Development Activities
 
     5.1 . During the Array Transfer Period, ArQule shall deliver to Abbott * ArQule Arrays per Contract Year. ArQule may, at its option, also deliver to Abbott additional ArQule Arrays. ArQule shall select the ArQule Arrays to be delivered to Abbott hereunder and the ArQule Core Compounds within each such ArQule Array, provided that each ArQule Core Compound shall appear only once in any ArQule Array delivered to Abbott hereunder. Except as otherwise agreed by Abbott, ArQule shall supply Abbott with a minimum quantity of * of each ArQule Compound in such ArQule Arrays or * percent (*%) of the material synthesized by ArQule of each ArQule Compound in such ArQule Arrays, whichever is less. ArQule acknowledges that it is its intention to synthesize approximately * of each ArQule Core Compound, whenever ArQule determines that synthesis of such quantities of ArQule Core Compounds is chemically feasible and commercially reasonable. ArQule shall conduct the research and development activities described in this Section in a good scientific manner and in compliance with all applicable federal, state and local laws and regulations.
Delivery of ArQule Arrays
     5.2 . During the Array Screening Period, Abbott shall have the right, either directly or through Abbott's Affiliates or third party contractors selected by Abbott, to perform such testing and analytical work as Abbott deems appropriate on ArQule Core Compounds received hereunder, provided that Abbott shall have the right to perform composition and
Screening of ArQule Compounds
 
structural analysis only after Abbott's receipt of confirmed chemical composition and structure and purity information pursuant to Section 5.3, and further provided that Abbott shall not perform significant derivitization work on ArQule Core Compounds until Abbott makes a Target Reservation for the ArQule Array containing such ArQule Core Compounds pursuant to Section 5.5. The parties agree that "significant derivitization work" shall mean any derivitization work beyond that which is reasonably necessary to allow Abbott to determine whether an ArQule Core Compound is sufficiently amenable to chemical modification to warrant the exercise of a Target Reservation by Abbott.
     5.3 . Upon Abbott's written request at any time during the Array Screening Period, ArQule shall provide Abbott with the confirmed chemical composition and structure and purity information for any Active ArQule Compound in an ArQule Array upon presentation by Abbott of reasonably sufficient documentation of the biological activity for which Abbott is testing. Prior to revealing such documentation to ArQule, Abbott shall remove any reference to the type of biological activity detected and the assay used, and Abbott shall not identify in any other manner such biological activity or assay except in accordance with Section 5.4. Upon Abbott's written request, ArQule shall also provide Abbott with the confirmed chemical composition and structure and purity information for additional ArQule Compounds in the ArQule Array that contains the Active ArQule Compound, but only if such ArQule Compounds exhibit biological activity less than or equal to the Active ArQule Compound.
Identification of ArQule Compounds
 
     5.4 .
Additional Quantities of ArQule Compounds
 
 
     5.5 .
Target Reservations and Reserved Arrays
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
     5.6     
License Rights.
 
 
 
     5.7       Abbott hereby grants ArQule:
License from Abbott.
 
     5.8      During the Array Screening Period, at no cost to Abbott, ArQule shall provide Abbott with reasonable technical support relating to the synthesis of ArQule Derivative Compounds. Such technical support shall be in the form of consultation and advice only, and shall not include any on-site instruction or the performance of any chemical synthesis.
Synthetic Support.
     5.9      Abbott shall have the sole discretion to determine which Licensed Final Compounds and Products, if any, to develop or market, or to continue to develop or market, as well as those Licensed Final Compounds and Products for which Regulatory Approvals may be sought, and when, where, how and on what terms and conditions to market such Licensed Final Compounds and Products in the Territory. All Regulatory Approvals for Licensed Final Compounds and Products shall be owned solely by Abbott.
Further Development and Regulatory Approvals.
     5.10      The parties acknowledge and agree that ArQuIe may make ArQule Arrays available to third parties in addition to Abbott for screening and analytical work and possible further research and development work. If ArQule enters into an agreement with any third party and the general terms of such agreement relating to ArQule Arrays are substantially similar to the terms of this Agreement relating to ArQule Arrays, except that the financial terms of such third party agreement relating to ArQule Arrays, considered in the aggregate, are more favorable than the financial terms relating
Agreements With Third Parties.
 
to ArQule Arrays under this Agreement, then Abbott may, at its option, elect to substitute the financial terms of such third party agreement relating to ArQule Arrays for the financial terms of this Agreement relating to ArQule Arrays in their entirety.
     5.11      ArQule acknowledges and agrees that Abbott shall have the right to commercially develop, market and sell ArQule Derivative Compounds synthesized by Abbott that are (a) not included in any Licensed Compound Set and (b) not covered by any ArQule Patent Rights, subject to Abbott's obligation to pay royalties and milestone payments to ArQule pursuant to Article 6. Abbott acknowledges and agrees that ArQule makes no warranties with respect to such ArQule Derivative Compounds.
Other ArQule Compounds.
     6.1      In consideration of ArQule's entering into this Agreement and the rights and licenses granted by ArQule to Abbott hereunder, Abbott shall pay ArQule the following milestone payments with respect to each Abbott Derivative Compound and ArQule Compound commercially developed by Abbott hereunder:
Milestone Payments.
 
     6.2      If Abbott determines, in its business judgment, to commercially develop and/or seek Regulatory Approval of a different Abbott Derivative Compound or a different ArQule Compound in substitution of an Abbott Derivative Compound or ArQule Compound for which Abbott has paid one (1) or more milestone payments pursuant to Section 6.1, then Abbott shall not be required to pay the same milestone payment(s) for the substituted Abbott Derivative Compound or ArQule Compound, as applicable (e.g., if Abbott has paid the $* milestone payment referenced in Section 6.1(a) after * with respect to Compound A and then Abbott subsequently substitutes
No Multiple Milestone Payments.
 
Compound B for Compound A, Abbott shall have no obligation to pay a second $* milestone payment for * with respect to Compound B. However, Abbott would still be obligated to make the milestone payments referenced in Section 6.1(b)-(e) for Compound B, if applicable).
     6.3      In further consideration of the rights and licenses granted to Abbott hereunder, Abbott shall pay ArQule royalties on Net Sales at the following royalty rates:
Royalty Rates and Payments.
 
     6.4      In addition to royalty payments pursuant to Section 6.3, with respect to any Products containing an ArQule Compound as a therapeutically active ingredient, Abbott shall pay ArQule a lump sum royalty payment of * Dollars ($*), payable within sixty (60) days after the end of the first calendar year during the Royalty Term in which Net Sales of any such Product are greater than * Dollars ($*). This lump sum royalty payment shall be payable only once per Product during the term of this Agreement (i.e., no such payments shall be due during any subsequent calendar years in which Net Sales of the same Product are greater than $*).
Lump Sum Royalty Payment.
     6.5      Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth herein, Abbott shall have no obligation to pay ArQule royalties or milestone payments pursuant to this Article 6 with respect to any ArQule Core Compounds or Abbott Derivative Compounds that were in Abbott's possession (either by independent development or acquisition from a third party) prior to receipt thereof from ArQule, as evidenced
Certain Compounds Previously in Abbott's Possession.
 
by competent written records that Abbott presents to ArQule within sixty (60) days after Abbott's receipt of the chemical composition and structure of such ArQule Core Compounds or Abbott Derivative Compounds from ArQule.
     6.6      Commencing with the first Calendar Quarter in which Abbott, its Affiliates or sublicensees make the first commercial sale of any Product in the Territory, Abbott shall provide ArQule with a written report of Net Sales for each Product on a Product-by-Product, country-by-country basis within forty-five (45) days after the last day of March, June, September and December for royalties accruing on Net Sales in the United States during the three (3) preceding calendar months and within seventy-five (75) days after the last day of February, May, August and November for royalties accruing on Net Sales in the Territory outside of the United States during the three (3) preceding calendar months. Concurrently with the submission of each such written report, Abbott shall pay or cause to be paid to ArQule the total amount of royalties shown to be due thereon.
Royalty Reports and Payments.
     6.7      Abbott shall make all milestone and royalty payments to ArQule pursuant to this Article 6 in U.S. Dollars. Royalty payments earned shall be first determined by Abbott in the currency of the country where the Net Sales were made and then converted by Abbott directly to its equivalent in U.S. Dollars. The rates of exchange for converting the currencies involved to U.S. Dollars as quoted by the Statistical Market Letter published by International Reports, Inc. as Foreign Exchange Rates quoted in New York as market rate (bid) on the last business day of the quarterly period in which the royalty
Currency.
 
payments were earned shall be used by Abbott to determine such conversion rates.
     6.8      No royalties shall be payable to ArQule on sales between Abbott, its Affiliates or sublicensees, or between Abbott Affiliates and sublicensees.
No Royalties Payable Between Affiliates.
     6.9      No multiple royalties shall be payable because any Product, its manufacture, import, use, offer for sale, or sale is or shall be covered by multiple patents.
No Multiple Royalties.
     6.10      The parties acknowledge and agree that the milestone payments under Section 6.1 and the royalty payments under Sections 6.3 and 6.4 are the sole payments which may become due and owing by Abbott to ArQule in consideration for the license rights and other rights granted to Abbott by ArQule under Sections 4.2, 5.5(c), 5.6, and 5.11. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, upon expiration of the Royalty Term for each Product such license rights and other rights shall become fully paid-up and irrevocable.
Sole License Payments: Fully Paid-up License.
     7.1     Payments by Abbott to ArQule under this Agreement shall be made, at Abbott's option, either by check or by bank wire transfer to the address or bank account designated by ArQule.
Method of Payment.
     7.2      Each party shall maintain complete and accurate financial books and records in accordance with United States generally
Books and Records.
 
accepted accounting principles, consistently applied and in sufficient detail to allow verification of any amounts subject to payment or reimbursement hereunder, including without limitation the calculation of Net Sales. Each party shall retain such records at its principal place of business for three (3) years or such other period as the parties may agree in writing.
     7.3      Upon the written request of either party (but not more frequently than once in any calendar year), the requesting party may retain an independent certified public accountant, subject to approval by the other party (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld), to review such records of the other party to verify the accuracy of the payments made or payable hereunder. Such accountant shall be required to execute a confidentiality agreement in a form reasonably acceptable to the audited party and shall report to the auditing party (with a copy to the audited party) only the amount of any underpayment or overcharge. Within ten (10) business days after completion of such review, the parties shall reconcile any underpayment or overcharge. The auditing party shall pay the cost of any review of records conducted at its request under this Section, except that the audited party shall bear such cost if the audit reveals an underpayment of ten percent (10%) or greater. Such audit rights may be exercised by the parties only with respect to records of the other party for the current calendar year and the preceding two (2) calendar years.
Audit Rights.
 
     8.1      During the term of this Agreement and for a period of seven (7) years thereafter, each party (as such, a "Receiving Party") shall keep in confidence any information and/or documentation received from or on behalf of the other party (as such, a "Furnishing Party") that is in written or tangible form and marked or otherwise identified as confidential or proprietary or, if originally disclosed orally or visually, that is reduced to a written document marked or otherwise identified as confidential or proprietary within sixty (60) days of oral or visual disclosure ("Confidential Information"), and the Receiving Party shall use the Confidential Information only for purposes of this Agreement. Abbott Confidential Information shall also include, but is not limited to, any information disclosed to ArQule concerning Abbott Compounds, Targets and ArQule Arrays that Abbott has reserved or requested to reserve, and targets for which Abbott is or may be screening Abbott Compounds. ArQule Confidential Information shall also include, but is not limited to, any information disclosed to Abbott concerning the identity of ArQule Compounds or the commitment of any ArQule Compounds or ArQule Arrays to a third party or an internal ArQule program. Except as expressly provided in this Agreement, the Receiving Party shall not at any time use or permit others to use any Confidential Information for any purposes, except as may be necessary for the Receiving Party to perform its obligations hereunder. The foregoing obligations shall not apply to, and the definition of "Confidential Information" does not include:
Confidentiality.
 
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential Information to its employees, agents, and contractors to the extent reasonably necessary for the performance of this Agreement, provided that such recipients are subject in writing to obligations of confidentiality and non-use with respect to such information to substantially the same extent as the Receiving Party is obligated hereunder. Further, Abbott may disclose relevant ArQule Confidential Information to appropriate government authorities without the necessity of obtaining ArQule's approval to the extent Abbott deems it necessary or appropriate in connection with its applications for Regulatory Approvals anywhere in the Territory, provided that Abbott shall use commercially reasonable efforts to consult with ArQule at least thirty (30) days prior to such disclosure in order to provide ArQule with an opportunity to comment on (i) the content, form and necessity of such disclosures and (ii) any potential effect of such disclosures on ArQule Patent Rights and Joint Patent Rights, as well as to provide ArQule with an opportunity to seek confidential treatment, if available, of the ArQule Confidential Information to be disclosed.
     8.2      . Neither party shall use the name of the other party or reveal the terms of this Agreement in any publicity or advertising without the prior written approval of the other party, except that (a) either party may use the text of a written statement approved in advance by both parties without further approval, and (b) either party shall have the right to identify the other party and to disclose
Publicity
 
the terms of this Agreement as required by applicable securities laws or other applicable federal, state or local laws or regulations, provided that the disclosing party uses commercially reasonable efforts to notify the other party of such disclosures and to consult with the other party concerning the form and content of such disclosures prior to such disclosures.
     8.3      .
Proprietary Materials
 
     8.4      Upon the termination of this Agreement, at the request of the Furnishing Party,
Return of Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials.
 
the Receiving Party shall return to the Furnishing Party all originals, copies, and summaries of documents, materials, and other tangible manifestations of the Furnishing Party's Confidential Information in the possession or control of the Receiving Party, except that the Receiving Party may retain one (1) copy of the Furnishing Party's Confidential Information in the possession of its legal counsel solely for the purpose of monitoring its obligations under this Agreement. Upon the termination of this Agreement, the Recipient shall at the instruction of the Transferor either destroy or return any unused Proprietary Materials of the Transferor.
     Each party hereby represents and warrants to the other party as follows:
     9.1      . Such party (a) is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the state in which it is incorporated, (b) has the corporate power and authority and the legal right to own and operate its property and assets, to lease the property and assets it operates under lease, and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, and (c) is in compliance with all requirements of applicable laws and regulations, except to the extent that any noncompliance would not have a material adverse effect on the properties, business, financial or other condition of such party and would not materially adversely affect such party's ability to perform its obligations under this Agreement.
Corporate Existence and Power
 
     9.2      . Such party (a) has the corporate power and authority and the legal right to enter into this Agreement and to perform its obligations hereunder, and (b) has taken all necessary corporate action on its part to authorize the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the performance of its obligations hereunder. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered on behalf of such party, and constitutes a legal, valid, binding obligation, enforceable against such party in accordance with its terms.
Authorization and Enforcement of Obligations
     9.3      . All necessary consents, approvals and authorizations of all governmental authorities and other persons required to be obtained by such party in connection with the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement have been obtained.
Consents
     9.4      . The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the performance of such party's obligations hereunder (a) do not conflict with or violate any requirement of applicable laws or regulations and (b) do not conflict with, violate or breach or constitute a default or require any consent under, any contractual obligation of such party.
No Conflict
     9.5      . Such party shall perform its activities under this Agreement in compliance with all applicable national, federal, state and local laws and regulations.
Compliance with Laws
     9.6      . To the best of its knowledge based upon reasonably diligent investigation, the issued patents included within its respective Patent Rights as of the Effective Date are and shall
Patent Rights/Intellectual Property Infringement
 
be valid and enforceable. Neither party represents or warrants to the other party that the exercise of the rights granted to the other party under this Agreement shall not infringe any patent rights of any third party (including, but not limited to, ArQule licensees).
     10.1      . Abbott may, at its own expense, take such actions as it deems appropriate with respect to the preparation, filing, prosecution, issuance, maintenance, extension, enforcement and/or defense of all Patent Rights in or relating to Abbott Core Compounds (including but not limited to defending infringement suits and pursuing third party infringers). All Patent Rights in or relating to Abbott Core Compounds shall be in Abbott's name and shall be owned solely by Abbott.
Abbott Core Compounds
     10.2      . Abbott shall have sole control, at its expense, over the preparation, filing, prosecution, issuance, maintenance, extension, enforcement and/or defense of all Patent Rights in or relating to any Abbott Derivative Compounds. If any such Patent Rights constitute ArQule Patent Rights or Joint Patent Rights, Abbott shall use commercially reasonable efforts to consult with ArQule prior to any deadline or action with the United States Patent and Trademark Office ("PTO") or any foreign patent office, and to furnish ArQule with copies of all relevant documents in advance of such consultation.
Abbott Derivative Compounds
 
     10.3      . ArQule shall have sole control, at its expense, over the preparation, filing, prosecution, issuance, maintenance, extension, enforcement and/or defense of any ArQule Patent Rights in or relating to ArQule Compounds; provided that ArQule shall use commercially reasonable efforts to consult with Abbott prior to any deadline or action with the PTO or any foreign patent office, and to furnish Abbott with copies of all relevant documents in advance of such consultation. Abbott shall have sole control, at its expense, over the preparation, filing, prosecution, issuance, maintenance, extension, enforcement and/or defense of any Joint Patent Rights in or relating to ArQule Compounds; provided that Abbott shall use commercially reasonable efforts to consult with ArQule prior to any deadline or action with the PTO or any foreign patent office, and to furnish ArQule with copies of all relevant documents in advance of such consultation. Abbott shall have control, at its expense, over the preparation, filing, prosecution, issuance, maintenance, extension, enforcement and/or defense of any Abbott Patent Rights in or relating to ArQule Compounds.
ArQuIe Compounds
     10.4      . If a party decides not to seek or maintain patent protection in any country for an invention for which such party controls the preparation and filing of a patent application and/or patent, and if such patent application and/or patent would constitute an ArQule Patent Right or a Joint Patent Right, the other party, at its expense, may assume responsibility for and control over such Patent Right in the relevant country. If a party decides to terminate or abandon an ArQule Patent Right or a Joint Patent Right with respect to which such party has control, then such party shall notify the other
Waiver and Abandonment
 
party at least sixty (60) days prior to such event to enable the other party, at its expense, to assume responsibility for and control over such Patent Right in the relevant country.
     10.5      . Each party agrees to cooperate fully in the preparation, filing, prosecution, issuance, maintenance, extension, enforcement and/or defense of any Patent Rights in or relating to ArQuIe Compounds and Abbott Derivative Compounds. Such cooperation includes, but is not limited to:
Full Cooperation
     10.6      . The parties shall promptly inform each other of any information that comes to their attention involving actual or possible infringement of Patent Rights by any third party anywhere in the Territory or claims of alleged infringement made by any third party in the Territory
Notification of Infringement
 
against either party or its Affiliates resulting from the manufacture, import, offer for sale, sale or use of any Product.
     10.7      . Abbott shall have the right, under its own control and at its own expense, to pursue any third party infringer of ArQule Patent Rights or Joint Patent Rights in or relating to Abbott Derivative Compounds or ArQule Compounds that are in any Licensed Compound Set. Abbott may prosecute any infringement action in the name of ArQule, if so required by applicable law. If Abbott fails to initiate an infringement action within six (6) months after notification or knowledge of the basis for such action relating to a material infringement, ArQule shall have the right to prosecute such infringement, under its sole control and at its sole expense. Neither party shall enter into any settlement, consent judgment, or other voluntary final disposition of any infringement action without the prior written consent of the other party, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. Any recovery resulting from an infringement action brought under this Section shall be distributed in the following manner:
Prosecution of Infringement Actions
 
     10.8      . In the event that any third party initiates a declaratory judgment action alleging the invalidity or unenforceability of ArQuIe Patent Rights or Joint Patent Rights in or relating to Abbott Derivative Compounds or ArQule Compounds that are in any Licensed Compound Set, or if any third party brings an infringement action against Abbott or its Affiliates or sublicensees because of the exercise of the rights granted Abbott under this Agreement, then Abbott shall have the right to defend such action under its own control and at its own expense; provided, however, that in the case of a declaratory judgment action involving ArQule Patent Rights, ArQule shall have the right to intervene and assume sole control of such defense, at its own expense. Neither party shall enter into any settlement, consent judgment, or other voluntary final disposition of any action under this Section without the consent of the other party, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. Any recovery shall be retained entirely by the party controlling the action at its conclusion.
Third Party Claims
     10.9      . In the event of any patent infringement litigation in the Territory involving any Patent Rights and/or any Products, the non-prosecuting or non-defending party, as applicable, shall render such reasonable assistance as may be requested by the prosecuting or defending party in connection with such infringement actions.
Mutual Cooperation
 
     11.1      . Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold the other party, its Affiliates, contractors and sublicensees, and the officers, directors, employees and agents of each, harmless from and against any and all liabilities, damages, claims, demands, costs, or expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) claimed by any third party for any harm suffered by such third party to the extent such harm is determined to have been caused by the negligence or willful misconduct of the indemnifying party or the indemnifying party's manufacture or sale of any products, except to the extent caused by the negligence or willful misconduct of the indemnified party or the indemnified party's breach of this Agreement, and subject to the conditions of indemnification set forth in Section 11.2.
General Indemnification
     11.2      . With respect to any indemnification obligations of either party to the other party under this Agreement, the following conditions must be met for such indemnification obligations to become applicable:
Conditions of Indemnification
 
     11.3      . Each party shall maintain reasonably adequate insurance or self-insurance coverage for its potential liabilities to the other party in connection with the performance of this Agreement.
Insurance
     Except for actions commenced by or involving third parties and disputes to be resolved by Scientific Dispute Resolution pursuant to Exhibit B, all disputes arising out of or in connection with this Agreement shall be resolved as follows:
     12.1      . The parties shall promptly give each other written notice of any disputes requiring resolution hereunder, which written notice shall specify the Section(s) of this Agreement that the other party is alleged to have breached or that are in dispute, and shall briefly state the initiating party's claims. Thereafter, the parties shall use reasonable efforts to resolve any such disputes in an amicable manner.
Attempted Amicable Resolution
 
     12.2      . Any disputes arising in connection with this Agreement which cannot be resolved pursuant to Section 12.1 shall be referred, not later than thirty (30) days after initiation of dispute resolution proceedings pursuant to Section 12.1. to the following corporate officers of the parties for resolution:
Reference to Designated Officers
     For Abbott:
     Vice President, Pharmaceutical Products Research and Development
     (or his or her designee)
     For ArQule:
     Chief Executive Officer (or his or her designee)
Such officers (or their designees) shall attempt to resolve the dispute and shall communicate with each other by facsimile or telephone or in personal meetings in an effort to resolve the dispute.
     12.3      . Any disputes arising in connection with this Agreement which cannot be resolved pursuant to Sections 12.1 or 12.2 within sixty (60) days after initiation of dispute resolution proceedings under Section 12.1 shall be finally settled by binding Alternate Dispute Resolution ("ADR") in accordance with the attached Exhibit A. Judgment upon any award rendered in such ADR proceedings may be issued and enforced by any court having competent jurisdiction.
Alternate Dispute Resolution
     12.4      . The neutral in any ADR proceeding under Section 2.3 shall determine and notify the parties in writing:
ADR Ruling
 
     12.5      . The neutral in any ADR proceeding under Section 12.3 shall have the authority to award the non-breaching party the following relief:
ADR Remedies
 
     13.1      . Unless terminated earlier by mutual written agreement of the parties or pursuant to Section 13.2, this Agreement shall expire on the latter of: (a) the end of the License Option Period and (b) the date of expiration of the last Royalty Term for any Product to expire in any country in the Territory.
Expiration
     13.2      . Either party shall have the right, without prejudice to any other rights or remedies available to it, to terminate this Agreement for cause by written notice to the other party in any of the following events:
Early Termination
 
     13.3      . In the event that the alleged breaching party commences dispute resolution proceedings pursuant to Article 12, and if the dispute involves non-payment of funds under this Agreement, all payments that would be due and payable under this Agreement in the absence of any dispute shall be paid into an interest-bearing escrow account until the matter is resolved and such escrow funds (plus interest) shall be distributed in accordance with the decision reached in such dispute resolution proceedings.
Escrow Payments
     13.4      . Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, termination or expiration of this Agreement through any means and for any reason shall not result in the termination of any license rights hereunder, shall not relieve the parties of any obligations accruing prior thereto, and shall be without prejudice to the rights and remedies of either party with respect to any prior breach of any of the provisions of this Agreement. Except to the extent otherwise specified therein, the rights and obligations of the parties under the following provisions shall survive expiration or termination of this Agreement: Articles 7, 8 and 11.
Effect of Termination
 
     14.1       This Agreement contains the entire understanding of the parties with respect to the subject matter thereof and supersedes all previous verbal and written agreements, representations and warranties with respect to such subject matter. This Agreement may be amended only by a written agreement signed by authorized representatives of both parties.
Entire Agreement:
Amendment.
     14.2      Failure of either party to perform its obligations under this Agreement (except the obligation to make payments) shall not subject such party to any liability or constitute a breach of this Agreement if such failure is caused by any event or circumstances beyond the reasonable control of such nonperforming party, including without limitation acts of God, fire, explosion, flood, drought, war, riot, sabotage, embargo, strikes or other labor trouble, failure in whole or in part of suppliers to deliver on schedule materials, equipment or machinery, interruption of or delay in transportation, a national health emergency or compliance with any order or regulation of any government entity. A party whose performance is affected by a force majeure shall take reasonably prompt action to remedy the effects of the force majeure. If the non-performing party fails to substantially remedy the effects of the force majeure event within twelve (12) months after the date upon which the force majeure event first occurred, the parties shall in good faith negotiate such modifications to this Agreement as the parties deem appropriate to continue performance of this Agreement
Force Majeure.
 
notwithstanding such force majeure event. If the parties are unable to agree upon such modifications within sixty (60) days after the end of such twelve (12) month period and the non-performing party has still failed to substantially remedy the effects of the force majeure event, the party not affected by the force majeure event may terminate this Agreement upon thirty (30) days prior written notice to the non-performing party, in which case neither party shall have any liability to the other party with respect to any failure to perform to the extent caused by the force majeure event.
     14.3      A failure by either party to enforce any rights under this Agreement shall not be construed as a waiver of such rights nor shall a waiver by either party in one or more instances be construed as constituting a continuing waiver or as a waiver in other instances. Any waiver of breach executed by either party shall affect only the specific breach and shall not operate as a waiver of any subsequent or preceding breach.
Waiver.
     14.4      Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, neither party may sell, assign, pledge, delegate, subcontract or otherwise dispose of all or any portion of its rights or obligations under this Agreement except to an Affiliate or to a successor to all or substantially all of the party's business to which this Agreement relates. Subject to the foregoing, this Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties and their respective successors and permitted assigns. In the event ownership or control of ArQule changes after the Effective Date as a result of a merger, an acquisition or otherwise, this Agreement (including, but not limited to, Abbott's licenses and
No Assignment.
 
other rights pursuant to Sections 4.2, 5.5(c), 5.6, and 5.11) shall continue in effect notwithstanding such change of ownership or control.
     14.5      If any clause or provision of this Agreement is declared invalid or unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, such provision shall be severed and the remaining provisions of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. The parties shall use all commercially reasonable efforts to agree upon a valid and enforceable provision as a substitute for the severed provision, taking into account the intent of this Agreement.
Severability.
     14.6      The parties shall have the status of independent contractors under this Agreement and nothing in this Agreement shall be construed as authorization for either of the parties to act as a joint venturer with, agent for, or partner of, the other party.
Relationship of Parties.
     14.7      Any notice, request or other communication required to be given pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to be given (a) when delivered in person or by overnight courier, (b) five (5) days after being deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, certified, return receipt requested, or (c) when received after being sent by confirmed facsimile transmission to the parties, addressed as follows:
Notices.
 
Either party may change its address or its fax number by giving the other party written notice, delivered in accordance with this Section 14.7.
     14.8      Each party shall execute and deliver such further instruments and do such further reasonable acts and things as reasonably may be required to carry out the intent and purpose of this Agreement.
Further Instruments.
     14.9      The validity, performance, construction, and effect of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois, without giving effect to conflict of law rules. The parties expressly disclaim the applicability of the United Nations Convention on the International Sale of Goods to this Agreement.
Governing Law.
 
     14.10      This Agreement shall become binding when any one or more counterparts hereof, individually or taken together, bears the signature of each of the parties. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original as against the party whose signature appears thereon, but all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts.
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each party has caused this Agreement to be signed by its duly authorized representative as of the Effective Date.
 
The parties recognize that a bona fide dispute as to certain matters may arise from time to time during the term of this Agreement which relates to either party's rights and/or obligations. To have such a dispute resolved by this Alternative Dispute Resolution ("ADR") provision, a party first must send written notice of the dispute to the other party for attempted resolution by good faith negotiations between the parties pursuant to Sections 12.1 and 12.2.
Any negotiations regarding a dispute shall be treated as settlement negotiations for purposes of the Federal Rules of Evidence and any similar state rules of evidence. Such negotiations shall not be admissible in any subsequent ADR hearing.
If the matter has not been resolved within sixty (60) days after initiation of dispute resolution proceedings pursuant to Section 12.1, either party may initiate an ADR proceeding as provided herein (all references to "days" in this ADR provision are to calendar days). The parties shall have the right to be represented by counsel in such a proceeding.
 
 
 
 
 
If the parties are unable to agree on a redefined, non-conflicting Target pursuant to Section 5.5(e) within thirty (30) days of initiating negotiations, the parties shall resolve such dispute through a Scientific Dispute Resolution ("SDR") proceeding as provided herein (all references to "days" in this SDR proceeding are to calendar days).
 
 
     This Amendment No. 1 to Research, Development and License Agreement is dated as of August 13, 1996 by and between Abbott Laboratories, an Illinois corporation having a principal place of business at 100 Abbott Park Road, Abbott Park, Illinois ("Abbott") and ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation having a principal place of business at 200 Boston Avenue, Suite 3600, Medford, Massachusetts ("ArQule").
     WHEREAS, Abbott and ArQule have entered into that certain Research, Development and License Agreement, dated as of June 16, 1995 (the "License Agreement"), pursuant to which ArQule agreed, , to provide Abbott with certain ArQule Compounds and Abbott Derivative Compounds (these and other capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the respective meanings provided in the License Agreement) for screening in consideration of the payment by Abbott to ArQule of certain license fees, milestone payments and research funding payments on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the License Agreement; and
inter alia
     WHEREAS, ArQule and Abbott desire to amend the License Agreement to enable ArQule to supply Abbott with additional ArQule Compounds and to delete certain aspects of the License Agreement having to do with reservation of Targets and the Array Screening Period.
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
                     (a) The following definitions are hereby deleted from Article 1 of the License Agreement (and the remaining definitions in Article 1 are renumbered accordingly):
                     (b) The definition of "ArQule Array" originally set forth in Section 1.8 of the License Agreement (now renumbered as Section 1.10) is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
 
                     (c) The definition of "Licensed Final Compound" originally set forth in Section 1.23 of the License Agreement (now renumbered as Section 1.25is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
)
                     (d) The definition of "Licensed Compound Set" originally set forth in Section 1.24 of the License Agreement (now renumbered as Section 1.26) is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
                     (e) The following definitions are hereby added to Article 1 of the License Agreement (and the remaining definitions in Article 1 are renumbered accordingly):
 
               1.2. The first two sentences of Section 5.1 are hereby deleted in their entirety and replaced with the following:
 
               1.3. Section 5.2 of the License Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
 
     1.4. Sections 5.3 and 5.5 of the License Agreement are hereby deleted in their entirety (and the remaining sections in Article are renumbered accordingly).
5
     1.5. All references in Section 5.3(a) (as renumbered) of the License Agreement to "Active ArQule Compounds" are hereby changed to "Active ArQule Compounds and Active ArQule Homologs"; all references in Section 5.3(a) (as renumbered) of the License Agreement to "Section 5.3" are hereby changed to "Section 5.2."; and all references in Section 5.3(b) (as renumbered) of the License Agreement to "Section 5.4(a)" are hereby changed to "Section 5.3(a)".
     1.6. Sections 5.6(a) and (b) (as originally numbered) of the License Agreement are hereby deleted in their entirety and replaced with the following:
     1.7. Section 5.6(c) (as originally numbered) of the License Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
 
 
     1.8. All references to "Section 5.5(c)" and "Section 5.6" in Sections 6.10 and 14.4 of the License Agreement are hereby replaced by "Section 5.2" and "Section 5.4", respectively, and all references to "Section 56(c)" in Section 12.5 of the License Agreement are hereby replaced by "Section 5.5"
.
.
     1.9. Section 12.5(c) of the License Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and "and (c)" is hereby deleted from Section 12.5(a) of the License Agreement.
     1.10. Section 13.1 of the License Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
     1.11. Section 14.7 of the License Agreement is hereby amended by replacing the telephone and facsimile numbers for Abbott for purposes of notice with the following:
     1.12. to the License Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with attached hereto.
Exhibit B
Exhibit B
     2.1 This Amendment shall be governed in all respects by the laws of the State of Illinois without giving effect to principles of conflicts of law thereunder.
Governing Law.
     2.2 Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, the provisions hereof shall inure to the benefit of, and be binding upon, the successors, permitted assigns, heirs, executors and administrators of the parties hereto.
Successors and Assigns.
     2.3 Except as specifically provided herein, the License Agreement as previously executed shall remain in full force and effect.
License Agreement.
     2.4 This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts.
 
     2.5 Attached hereto as is a copy of the Agreement, as amended by this Amendment, reflecting the terms of the Agreement, as amended hereby, in effect as of the Amendment Date.
Restated Agreement.
Exhibit C
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have duly executed this Amendment as of the date first above written.
 
EXHIBIT B
 
EXHIBIT B
This Agreement, effective as of the date last written below, is by and among ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule"), Abbott Laboratories ("Abbott") and _____________________ ("Recipient").
     WHEREAS, Abbott and ArQule have entered into that certain Research, Development and License Agreement, dated as of June 16, 1995, as amended by Amendment No. 1 to Research, Development and License Agreement, dated as of August      , 1996 (as so amended, the "License Agreement"), pursuant to which ArQule has agreed, , to provide Abbott with certain compounds for screening on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the License Agreement; and
inter
alia
     WHEREAS, pursuant to Section 5.2 of the License Agreement, Abbott is permitted to deliver such compounds to third parties such as Recipient, provided such parties execute and deliver this Agreement to ArQule.
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
1.     : Within      days after receiving an original of this Agreement executed by all parties, Abbott will supply Recipient with the compounds set forth on (the "Materials"). Upon written request, Abbott may provide the Recipient with additional quantities of such Materials or with additional compounds, which compounds shall also be considered Materials for the purposes of this Agreement.
Supply of Materials
Exhibit A
2.     : Recipient acknowledges and agrees that the Materials are proprietary to and owned by ArQule and are or may be covered by claims of U.S. and international patents or patent applications of ArQule. Recipient agrees to use the Materials solely to screen them for potential pharmacological activity for Abbott using the assay procedure [previously disclosed to Abbott/set forth on . Recipient agrees (i) not to transfer such Materials to any third party without the prior written consent of ArQule and Abbott, (ii) to permit access to the Materials only to its employees and consultants requiring
Use and Transfer Restrictions
Exhibit B]
such access, (iii) to inform such employees and consultants of the proprietary nature of the Materials, (iv) to rake reasonable precautions, at least as stringent as those observed by Recipient to protect its own proprietary materials, to ensure that such employees and consultants observe the obligations of Recipient pursuant to this Section and (v) to execute and deliver any documents of assignment or conveyance that may be necessary to effectuate the ownership rights of ArQule in the Materials. Upon the expiration of this Agreement, Recipient shall, at the instruction of ArQule or Abbott, either destroy or return any unused Materials.
3.     : Recipient agrees to comply with all federal, state, and local laws and regulations applicable to the use, testing, storage, disposal, and transfer of the Materials, including without limitation the Toxic Substances Control Act (15 USC 2601 and implementing regulations (in particular, 40 CFR 720.36 [Research and Development Exemption]), the Food. Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USC 301 and implementing regulations, and all Export Administration Regulations of the Department of Commerce. Recipient assumes sole responsibility for any violation of such laws or regulations by Recipient or any of its affiliates or sublicensees.
Compliance with Law
et seq.
et seq.
4.      This Agreement shall commence on the date last written below and continue for a period of      months. Sections 3, 6 and 7 shall survive termination of this Agreement.
Termination:
5.     : Any Materials delivered pursuant to this Agreement are understood to be experimental in nature and may have hazardous properties. Recipient should assume that the Materials are dangerous and should use appropriate precautions. NEITHER ABBOTT NOR ARQULE MAKES ANY REPRESENTATIONS, OR EXTENDS ANY WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, WITH RESPECT TO THE COMPOUNDS. THERE ARE NO EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR
No Warranties
 
 
THAT THE USE OF THE MATERIALS WILL NOT INFRINGE ANY PATENT RIGHTS OF OTHERS.
6.     : Recipient agrees promptly to disclose to Abbott any and all ideas, concepts, discoveries, inventions, developments, improvements, trade secrets, technical data, know-how or biological materials that are conceived, devised, invented, developed or reduced to practice or tangible medium by Recipient, or any of its agents or employees, or under its direction, during the term of this Agreement and which arise out of its screening or evaluation of the Materials (hereinafter "Inventions"). Recipient hereby assigns to Abbott all of its right, title and interest in and to the Inventions and any and all related patent rights, copyrights and applications and registrations therefor. During and after the expiration of this Agreement, Recipient shall cooperate with Abbott, at Abbott's expense, in obtaining proprietary protection for the Inventions and shall execute all documents which Abbott shall reasonably request in order to perfect Abbott's rights in the Inventions.
Assignment of Inventions
7.     : Recipient assumes all liability for, and agrees to indemnify, defend, and hold harmless ArQule and Abbott and their respective directors, officers, representatives, employees, and agents against all losses, expenses (including without limitation any legal expenses), claims, demands, damages, judgments, suits, or other actions arising from the use, testing, storage, or disposal of the Materials by Recipient and its agents or employees, or from any breach of its obligations under Section 2 of this Agreement.
Indemnification
8.     : This Agreement shall not be assigned or otherwise transferred by Recipient without the prior written consent of ArQule and Abbott. This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. This Agreement constitutes the entire understanding of the parties and supersedes all prior agreements, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Miscellaneous
Address: ArQule, Inc. 200 Boston Avenue, Suite 3600 Medford, MA 02155 Tel:      (800) 644-5000 Fax:     (617) 395-1225
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT C
See the Research and Development and License Agreement filed as Exhibit 10.15 to the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-1 (File No. 333-11105).

 
Exhibit 99.2
[*]=CERTAIN INFORMATION IN THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN OMITTED AND FILED SEPARATELY WITH THE COMMISSION. CONFIDENTIAL TREATMENT HAS BEEN REQUESTED WITH RESPECT TO THE OMITTED PORTIONS. OMITTED TEXT IS INDICATED BY A "*".
 
     This Agreement, dated as of December 23, 1996, is between ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule"), a Delaware corporation, and Monsanto Company ("Monsanto"), a Delaware corporation.
     WHEREAS, ArQule has developed certain technology that has applications in the discovery and development of compounds for use in agriculture and ;
in planta
     WHEREAS, Monsanto desires that ArQule apply its technologies to the research and development of compounds with agricultural and applications for Monsanto; and
in planta
     WHEREAS, in exchange for payment by Monsanto of research funds, milestone payments and royalties, ArQule is willing to provide compound arrays for Monsanto testing and perform certain other compound development activities, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement;
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants set forth in this Agreement, the parties hereby agree as follows:
1.  .
Definitions
          "" shall mean any ArQule Derivative Compound or Monsanto Derivative Compound that exhibits substantial homology with an Active ArQule Compound or Active Monsanto Compound, respectively, as determined by the Research Committee.
Active Homolog
          "" shall mean any ArQule Compound or ArQule Derivative Compound which exhibits confirmed significant functional activity against a Target. The Research Committee shall establish the criteria for "significant functional activity" at the time of selection of each Target.
Active ArQule Compound
          "" shall mean any Active ArQule Compound or Active Monsanto Compound.
Active Compound
          "" shall mean any Monsanto Compound or Monsanto Derivative Compound which exhibits confirmed significant functional activity
Active Monsanto Compound
 
against a Target. The Research Committee shall establish the criteria for "significant functional activity" at the time of selection of each Target.
          "" shall mean advanced testing trials conducted by or for Monsanto in a manner representative of actual agricultural or industrial practices including (i) determining the performance or safety of a Licensed Compound or (ii) greenhouse, growth chamber or laboratory testing including radio-labeled synthesis and associated testing, advanced toxicity, environmental fate, and toxicity on non-target species including mammals and/or assembling field information necessary to obtain an EUP.
Advanced Field Trials
          "" shall mean this Array Delivery and Testing Agreement, together with Exhibit A and Exhibit B hereto.
Agreement
          "" shall mean any chemical molecule that is synthesized by ArQule using its proprietary technology and provided by ArQule to Monsanto under the Mapping Array Program or the Directed Array Program as described below.
ArQule Compound
          "" shall mean a Derivative Compound synthesized by ArQule from an ArQule Compound under the Directed Array Program described in Section 3.3.
ArQule Derivative Compound
          "" shall mean any testing or screening activity performed by ArQule itself with the primary purpose of determining the functional activity in the Field of ArQule Compounds or ArQule Derivative Compounds, but shall not include any advanced field trials.
ArQule Internal Discovery Program
          "" shall mean Patent Rights controlled or owned by ArQule as of the Effective Date or during the Research Period, as set forth in Section 5.1(b).
ArQule Patent Rights
          "" shall mean all information and data which is owned by or licensed by third parties to ArQule during the Research Program and is necessary or useful to conduct the screening to discover Active Compounds and Licensed Compounds or to develop, make, use, sell or seek regulatory approval in any country to market a product containing a Licensed Compound; all to the extent and only to the extent that ArQule now has or hereafter will have the right to grant licenses, immunities or other rights thereunder.
ArQule Technology
          "" shall mean a set of samples of structurally related chemical compounds arranged in a format such as a microtiter screening plate or another format as mutually agreed to by the Parties.
Array
          "" shall mean the base rate of interest charged to its best commercial customers from time to time by the Bank of Boston or its successor.
Base Rate of Interest
 
          "" shall mean the chemical or structural characteristics shared by a group of compounds as determined by the Research Committee pursuant to Section 2.2.
Chemical Theme
          "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.1.
Confidential Information
          "" shall mean each twelve (12) month fiscal year of the Research Period, commencing on January 1 of each year and concluding twelve (12) months thereafter.
Contract Year
          "" shall mean a chemical compound structurally derived in one or more steps from another by a process of modification (either through manipulation of a compound or synthesis from structural information provided hereunder) or partial substitution of at least one component wherein at least one structural feature is retained at each process step. The number of intermediate steps or compounds is not relevant to the classification of a compound as a Derivative Compound. A compound need not have structural similarity to another compound in order to be classified as a Derivative Compound.
Derivative Compound
          "" shall mean an Array comprised of ArQule Derivative Compounds synthesized by ArQule under the Directed Array Program described in Section 3.3.
Directed Array
          "" shall mean a Directed Array Program conducted by ArQule as set forth in Section 3.3, with each Directed Array Program consisting of multiple Arrays derived from one (1) Monsanto Compound, or one (1) Monsanto Derivative Compound, or one (1) ArQule Compound, or one (1) ArQule Derivative Compound.
Directed Array  Program
          "" shall mean that Party disclosing Confidential Information to the other Party under Section 8.
Disclosing Party
          "" shall mean Austria, Belgium, Denmark, Finland, France, Germany, Greece, Ireland, Italy, Luxembourg, Netherlands, Norway, Portugal, Spain, Sweden, United Kingdom and such other countries that may be subsequently admitted to or excluded from the EU.
EU
          "" shall mean an Experimental Use Permit.
EUP
          "" shall mean the date of execution of this Agreement by the Parties hereto, at which time this Agreement shall become effective.
Effective Date
 
          "" shall mean the Environmental Protection Agency (or its foreign equivalent responsible for approval of commercial use of Licensed Compounds as defined in the Field).
EPA
          "" shall mean a permit for field application issued by the EPA prior to label approval.
Experimental Use Permit
          "" shall mean those unusual capital expenses incurred by ArQule at the request of Monsanto which are not contemplated by the original Research Plan executed by the Parties.
Extraordinary Expenses
          "" shall mean the field of all agricultural and applications of any Licensed Compound.
Field
in planta
          "" shall mean any Patent Rights that are jointly owned by the Parties as of the Effective Date or during the Research Period, as set forth in Section 5.1(c).
Joint Patent Rights
          "" shall mean any Active Compound and Active Homologs thereto with respect to which the Research Committee has elected to conduct Preliminary Field Trials.
Licensed Compound
          "" shall mean an Array of ArQule Compounds synthesized by ArQule under the Mapping Array Program.
Mapping Array
          "" shall mean the Mapping Array component of the Research Program.
Mapping Array Program
           shall mean that agreement the form of which is attached as Exhibit B hereto.
Materials Transfer Agreement
          "" shall mean any chemical molecule provided by Monsanto or its Primary Affiliates to ArQule under the Mapping Array  Program or the Directed Array Program.
Monsanto Compound
          "" shall mean a Derivative Compound synthesized by ArQule from a Monsanto Compound under the Directed Array  Program.
Monsanto Derivative Compound
          "" shall mean Patent Rights controlled or owned by Monsanto as of the Effective Date or during the Research Period, as set forth in Section 5.1(a).
Monsanto Patent Rights
          "" shall mean the aggregate Net Sales Price of Royalty-Bearing Products in any Royalty Period.
Net Sales
 
          "" shall mean the gross amount received on sales by Monsanto, its Secondary Affiliates and Sublicensees of Royalty-Bearing Products, less the following amounts actually paid out by Monsanto, its Secondary Affiliates or Sublicensees or credited against the amounts received by them from the sale or distribution of Royalty-Bearing Product: (i) trade, quantity, and cash discounts or rebates actually allowed, (ii) credits or allowances given for complaints, rejections or returns, (iii) freight, shipping, or other costs of transportation paid or allowances made by Monsanto, its Secondary Affiliates or Sublicensees or charged to a customer, and (iv) sales and other excise or use taxes and duties imposed upon and paid by Monsanto with respect to the sale only to the extent included within the gross selling price. In the event that Monsanto, its Secondary Affiliates or Sublicensees receives non-monetary consideration for any Royalty-Bearing Products, the Net Sales Price shall be calculated based on the average price charged by Monsanto, its Secondary Affiliates or Sublicensees for such Royalty-Bearing Products in the same territory during the preceding Royalty Period less the items set forth in items (i) through (iv) above.
Net Sales Price
          "" means ArQule or Monsanto or their respective Primary Affiliates; "Parties" means ArQule and Monsanto and their respective Primary Affiliates.
Party
          "" shall mean all Valid Claims of all issued and subsisting patents and reissues, reexaminations, extensions and supplementary protection certificates thereof and all patent applications and any divisions, continuations, or continuations-in-part thereof.
Patent Rights
          "" shall mean, with respect to any Licensed Compound, preliminary testing first conducted by or for Monsanto to determine efficacy conducted under anticipated use conditions, generally in an external environment. Preliminary Field Trials does not include primary testing, which includes greenhouse, growth chamber or laboratory testing including associated testing for environmental fate, toxicity, and toxicity on non-target species including mammals.
Preliminary Field Trials
          "" of a Party shall mean a corporation or other legal entity that owns, directly or indirectly, fifty percent (50%) or more of the outstanding equity securities of a corporation which are entitled to vote in the election of directors or a fifty percent (50%) or greater interest in the net assets or profits of an entity which is not a corporation or any similar type of control relationship.
Primary Affiliate
          "" shall mean a group of Monsanto employees formed to facilitate product development analysis following successful completion of Advanced Field Trials.
Product Team
          "" shall mean that Party receiving Confidential Information under Section 8.1.
Receiving Party
          "" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.1.
Research Committee
 
          "" shall mean the period during which the applicable aspect (Mapping Array Program or Directed Array Program) of the Research Program remains in effect.
Research Period
          "" shall mean, collectively, each of the Directed Array Programs and the Mapping Array Program.
Research Program
          "" shall mean a plan of research for the Directed Array Program covering a minimum of a six-month period, which shall be updated quarterly pursuant to Section 2.2 to reflect developments during the previous three (3) months and extended for the subsequent three (3) months. A form of the initial Research Plan shall be attached as Exhibit A to this Agreement, and shall be executed by the Parties prior to March 1, 1997.
Research Plan
          "" shall mean a commercial product containing as one of its constituents (a) any Active ArQule Compound; (b) any ArQule Derivative Compound; (c) any Monsanto Derivative Compound; or (d) any other compound discovered or designed by Monsanto directly as a result of information provided by ArQule to Monsanto under the Mapping Array Program or Directed Array Program, which information forms the primary basis for such discovery or development.
Royalty-Bearing Product
          "" shall mean, with respect to each Royalty-Bearing Product, every calendar quarter, or partial calendar quarter, commencing with the first arms-length, commercial sale of such Royalty-Bearing Product in any country and ending at the end of the quarter during which all Patent Rights covering such Royalty-Bearing Product expire in the applicable country provided that if there is no Valid Claim covering a Royalty Bearing Product at the end of ten (10) years from the date of the first arms-length commercial sale in that country of the applicable Licensed Product, then the Royalty Period shall be deemed to have terminated for all purposes with respect to that Royalty-Bearing Product in that country.
Royalty Period
          "" of a Party shall mean a corporation or other legal entity that owns, directly or indirectly, twenty percent (20%) or more of the outstanding equity securities of a corporation which are entitled to vote in the election of directors or a twenty percent (20%) or greater interest in the net assets or profits of an entity which is not a corporation or any similar type of control relationship.
Secondary Affiliate
          "" shall mean any third party (not including a Secondary Affiliate) licensed by Monsanto to make, use (except where the implied right to use accompanies the sale to the third party of any Royalty-Bearing Product by Monsanto or its Secondary Affiliates or Sublicensees), sell, import, export, advertise, promote and otherwise commercialize any Royalty-Bearing Product.
Sublicensee
 
          "" shall mean any target within the Field selected by Monsanto. A biological target used for purposes of toxicity testing shall be deemed a Target within the Field.
Target
          "" shall mean either (a) a claim of an issued and subsisting patent that has not been held finally unenforceable or invalid by an agency, court or other tribunal of competent jurisdiction in any unappealable or unappealed decision the time for appeal of which has expired or (b) a claim of a pending patent application that has not been abandoned or finally rejected without the possibility of appeal or refiling.
Valid Claim
          The above definitions are intended to encompass the defined terms in both the singular and plural tenses.
2.  .
Management of Research Program
     2.1. . The Parties hereby establish a Research Committee comprised of four (4) members, with two (2) representatives appointed by each Party. The initial members of the Research Committee shall be as follows:
Composition of Research Committee
     A Party may change one or more of its representatives to the Research Committee at any time upon notice to the other Party. Each Party will designate one of its representatives as its team leader.
     2.2. . The Research Committee shall direct and administer the Research Program. With respect to each Directed Array Program, the Research Committee shall specifically determine the following: (i) the appropriate objectives of each Chemical Theme and/or Active Compound to be submitted to the Directed Array Program; (ii) the appropriate number and type of Chemical Themes to be submitted to the Directed Array Program, subject to ArQule's right to exclude certain compounds as set forth in Section 3.2.3 below; (iii) the appropriate number of compounds that ArQule should generate in a Directed Array for a particular Chemical Theme; and (iv) the appropriate amount of each compound in a Directed Array that ArQule should deliver to Monsanto for further research and development. The scope of each Chemical Theme will be determined on the basis of the following criteria: (i) the specific reaction or reaction sequence used to combine members of two or more discrete chemical units in which each chemical unit bears the functional group(s) required for the specific reaction(s) that result in the combination of the chemical units; and (ii) the extent to which a class of compounds is related by a recurring structural motif associated with a particular biological activity. In addition, the Research Committee shall (i) review test
Duties of the Research Committee
 
reports provided by Monsanto as to the significant functional activity derived from testing each Mapping Array and, based on such results, recommend to ArQule whether to develop Directed Arrays for any Active ArQule Compound, (ii) determine, subject to availability in the case of Active ArQule Compounds as provided in Section 3.2.3, whether any Active Compound and/or any Active Homolog thereto should be designated as a Licensed Compound; (iii) determine and update the list of Licensed Compounds; (iv) determine the allocation of the funding and personnel resources to be contributed by the Parties under this Agreement; (v) revise and extend the Research Plan each calendar quarter for the subsequent six (6) months based on prior developments; and (vi) resolve matters involving scientific questions.
     2.3. . The Research Committee shall conduct monthly telephone conferences and shall prepare and deliver a brief written report describing the significant issues and discussions that take place during such telephone conferences. A representative of the Research Committee jointly appointed by its members shall provide each member with five (5) business days notice of the time of any such telephone conferences and the proposed agenda with respect thereto, unless waived by all members. The Research Committee shall meet at least once each quarter at the facilities of ArQule, or at such other times and locations as the Research Committee determines. A representative of the Research Committee jointly appointed by its members shall provide each member with five (5) business days notice of the time and location of meetings, unless such notice is waived by all members. If a designated representative of a Party cannot attend any meeting of the Research Committee, such Party may designate a different representative for that meeting without notice to the other Party, and the substitute member will have full power to vote on behalf of the permanent member. Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, all actions and decisions of the Research Committee will require the unanimous consent of all of its members. If the Research Committee fails to reach agreement upon any matter, the dispute will be resolved in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 12.5 below. Within ten (10) days following each quarterly meeting of the Research Committee, the Research Committee shall prepare and deliver, to both Parties, a written report describing the decisions made, conclusions and actions agreed upon.
Meetings of the Research Committee
     2.4. . Each Party agrees to provide the Research Committee with information and documentation as reasonably required for the Research Committee to fulfill its duties under this Agreement. In addition, each Party agrees to make available its employees and consultants as reasonably requested by the Research Committee. The Parties anticipate that members of the Research Committee will communicate informally with each other and with employees and consultants of the Parties on matters relating to the Directed Array Program.
Cooperation
     2.5. . Members of the Research Committee shall have reasonable access to the facilities of each Party where activities under this Agreement are in progress, but only during normal business hours and with reasonable prior notice. Each Party shall bear its own expenses in connection with such site visits.
Visits to Facilities
 
3.  .
Access Fee; Description of Programs
     3.1. . In partial consideration for Monsanto's obtaining access to ArQule's Mapping Array Program and Directed Array Program as provided herein, Monsanto shall pay to ArQule a technology access fee equal to $2,000,000 in the aggregate, payable in four equal installments of $500,000 each, with the first such payment to be made on the Effective Date and the remaining three payments to be made on December 31, 1997, 1998 and 1999.
Access Fee
     3.2. .
Mapping Array Program
          3.2.1. . During each Contract Year, ArQule will supply Monsanto with Mapping Arrays  containing approximately two (2) milligrams each of not less than 100,000 different ArQule Compounds not included in any other Mapping Array supplied to Monsanto, based on approximately ten (10) different Chemical Themes per year; provided, however, that ArQule hereby agrees that the first Mapping Array containing at least 50,000 ArQule Compounds to be delivered under this Agreement will be shipped no later than December 31, 1996, and the difference between 100,000 and the number of ArQule Compounds so delivered by December 31, 1996 will be delivered to Monsanto prior to March 1, 1997. Promptly upon its receipt of any such Mapping Arrays, Monsanto shall commence testing of such Mapping Arrays for activity against Targets. Upon the completion by Monsanto of its testing of any such Mapping Arrays, Monsanto shall provide the Research Committee with notice of the discovery of Active ArQule Compounds, together with relevant information concerning the functional activity identified.
Conduct of Mapping Array  Program
          3.2.2. . ArQule shall provide to Monsanto all ArQule Compounds for screening in the Field pursuant to the Mapping Array Program contemporaneously with the date of delivery of such compound to any other third party Mapping Array partner for screening in the Field.
Timing of Delivery
          3.2.3. . Initially, ArQule will identify the Chemical Theme of each Mapping Array but not the structures of the individual ArQule Compounds in the Mapping Arrays. Monsanto may screen the Mapping Arrays against any Targets within the Field during the term of this Agreement. Initially, Monsanto will not disclose the Targets screened. If Monsanto detects any Active ArQule Compound in a Mapping Array, ArQule will disclose (a) the structure of each Active ArQule Compound and (b) the structures, but not the locations in the Mapping Array, of all other ArQule Compounds in the Mapping Array and Monsanto will disclose (a) the identity of the Target and (b) the level of activity. All such disclosed information shall be treated as Confidential Information by the receiving Party. Monsanto may subsequently request that the Research Committee designate such Active ArQule Compound and up to five Active Homologs thereof as a Licensed Compound. In such event, ArQule will promptly notify the Research Committee if, as of the date of such request, any such Active ArQule Compound or such Active Homolog thereof (i) has been licensed to a third party, (ii) is included in an existing ArQule Internal Discovery
Mutual Disclosure
 
Program and ArQule has previously notified Monsanto of the inclusion of such compound in an ArQule Internal Discovery Program pursuant to the terms of Section 3.2.6, or (iii) is included within a Directed Array Program for a third party, in which case such Active ArQule Compound or Active Homolog thereof may not be designated as a Licensed Compound. Unless (i) the Active ArQule Compound or Active Homolog thereof has been licensed to a third party in the Field, (ii) is included in an existing ArQule Internal Discovery Program and ArQule has previously notified Monsanto of the inclusion of such compound in an ArQule Internal Discovery Program pursuant to the terms of Section 3.2.6, or (iii) is included within a Directed Array Program for a third party in the Field, the Research Committee shall designate such Active ArQule Compound and such Active Homologs thereof as a Licensed Compound. Monsanto may, by written notice to ArQule given within thirty (30) days of the determination by the Research Committee that any such Active ArQule Compound and such Active Homologs thereof should properly be designated as a Licensed Compound, elect to either (i) further develop any such Active ArQule Compound and such Active Homologs thereof itself or through a third party, or (ii) subject to the approval of the Research Committee, submit such Active ArQule Compound to the Directed Array Program under Section 3.3.
          3.2.4. . In consideration of the performance by ArQule of the Mapping Array Program, Monsanto shall pay ArQule a delivery fee equal to $1,000,000 in the initial Contract Year, payable one-third (1/3) within thirty (30) days of January 5, 1997, one-third (1/3) upon delivery of one-half of the scheduled Mapping Arrays  due for such first Contract Year and the remaining one-third (1/3) within forty-five (45) days of the delivery of the remainder of the scheduled Mapping Arrays to be provided by ArQule in such first Contract Year. Thereafter, Monsanto shall make the following annual payment to ArQule during each Contract Year, payable one-third (1/3) on the fifth day of January of such Contract Year, one-third (1/3) within forty-five (45) days of delivery of one-half of the scheduled Mapping Arrays due for that Contract Year and the remaining one-third (1/3) within forty-five (45) days of the delivery of the remainder of the scheduled Mapping Arrays to be provided by ArQule in such Contract Year:
Mapping Array  Program Payments
          3.2.5. . The Mapping Array Program shall commence on the Effective Date and continue for a period of five (5) Contract Years, unless earlier terminated as provided in this Section 3.2.5 or Article 11 below; , , that upon six (6) months prior written notice by Monsanto, the Mapping Array Program may be extended for up to two (2) additional one-year
Term of Mapping Array Program
provided
however
 
periods. Monsanto may terminate the Mapping Array Program at its discretion upon six (6) months written notice to ArQule at any time subject to the payment by Monsanto of all amounts that would have been due to ArQule during the entire term of this Agreement pursuant to the terms of Sections 3.1 and 3.2.4 herein if the Mapping Array Program had not been so terminated. Upon notice of termination, ArQule shall use reasonable efforts to complete the Mapping Array Programs then underway in a reasonable and orderly fashion.
     3.2.6 . In the event ArQule shall commence an Internal Discovery Program including a compound previously provided to Monsanto pursuant to the Mapping Array Program, ArQule shall promptly notify Monsanto of the location of each such compound within any Mapping Array previously provided to Monsanto.
ArQule Internal Discovery Program
     3.3. .
Directed Array Program
          3.3.1. . Under the direction of the Research Committee and in accordance with the Research Plan, ArQule will synthesize multiple Directed Arrays of compounds derived from (i) each Monsanto Compound provided to ArQule by Monsanto, or (ii) each Active ArQule Compound provided by ArQule to Monsanto under the Mapping Array Program and approved by the Research Committee for inclusion in the Directed Array Program, subject to Section 3.3.2 below. The number of Chemical Themes to be submitted to the Directed Array Program and the number of ArQule Derivative Compounds to be produced per Chemical Theme will be determined by the Research Committee. The Parties intend that ArQule will produce approximately twenty (20) milligrams of each ArQule Derivative Compound in the Directed Arrays, subject to the availability of the original Monsanto Compounds and/or the ArQule Compounds; provided, however that the amount of each ArQule Derivative Compound that ArQule actually produces will ultimately be determined by the Research Committee.
Description of Directed Array Program
          3.3.2. . ArQule shall have the right, at any time Monsanto seeks to include any Active ArQule Compound in any Directed Array Program, to exclude from such Directed Array Program any Active ArQule Compound that is at that time included within a Directed Array Program for a third party for development in the Field.
Compounds Excluded from the Directed Array Program
          3.3.3. . The Directed Array Program shall be conducted in a good scientific manner and in compliance with all applicable legal requirements. The conduct of the Directed Array Program shall be the primary responsibility of ArQule with participation by Monsanto. Monsanto shall propose Chemical Themes to the Research Committee for inclusion in the Directed Array Program based on either an Active ArQule Compound from the Mapping Array or an Active Monsanto Compound. If the Research Committee approves the inclusion of the proposed Chemical Theme, then Monsanto may either deliver to ArQule amounts of the Active Monsanto Compound or the structural information sufficient for
Conduct of Directed Array Program
 
ArQule to synthesize the Active Monsanto Compound. If ArQule is requested to synthesize the Active Monsanto Compound, then Monsanto shall specify to ArQule the required amount and purity of Monsanto Compounds for that Chemical Theme, as directed by the Research Committee. ArQule shall thereupon diligently synthesize Directed Arrays of ArQule Derivative Compounds or Monsanto Derivative Compounds, as the case may be, in accordance with the Research Plan. Monsanto shall, in its discretion, test all compounds in the Directed Arrays. The Parties shall continue the procedure described in this Section 3.3.3 for each Active Compound until the earliest to occur of (i) the determination by the Research Committee, in accordance with Section 2.2, to designate any such Active Compound and any Active Homolog thereto as a Licensed Compound, (ii) the determination by the Research Committee to cease further testing of such Active Compound, or (iii) the termination of this Agreement in accordance with Section 11.
          3.3.4. .
Directed Array Program Payments
               (a) . In consideration of the performance by ArQule of the Directed Array Program, Monsanto shall pay ArQule a delivery fee equal to $1,000,000 per Directed Array Program during the first Contract Year, payable one-third (1/3) upon commencement of the first Directed Array Program and two-thirds (2/3) within forty-five (45) days of the delivery of the final Directed Array to be provided by ArQule in the first Contract Year. Thereafter, Monsanto shall make the following annual payment to ArQule during each Contract Year, payable one-third (1/3) on the fifth day of January of such Contract Year and two-thirds (2/3) within forty-five (45) days of the delivery of the Directed Arrays to be provided by ArQule in such Contract Year:
Delivery Fee
               (b) . In addition to the amounts payable pursuant to Section 3.3.4(a) above, Monsanto shall pay any and all Extraordinary Expenses of ArQule, as required and approved in advance by the Research Committee.
Expenses
          3.3.5. . The Directed Array Program shall commence upon execution of the Research Plan by each of the team leaders of Research Committee and continue for a period of five (5) Contract Years, unless earlier terminated as provided in this Section 3.3.5 or Article 11 below; provided, however, that upon six (6) months prior written notice by Monsanto, the Directed Array Program may be extended for up to two (2) additional one-year periods. Monsanto may terminate the
Term of Directed Array Program
 
Directed Array Program at its discretion upon six (6) months written notice to ArQule at any time subject to the payment by Monsanto of all amounts that would have been due to ArQule during the entire term of this Agreement pursuant to Section 3.3.4 herein if the Directed Array Program had not been so terminated. Upon notice of termination, ArQule shall use reasonable efforts to complete the Directed Array Programs then underway in a reasonable and orderly fashion.
4.  .
License Grants; Diligence
     4.1. . ArQule hereby grants to Monsanto (a) a nonexclusive, worldwide, royalty-free license (without the right to sublicense) to test Mapping Arrays against Targets in the Field and to perform other analytical work on the compounds in the Mapping Arrays, and (b) an exclusive (including to the exclusion of ArQule), worldwide, royalty-free license (without the right to sublicense) to test any Directed Arrays for significant functional activity against Targets in the Field and to perform other analytical work on the compounds in the Directed Arrays.
Screening Licenses
     4.2. . Upon the identification by Monsanto of any Active Compound and the determination by the Research Committee that such Active Compound or any Active Homolog thereof should properly be designated as a Licensed Compound, ArQule, without any further action, shall be deemed to have granted to Monsanto, under ArQule Patent Rights, ArQule's interest in any Joint Patent Rights and ArQule Technology, an exclusive (including to the exclusion of ArQule), worldwide, royalty-bearing license (with the right to grant sublicenses) (i) to develop (including the making of Derivative Compounds), have developed, make, or have made Royalty-Bearing Products incorporating or using any patent or other intellectual property rights of ArQule covering the composition, manufacture or use of such Licensed Compound for use, distribution and sale in the Field, and (ii) to distribute for sale and sell in the Field Royalty-Bearing Products incorporating or using any patent or other intellectual property rights of ArQule covering the composition, manufacture or use of such Licensed Compound, and (iii) to use in the Field Royalty-Bearing Products incorporating or using any patent or other intellectual property rights of ArQule covering the composition, manufacture or use of such Licensed Compound.
Commercialization Licenses
     4.3. . The licenses granted to Monsanto by ArQule pursuant to Sections 4.1 and 4.2 and the license granted to ArQule by Monsanto pursuant to Section 4.8 shall continue in perpetuity unless this Agreement terminates pursuant to Sections 11.2 or 11.3 or such licenses terminate pursuant to section 4.4.
Termination of Licenses
     4.4. . Except as provided in Section 4.5 below, Monsanto agrees to use reasonable commercial efforts to develop and market Royalty-Bearing Products based on or incorporating any Licensed Compound, using a level of effort consistent with that used for other Monsanto products having similar commercial potential. Monsanto shall have the sole and absolute discretion to make all decisions relating to the research, development, marketing and other commercialization activities with respect to any Licensed Compound or any Royalty-Bearing Product derived
Return of Materials
 
therefrom. In the event that Monsanto takes no action to protect its intellectual property rights or further develop any Licensed Compound for a period of ninety (90) days after the earlier of (i) the time at which a milestone payment is due but has not been paid by Monsanto, or (ii) the failure of Monsanto to continue with or initiate any activity that could reasonably lead to a milestone payment as determined by the Research Committee, then Monsanto shall so notify ArQule and ArQule shall have the right, upon reasonable notice, to terminate any license granted to Monsanto under Sections 4.1 or 4.2 with respect to such Licensed Compound.
     4.5. . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, the Parties hereby agree that the diligence obligations described in Section 4.4 shall not commence with respect to any Licensed Compound that is included within a Directed Array Program until such time as such Directed Array Program is completed.
Commencement of Diligence
     4.6. . The Parties recognize and agree that Monsanto does not and will not at any time need any license or other permission or authorization from ArQule for any activities (including by way of example and not limitation) making, using, offering for sale, selling and importing concerning or involving any compound or composition or its manufacture or use unless ArQule owns (to the exclusion of Monsanto) (i) ArQule Patent Rights, or (ii) proprietary and confidential ArQule Technology covering such compound or composition or its manufacture or use.
License Requirements
     4.7. . During any Research Period, Monsanto shall have the right, either directly or through Monsanto's Primary Affiliates or third parties (including Secondary Affiliates who are not also Primary Affiliates) selected by Monsanto, to perform such testing as Monsanto deems appropriate on ArQule Compounds and ArQule Derivative Compounds received hereunder, provided that, prior to delivering any ArQule Compounds or ArQule Derivative Compounds to any such third party(including Secondary Affiliates who are not also Primary Affiliates), Monsanto, ArQule and each such third party(including Secondary Affiliates who are not also Primary Affiliates) enter into a Materials Transfer Agreement substantially in the form of the attached Exhibit B.
Screening of ArQule Compounds
     4.8. . Monsanto hereby grants to ArQule an exclusive (including to the exclusion of Monsanto), worldwide, royalty-free license (with the right to sublicense) to make, have made, use, sell, have sold, import, export and distribute for sale outside of the Field compounds containing or using any intellectual property rights of Monsanto covering the composition, manufacture or use of Licensed Compounds.
Grant of License to ArQule
     4.9 . Monsanto shall not attempt to reverse engineer, or attempt to determine the structure of, any ArQule Compound in a Mapping Array until the structure of such compound has been disclosed to Monsanto by ArQule and Monsanto has disclosed to ArQule the identity of the Target and level of activity, all pursuant to Section 3.2.3.
Reverse Engineering
 
5.  .
Intellectual Property Rights
     5.1. .
Ownership of Patent Rights
     5.2. . In the case of Joint Patent Rights, Monsanto shall have all control over and shall bear all responsibility for, and the expense of, the preparation, filing, prosecution, and maintenance of any Joint Patent Rights claiming such inventions. Monsanto shall consult with ArQule as to the preparation, filing, prosecution, and maintenance of such Joint Patent Right reasonably prior to any deadline or action with the U.S. Patent & Trademark Office or its foreign equivalent, and shall furnish to ArQule copies of all relevant documents reasonably in advance of such consultation. In the event that Monsanto desires to abandon such Joint Patent Right, or if Monsanto later declines responsibility for such Joint Patent Right, Monsanto shall provide reasonable prior written notice to ArQule of such intention to abandon or decline
Management of Joint Patent Rights
 
responsibility, and ArQule shall have the right, at its expense, to prepare, file, prosecute, and maintain such Joint Patent Rights.
     5.3. . Each Party agrees to cooperate fully in the preparation, filing, and prosecution of any Patent Rights under this Agreement. Such cooperation includes, but is not limited to:
Cooperation of the Parties
     5.4. Infringement by Third Parties. ArQule and Monsanto shall each promptly notify the other in writing of any alleged or threatened infringement by a third party of any ArQule Patent Right, Monsanto Patent Right or Joint Patent Right of which they become aware. The Parties shall consult concerning the action(s) to be taken in connection with any such alleged or threatened infringement.
6.  .
Ownership of Compounds
     All Monsanto Compounds, Monsanto Derivative Compounds, ArQule Compounds and ArQule Derivative Compounds shall be owned in the same manner as the patent rights to such compounds are owned as set forth in Article 5.
7.  .
Payments, Reports, and Records
     7.1. . In partial consideration of the rights granted Monsanto under this Agreement, Monsanto shall pay ArQule the following amounts within forty-five (45) days after each occurrence of the following milestones:
Milestone Payments
 
Such milestone payments shall be non-refundable and shall not be credited against royalties payable to ArQule under this Agreement. Monsanto shall promptly notify ArQule of each occurrence of any of the foregoing milestones.
     7.2. .
Royalties
     (a)  In consideration of the licenses granted to Monsanto hereunder, Monsanto shall pay to ArQule a royalty of four percent (4%) of Net Sales of Royalty-Bearing Products.
     (b)  No royalty shall accrue on sales among Monsanto, its Secondary Affiliates and Sublicensees. Royalties shall only accrue on sales by Monsanto, its Secondary Affiliates and Sublicensees to parties other than Monsanto, its Secondary Affiliates and Sublicensees and shall be payable only once for any given unit of Royalty-Bearing Product sold.
     7.3. . Within thirty (30) days after the conclusion of each Royalty Period, Monsanto shall deliver to ArQule a report containing the following information:
Reports and Payments
All such reports shall be maintained in confidence by ArQule. If no royalties are due to ArQule for any reporting period, the report shall so state. Concurrent with this report, Monsanto shall remit to ArQule any payment due for the applicable Royalty Period using a method of payment mutually agreed to by the Parties. All amounts payable to ArQule under this Section will first be calculated in the currency of sale and then converted into U.S. dollars in accordance with Section 7.4, and such
 
amounts shall be paid without deduction, except as required by law, of any withholding taxes, value-added taxes, or other charges applicable to such payments.
     7.4. . With the exception of royalty payments due under Section 7.2, ArQule shall submit invoices to Monsanto for each payment due ArQule hereunder (including without limitation all payments due pursuant to Sections 3.1, 3.2.4 and 3.3.4(a)), and Monsanto shall pay such invoices within forty-five (45) days of receipt thereof. All payments due under this Agreement shall, except as provided in Section 7.5 below, be payable in United States dollars. Conversion of foreign currency to U.S. dollars shall be made at the conversion rate existing in the United States (as reported in ) on the last working day of the calendar quarter preceding the applicable calendar quarter. Such payments shall be without deduction of exchange, collection, or other charges.
Invoices; Payments in U.S. Dollars
The Wall Street Journal
     7.5. . If by law, regulation, or fiscal policy of a particular country, conversion into United States dollars or transfer of funds of a convertible currency to the United States is restricted or forbidden, Monsanto shall give ArQule prompt written notice of such restriction, which notice shall satisfy the forty-five day payment deadline described in Section 7.4. Monsanto shall pay any amounts due ArQule through whatever lawful methods ArQule reasonably designates; provided, however, that if ArQule fails to designate such payment method within forty-five (45) days after ArQule is notified of the restriction, then Monsanto may deposit such payment in local currency to the credit of ArQule in a recognized banking institution selected by Monsanto and identified by written notice to ArQule, and such deposit shall fulfill all obligations of Monsanto to ArQule with respect to such payment.
Payments in Other Currencies
     7.7. . Monsanto and its Secondary Affiliates shall maintain complete and accurate records of Royalty-Bearing Products made, used or sold by them or their Sublicensees under this Agreement, and any amounts payable to ArQule in relation to such Royalty-Bearing Products, which records shall contain sufficient information to permit ArQule to confirm the accuracy of any reports delivered to ArQule in accordance with Section 7.3. The relevant Party shall retain such records relating to a given Royalty Period for at least three (3) years after the conclusion of that Royalty Period. Each Party (acting as the "Auditing Party") shall have the right, at its own expense, to cause an independent certified public accountant to inspect such records of the other Party (the "Audited Party") during normal business hours for the sole purpose of verifying any reports and payments delivered under this Agreement. Such accountant shall not disclose to the Auditing Party any information other than information relating to accuracy of reports and payments delivered under this Agreement and shall provide the Audited Party with a copy of any report given to the Auditing Party. The Parties shall reconcile any underpayment or overpayment within forty-five (45) days after the accountant delivers the results of the audit. In the event that any audit performed under this Section reveals an underpayment in excess of five percent (5%) in any Royalty Period, the Audited Party shall bear the full cost of such audit. Each Party may exercise its rights under this Section only once every year and only with reasonable prior notice to the other Party.
Records
     7.8. . Any payments by Monsanto that are not paid on or before the date such payments are due under this Agreement shall bear interest, to the extent
Late Payments
 
permitted by law, at two percentage points above the Base Rate of Interest calculated based on the number of days that payment is delinquent.
8.  .
Confidential Information
     8.1. . Confidential Information shall mean any technical or business information furnished by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving Party in connection with this Agreement and specifically designated as confidential. Such Confidential Information may include, without limitation, the identity of a chemical compound, the use of a chemical compound, trade secrets, know-how, inventions, technical data or specifications, testing methods, business or financial information, research and development activities, product and marketing plans, and customer and supplier information.
Definition of Confidential Information
     8.2. . The Receiving Party agrees that it shall:
Obligations
     8.3. . The obligations of the Receiving Party under Section 8.2 above shall not apply to any specific Confidential Information to the extent that the Receiving Party can demonstrate that such Confidential Information:
Exceptions
 
     8.4. . ArQule shall not publish any information with respect to ArQule Derivative Compounds, Monsanto Compounds, or Monsanto Derivative Compounds without the prior written permission of Monsanto, which may be withheld in its sole discretion.
Publications
     8.5. . The obligations set forth in this Article shall remain in effect after termination of this Agreement, except that the obligations of the Receiving Party to destroy or return Confidential Information to the Disclosing Party shall survive until fulfilled.
Survival of Obligations
9.  .
Representations and Warranties
     9.1. . Each Party represents and warrants to the other that it has the legal right and power to enter into this Agreement, to extend the rights and licenses granted to the other in this Agreement, and to fully perform its obligations hereunder, and that the performance of such obligations will not conflict with its charter documents or any agreements, contracts, or other arrangements to which it is a party.
Authorization
     9.2. . ArQule hereby represents and warrants that as of the Effective Date it has granted no other license, right or interest to ArQule Compounds to any third party for the testing, making, use, development or sale of ArQule Compounds in the Field.
Prior Licenses In Field
     9.3. . ArQule represents that to its knowledge the conduct of the business of ArQule as it is currently being conducted or as it is proposed to be conducted pursuant to this Agreement does not conflict with or infringe on the intellectual property of any other person, and ArQule has not received any claim or notice from any person to such effect which is still pending. ArQule has no knowledge of any claim or fact that would give rise to a claim that any of the ArQule Patents is invalid or unenforceable. To ArQule's knowledge, the ArQule Patents are not infringed by any third party.
Non-Infringement
 
10. .
Indemnification and Insurance
     10.1. Indemnification. Each Party (the "Indemnitor") shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the other Party and its Primary Affiliates and their directors, officers, employ-ees, and agents and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (the "Indemnitees"), against any liability, damage, loss, or expense (including reasonable attorneys fees and expenses of litigation) incurred by or imposed upon the Indemnitees or any one of them in connection with any claims, suits, actions, demands, or judgments arising out of any theory of product liability (including, but not limited to, actions in the form of tort, warranty, or strict liability) concerning any product (or any process or service) that is made, used, or sold by the Indemnitor pursuant to any right or license granted under this Agreement; provided, however, that such indemnification right shall not apply to any liability, damage, loss, or expense to the extent directly attributable to the negligent activities, reckless misconduct, or intentional misconduct of the Indemnitees.
     10.2. Procedures. Any Indemnitee that intends to claim indemnification under Section 10.1 shall promptly notify the appropriate Indemnitor of any claim in respect of which the Indemnitee intends to claim such indemnification, and the Indemnitor shall assume the defense thereof with counsel mutually satisfactory to the Parties; provided, however, that an Indemnitee shall have the right to retain its own counsel, with the fees and expenses to be paid by the Indemnitor, if representation of such Indemnitee by the counsel retained by the Indemnitor would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between such Indemnitee and any other party represented by such counsel in such proceedings. The indemnity agreement in Section 10.1. shall not apply to amounts paid in settlement of any loss, claim, liability or action if such settlement is effected without the consent of the Indemnitor, which consent shall not be withheld unreasonably. The failure to deliver notice to the Indemnitor within a reasonable time after the commencement of any such action, if prejudicial to its ability to defend such action, shall relieve the Indemnitor of any liability to the Indemnitee under Section 10.1. Each party and its Primary Affiliates and their employees and agents shall cooperate fully with the other party and its legal representatives in the investigation of any action, claim or liability covered by this indemnification.
     10.3. Insurance. Each party shall maintain at least $5,000,000 in insurance coverage for its own potential liabilities to the Indemnitees as set forth in this Article 10.
11. .
Term and Termination
     11.1. . This Agreement shall commence on the Effective Date and shall remain in effect until the expiration of the last to expire of the applicable Patent Rights covering any Royalty-Bearing Product, unless earlier terminated as provided in this Article 11.
Term
     11.2. . In the event that Monsanto fails to make timely payment of any amounts due to ArQule under this Agreement, ArQule may
Breach of Payment Obligations
 
terminate this Agreement upon ninety (90) days written notice to Monsanto, unless Monsanto pays all past-due amounts within such ninety-day notice period.
     11.3. . In the event that either party commits a material breach of any of its obligations under this Agreement (other than as provided in Section 11.2) and such party fails (i) to remedy that breach within ninety (90) days after receiving written notice thereof from the other party or (ii) to commence dispute resolution pursuant to Section 12.5, within ninety (90) days after receiving written notice of that breach from the other party, the other party may immediately terminate this Agreement upon written notice to the breaching party.
Material Breach
     11.4. . Termination of this Agreement shall not relieve the parties of any obligation accruing prior to such termination. The provisions of Article 4, Article 5, Article 6 and Article 7 (with respect only to milestone payments and royalties accrued at the time of termination but not yet paid), Article 8, Article 9 and Article 12 shall survive the expiration or termination of this Agreement.
Effect of Termination
12. .
Miscellaneous
     12.1. . Nothing in this Agreement is intended or shall be deemed to constitute a partnership, agency, employer-employee or joint venture relationship between the parties. No party shall incur any debts or make any commitments for the other, except to the extent, if at all, specifically provided herein.
Relationship of Parties
     12.2. . Neither party shall use the name of the other party or reveal the terms of this Agreement in any publicity or advertising without the prior written approval of the other party, except that (i) either party may use the text of a written statement approved in advance by both parties without further approval, (ii) either party shall have the right to identify the other party and to disclose the terms of this Agreement as required by applicable securities laws or other applicable law or regulation, and (iii) either party may use the name of the other party and reveal the existence of this Agreement.
Publicity
     12.3. . During the term of this Agreement and thereafter for a period of two (2) years, each party agrees not to seek to persuade or induce any employee of the other party to discontinue his or her employment with that party in order to become employed by or associated with any business, enterprise, or effort that is associated with its own business.
Non-Solicitation
     12.4. . This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law
     12.5. .
Dispute Resolution Procedures
 
 
     12.6. . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, and all of which together shall be deemed to be one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
     12.7. . All headings in this Agreement are for convenience only and shall not affect the meaning of any provision hereof.
Headings
     12.8. . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties, their Primary Affiliates, and their respective lawful successors and assigns.
Binding Effect
     12.9. . This Agreement may not be assigned by either party without the prior written consent of the other party, except that either party may assign this Agreement to a successor in connection with the merger, consolidation, spin-off or sale of all or substantially all of its assets or that portion of its business pertaining to the subject matter of this Agreement. Monsanto has the right to extend its rights and benefits under this Agreement to any Primary Affiliate.
Assignment
     12.10. . All notices, requests, demands and other communications required or permitted to be given pursuant to this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given upon the date of receipt if delivered by hand,
Notices
 
recognized international overnight courier, confirmed facsimile transmission, or registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid to the following addresses or facsimile numbers:
Either party may change its designated address and facsimile number by notice to the other party in the manner provided in this Section.
     12.11. . This Agreement may be amended, supplemented, or otherwise modified only by means of a written instrument signed by both parties. Any waiver of any rights or failure to act in a specific instance shall relate only to such instance and shall not be construed as an agreement to waive any rights or fail to act in any other instance, whether or not similar.
Amendment and Waiver
     12.12. . In the event that any provision of this Agreement shall, for any reason, be held to be invalid or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity or unenforceability shall not affect any other provision hereof, and the parties shall negotiate in good faith to modify the Agreement to preserve (to the extent possible) their original intent.
Severability
     12.13. . This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements or under-standings between the parties relating to the subject matter hereof.
Entire Agreement
     12.14. . Neither party shall be held liable or responsible to the other party, nor be deemed to be in breach of this Agreement, for failure or delay in fulfilling or performing any provisions of this Agreement when such failure or delay is caused by or results from any cause whatsoever outside the reasonable control of the
Force Majeure
 
party concerned including, but not limited to, fire, explosion, breakdown of plant, strike, lock-out, labor disputes, casualty or accident, lack or failure of transportation facilities, flood, lack or failure of sources of supply or of labor, raw materials or energy, civil commotion, embargo, any law, regulation, decision, demand or requirement of any national or local government or authority. The party claiming relief shall, without delay, notify the other party by registered airmail or by telefax of the interruption and cessation thereof and shall use its best efforts to remedy the effects of such hindrance with all reasonable dispatch. The onus of proving that any such Force Majeure event exists shall rest upon the party so asserting. During the period that one party is prevented from performing its obligations under this Agreement due to a Force Majeure event, the other party may, in its sole discretion, suspend any obligations that relate thereto. Upon cessation of such Force Majeure event the parties hereto shall use their best efforts to make up for any suspended obligations. If such Force Majeure event is anticipated to continue, or has existed for nine (9) consecutive months or more, this Agreement may be forthwith terminated by either party by registered airmail or by telefax. In case of such termination the terminating party will not be required to pay to the other party any indemnity whatsoever.
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have duly executed and delivered this Agreement as a sealed instrument effective as of the date first above written.
 
 
     This Agreement, dated as of _______________, __, ______, is between ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule"), a Delaware corporation, and Monsanto Company ("Monsanto"), a Delaware corporation and _______________________, a _______________________ ("Recipient").
     WHEREAS, Monsanto and ArQule have entered into that certain Array Delivery and Testing Agreement, dated as December 23, 1996, ("Array Delivery Agreement"), pursuant to which ArQule agreed to provide Monsanto with certain compound arrays for screening on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Array Delivery Agreement and to perform certain other compound development activities; and
     WHEREAS, pursuant to Section 4.1 of the Array Delivery Agreement, Monsanto is permitted to deliver such compounds to third parties such as Recipient, provided such parties execute and deliver this Agreement to ArQule.
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
     1.     SUPPLY OF MATERIALS: Within _____ days after receiving an original of this Agreement executed by all parties, Monsanto will supply Recipient with the compounds set forth on Exhibit 1 (the "Materials"). Upon written request, Monsanto may provide the Recipient with additional quantities of such Materials or with additional compounds, which compounds shall also be considered Materials for the purposes of this Agreement.
     2.     USE AND TRANSFER RESTRICTIONS: Recipient acknowledges and agrees that the Materials may be proprietary to and owned by ArQule and are or may be covered by claims of U.S. and international patents or patent applications of ArQule and/or Monsanto. Recipient agrees to use the Materials solely to screen them for potential agricultural and use for Monsanto using the assay procedure previously disclosed to Monsanto. Recipient agrees (i) not to transfer such Materials to any third party without the prior written consent of ArQule and Monsanto, (ii) to permit access to the Materials only to its employees and consultants requiring such access, (iii) to inform such employees and consultants of the proprietary nature of the Materials, (iv) to take reasonable precautions, at least as stringent as those observed by Recipient to protect its own proprietary materials, to ensure that such employees and consultants observe the obligations of Recipient pursuant to this Section and (v) to execute and deliver any docu-ments of assignment or conveyance that may be necessary to effectuate the ownership rights of ArQule or Monsanto in the Materials. Upon the expiration of this
in planta
 
Agreement, Recipient shall, at the instruction of ArQule or Monsanto, either destroy or return any unused Materials.
     3.     COMPLIANCE WITH LAW: Recipient agrees to comply with all federal, state, and local laws and regulations applicable to the use, testing, storage, disposal, and transfer of the Materials. Recipient assumes sole responsibility for any violation of such laws or regulations by Recipient or any of its affiliates or sublicensees.
     4.     TERMINATION: This Agreement shall commence on the date last written below and continue for a period of _____ months. Sections 3, 6 and 7 shall survive termination of this Agreement.
     5.     NO WARRANTIES: Any Materials delivered pursuant to this Agreement are understood to be experimental in nature and may have hazardous properties. Recipient should assume that the Materials are dangerous and should use appropriate precautions. NEITHER MONSANTO NOR ARQULE MAKES ANY REPRESENTATIONS, OR EXTENDS ANY WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, WITH RESPECT TO THE COMPOUNDS. THERE ARE NO EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PUR-POSE, OR THAT THE USE OF THE MATERIALS WILL NOT INFRINGE ANY PATENT RIGHTS OF OTHERS.
     6.     ASSIGNMENT OF INVENTIONS: Recipient agrees promptly to disclose to Monsanto any and all ideas, concepts, discoveries, inventions, developments, improvements, trade secrets, technical data, know-how or agricultural or materials that are con-ceived, devised, invented, developed or reduced to practice or tangible medium by Recipient, or any of its agents, employees or contractors, or under its direction, during the term of this Agreement and which arise out of its screening or evaluation of the Materials (hereinafter "Inventions"). Recipient hereby assigns to Monsanto all of its right, title and interest in and to the Inventions and any and all related patent rights, copyrights and applications and registrations therefor. During and after the expiration of this Agreement, Recipient shall cooperate with Monsanto, at Monsanto's expense, in obtaining proprietary protection for the Inventions and shall execute all documents which Monsanto shall reasonably request in order to perfect Monsanto's rights in the Inventions.
in planta
     7.     INDEMNIFICATION: Recipient assumes all liability for, and agrees to indemnify, defend, and hold harmless ArQule and Monsanto and their respective directors, officers, representatives, employees, and agents against, all losses, expenses (including without limitation any legal fees and expenses), claims, demands, damages, judgments, suits, or other actions arising from the use, testing, storage, or disposal of the Materials by Recipient and its agents, employees or contractors , or from any breach of its obligations under Section 2 of this Agree-ment.
     8.     MISCELLANEOUS: This Agreement shall not be assigned or otherwise transferred by Recipient without the prior written consent of ArQule and Monsanto. This
 
Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of New York. This Agreement constitutes the entire understanding of the parties and supersedes all prior agreements, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Tel:   Fax:

 
Exhibit 99.3
     This Amendment No. 2 to Research & Development and License Agreement is dated as of December 24, 1996 by and between Abbott Laboratories, an Illinois corporation having a principal place of business at 100 Abbott Park Road, Abbott Park, Illinois ("Abbott") and ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation having a principal place of business at 200 Boston Avenue, Suite 36, Medford, Massachusetts ("ArQule").
     WHEREAS, Abbott and ArQule have entered into that certain Research & Development and License Agreement, dated as of June 16, 1995, as amended by Amendment No. 1 on August 13, 1996 (as so amended, the "License Agreement"), pursuant to which ArQule agreed, Inter alia, to provide Abbott with certain ArQule core Compounds and Abbott Derivative Compounds (these and other capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the respective meanings provided in the License Agreement) for screening in consideration of the payment of Abbott to ArQule of certain technology access license fees, milestone and royalty payments and research funding payments on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the License Agreement; and
     WHEREAS, ArQule and Abbott desire to further amend the License Agreement to extend the Research Term thereof and to provide for additional financial terms in connection therewith.
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows::
1.  The License Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
     1.1. Section 2.4(b) of the License Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirely and replaced wit the following:
[*]=CERTAIN INFORMATION IN THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN OMITTED AND FILED SEPARATELY WITH THE COMMISSION. CONFIDENTIAL TREATMENT HAS BEEN REQUESTED WITH RESPECT TO THE OMITTED PORTIONS. OMITTED TEXT IS INDICATED BY A "*".
 
     1.2. A new Section 2.4(d) of the License Agreement is hereby added as follows:
     1.3. The first sentence of Section 5.1 of the License Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
 
2.  Miscellaneous
     2.1. . This Amendment shall be governed in all respects by the laws of the State of Illinois without giving effect to principles of conflicts of law thereunder.
Governing Law
     2.2. . Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, the provisions hereof shall inure to the benefit of, and be binding upon, the successors, permitted assigns, heirs, executors and administrators of the parties hereto.
Successors and Assigns
     2.3. . Except as specifically provide herein, the License Agreement as previously executed ad amended by Amendment No. 1 shall remain in full force and effect.
License Agreement
     2.4. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have duly executed this Agreement No. 2 as of the date first above written.

 
Exhibit 99.4
[*]=CERTAIN INFORMATION IN THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN OMITTED AND FILED SEPARATELY WITH THE COMMISSION. CONFIDENTIAL TREATMENT HAS BEEN REQUESTED WITH RESPECT TO THE OMITTED PORTIONS. OMITTED TEXT IS INDICATED BY A "*".
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
     This Agreement, dated as of July 3, 1997, is between ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule"), a Delaware corporation, and American Home Products Corporation, acting through its Wyeth-Ayerst Research division ("Wyeth-Ayerst"), a Delaware corporation.
     WHEREAS, ArQule has developed certain technology that has applications in the discovery and optimization of pharmaceutical compounds;
     WHEREAS, Wyeth-Ayerst desires that ArQule apply its technologies to the research and optimization of pharmaceutical compounds for Wyeth-Ayerst; and
     WHEREAS, in exchange for payment by Wyeth-Ayerst of research funds and royalties, ArQule is willing to perform certain research and compound optimization activities for Wyeth-Ayerst, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement;
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants set forth in this Agreement, the Parties hereby agree as follows:
1. 
Definitions.
     1.1.    shall mean any ArQule Compound within the same Chemical Theme as an Active ArQule Compound that exhibits substantial structural homology with such Active ArQule Compound and exhibits minimal functional activity. The criteria for determining "substantial structural homology" and "minimal functional activity" for each Active ArQule Compound are established by the Research Committee acting in accordance with Section 2.
"Active Homolog"
     1.2.    shall mean any ArQule Compound or ArQule Derivative Compound which exhibits confirmed significant functional activity against a Target. The criteria for determining "significant functional activity" for each Target is established by the Research Committee acting in accordance with Section 2.
"Active ArQule Compound"
     1.3.    shall mean any Active ArQule Compound or Active Wyeth-Ayerst Compound.
"Active Compound"
     1.4.    shall mean any Wyeth-Ayerst Compound or Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compound which exhibits confirmed significant functional activity against a Target. The criteria for determining "significant functional activity" for each Target is established by the Research Committee acting in accordance with Section 2.
"Active Wyeth-Ayerst Compound"
     1.5.    shall mean a corporation or other legal entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with such party. For purposes of this definition, "control" means the ownership, directly or indirectly, of fifty percent (50%) or more of the outstanding equity securities of a corporation which are entitled to vote in the election of directors or a fifty percent (50%) or greater interest in the net assets or profits of an entity which
"Affiliate"
 
is not a corporation. For the purposes of this definition, Immunex Corporation shall not be deemed a Wyeth-Ayerst Affiliate.
     1.6.    shall mean this Research and License Agreement, together with and hereto.
"Agreement"
Exhibit A
Exhibit B
     1.7.    shall mean any chemical that is synthesized by ArQule using its proprietary technology and provided by ArQule to Wyeth-Ayerst under the Mapping Array Program.
"ArQule Compound"
     1.8.   shall mean a Derivative Compound synthesized by ArQule from an ArQule Compound under a Directed Array Program described in Section 4.
"ArQule Derivative Compound"
     1.9.    shall mean any testing or screening activity fully funded and performed by ArQule itself with the primary purpose of determining the functional activity in the Field of ArQule Compounds or ArQule Derivative Compounds.
"ArQule Internal Development Program"
     1.10.  shall mean Patent Rights controlled or owned by ArQule as of the Effective Date or during the term of this Agreement.
"ArQule Patent Rights"
     1.11.  shall mean all information and data which is owned by ArQule or licensed by third parties to ArQule prior to or during the Research Program and is necessary or useful to conduct the screening to discover Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs thereto or to develop, make, use, sell or seek regulatory approval in any country to market a product containing a Licensed Compound; all to the extent and only to the extent that ArQule now has or hereafter will have the right to grant licenses, immunities or other rights thereunder.
"ArQule Technology"
     1.12.   shall mean a set of samples of structurally related chemical compounds arranged in a format such as a microtiter screening plate.
"Array"
     1.13.  shall mean the chemical or structural characteristics shared by a group of compounds as determined by the Research Committee acting in accordance with Section 2.
"Chemical Theme"
     1.14.   shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.1.
"Confidential Information"
     1.15.  shall mean each twelve (12) month calendar year of the Research Period commencing on January 1 and ending on December 31 of each such year. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the "Initial Contract Year" shall mean the stub period beginning on the Effective Date and ending on December 31, 1997, and, with respect to the "Directed Array Programs, the "Final Contract Year" shall mean the Contract Year ending on December 31, 2000.
"Contract Year"
     1.16.  shall mean a chemical compound structurally derived in one or more steps from another by a process of modification or partial substitution of at least one component wherein at least one structural feature is retained at each process step. The number of
"Derivative Compound"
 
intermediate steps or compounds is not relevant to the classification of a compound as a Derivative Compound. A compound need not have structural similarity to another compound in order to be classified as a Derivative Compound.
     1.17.  shall mean an Array comprised of ArQule Derivative Compounds or Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compounds, as the case may be, synthesized by ArQule under a Directed Array Program described in Section 4.
"Directed Array"
     1.18.  Program"
"Directed Array
     shall mean a lead optimization program based around a single Chemical Theme and conducted by ArQule as set forth in Section 4.
     1.19.   shall mean that Party disclosing Confidential Information to the other Party under Section 9.
"Disclosing Party"
     1.20.  shall mean the date first written above.
"Effective Date"
     1.21.   shall mean those unusual expenses incurred by ArQule required solely to further the Directed Array Program in accordance with the Research Plan as approved by the Research Committee and which are not contemplated by the Research Plan.
"Extraordinary Expenses"
     1.22.  shall mean the United States Food and Drug Administration (or its foreign equivalent in a Major Market Country).
"FDA"
     1.23.  shall mean, with respect to a Target, all human therapeutic and diagnostic pharmaceutical uses of a Licensed Compound.
"Field"
     1.24.  shall mean the designation by the Wyeth-Ayerst Discovery Council that a Licensed Compound meets the criteria set forth in
"IND-Track Status"
Exhibit B.
     1.25.  shall mean any Patent Rights that are jointly owned by the Parties, as set forth in Section 7.1(b).
"Joint Patent Rights"
     1.26.   shall mean any Active ArQule Compound or Active Homologs thereto which the Research Committee has designated as such pursuant to Section 3.2 or Section 4.3 hereof.
"Licensed Compound"
     1.27.  shall mean the set of Licensed Compounds comprising at least one Active ArQule Compound and the Active Homologs thereto which the Research Committee has designated as such pursuant to Section 3.2 or Section 4.3 hereof. For the purposes of this Agreement, any reference made to a Licensed Compound applies to all compounds in the Licensed Compound Set to which the Licensed Compound belongs.
"Licensed Compound Set"
     1.28.  shall mean the United States, United Kingdom, France, Germany, Italy and Japan.
"Major Market Country"
 
     1.29.  shall mean an Array of ArQule Compounds synthesized by ArQule under the Mapping Array Program set forth in Section 3.
"Mapping Array"
     1.30.  shall mean the Mapping Array component of the Research Program as set forth in Section 3.
"Mapping Array Program"
     1.31.  shall mean the aggregate Net Sales Price of Royalty-Bearing Products in any Royalty Period.
"Net Sales"
     1.32.   shall mean with respect to a Royalty-Bearing Product, the gross amount invoiced by Wyeth-Ayerst, its Affiliates, Sublicensees and/or Direct Licensees as appropriate, on sales or other dispositions of the Royalty-Bearing Product to unrelated third parties, less the following items:
"Net Sales Price"
Such amounts shall be determined from the books and records of Wyeth-Ayerst, its Affiliates and/or its Sublicensees, maintained in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, consistently applied.
     If a Royalty-Bearing Product is sold in bulk (as distinguished from packaged pharmaceutical form) for resale in packaged or finished form, Net Sales shall be calculated by determining the quantity of Royalty-Bearing Product in packaged pharmaceutical form that would reasonably be produced from the bulk quantity of Royalty-Bearing Product so sold, and by multiplying such quantity by the average price for such Royalty-Bearing Product in packaged pharmaceutical form during the applicable royalty reporting period. If a Royalty-Bearing Product is sold, or otherwise commercially disposed of for value (including, without limitation, disposition in connection with the delivery of other products or services), in a transaction that is not an outright arm's-length sale to an independent third party, then the gross amount invoiced in such transaction shall be deemed to be the gross amount that would have been paid had there been such a sale at the average sale price of such Royalty-Bearing Product during the applicable royalty reporting period. Net Sales Price shall not include any consideration received by Wyeth-Ayerst, its Affiliates or its Sublicensees in respect of the sale, use or other disposition of a Royalty-Bearing Product in a country as part of a clinical trial prior to the receipt of all regulatory approvals required to commence full commercial sales of such Royalty-Bearing Product in such country, except * pursuant to which Wyeth-Ayerst, its Affiliates or Sublicensees
 
is/are entitled, under applicable regulatory policies, to recover costs incurred in providing such products to the patients.
     1.33.   means ArQule or Wyeth-Ayerst or their respective Affiliates; "Parties" means ArQule and Wyeth-Ayerst and their respective Affiliates.
"Party"
     1.34.   shall mean all Valid Claims of all issued patents and reissues, reexaminations, extensions and supplementary protection certificates thereof, and all patent applications and any divisions, continuations, or continuations-in-part thereof or patents issuing thereon. For the purposes of this Section, "Valid Claim" shall mean either (a) a claim of an issued patent that has not been held unenforceable or invalid by an agency or a court of competent jurisdiction in any unappealable or unappealed decision or (b) a claim of a pending patent application that has not been abandoned or finally rejected without the possibility of appeal or refiling and that has been pending for less than * years from its priority date.
"Patent Rights"
     1.35.  shall mean clinical trials in a small number of patients to determine the metabolism and pharmacologic actions of a product in humans, the side effects associated with increasing doses and to gather evidence on effectiveness and meeting the requirements established by the FDA for Phase I clinical trials.
"Phase I Clinical Trials"
     1.36.   shall mean clinical trials in a small sample of the intended patient population to assess the efficacy for a specific indication of a compound proposed to be used as a therapeutic or diagnostic pharmaceutical product, to determine dose tolerance and the optimal dose range as well as to gather additional information relating to safety and potential adverse effects, and meeting the requirements established by the FDA for Phase II clinical trials.
"Phase II Clinical Trials"
     1.37.  shall mean clinical trials designed to demonstrate safety and efficacy of a compound proposed to be used as a therapeutic or diagnostic pharmaceutical product in an expanded patient population at geographically dispersed study sites, meeting the requirements established by the FDA for Phase III clinical trials.
"Phase III Clinical Trials"
     1.38.   shall mean any Licensed Compound selected by Wyeth-Ayerst or an Affiliate of Wyeth-Ayerst to enter into Preclinical Development.
"Preclinical Compound"
     1.39.  shall mean, with respect to any Preclinical Compound, the commencement of IND-enabling toxicology studies.
"Preclinical Development"
     1.40.   shall mean that Party receiving Confidential Information under Section 9.1.
"Receiving Party"
     1.41.   shall mean the period during which the Research Program, or any part thereof, remains in effect.
"Research Period"
     1.42.   shall mean a plan of research for each Directed Array Program covering a minimum of a six-month period, which shall be updated periodically as agreed to by the Parties pursuant to Section 2.2. The initial Research Plan shall be developed by the Parties within thirty (30) days of the Effective Date and be attached to this Agreement as Exhibit A.
"Research Plan"
 
     1.43.   shall mean, collectively and individually, each of the Directed Array Programs and the Mapping Array Program.
"Research Program"
     1.44.   shall mean a product containing as one of its constituents (a) any ArQule Compound; (b) any ArQule Derivative Compound; (c) any Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compound; or (d) any other Derivative Compound discovered, developed or designed by Wyeth-Ayerst from any ArQule Compound, ArQule Derivative Compound or Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compound.
"Royalty-Bearing Product"
     1.45.  shall mean, with respect to each Royalty-Bearing Product, every calendar quarter, or partial calendar quarter, commencing with the first commercial sale of such Royalty-Bearing Product in any country and ending on the later to occur of (i) the end of the quarter during which all Patent Rights covering one or more active components per se of such Royalty-Bearing Product expire in the applicable country, or (ii) * years after such first commercial sale in the applicable country.
"Royalty Period"
     1.46.   shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.1.
"Research Committee"
     1.47.  shall mean any non-Affiliate third party licensed by Wyeth-Ayerst to make, use (except where the right to use accompanies the sale of any Royalty-Bearing Product by Wyeth-Ayerst or its Affiliates, Sublicensees or Direct Licensees) or sell any Royalty-Bearing Product pursuant to any rights granted hereunder.
"Sublicensee"
     1.48.  shall mean any biological target selected by Wyeth-Ayerst.
"Target"
     1.49.   shall mean any chemical compound provided by Wyeth-Ayerst or its Affiliates to ArQule under a Directed Array Program described in Section 4.
"Wyeth-Ayerst Compound"
     1.50.  shall mean a Derivative Compound synthesized by ArQule from a Wyeth-Ayerst Compound under a Directed Array Program described in Section 4.
"Wyeth-Ayerst Compound"
     1.51.   shall mean Patent Rights controlled or owned by Wyeth-Ayerst as of the Effective Date or during the Research Period.
"Wyeth-Ayerst Patent Rights"
     1.52  The above definitions are intended to encompass the defined terms in both the singular and plural tenses.
2.  
Management of Research Program.
     2.1.  The Parties hereby establish a Research Committee comprised of six (6) members, with three (3) representatives appointed by each Party. The members of the Research Committee shall be as follows:
Composition of Research Committee.
                    
ArQule Representatives
Wyeth-Ayerst Representatives
 
     David Coffen, Ph.D.                      Magid Abou-Gharbia, Ph.D.
     Peter Pallai, Ph.D.                           John Ellingboe, Ph.D.
     Dave Powers, Ph.D.                       TBD on a Target-specific basis
A Party may change one or more of its representatives to the Research Committee at any time upon notice to the other Party. Each Party will designate one of its representatives as its team leader.
     2.2.   The Research Committee shall direct and administer the Research Program. With respect to each Directed Array Program, the Research Committee shall specifically determine the following: (i) the appropriate number and type of Chemical Themes, to be submitted to the Directed Array Program, subject to ArQule's right to exclude certain compounds as set forth in Section 4.2 below; (ii) the appropriate number of compounds that ArQule should generate in a Directed Array for a particular Chemical Theme; and (iii) the appropriate amount of each compound in a Directed Array that ArQule should deliver to Wyeth-Ayerst for further research and development. The scope of each Chemical Theme will be determined on the basis of the following criteria: (i) the specific reaction or reaction sequence used to combine members of two or more discrete chemical units in which each chemical unit bears the functional group(s) required for the specific reaction(s) that result in the combination of the chemical units; and (ii) the extent to which a class of compounds is related by a recurring structural motif associated with a particular biological activity. In addition, the Research Committee shall (i) determine the criteria of substantial structural homology and minimal functional activity necessary to identify Active Homologs of an Active Compound, (ii) determine the criteria of significant functional activity necessary to identify an Active Compound, (iii) determine whether any Active ArQule Compound and any Active Homolog thereto should be designated as a Licensed Compound and included in a Licensed Compound Set pursuant to Section 3.2 or Section 4.3 hereof; (iv) determine and update the list of Licensed Compounds; (v) revise and extend the Research Plan periodically as agreed to by the Parties; (vi) allocate personnel resources to be utilized by the parties under the Agreement; and (vii) resolve all matters involving scientific questions.
Duties of the Research Committee.
     2.3.   The Research Committee shall conduct monthly telephone conferences and shall prepare and deliver a brief written report describing the significant issues and discussions that take place during such telephone conferences. A representative of the Research Committee jointly appointed by its members shall provide each member with * business days notice of the time of any such telephone conferences and the proposed agenda with respect thereto, unless waived by all members. The Research Committee shall meet at least once each quarter alternately at the Parties' locations, or at such other times and locations as the Research Committee determines. A representative of the Research Committee jointly appointed by its members shall provide each member with * business days notice of the time and location of meetings, unless such notice is waived by all members. If a designated representative of a Party cannot attend a meeting of the Research Committee, such Party may designate a different representative for that meeting without notice to the other Party, and the substitute member will have full power to vote on behalf of the permanent member. Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, all actions and decisions of the Research
Meetings of the Research Committee.
 
Committee will require the unanimous consent of all of its members. If the Research Committee fails to reach agreement upon any matter, the dispute will be resolved in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 13.4 below. Within * days following each quarterly meeting of the Research Committee, the Research Committee shall prepare and deliver, to both Parties, a written report describing the decisions made, conclusions and actions agreed upon.
     2.4.    Each Party agrees to provide the Research Committee with information and documentation as reasonably required for the Research Committee to fulfill its duties under this Agreement. In addition, each Party agrees to make available its employees and consultants as reasonably requested by the Research Committee. The Parties anticipate that members of the Research Committee will communicate informally with each other and with employees and consultants of the Parties on matters relating to the Directed Array Program.
Cooperation.
     2.5.    Members of the Research Committee shall have reasonable access to the facilities of each Party where activities under this Agreement are in progress, but only during normal business hours and with reasonable prior notice. Each Party shall bear its own expenses in connection with such site visits.
Visits to Facilities.
3.  
Mapping Array Program.
     3.1.    ArQule will supply Wyeth-Ayerst with its Mapping Array Program containing approximately one (1) milligram each of not less than 200,000 different ArQule Compounds during the Initial Contract Year of 1997 (which includes approximately 100,000 ArQule Compounds from ArQule's 1996 Mapping Array Program, and approximately 100,000 ArQule Compounds from ArQule's 1997 Mapping Array Program), and approximately 200,000 different ArQule Compounds during the subsequent Contract Years for the term of the Mapping Array Program provided for in Section 3.5. Each Mapping Array Program shall be based on approximately 10-20 Chemical Themes. Beginning in 1998, ArQule shall confirm that the ArQule Compounds within the Mapping Array are, on average, at least eight-five percent (85%) pure. Promptly upon its receipt of any such Mapping Array, Wyeth-Ayerst shall commence testing of such Mapping Array for activity against Targets within the Field. Upon the completion by Wyeth-Ayerst of its testing of any such Mapping Array, Wyeth-Ayerst shall promptly provide the ArQule team leader with a telefax communication detailing the discovery of Active Compounds, which telefax shall be followed by a confirmatory letter, provided, however, that Wyeth-Ayerst may withhold any Confidential Information it deems appropriate to prevent disclosure of the Targets. At Wyeth-Ayerst's request, and subject to the availability of such Active Compound(s) as Licensed Compound(s) in accordance with the provisions of Section 3.2 hereof, ArQule shall resynthesize any Active Compound(s) and will promptly supply Wyeth-Ayerst with an appropriate amount of such Active Compound(s) for a second evaluation as determined by the Research Committee.
Conduct of Mapping Array Program.
     3.2.    Initially, ArQule will identify the Chemical Theme of each Mapping Array but not the structures of the individual ArQule Compounds in the Mapping Array. Wyeth-Ayerst may screen the Mapping Array against any Targets within the Field during the term of this Agreement and thereafter. Initially, Wyeth-Ayerst will not disclose the Targets screened. When Wyeth-Ayerst detects any Active ArQule Compound in a Mapping
Mutual Disclosure.
 
Array, ArQule will initially disclose whether such Active Compound or Active Homolog thereto (i) is included within a Directed Array Program for a third party for development in the Field, (ii) is being optimized by a third party from a Mapping Array Program for development in the Field, (iii) is licensed by a third party for development in the Field, or (iv) is included in an existing ArQule Internal Discovery Program, in which case such Active ArQule Compound and such Active Homologs thereto may not be reserved as per Section 3.3 or designated as Licensed Compounds. If such Active ArQule Compound and Active Homologs may be reserved or designated as Licensed Compounds, ArQule will disclose (a) the structure of each Active ArQule Compound and (b) the structures, but not the locations in the Mapping Array, of all Active Homologs thereto, and Wyeth-Ayerst will disclose (a) the identity of the Target and (b) the level of activity. All such disclosed information shall be treated as Confidential Information by both Parties. The Parties agree that all Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs thereto which exhibit significant functional activity against Targets shall, subject to the approval of the Research Committee, be submitted to the Directed Array Program under Section 4. Wyeth-Ayerst, at its discretion, may request that the Research Committee designate any such Active ArQule Compound and Active Homologs thereto as Licensed Compounds comprising a Licensed Compound Set if such Active ArQule Compound and Active Homologs are still available as Licensed Compounds. Subject to the foregoing, (a) ArQule shall notify the Research Committee that such Active ArQule Compound and Active Homologs thereto are properly designated as Licensed Compounds, and (b) provide Wyeth-Ayerst with the confirmed chemical composition, structure, purity information and location of all Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs thereto so designated as Licensed Compounds belonging to such Licensed Compound Set.
     3.3.   Prior to designating any Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs thereto as Licensed Compounds pursuant to Section 3.2 hereof, Wyeth-Ayerst, at its discretion, may notify ArQule of its intent to license such Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs, and request a reservation of such Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs thereto (collectively the "Reserved Compounds"). Upon ArQule receiving from Wyeth-Ayerst (i) a written request to reserve such Reserved Compounds, and (ii) disclosure of the Target and activity information pursuant to Section 3.2 hereof, ArQule shall reserve such Reserved Compounds for subsequent designation by Wyeth-Ayerst as Licensed Compounds for a period ending upon the earlier to occur of (i) Wyeth-Ayerst's notification to ArQule that it no longer has an interest in licensing or developing such Reserved Compounds, or (ii) sixty (60) days.
Reservation of Active ArQule Compounds.
     3.4.   In consideration of the performance by ArQule of the Mapping Array Program during the term provided for in Section 3.5, Wyeth-Ayerst shall pay ArQule an annual subscription fee of $1,500,000. Each subsequent annual subscription fee after the 1998 Contract Year shall be as follows:
Mapping Array Program Payments.
     1999 Contract Year Annual Subscription Fee = $1,545,000.
     2000 Contract Year Annual Subscription Fee = $1,591,350.
     2001 Contract Year Annual Subscription Fee = $1,639,091.
 
Beginning in 1998, any such annual subscription fee is payable one-third (1/3) upon the start of such Contract Year, one-third (1/3) within thirty (30) days of the delivery of one-half the Mapping Array to be provided by ArQule in such Contract Year, and one-third (1/3) within thirty (30) days of the delivery of the remainder of the Mapping Arrays to be provided by ArQule in such Contract Year. The payment schedule for annual subscription fees shall be as follows:
     In 1997 Contract Year:          $500,000.
     In 1998 Contract Year:          $2,500,000.
     In 1999 Contract Year:          $1,545,000.
     In 2000 Contract Year:          $1,591,350.
     In 2001 Contract Year:          $1,639,091.
     3.5.   The Mapping Array Program shall commence on the Effective Date and continue until December 31, 2001, unless earlier terminated as provided in Article 12 below. Wyeth-Ayerst may renew the term of the Mapping Array Program at its option for additional periods of three years on terms and conditions to be mutually agreed upon by the Parties. Termination of the Mapping Array Program shall have no effect on the continuation of any Directed Array Program.
Term of Mapping Array Program.
     3.6.   During the term of the Mapping Array Program, any Active ArQule Compound selected by Wyeth-Ayerst from the Mapping Array Program for re-synthesis pursuant to this Agreement shall be reproducible by ArQule in quantities of at least 1 mg or such other reasonable quantity as determined by the Research Committee. The Parties agree that the failure of ArQule to meet these performance criteria of this section shall not constitute a material breach of the Agreement sufficient for termination pursuant to Section 12.3 hereof. In the event that there develops a clear pattern of false positive screening results attributable to the quality of Mapping Array Compounds or ArQule is consistently unable to reproduce Active ArQule Compounds in accordance with the re-synthesis performance criteria set forth in this section, the Parties agree to submit the matter to the Research Committee for development of a plan to correct the deficiency. If the Parties fail to achieve a satisfactory correction of the deficiency in accordance with the plan developed by the Research Committee, Wyeth-Ayerst shall be entitled to terminate the Mapping Array Program in accordance with Section 12.3 hereof.
Performance of Mapping Array Program.
4.   
Directed Array Program.
     4.1.   Subject to the approval of the Research Committee and the provisions of Section 4.2, ArQule will synthesize, under the direction of the Research Committee and in accordance with the Research Plan, multiple Directed Arrays of compounds derived from (i) each Wyeth-Ayerst Compound provided to ArQule by Wyeth-Ayerst for inclusion in a Directed Array Program, and/or (ii) each Active ArQule Compound or Active Homolog thereto provided by ArQule to Wyeth-Ayerst under the
Description of Directed Array Programs.
 
Mapping Array Program for inclusion in a Directed Array Program. The Parties agree that, during the period provided for in Section 4.5, ArQule will produce such Directed Arrays in no less than * separate Directed Array Programs as follows:
The Research Committee will determine which Active ArQule Compounds or Active Homologs thereto, and which Wyeth-Ayerst Compounds are actually submitted to the Directed Array Programs. Subject to Research Committee approval and oversight, it is expected that each Directed Array Program should take * to complete, with an average of * for the Directed Array Programs commenced in any Contract Year. In the event that such average exceeds * in any Contract Year, the matter will be referred to the Research Committee to develop a plan to accelerate the Directed Array Programs. Failure to average * or less to complete the Directed Array Programs for any Contract Year shall not be a material breach sufficient to terminate this Agreement pursuant to Section 12.3. Each Directed Array program shall result in the production of approximately * to about * compounds per Chemical Theme per Directed Array Program resulting in approximately * to * compounds generated for the * Directed Array Programs, that the number of Chemical Themes actually submitted to the Directed Array Program and the number of ArQule Derivative Compounds or Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compounds actually produced per Chemical Theme will be determined by the Research Committee. ArQule shall devote the resources necessary to produce such Directed Array Program commensurate with the payments received by ArQule for such Directed Array Program and ArQule agrees that the determination of the actual numbers of compounds developed per Directed Array Program shall be determined on a strict scientific basis to accomplish the goals of such Directed Array Program rather than on the basis of allocation of resources among ArQule's corporate collaborators. The Parties intend that ArQule will produce approximately * of each such Derivative Compound in the Directed Arrays, and in the case of Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compounds, subject to the availability of the original Wyeth-Ayerst Compounds; that the amount of each Derivative Compound that ArQule actually produces will ultimately be determined by the Research Committee.
provided, however,
provided, however,
     4.2.   ArQule shall have the right, at the time Wyeth-Ayerst seeks to include any (i) Active ArQule Compound or Active Homolog thereto, or (ii) Wyeth-Ayerst Compound, in any Directed Array Program, to exclude from such Directed Array Program any such Active ArQule Compound, Active Homolog thereto, or Wyeth-Ayerst Compound that is at that time (i) included within a Directed Array Program for a third party for development in the Field, (ii) being optimized by a third party from a Mapping Array Program for development in the Field, (iii) previously licensed by a third party for development in the Field, or (iv) is included in an existing ArQule Internal Discovery Program. In the event that ArQule excludes a compound from a Directed Array Program
Compounds Excluded from the Directed Array Program.
 
pursuant to Subsection (iv) of this Section, and to the extent ArQule may be permitted to do so in respect of agreements with third parties, Wyeth-Ayerst shall * on terms and conditions to be negotiated in good faith by the Parties during a sixty (60) period beginning upon ArQule's notice to Wyeth-Ayerst that *. In the event that no agreement is reached within such sixty (60) day period, *, that ArQule will not * to a third party on financial terms more favorable, in the aggregate, than those last offered to Wyeth-Ayerst.
provided, however,
     4.3.    Each Directed Array Program shall be conducted in a good scientific manner and in compliance with all applicable legal requirements. The conduct of the Directed Array Program shall be the primary responsibility of ArQule with participation by Wyeth-Ayerst. Directed Arrays may be produced by ArQule in one or more iterations as directed by the Research Committee. Wyeth-Ayerst shall propose Chemical Themes to the Research Committee for inclusion in a Directed Array Program. If the Research Committee approves the inclusion of the proposed Chemical Theme, Wyeth-Ayerst shall provide ArQule with the requisite amount and purity of Wyeth-Ayerst Compounds for that Chemical Theme, as directed by the Research Committee. ArQule shall thereupon diligently synthesize Directed Arrays of ArQule Derivative Compounds or Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compounds, as the case may be, in accordance with the Research Plan. Wyeth-Ayerst shall, in its discretion, be responsible for conducting screening for binding affinity and/or functional activity of all compounds in the Directed Arrays. The Parties shall continue the procedure described in this Section 4.3 for each Active Compound until the earliest to occur of (i) the determination by the Research Committee, in accordance with Section 2.2, to designate any such Active ArQule Compound and any Active Homolog thereto as Licensed Compounds belonging to a Licensed Compound Set, (ii) the determination by the Research Committee to cease further testing of such Active Compound, (iii) the termination of such Directed Array Program pursuant to Section 4.5, or (iv) termination of this Agreement in accordance with Section 12. In the event that the Research Committee cannot agree on a determination to be made by the Research Committee hereunder, then such determination shall be resolved pursuant to Section 13.4. Notwithstanding the foregoing, all Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs thereto arising from the Directed Array Program and designated as Licensed Compounds, shall remain exclusive to Wyeth-Ayerst, and ArQule or any of its licensees or its pharmaceutical partners shall have no rights thereto except as otherwise provided for in this Agreement.
Conduct of Directed Array Program.
     4.4.  
Directed Array Program Payments.
              4.4.1.    In consideration of the performance by ArQule of the Directed Array Program, Wyeth-Ayerst shall pay ArQule a delivery fee equal to $* for each Directed Array Program commenced during the 1997 and 1998 Contract Years. Wyeth-Ayerst shall make the following delivery fee payment to ArQule for the Directed Array Programs commenced during subsequent Contract Years:
Delivery Fee.
     1999 Contract Year Delivery Fee = $*.
     2000 Contract Year Delivery Fee = $*
 
All such delivery fees are payable *. The annual payment schedule for such fees is expected to be as follows:
The parties agree that due to the uncertain scientific nature of any Directed Array Program, the completion of the expected number of Directed Array Programs in any one year may not occur in the same year that they are initiated, and in such case, Wyeth-Ayerst will not be obligated to make the payments scheduled in that year, but only to make the remaining payments when the Directed Array Programs are actually completed.
          4.4.2. . In addition to the amounts payable pursuant to Section 4.4.1 above, Wyeth-Ayerst shall pay any and all Extraordinary Expenses of ArQule, as required and approved by the Research Committee which shall approve such Extraordinary Expenses before they are incurred.
Expenses
     4.5. . The term of each Directed Array Program shall begin upon the commencement of such Directed Array Program and, unless earlier terminated as provided in Article 12 below, terminate on the first anniversary of such commencement date unless extended by the Research Committee because of extraordinary circumstances. The period for completing all Directed Array Programs commenced pursuant to Section 4.1 hereof shall terminate at the end of the Final Contract Year, provided, however, that such period may be extended for additional periods of three (3) years at Wyeth-Ayerst's option on terms and conditions to be mutually agreed upon by the Parties.
Term of Directed Array Programs
     4.6. . During the term of the Directed Array Program, any ArQule Derivative Compound and any Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compound selected for resynthesis pursuant to this Agreement shall be reproducible by ArQule in quantities of at least * or such other reasonable quantity as determined by the Research Committee. In the event that ArQule is unable to reproduce such compound in accordance with the performance criteria set forth in this section, the Parties agree to submit the matter to the Research Committee for development of a plan to achieve such performance criteria and to ultimately resolve the matter in accordance with this Agreement. The Parties agree that the failure of ArQule to meet the performance criteria of this section shall not constitute a material breach of the Agreement sufficient for termination pursuant to Section 12.3 hereof.
Performance of Directed Array Program
5. .
License Grants; Reversion of Rights
     5.1. . ArQule hereby grants to Wyeth-Ayerst, under ArQule Patent Rights and ArQule Technology (a) a nonexclusive, royalty-free license * to test each Mapping
Screening Licenses
 
Array for significant functional activity against Targets; and (b) an exclusive, royalty-free license to test each Directed Array for significant functional activity against Targets.
     5.2. . Upon the designation of Wyeth-Ayerst and upon the designation by the Research Committee of any Active ArQule Compound or any Active Homolog thereto as a Licensed Compound, ArQule shall grant to Wyeth-Ayerst, under any intellectual property rights owned solely by ArQule or jointly with Wyeth-Ayerst or controlled by ArQule, including ArQule Patent Rights, Joint Patent Rights and ArQule Technology, covering the composition, manufacture or use of any such Licensed Compound selected by Wyeth-Ayerst for Preclinical Development, an exclusive, worldwide royalty-bearing license * subject to Section 5.3 (i) to develop or have developed Royalty-Bearing Products incorporating Licensed Compounds for use in the Field (ii) to make or have made Royalty-Bearing Products incorporating Licensed Compounds for use, distribution and sale in the Field, and (iii) to distribute for sale and sell in the Field Royalty-Bearing Products incorporating Licensed Compounds, , that * contained in this Agreement.
Commercialization License
provided, however
     5.3. . With respect to an Active ArQule Compound and Active Homologs thereof composing a Licensed Compound Set identified by Wyeth-Ayerst from a Mapping Array Program, in the event that (i) Wyeth-Ayerst determines not to develop such Licensed Compound Set or to discontinue Preclinical Development of such Licensed Compound Set (in which case Wyeth-Ayerst shall promptly notify ArQule); or (ii) Wyeth-Ayerst fails to use commercially reasonable and diligent efforts (as defined below) to develop such Licensed Compound Set for a specific therapeutic Target (provided, however, that Wyeth-Ayerst shall not develop more than * licensed Compound Sets for a specified therapeutic Target), then ArQule shall have the right to terminate upon notice any license granted to Wyeth-Ayerst under Section 5.2 with respect to such Licensed Compound Set. In such event, ArQule shall thereafter be free to offer such Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs thereto belonging to such Licensed Compound Set to third parties pursuant to a Mapping Array Program, including the right to grant licenses covering such reverted Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs to third parties for development and commercialization resulting from independent discoveries arising from such Mapping Array Program. Upon termination of such license by ArQule, Wyeth-Ayerst shall (i) grant to ArQule an exclusive license, with the right to grant sublicenses, to manufacture, use or sell such Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs thereto under any Joint Patent Rights covering the composition or use of such Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs and (ii) return to ArQule all Proprietary Materials and Confidential Information supplied by ArQule which relate to such Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs. ArQule agrees not to disclose any Wyeth-Ayerst Confidential Information to any third party regarding such reverted Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs in accordance with Article 9 hereof. In the event that ArQule grants a license to a third party to use a reverted Active ArQule Compound or Active Homolog in a manner that is covered by a Valid Claim of a Joint Patent Right exclusively licensed to ArQule under this Section 5.3, ArQule shall pay Wyeth-Ayerst * percent (*%) of revenue attributable to the license of that Joint Patent Right. As used herein, the term "commercially reasonable and diligent efforts" means those efforts consistent with the exercise of prudent scientific and business judgment, as applied to other products of similar scientific and commercial potential within the relevant product lines of Wyeth-Ayerst and its Affiliates. Notwithstanding the foregoing,
Reversion of Rights; Return of Materials
 
pursuant to Section 4.3 hereof, all Active ArQule Compounds and Active Homologs thereto arising from the Directed Array Program and designated as Licensed Compounds, shall remain exclusive to Wyeth-Ayerst, and ArQule or any of its licensees or its pharmaceutical partners shall have no rights thereto except as otherwise provided for in this Agreement.
     5.4. . Wyeth-Ayerst may, at any time, request from ArQule, and ArQule agrees to grant directly to Wyeth-Ayerst Affiliates in any country other than the United States equivalent rights as granted to Wyeth-Ayerst on equivalent terms and conditions as agreed to by Wyeth-Ayerst under this Agreement. Accordingly, upon receipt of Wyeth-Ayerst's request, ArQule shall enter into and sign a direct license agreement or agreements with such Wyeth-Ayerst Affiliates designated by Wyeth-Ayerst in the request. All direct license agreements coming into force under this section shall contain terms and conditions which are equivalent with those in this Agreement, subject only to such modifications, as may be required by the laws or regulations of the country to be demonstrated by Wyeth-Ayerst in which such direct license may still be exercised, but only to the extent such modifications are outside Wyeth-Ayerst's or its Affiliates' direct or indirect control, including, but not limited to, restrictions against the remittance of royalties and limitations upon the term or duration of said direct license agreement. In those countries in which the validity of such a direct license agreement requires prior government approval or registration, such direct license agreement shall not be binding or have force or effect until the required governmental approval or registration has been granted.
Direct Licenses to Affiliates
6. .
Ownership of Compounds
     6.1. . All Wyeth-Ayerst Compounds and Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compounds shall be owned by Wyeth-Ayerst or its Affiliates, except, and only to the extent that any such compound (i) was under development by ArQule (including programs with academic collaborators or corporate partners) before such compound was proposed to be included in the Directed Array Program; (ii) was independently developed by ArQule employees who had no access to Wyeth-Ayerst Confidential Information regarding the particular compound as evidenced by sufficient written documentation, or (iii) was already within a screening array before such compound was proposed to be included in the Directed Array Program.
Wyeth-Ayerst Compounds; Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compounds
     6.2. . All ArQule Compounds and ArQule Derivative Compounds shall be owned by ArQule except, and only to the extent that, any such compound (i) was under development by Wyeth-Ayerst before such compound was proposed to be included in the Directed Array Program; (ii) was independently developed by Wyeth-Ayerst employees who had no access to ArQule Confidential Information regarding the particular compound as evidenced by sufficient written documentation, or (iii) was already in the possession of Wyeth-Ayerst before it was provided by ArQule to Wyeth-Ayerst or its Affiliates.
ArQule Compounds; ArQule Derivative Compounds
7. .
Intellectual Property Rights
     7.1. .
Ownership of Patent Rights
 
     7.2. . The Parties shall agree upon a mutually acceptable independent patent attorney who will be responsible, at Wyeth-Ayerst's expense, for the preparation, filing, prosecution, and maintenance of any Joint Patent Rights claiming such inventions. In the event of any disagreement concerning any Joint Patent Rights, the matter shall be resolved in accordance with Section 13.4. Wyeth-Ayerst shall consult with ArQule as to the preparation, filing, prosecution, and maintenance of such Joint Patent Rights reasonably prior to any deadline or action with the U.S. Patent & Trademark Office or its foreign equivalent in a Major Market Country, and shall furnish to ArQule copies of all relevant documents reasonably in advance of such consultation. In the event that Wyeth-Ayerst desires to abandon such Joint Patent Rights or later declines responsibility for such Joint Patent Rights, Wyeth-Ayerst shall provide reasonable prior written notice to ArQule of such intention to abandon or decline responsibility, and ArQule shall have the right, at its expense, to prepare, file, prosecute, and maintain such Joint Patent Rights.
Management of Joint Patent Rights
     7.3. . Each Party agrees to cooperate fully in the preparation, filing, and prosecution of any Patent Rights under this Agreement. Such cooperation includes, but is not limited to:
Cooperation of the Parties
 
     7.4. .
Infringement by Third Parties
     ArQule and Wyeth-Ayerst shall each promptly notify the other in writing of any alleged or threatened infringement by a third party of any ArQule Patent Right, Wyeth-Ayerst Patent Right or Joint Patent Right of which they become aware. ArQule may elect, but is under no obligation, to initiate legal action with respect to an ArQule Patent Right against such third party in its sole discretion, and Wyeth-Ayerst shall cooperate fully with ArQule in any such action at its own out-of-pocket expenses, further provided that Wyeth-Ayerst shall have the right to join as a party. Wyeth-Ayerst shall have the right to be represented by legal counsel of its own choosing at its sole expense. If ArQule, within * months of receipt of such notice or such lesser period of time if a further delay would result in material harm, or the loss of a material right, has not commenced legal action against an infringer whose infringing product has a market share larger than * percent (*%) of the sales of a product competing with a Royalty-Bearing Product and embraced by a Valid Claim of such ArQule Patent Rights licensed to Wyeth-Ayerst hereunder, upon written notice from Wyeth-Ayerst, ArQule, in its sole discretion shall either (i) initiate such action, or (ii) authorize Wyeth-Ayerst to commence such action. Wyeth-Ayerst may elect, but is under no obligation, to initiate legal action with respect to a Wyeth-Ayerst Patent Rights or Joint Patent Rights against such third party in its sole discretion, and ArQule shall cooperate fully with Wyeth-Ayerst in any such action at its own out-of-pocket expenses, further provided that ArQule shall have the right to join as a party. ArQule shall have the right to be represented by legal counsel of its own choosing at its sole expense. If Wyeth-Ayerst, within * months of receipt of such notice or such lesser period of time if a further delay would result in material harm, or the loss of a material right, has not commenced legal action against an infringer whose infringing product has a market share larger than * percent (*%) of the sales of a product competing with a Royalty-Bearing Product and embraced by a Valid Claim in that country of such Wyeth-Ayerst Patent Rights or Joint Patent Rights, upon written notice from ArQule, Wyeth-Ayerst, in its sole discretion, shall either (i) initiate such action, or (ii) authorize ArQule to commence such action. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, any settlement of such legal action by the initiating Party shall require the consent of the non-initiating Party, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. The Party whose Patent Rights allegedly are being infringed, if they initiate such action, shall not be required to bring or maintain more than one such suit at any time with respect to claims directed to any one method of manufacture or composition of matter. All monies recovered upon the final judgment or settlement of any such suit shall be shared, after reimbursement of expenses, by ArQule and Wyeth-Ayerst pro rata according to the respective percentages of costs borne by each Party in the suit pursuant to Section 7.4. Notwithstanding the foregoing, ArQule and Wyeth-Ayerst shall fully cooperate with each other in the planning and execution of any action to enforce the Patent Rights, and shall join suit if required by law to do so in order to bring such action.
     7.5. .
Infringement of Third Party Rights
     (a)  If Wyeth-Ayerst should be of the reasonable opinion that it cannot make, import, use, market and/or sell a Royalty-Bearing Product without infringing a third party's patent, and where such infringement arises solely and directly from the use or sale of an ArQule Compound or ArQule Derivative Compound (but not a Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compound), it shall notify ArQule. Both Parties then shall seek an opinion of patent counsel acceptable to both Parties and shall share the costs thereof. If such patent counsel concurs with Wyeth-Ayerst's opinion, the
 
Parties shall jointly or independently endeavor to secure a license from the third party on terms that are acceptable to both Parties.
     (b)  If, in the opinion of patent counsel selected under Subsection (a) hereof, the third party patent, if litigated, would be found to be invalid or not infringed by the manufacture or sale of Royalty-Bearing Products, or if the Parties otherwise mutually agree to obtain a license to such third party patent, the Parties shall proceed in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, unless an action for infringement is brought against one or both Parties.
     (c)  If either Party is sued for patent infringement of any third party patents arising out of the manufacture, use, sale or importation of Royalty-Bearing Products, and where such infringement arises solely and directly from the use or sale of an ArQule Compound or ArQule Derivative Compound (but not a Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compound), the Parties shall promptly meet to discuss the course of action to be taken to resolve or defend any such infringement litigation. In such event, Wyeth-Ayerst shall determine the course of action with regard to such infringement litigation in its sole discretion, and ArQule shall provide Wyeth-Ayerst with such assistance as is reasonably necessary and shall cooperate in the defense of any such action.
     (d)  Subject to Section 8.9, Wyeth-Ayerst shall bear all the costs and expenses arising in connection with any of the activities described in Sections 7.5(b) and 7.5(c).
     7.6. . Royalty-Bearing Products shall be marketed and sold under the trademark of Wyeth-Ayerst. Upon the termination of this Agreement, Wyeth-Ayerst shall continue to use its trademarks with respect to Royalty-Bearing Products.
Trademarks
8. .
Payments, Reports, and Records
     8.1. . In partial consideration for Wyeth-Ayerst obtaining access to ArQule's Mapping Array Program and Directed Array Program as provided herein, Wyeth-Ayerst shall pay to ArQule a technology access fee equal to $* (the "Access Fee") payable during the first half of 1998, and for which Wyeth-Ayerst shall receive from ArQule a number of shares of ArQule Common Stock, determined in accordance with and subject to the terms and conditions of a certain Common Stock Purchase Agreement entered into by the Parties of even date hereof.
Access Fee
     8.2. . In partial consideration of the rights granted Wyeth-Ayerst under this Agreement, Wyeth-Ayerst shall pay ArQule the following amounts within * days after each occurrence of the following milestones:
Research and Development Payments
 
As used in this Section 8.2, * means the decision of the Wyeth-Ayerst Research Operations Committee or its equivalent to *. At least *. * will measure appropriate endpoints. An * must have a * without *. Cost of goods must remain commercially reasonable to proceed with development.
     Such Research and Development payments shall be non-refundable and shall not be credited against royalties payable to ArQule under this Agreement. Research and Development payments shall be paid for the first occurrence of each Event listed above with respect to each Royalty-Bearing Product. Wyeth-Ayerst shall promptly notify ArQule of each occurrence of any of the foregoing Events.
     8.3. . In consideration of the licenses granted to Wyeth-Ayerst hereunder, for each Royalty Period, Wyeth-Ayerst shall pay to ArQule a royalty for each Royalty-Bearing Product of:
Marginal Royalties
     8.4. . Within * days after the conclusion of each Royalty Period, Wyeth-Ayerst shall deliver to ArQule a report containing the following information:
Reports and Payments
 
All such reports shall be maintained in confidence by ArQule. If no royalties are due to ArQule for any reporting period, the report shall so state. Concurrent with this report, Wyeth-Ayerst shall remit to ArQule any payment due for the applicable Royalty Period. The method of payment shall be mutually agreed to. All amounts payable to ArQule under this Section will first be calculated in the currency of sale and then converted into U.S. dollars in accordance with Section 8.5, and such amounts shall be paid without deduction of any withholding taxes, value-added taxes, or other charges applicable to such payments.
     8.5. . With the exception of Access Fee, Research and Development and royalty payments due under Sections 8.1, 8.2 and 8.3, respectively, ArQule shall submit invoices to Wyeth-Ayerst for each payment due ArQule hereunder (including without limitation all payments due pursuant to Section 3.4), and Wyeth-Ayerst shall pay such invoices within * days of receipt thereof. All payments due under this Agreement shall, except as provided in Section 8.6 below, be payable in United States dollars. Conversion of foreign currency to U.S. dollars shall be made at the conversion rate existing in the United States (as reported in the Wall Street Journal) on the last working day of the calendar quarter preceding the applicable calendar quarter. Such payments shall be without deduction of exchange, collection, or other charges.
Invoices; Payments in U.S. Dollars
     8.6. . If by law, regulation, or fiscal policy of a particular country, conversion into United States dollars or transfer of funds of a convertible currency to the United States is restricted or forbidden, Wyeth-Ayerst shall give ArQule prompt written notice of such restriction, which notice shall satisfy the * day payment deadline described in Section 8.5. Wyeth-Ayerst shall pay any amount due ArQule through whatever lawful methods ArQule reasonably designates, provided, however, that if ArQule fails to designate such payment method within * days after ArQule is notified of the restriction, then Wyeth-Ayerst may deposit such payment in local currency to the credit of ArQule in a recognized banking institution selected by Wyeth-Ayerst and identified by written notice to ArQule, and such deposit shall fulfill all obligations of Wyeth-Ayerst to ArQule with respect to such payment.
Payments in Other Currencies
     8.7. . Wyeth-Ayerst and its Affiliates shall maintain complete and accurate records of Royalty-Bearing Products made, used or sold by them or their Sublicensees or Direct Licensees under this Agreement, and any amounts payable to ArQule in relation to such Royalty-Bearing Products, which records shall contain sufficient information to permit ArQule to confirm the accuracy of any reports delivered to ArQule in accordance with Section 8.4. Wyeth-Ayerst shall retain such records relating to a given Royalty Period for at least * years after the conclusion of that Royalty Period. ArQule shall have the right at its own expense, to cause an independent certified public accountant reasonably acceptable to Wyeth-Ayerst at a date and time mutually agreed upon by both Parties and after giving Wyeth-Ayerst at least * days written notice to inspect such records during normal business hours for the sole purpose of verifying any reports and payments delivered under this Agreement. Such accountant shall not disclose to ArQule any information other than information relating to accuracy of reports and payments delivered under this Agreement and shall provide Wyeth-Ayerst with a copy of any report given to ArQule. The Parties shall reconcile any underpayment or overpayment within * days after the
Records
 
accountant delivers the results of the audit. In the event that any audit performed under this Section reveals an underpayment in excess of * percent (*%) in any Royalty Period, Wyeth-Ayerst shall bear the full cost of such audit. ArQule may exercise its rights under this Section only once every year and only with reasonable prior notice to the other Party.
     8.8. . Wyeth-Ayerst shall be obligated to pay royalties on each Royalty-Bearing Product on a country-by-country basis for the Royalty Period. Thereafter, Wyeth-Ayerst shall have a fully paid up license from ArQule with respect to such Royalty-Bearing Product.
Term of Royalty Obligation
     8.9. . If Wyeth-Ayerst is required to pay royalties to a non-Affiliate third party in order to make, use or sell a Royalty-Bearing Product for which Wyeth-Ayerst is then paying royalties to ArQule, to avoid infringing such third party's patent rights, or where such royalties are payable to such third party as a result of adjudication of an infringement action or settlement thereof, and where such infringement arises solely and directly from the use or sale of an ArQule Compound or ArQule Derivative compound (but not a Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compound), Wyeth-Ayerst may deduct up to * percent (*%) of such third party royalty payments from royalties thereafter payable to ArQule; provided, however, that (i) no such right of deduction shall apply to * (A) that is not an * and (B) that is included within a Royalty-Bearing Product which is a combination product, (ii) no such right of deduction shall apply to *, and (iii) under no circumstances shall the royalties due ArQule be reduced to less than * percent (*%) for Royalty-Bearing Products.
Third Party Royalties
9. .
Confidential Information
     9.1. . Confidential Information shall mean any technical or business information furnished by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving Party in connection with this Agreement and specifically designated as confidential. Such Confidential Information may include, without limitation, the identity of a chemical compound, the use of a chemical compound, trade secrets, know-how, inventions, technical data or specifications, testing methods, business or financial information, research and development activities, product and marketing plans, and customer and supplier information.
Definition of Confidential Information
     9.2. . Confidential Information that is disclosed in writing shall be marked with a legend indicating its confidential status. Confidential Information that is disclosed orally or visually shall be documented in a written notice prepared by the Disclosing Party and delivered to the Receiving Party within thirty (30) days of the date of disclosure; such notice shall summarize the Confidential Information disclosed to the Receiving Party and reference the time and place of disclosure.
Designation of Confidential Information
     9.3. . The Receiving Party agrees that it shall:
Obligations
 
     9.4. . The obligations of the Receiving Party under Section 9.3 above shall not apply to the extent that the Receiving Party can demonstrate that certain Confidential Information:
Exceptions
     9.5. . Upon the termination of this Agreement at the request of the Disclosing Party, the Receiving Party shall destroy or return to the Disclosing Party all originals, copies, and summaries of documents, materials, and other tangible manifestations of Confidential Information in the possession or control of the Receiving Party, except that the Receiving Party may retain one copy of the Confidential Information in the possession of its legal counsel (for ArQule) and its Legal Department (for Wyeth-Ayerst) solely for the purpose of monitoring its obligations under this Agreement.
Return of Confidential Information
     9.6. . ArQule shall not publish any scientific publications with respect to Active ArQule Compounds, Active Homologs, ArQule Derivative Compounds, Wyeth-Ayerst Compounds or Wyeth-Ayerst Derivative Compounds without the prior written permission of Wyeth-Ayerst, which may be withheld in its sole discretion.
Publications
 
     9.7. . The obligations set forth in this Article shall remain in effect for a period of * years after termination of this Agreement, except that the obligations of the Receiving Party to destroy or return Confidential Information to the Disclosing Party shall survive until fulfilled.
Survival of Obligations
10. .
Representations and Warranties
     10.1. . Each Party represents and warrants to the other that it has the legal right and power to enter into this Agreement, to extend the rights and licenses granted to the other in this Agreement, and to fully perform its obligations hereunder, and that the performance of such obligations will not conflict with its charter documents or any agreements, contracts, or other arrangements to which it is a Party.
Authorization
     10.2. . Each Party further represents that it (a) owns or is the licensee in good standing of all Patent Rights, trade secrets and other intellectual property to be used by it in connection with the Research Program, except to the extent that such use is to be based upon patents, trademarks and other intellectual property furnished by the other Party; (b) has received no notice of infringement or misappropriation of any alleged rights asserted by a third party in relation to any technology to be used by it in connection with the Research Program; (c) is not in default with respect to any license agreement related to the Research Program; and (d) its directors, officers and employees responsible for intellectual property matters are not aware of any patent, trade secret or other right of any third party which could materially adversely affect its ability to carry out its responsibilities under the Research Program or the other Party's ability to exercise or exploit any license granted to it under this Agreement. Such Party agrees to immediately notify the other Party in writing in the event such Party hereafter receives a notice of the type referred to in (b) above, becomes in default under any license agreement referred to in (c) above, or becomes aware of any patent, trade secret or other right of the nature referred to in (d) above.
Intellectual Property
11. .
Indemnification and Insurance
     11.1. .
Wyeth-Ayerst Indemnity Obligations
     Wyeth-Ayerst (the "Indemnitor") agrees to defend, indemnify and hold ArQule, its Affiliates and their respective directors, officers, employees and agents (the "Indemnitee") harmless from all costs, judgments, liabilities and damages assessed by a court of competent jurisdiction arising from claims asserted by a third party against ArQule, its Affiliates or their respective directors, employees or agents as a result of: (a) actual or asserted violations of any applicable law or regulation by Wyeth-Ayerst, its Affiliates, sublicensees or third party manufacturers by virtue of which the Royalty-Bearing Products manufactured, distributed or sold shall be alleged or determined to be adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled or otherwise not in compliance with such applicable law or regulation; (b) claims for bodily injury, death or property damage attributable to the manufacture, distribution, sale or use of the Royalty-Bearing Products by Wyeth-Ayerst, its Affiliates, sublicensees or third party manufacturers; or (c) a recall ordered by a governmental agency, or required by a confirmed failure, of Royalty-Bearing Products manufactured, distributed, or sold by Wyeth-Ayerst, its Affiliates, sublicensees or third party manufacturers as reasonably determined by the Parties hereto.
 
     11.2. . Each Party (the "Indemnitor") agrees to defend, indemnify and hold the other Party, its Affiliates and their respective directors, officers, employees and agents (the "Indemnitee") harmless from all costs, judgments, liabilities and damages assessed by a court of competent jurisdiction arising from claims asserted by a third party against the Indemnitee as a result of a breach by the Indemnitor of any of its respective representations and warranties made pursuant to Section 10.1 or 10.2 hereof.
Cross-Indemnity Obligations
     11.3. . In the event that an Indemnitee or any of its Affiliates or their respective employees or agents intends to claim indemnification under this Article 11, such Party shall promptly notify the Indemnitor of any loss, claim, damage, liability or action in respect of which the Indemnitee intends to claim such indemnification, and the Indemnitor shall assume the defense thereof with counsel mutually satisfactory to the Parties; provided, however, that an Indemnitee shall have the right to retain its own counsel, with the fees and expenses to be paid by Indemnitor, if representation of such Indemnitee by the counsel retained by the lndemnitor would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between such Indemnitee and any other Party represented by such counsel in such proceedings. The indemnity agreement in this Article 11 shall not apply to amounts paid in settlement of any loss, claim, damage, liability or action if such settlement is effected without the consent of the Indemnitor, which consent shall not be withheld unreasonably. The failure to deliver notice to the Indemnitor within a reasonable time after the commencement of any liability to the Indemnitee under this Article 11, but the omission so to deliver notice to the Indemnitor will not relieve it of any liability that it may have to any Indemnitee otherwise than under this Article 11. The Indemnitee under this Article 11, its employees and agents, shall cooperate fully with the Indemnitor and its legal representatives in the investigation of any action, claim or liability covered by this indemnification.
Procedure
     11.4. . Wyeth-Ayerst shall maintain appropriate product liability insurance or self-insurance with respect to development, manufacture and sales of the Royalty-Bearing Products by Wyeth-Ayerst in such amount as Wyeth-Ayerst customarily maintains with respect to sales of its other products. Wyeth-Ayerst shall each maintain such insurance for so long as it continues to manufacture or sell the Royalty-Bearing Products, and thereafter for so long as Wyeth-Ayerst maintains insurance for itself covering such manufacture or sales.
Insurance
     12.     .
Term and Termination
     12.1. . This Agreement shall commence on the Effective Date and shall remain in effect until the expiration of the last Royalty Period covering any Royalty-Bearing Product, unless earlier terminated as provided in this Article 12.
Term
     12.2. . In the event that Wyeth-Ayerst fails to make timely payment of any amounts due to ArQule under this Agreement, ArQule may terminate this Agreement upon sixty (60) days written notice to Wyeth-Ayerst, unless Wyeth-Ayerst pays all past-due amounts within such sixty-day notice period.
Breach of Payment Obligations
     12.3. . In the event that either Party commits a material breach of any of its obligations under this Agreement (other than as provided in Section 12.2) and such Party fails (i) to remedy that breach within ninety (90) days after receiving written notice thereof from the other Party or (ii) to commence dispute resolution pursuant to Section 13.4, within ninety
Material Breach
 
(90) days after receiving written notice of that breach from the other Party, the other Party may immediately terminate this Agreement upon written notice to the breaching Party. In the event that a satisfactory resolution of a clear pattern of false positive screening results attributable to the quality of Mapping Array Compounds, and/or consistent inability to reproduce Active ArQule Compounds in accordance with the Mapping Array resynthesis performance criteria as set forth in Section 3.6, cannot be achieved, then Wyeth-Ayerst shall have the right to terminate the Mapping Array Program in accordance with this Section 12.3. In the event that ArQule fails to complete, except under circumstances not reasonably within ArQule's control, by the end of the 1998 Contract Year at least four (4) Directed Array Programs out of the sum of (a) the three (3) Directed Array Programs commenced during the 1997 Contract Year, and (b) the five (5) Directed Array Programs commenced during the 1998 Contract Year, all eight (8) of which had been timely approved by the Research Committee, then Wyeth-Ayerst shall have the right to terminate the Directed Array Program in accordance with this Section 12.3.
     12.4. . Either Party may terminate this Agreement immediately upon notice to the other Party in the event of (i) the filing by the other Party of a petition in bankruptcy or for liquidation; (ii) the request for or appointment of a receiver for the other Party; (iii) execution upon any portion of the other Party's business or assets; (iv) the other Party's arrangement with or assignment for the benefit of creditors; or (v) the other Party becoming unable to meet its obligations as they become due.
Insolvency
     12.5. . In the event that ArQule is acquired by a competitor of Wyeth-Ayerst, Wyeth-Ayerst may (i) terminate the Mapping Array Program upon nine (9) months written notice to ArQule, and/or (ii) terminate any Directed Array Program upon six (6) months written notice to ArQule, subject to the payment of all accrued and unpaid payments, including, without limitation, Mapping Array Program (as provided for in this Section 12.5), Directed Array Program, Research, and royalty payments accrued or accruing in the future. In the event Wyeth-Ayerst terminates the Mapping Array Program pursuant to this Section 12.5, then Wyeth-Ayerst shall pay ArQule a pro-rated Mapping Array subscription fee equal to the sum of (i) the subscription fee due under Section 3.4 for the current Contract Year times a fraction, the numerator of which equals the total number of ArQule Compounds actually delivered to Wyeth-Ayerst from the current Contract Year Mapping Array from the beginning of the current Contract Year until nine (9) months from the notice of termination, and the denominator of which equals 200,000 ArQule Compounds, plus (ii) the subscription fee due under Section 3.4 for the subsequent Contract Year times a fraction, the numerator of which equals the total number of ArQule Compounds actually delivered to Wyeth-Ayerst from the subsequent Contract Year Mapping Array from the beginning of the subsequent Contract Year until nine (9) months from the notice of termination, and the denominator of which equals 200,000 ArQule Compounds. In the event that Wyeth-Ayerst terminates the Directed Array Program pursuant to this Section 12.5, Wyeth-Ayerst shall be under no obligation to begin any new Directed Array Programs after giving notice of such termination. In the event of such acquisition, ArQule will keep confidential Wyeth-Ayerst Confidential Information, including, without limitation, the identity and number of the Directed Array Targets and Licensed Compounds, from its parent company, and any employee or consultant thereof (except former ArQule employees and consultants) for a period of five (5) years.
Change of Control
 
     12.6. . Termination of this Agreement shall not relieve the Parties of any obligation accruing prior to such termination. The provisions of Article 6, Sections 7.1, 7.3, 7.6, Article 8 (with respect only to the payment of milestone payments and royalties accrued at the time of or after termination), Article 9, Article 11 and Article 13 shall survive the expiration or termination of this Agreement. Wyeth-Ayerst shall have the right to reserve or license pursuant to Article 3 or 4, any Active Compound disclosed to ArQule pursuant to Section 3.1 prior to termination of this Agreement, subject to all applicable terms and conditions of this Agreement, which shall also survive termination of this Agreement with respect to such compound. All licenses granted pursuant to Section 5.2 with respect any Licensed Compound shall survive termination of this Agreement subject to all applicable terms and conditions of this Agreement, which shall also survive termination of this Agreement with respect to such Licensed Compound. Upon termination of this Agreement, the Parties shall be obliged to take, maintain, and update an inventory of all payments due ArQule under Articles 3, 4 and 8 of this Agreement.
Effect of Termination
13. .
Miscellaneous
     13.1. . Nothing in this Agreement is intended or shall be deemed to constitute a partnership, agency, employer-employee or joint venture relationship between the Parties. No Party shall incur any debts or make any commitments for the other, except to the extent, if at all, specifically provided therein.
Relationship of Parties
     13.2. . Neither Party shall use the name of the other Party or reveal the terms of this Agreement in any publicity or advertising without the prior written approval of the other Party, except that (i) either Party may use the text of a written statement approved in advance by both Parties without further approval, (ii) either Party shall have the right to identify the other Party and to disclose the terms of this Agreement as required by applicable securities laws or other applicable law or regulation, and (iii) either Party may use the name of the other Party and reveal the existence of this Agreement as long as such statements do not disclose the terms of this Agreement. In any disclosure of this Agreement to a government agency under the preceding sentence, the disclosing party shall request confidential treatment of the sensitive terms and conditions hereof, such as the financial terms of this Agreement, and shall provide such confidential treatment request to the other party for review and comment prior to filing.
Publicity
     13.3. . This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts without regard to its conflict of laws provisions.
Governing Law
     13.4. .
Dispute Resolution Procedures
 
     13.5. . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, and all of which together shall be deemed to be one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
     13.6. . All headings in this Agreement are for convenience only and shall not affect the meaning of any provision hereof.
Headings
     13.7. . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Parties, their Affiliates, and their respective lawful successors and assigns.
Binding Effect
     13.8. . This Agreement may not be assigned by either Party without the prior written consent of the other Party, except that either Party may assign this Agreement to a
Assignment
 
successor in connection with the merger, consolidation, or sale of all or substantially all of its assets or that portion of its business pertaining to the subject matter of this Agreement.
     13.9. . All notices, requests, demands and other communications required or permitted to be given pursuant to this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given upon the date of receipt if delivered by hand, recognized international overnight courier, confirmed facsimile transmission, or registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid to the following addresses or facsimile numbers:
Notices
Either Party may change its designated address and facsimile number by notice to the other Party in the manner provided in this Section.
     13.10. . This Agreement may be amended, supplemented, or otherwise modified only by means of a written instrument signed by both Parties. Any waiver of any rights or failure to act in a specific instance shall relate only to such instance and shall not be construed as an agreement to waive any rights or fail to act in any other instance, whether or not similar.
Amendment and Waiver
     13.11. . In the event that any provision of this Agreement shall, for any reason, be held to be invalid or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity or unenforceability shall not affect any other provision hereof, and the Parties shall negotiate in good faith to modify the Agreement to preserve (to the extent possible) their original intent.
Severability
     13.12. . This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the Parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements or understandings between the Parties relating to the subject matter hereof.
Entire Agreement
     13.13. . Neither Party shall be held liable or responsible to the other Party, nor be deemed to be in breach of this Agreement, for failure or delay in fulfilling or
Force Majeure
 
performing any provisions of this Agreement when such failure or delay is caused by or results from any cause whatsoever outside the reasonable control of the Party concerned including, but not limited to, fire, explosion, breakdown of plant, strike, lock-out, labor disputes, casualty or accident, lack or failure of transportation facilities, flood, lack or failure of sources of supply or of labor, raw materials or energy, civil commotion, embargo, any law, regulation, decision, demand or requirement of any national or local government or authority. The Party claiming relief shall, without delay, notify the other Party by registered airmail or by telefax of the interruption and cessation thereof and shall use its best efforts to remedy the effects of such hindrance with all reasonable dispatch. The onus of proving that any such Force Majeure event exists shall rest upon the Party so asserting. During the period that one Party is prevented from performing its obligations under this Agreement due to a Force Majeure event, the other Party may, in its sole discretion, suspend any obligations that relate thereto. Upon cessation of such Force Majeure event the Parties hereto shall use their best efforts to make up for any suspended obligations. If such Force Majeure event is anticipated to continue, or has existed for nine (9) consecutive months or more, this Agreement may be forthwith terminated by either Party by registered airmail or by telefax. In case of such termination the terminating Party will not be required to pay to the other Party any indemnity whatsoever.
     13.14. . If required by law, the parties will, at their own expense, prepare and make appropriate filings under Title II of the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvement Act of 1976, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (16 C.F.R. 801.1 et seq.) (the "Act") as soon as reasonably practicable. The parties shall co-operate in the antitrust clearance process and agree to furnish promptly to the FTC and the Antitrust Division of the Department of Justice any additional information reasonably requested by them in connection with such filings.
Hart-Scott-Rodino Act
[THE REMAINDER OF THIS PAGE INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK]
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have duly executed and delivered this Agreement as a sealed instrument effective as of the date first above written.
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have duly executed and delivered this Agreement as a sealed instrument effective as of the date first above written.
 
Pursuant to Section 1.42 hereof, the initial Research Plan shall be developed by the Parties within * days of the Effective Date and be attached to this Agreement as Exhibit A.
 
Biological Compounds
*
Chemical Criteria
*
Other Criteria
*
 
 

 
     This Amendment No. 3 to Research & Development and License Agreement, dated as of December 23, 1997, is between Abbott Laboratories, an Illinois corporation having a principal place of business at 100 Abbott Park Road, Abbott Park, Illinois ("Abbott") and ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation having a principal place of business at 200 Boston Avenue, Suite 1000, Medford, Massachusetts ("ArQule").
     WHEREAS, Abbott and ArQule have entered into that certain Research & Development and License Agreement, dated as of June 16, 1995, as amended by Amendment No. 1 dated August 13, 1996 and Amendment No. 2 dated December 24, 1996 (as so amended, the "License Agreement"), pursuant to which ArQule agreed, among other things, to perform certain contract research activities and to provide Abbott with certain ArQule Core Compounds and Abbott Derivative Compounds (these and other capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the respective meanings provided in the License Agreement) for screening in consideration of the payment by Abbott to ArQule of certain technology access fees, license fees, milestone and royalty payments, and research funding payments on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the License Agreement; and
     WHEREAS, ArQule and Abbott desire to further amend the License Agreement to amend the Research Term thereof and to provide for additional financial terms in connection therewith, and to further provide for delivery of additional ArQule Core Compounds to Abbott.
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and mutual covenants and conditions contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
1.     . Abbott has previously extended the R & D Program set forth in Article 2 beyond the initial Research Term, which ended June 15, 1997. The parties hereby agree to amend the R & D Program, with certain modifications, as follows:
R & D Program
[*]=CERTAIN INFORMATION IN THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN OMITTED AND FILED SEPARATELY WITH THE COMMISSION. CONFIDENTIAL TREATMENT HAS BEEN REQUESTED WITH RESPECT TO THE OMITTED PORTIONS. OMITTED TEXT IS INDICATED BY A "*".
 
2.     . ArQule hereby agrees to increase the number of ArQule Core Compounds that ArQule will deliver to Abbott during the Initial Contract Extension Period (through March 16, 1999) by * ArQule Core Compounds, without additional charge, such that Abbott will receive a total of * ArQule Core Compounds within ArQule Arrays having not less than * different Chemical Themes (with a minimum of * ArQule Core Compounds and a maximum of * ArQule Core Compounds for each Chemical Theme).
Increase in Delivery of ArQule Arrays
3.     . Abbott agrees to pay ArQule the amount of * Dollars ($*) on or before December 31, 1997, which amount represents the second installment of the technology access fee for the Initial Contract Extension Period which is payable under Section 2.4.(b) of the License Agreement. This Article shall supersede Section 2.4.(b) of the License Agreement.
Payment of Technology Access Fee
4.     .
Miscellaneous
     4.1. . This Amendment shall be governed in all respects by the laws of the State of Illinois without giving effect to principles of conflicts of law thereunder.
Governing Law
     4.2. . Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, the provisions hereof shall inure to the benefit of, and be binding upon, the successors, permitted assigns, heirs, executors, and administrators of the parties hereto.
Successors and Assigns
 
     4.3. . Except as specifically provided herein, the License Agreement as previously executed and amended by Amendments No. 1 and 2 shall remain in full force and effect.
License Agreement
     4.4. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, but all of which together shall constitute one in the same instrument.
Counterparts
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have duly executed this Amendment No. 3 as of the date first written above.

 
Exhibit 99.6
, a Delaware corporation, having an office at 235 East 42nd Street, New York, New York 10017 and its Affiliates ("Pfizer"), and a Delaware corporation, having an office at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801-5140 and its Affiliates (), enter into this Collaboration Agreement as of December 19, 2001 ("Effective Date") to design, synthesize and provide Pfizer with pharmacologically relevant compounds, suited for incorporation into Pfizer's screening file, together with related materials and information, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein. This Agreement shall supercede the Technology Acquisition Agreement between Pfizer and ArQule dated as of July 19, 1999 ("1999 Agreement"), which 1999 Agreement shall terminate and be of no further force or effect as of the Effective Date.
Pfizer Inc
ArQule Inc.,
"ArQule"
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
     
Notices shall be deemed given as of the date received at the above-specified address.
 
 
the Parties have caused this Agreement to be executed by their duly authorized representatives.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF,
 
Exhibits:
 
AMAP Description
The automated molecular assembly plant (AMAP) is an integration of automation modules and processes, which allow the rapid synthesis, purification, analysis and reformatting of spatially addressable libraries. The AMAP includes process development, automated synthesis, analytical chemistry and registration. In addition to the chemical processes and the hardware, there is also proprietary application software that has been developed to allow the integration of each automation module to the AMAP process and aid in data and information management.
The AMAP system includes the following components:
Inert Weighing and Dissolution Station (IWAD)
The IWAD is a robotic station that allows weighing, solvent dispensing, and dissolution of reagents in 40 ml vials in preparation for large array syntheses.
Small Scale Inert Weighing and Dissolution Station (ssIWAD)
The IWAD is a robotic station that allows weighing, solvent dispensing, and dissolution of reagents in 8 ml vials in preparation for small array syntheses or protocol development.
Open Well Chemical Synthesizer (OCS)
The OCS is an automated liquid handler designed to perform efficient liquid transfers to accommodate a wide variety of combinatorial and non-combinatorial crosses for high throughput organic syntheses.
Small Scale Open Well Chemical Synthesizer (ssOCS)
The OCS is an automated liquid handler designed to perform efficient liquid transfers to accommodate a wide variety of combinatorial and non-combinatorial crosses for high throughput organic syntheses. This system can be used for protocol development or small arrays.
Septum Piercing Capabilities
Septum piercing capabilities exist in the OCS and ssOCS and allow for transfer of liquids into the reaction vials without removing the caps.
Inert and Low Temperature Synthesis
Inert and low temperature synthesis capabilities allow the addition of highly reactive reagents within a controlled environment (atmosphere and temperature) in order to manage the extent and outcome of specific reactions.
 
Single Position Heater/Shaker
Small-scale temperature controlled shaker used in protocol development that simulates heating and shaking of large production unit.
32-Position Temperature Controlled Agitation Module
Six independently controlled heating zones attached to a large shaking module that allows up to 32 reaction blocks to be heated and shaken simultaneously. Although all reaction blocks are shaken at the same speed, there is an option to adjust this as necessary.
Acid Resistant Centrifugal Solvent Evaporation Systems (CSE)
The Centrifugal Solvent Evaporator (CSE) is designed to perform high throughput solvent evaporation by applying centrifugal force to the samples while simultaneously drawing a vacuum and optionally heating the samples. The CSE's ability to apply centrifugal force while controlling both vacuum and temperature provides the user the ability to establish the optimum conditions required for high throughput solvent evaporation, while maintaining minimal bumping and foaming.
Liquid/Liquid Extraction Module (LLE)
The liquid  liquid extraction module is designed to perform a post synthesis work up procedure that removes undesired products or starting materials from the desired product by partitioning between two non-miscible solvents using the 24 well format.
Solid Phase Extraction Module (SPE)
The solid phase extraction module is designed to perform a post synthesis work up procedure that removes undesired products or starting material from the desired product by preferential adsorption on a solid phase.
Recovery Quantification Module
The quantitation procedure is performed to verify the amount of product present in the reaction vessels after purification. The quantification procedure requires weighing empty vials on an automation workstation and then again after the material is collected from purification and the solvent evaporated. Based on the weight of collected dried material the appropriate volume of diluent is added to obtain the desired concentration.
QC Sample Preparation
The QC sample preparation module allows specific QC patterns to be picked for analysis using a Gilson single probe system. The QC pattern, along with desired volumes of sample and diluent, is then translated into a set of instructions for an automated liquid handler for high throughput sample preparation.
 
Manual Solids Dispenser
The manual powder dispenser is used to simultaneously dispense free-flowing solids to all vials in a reaction block. This operation is used to dispense solid materials common for all reaction or scavenger resins to clean up the reaction mixture.
Filtration
Filtration is used to separate liquid, which may contain the desired product, from solids, which may be impurities formed during synthesis, or that are added as a part of the synthesis. The filtration is performed using a filter plate and a vacuum filtration manifold.
96-Well Liquid Transfer System
The 96-channel pipettor can carry out a multi-step-preprogrammed sequence that includes dilution and transfer of product.
Gilson Culling and Reformatting Station
The culling and reformatting station is designed to receive data pertaining to wells of the source plates, which will be kept, and wells, which will be discarded. The hardware platform for this operation is the single-probe system, which performs the reformatting of "keep" wells of the source plate(s) into contiguous wells in the destination plate(s). The original layouts with culled and reformatted layouts are tracked in the AIMS database.
Tecan Culling and Reformatting Station
This culling and reformatting operation is equivalent to the Gilson culling and reformatting operation, except this one is performed using an eight probe Tecan, which has a larger deck capacity and therefore requires less user interaction and is also faster.
Peripherals
Peripherals include a number of commercially available and ArQule developed hardware and equipment, which are essential for the safe, efficient and productive operation of the automated synthesis system. A list of the major components are as follows:
 
HPLC/ELSD/UV/Ms Analytical Characterization
Analytical characterization of array development, process optimization and QC analysis is performed by high performance liquid chromatography (HPLC) using a variety of detectors including UV, evaporative light scattering (ELSD) and mass spectrometry (MS).
PrepQule Preparative HPLC Purification
The PrepQule system collects chromatographic peaks eluting from a column based on UV or ELSD response. Since several peaks are collected per sample without knowing which contains the compound of interest, the fractions are then analyzed by flow injection MS to identify the desired fraction.
PrepQule Reformatting Module
The reformatting module is based on a single probe Gilson which receives the information relating to the fractions collected per sample from the PrepQule system, as well as the information regarding the fraction which contains the desired fraction from the flow injection MS and reformats only those fraction which correspond to the desired products.
FractionLynx Preparative HPLC Purification
The FractionLynx preparative chromatography system uses a more sophisticated detector such as a mass spectrometer that only triggers collection of the desired fraction based on the mass of the expected product. This system maintains the original spatial addressing without the need to reformat the resulting fractions.
Information Systems Hardware and Commercially Available Software
The information system is a combination several servers operating with Oracle databases and interconnects with each other. One server is dedicated to the corporate database, which is the primary database where compound information is stored and managed. A second server maintains the production database where all the production process information is stored. The third server is dedicated to the LIMS of the analytical group. These databases are accessed through the network.
Array Information Management System (AIMS)
The AIMS database tracks all the information regarding the setup and execution of an array through the production process. The databases interacts with each of the instrument control applications that operates the automation workstations and uploads new data from the workstations for storage and management, as well as downloading data to the workstations for execution of the production process.
Process Control and Monitoring System (PCMS)
 
 
Informatics/Library Design Tools
AQUIRE (ArQule United Information Repository and Exchange)
Central information hub for all scientific data at ArQule integrated information platform linking chemical ideas, compound production/registration, analytical and biological assay information integrated with visualization, computational design and analysis tools
ALOFT (ArQule Lead Optimization Framework/Toolkit)
Distributed computing environment intended to support lead optimization efforts. web-based, modular array design foundation including array visualization 2D property calculations, statistical modeling, classification models, virtual library enumeration, consensus and weighting functions) currently supports retrieval of computed properties from a computed properties database, retrieval of biological data from the biology database, development and storage of predictive models based upon the existing biological data, computation of molecular properties for new molecules, and prediction of biological activity for new molecules. Additional development efforts include library specification / enumeration / subsetting capability and pharmacophoric / 3D molecular property based modeling
ARQeDES (ArQule Descriptor Selector)
Expert tool for selection of molecular descriptors. General classification and regression model building tool utilizing a genetic algorithm optimizer of variable descriptors and Neural Network architecture. Currently used for SAR, incorporation of confusion matrix, sensitivity analysis, statistical design elements validation was carried out on a number of artificial data sets and biological data sets from the literature. A follow on program to ARQeDES, ARQePRED is able to utilize the models developed by ARQeDES for the prediction/classification of biological activity for new compounds.
MapMaker
Reagent selection tool utilizing genetic algorithm based selection of reagents based on virtual product properties (Rule of 5, repository overlap, diversity, array geometry).
Molecular Assembler
ArQule aims to exploit novel in silico approaches to chemotype design. Using limited compound screening data or known binding site/ligand structure data, ArQule aims to develop in silico Molecular Assembler technology which will provide the ability to define novel chemotypes which, when linked into ArQule's combinatorial library design and synthesis capabilities, will permit creation of multiple lead series of compounds, providing desirable "back-up" compounds in the event the lead molecule possesses an unanticipated liability.
 
 
 
 
     
1.0
Executive Summary
Based on the success of the July 1999 file enrichment collaboration between Pfizer and ArQule, Pfizer's Chemical Technology Council proposes to extend the collaboration with ArQule Inc. to seven (7) years. This collaboration will provide Pfizer high throughput compound synthesis to enrich Pfizer's high throughput screening (HTS) collection and to create an industry-best screening file. During the term of this collaboration, the production goal is to synthesize a total of * compounds. Furthermore, each of the compounds produced will consist of *, have its structure confirmed by mass spectrometry, and purity determined by HPLC *. All data for these compounds, including physical, analytical, and quality control data, will be stored in an SD file or other format agreed upon by the Steering Committee, and * with the physical samples. Samples that do not meet the yield or purity requirement, if Pfizer has no further interest in them, will be destroyed and *. Within the first two years of the collaboration, ArQule will combine its Woburn and Medford operations as necessary to deliver on the new development and production goals. This will include *. In order to ensure full value from the collaboration, Pfizer will provide dedicated managerial and scientific staff.
In addition to collaborating on developing and synthesizing high quality compounds, both companies will collaborate on * in order to develop *. In the previous agreement Pfizer provided the * and ArQule * and *, this agreement allows for * to * so that *. There will be an opportunity during the course of the collaboration for * to work on *.
     
2.0
Introduction
ArQule Inc., located in Woburn MA, is a 400 person chemistry based drug discovery company focused on improving the drug discovery process by integrating high throughput chemical synthesis, intelligent library design and high throughput predictive and experimental ADME. Since its inception in 1993, ArQule has established a track record of producing high quality compounds using its industry recognized high throughput parallel synthesis AMAP system, which was the basis for establishing the first ArQule/Pfizer collaboration. ArQule continues to enhance the AMAP technology, and also to develop and integrate high quality library design tools in order to utilize the synthesis capabilities more effectively in making high quality libraries biased towards target families. ArQule's commitment to this process is evidence by its merger in 2000 with Camitro, a company dedicated to predictive ADME model development with considerable software development experience that allows ArQule to integrate these capabilities into its AMAP technology.
ArQule's capacity to generate large numbers of compounds is particularly attractive to Pfizer, in that it fits well with Pfizer's expertise in the area of high throughput screening. A great portion of all discovery programs worldwide are now working on leads discovered through HTS, and increasing knowledge of the human genome may well place an even greater reliance on HTS as a pre-requisite for project initiation. The ArQule collaboration will continue to augment Pfizer's Gene-to-Candidate process in three ways.
 
First, by increasing the size of the screening file, it is likely to increase the proportion of screens that are successful. Second, compounds with a high-speed synthesis heritage will improve the entire efficiency of the lead to candidate process. Third, the early ADME and physical property measures should reduce lead to candidate attrition. Thus, project teams will have more lead compounds available to them, these leads should more closely embody the desirable properties of a candidate, and they have the potential to be incorporated into an automated closed loop optimization cycle.
     
3.0
Collaboration Plan
There are multiple components to the annual production of approximately * compounds in the form of * libraries per year. The key components in this process are *, and *. After the first year transition period, Pfizer will, in general, provide * and *, while ArQule will be responsible for *, and *.
Library ideas will be provided *, to insure that the ideas * (Section 10.1). If the proposed library idea is cleared, it will be registered as * and *. If the idea is encumbered and does not clear, then it will be *.
During the course of the collaboration, * that are assigned to this collaboration will * as well (Section 10.2)Ideas that are accepted by the Steering Committee will be * and *. Ideas submitted by * employees that are rejected by the Steering Committee will be released *. Ideas submitted by * employees that are rejected for immediate inclusion in the collaboration protocol development plan, but not immediately released *, will be *. At the end of the collaboration, * that were * will * as appropriate.
.
Bulk template provided for protocol development and production will, in general, be obtained through * and provided to ArQule in a timely manner to meet the development and production plan defined by the Steering Committee. If the collaboration management *, all costs incurred * will be *. Additionally, if necessary, the * could *. However, this effort would be performed * and therefore have an impact on * any given year. The Steering Committee therefore may *.
Pfizer will be responsible for *. Pfizer will assist on * in accordance with *. Initially, Pfizer will * until *. It is anticipated that by the end of the first year, *. If *, it may become * to continue in subsequent years at the discretion of the Steering Committee. In subsequent years the Library Design Workgroup will continue to monitor the need for *, which could include such things as *. As new * are added to the collaboration *.
 
Library design criteria may be modified or specific criteria or monomers may be applied to designated libraries as determined by *. * may *.
Protocol development, the reduction of an idea to a synthetic procedure capable of making * compounds, will be the responsibility of *. The number of automated synthetic and workup steps per protocol is anticipated to average no more than * and *, respectively. Since the expected final quantity is *, the reaction scale may be adjusted accordingly, ca. *.
If * desires to *. For selected protocols, up to * selected by *, meeting the *, and having a minimum quantity of * would be * the appropriate information in an SD file. These samples *.
Execution of the developed protocols to produce the * compounds in parallel using the *. The reaction scale will also be approximately *. Libraries may be produced using *, etc. In addition, production may also *.
HPLC purification is anticipated to be conducted on *. The success of the library production process will be assessed by * analysis using *, if appropriate, to * each sample. When *, it will be at the discretion of the Chemistry Workgroup to *. These criteria may be modified by the Steering Committee as additional data is accumulated that *. When * at the discretion of the Steering Committee.
The primary analytical QC method to assess compound * will be *. * will be the primary sample quantification method. The passing criteria for HPLC purified samples are: * The *. Acceptance of any compounds not meeting the appropriate purity and/or quantity criteria will be at the discretion of the Steering Committee. As analytical and purification technologies evolve, the criteria to best establish the most accurate nature of the final products may be modified by the Steering Committee.
All compounds that meet the acceptance criteria (* and purity criteria Section 3.7) will be consolidated into full arrays using * and screening format and * with the associated pertinent information in a SD file. The Steering Committee will finalize a plan on *. Compounds with unacceptable purity will be removed, discarded and *. Compounds * will be * plus the remaining compound in a manner to be determined and they will be *.
 
Protocol development information will primarily be recorded in the * following *. Production information will be recorded in the * as well as maintaining * as necessary. All electronic in-process information will be maintained in the *. Analytical data that supports compound production will be maintained in the * and *. All appropriate data supporting compound production will be * and the requisite information will be included in an SD file that will *.
At the beginning of the new collaboration and in quarterly reports to the Steering Committee, *. Based on the information provided by *. All * will be at the direction and discretion of the Steering Committee. However, some of the * are identified below and in the subsequent respective sections. These details will be documented in the Steering Committee minutes.
The ability to . This capability would .
*
*
Increasing the so that .
*
*
Developing that allow .
*
*
Developing an * with * that allow the *.
Blending with to develop .
*
*
*
Development of , including , etc.
*
*
Enhancing the * to include * as well as any *.
 
The * of the new collaboration will be necessary in order to increase the requisite personnel, facilities, equipment, and protocols in preparation of an annual steady state of developing approximately * library protocols that can produce approximately * compounds. The production phase will *, delivering a projected * compounds in 2002 through 2004 and * compounds in 2005-2007 and * compounds in 2008. The annual number of developed protocols and produced compounds are given in Table 1. Throughout the collaboration, * as desired by the Steering Committee. The associated costs for * and the cost assigned to each party will be *.
The remainder of the document is organized into eight sections that cover the * production period, the goals and deliverables for each production year, and the management of the collaboration.
 
Table 1. Research Plan Summary
 
     
4.0
First Year of * Collaboration  2002
The goal of the first year is to *. This includes * as well as *.
After the agreement is executed a Library Design Workgroup will be defined, which will be * as appropriate. This workgroup will be responsible for defining the library design process *. Initially, the * will *, however, the goal is to *. At its discretion *.
Beginning Q1- 2002, all protocols being developed will be at ca. * and will include HPLC purification as the *. In order to assure the development of approximately * protocols for the first year, there will be approximately * each quarter. This level of development activity requires maintaining * with the appropriate references, reaction schemes, monomer lists and at minimum development quantities of template.
The annual production goal for the first year is * compounds, however, since the first quarter will be *.
All synthesized compounds from library protocols that included purification would be purified by HPLC. The decision to * would be based on the *.
Production samples * will be analyzed *, however, using the *.
Compounds produced * will be * (Section 3.7) and *.
All compounds * would be *, using the * (Section 3.7).
Any compounds * that did *.
The * will be * determined by the Steering Committee to allow the implementation of *.
All compounds that meet the appropriate acceptance criteria established in Section 3.7 will be consolidated as described in Section 3.8.
 
     
4.7 Data Capture and Registration
All data and documentation will be maintained as defined in Section 3.9. During the first year, the * using a *. Once the information systems *. This indicates that only the * during the term of the collaboration. Once the collaboration is completed, only the *. The * to * will be maintained as necessary going forward with a *.
     
4.8 *
The following * for this * year. The * will be at the discretion of Steering Committee
     
4.8.1 *
By the end of the year, *.
     *
4.8.2
By the end of the year, *.
     *
4.8.3
By the end of the year, * as well as *.
     *
4.8.4
By the end of the year an * with * that allow the *.
4.8.5 *
 -      to include the use of * to allow for * as well as *.
*
5.0 Second Year of
Collaboration  2003
The goal of the second year is to * and begin to * in anticipation of the * and beyond. Moreover, the majority of the responsibility for the library design phase should be *.
     
5.1 Library Design
The Library Design Workgroup will monitor, modify, or update library design criteria, methods or processes as deemed necessary to improve the design of any given library. * may be *.
     
5.2 Protocol Development
 
By the beginning of 2003, all protocols being developed will be at * and will include HPLC purification as the *. In order to assure the development of approximately * protocols for the second year and prepare for the * the third year, there will be approximately * each quarter. This level of development activity requires maintaining * with the appropriate references, reaction schemes, monomer lists, and at minimum development quantities of necessary template.
     
5.3 Compound Production
The annual production goal for the second year is * compounds, however, since by the *.
     
5.4 HPLC Purification
All synthesized compounds from library protocols that included purification would be purified by HPLC purification. The decision to * would be based on the *, unless modified by the Steering Committee.
     
5.5 Quality Control
All compounds produced in the second year would be analyzed *, using the *, unless modified by the Steering Committee.
Any compounds * that did *.
     
5.6 Culling and Reformatting
All compounds that meet the appropriate acceptance criteria established in Section 3.7 will be consolidated as described in Section 3.8.
     
5.7 Data Capture and Registration
All data and documentation will be maintained as defined in Section 3.9. It is anticipated that by the second year, the *. The * will continue as necessary going forward with a *.
     *
5.8
The following * for the second year of the new collaboration. The * will be at the discretion of Steering Committee
     
5.8.1 *
By the end of the year, *.
     *
5.8.2
By the end of the year, *.
 
     *
5.8.3
By the end of the year, * that include *.
     
5.8.4 *
By the end of the year an * with * that allow the *. It will be at the discretion of the Steering Committee to determine *.
6.0 Third Year of * Collaboration  2004
The goal of the third year is to * and *, as well as an *.
     
6.1 Library Design
The Library Design Workgroup will monitor, modify, or update library design criteria, methods or processes as deemed necessary to improve the design of any given library. * may be *.
     
6.2 Protocol Development
In order to assure the development of approximately * protocols for the third year and prepare for *, there will be approximately * each quarter. This level of development activity requires maintaining * with the appropriate references, reaction schemes, monomer lists, and at minimum development quantities of template.
     
6.3 Compound Production
The annual production goal for the third year would be * compounds with each quarter's production goal determined by the Steering Committee.
     
6.4 HPLC Purification
All synthesized compounds from library protocols that included purification would be purified by HPLC purification. The decision to * would be based on the *. However, libraries that would be * could be * in order to * and will be left to the discretion of the Chemistry Workgroup.
     
6.5 Quality Control
All compounds produced would be analyzed by *, using the * (Section 3.7).
Any * that did *.
     
6.6 Culling and Reformatting
 
All compounds that meet the appropriate acceptance criteria established in Section 3.7 will be consolidated as described in Section 3.8.
     
6.7 Data Capture and Registration
All data and documentation will be maintained as defined in Section 3.9. The * will continue as necessary going forward with a *.
     
6.8 *
The type of * will be left to the discretion of the Steering Committee.
7.0 Fourth, Fifth and Sixth Year of * Collaboration  2005-2007
The goal the fourth through sixth year is *.
     
7.1 Library Design
The Library Design Workgroup will monitor, modify, or update library design criteria, methods or processes as deemed necessary to improve the design of any given library. * by this time.
     
7.2 Protocol Development
In order to assure the development of approximately * protocols for the fourth through the sixth years, there will be approximately * each quarter. This level of development activity requires maintaining * with the appropriate references, reaction schemes, monomer lists, and * minimum development quantities of necessary template, *.
     
7.3 Compound Production
The annual production goal for 2005  2007 would be * compounds with each quarter's production goal determined by the Steering Committee.
     
7.4 HPLC Purification
All synthesized compounds from library protocols that included purification would be purified by HPLC purification. The decision to * would be based on the *. However, libraries that would be * could be * in order to * and would be at the discretion of the Chemistry Workgroup.
     
7.5 Quality Control
All compounds produced would be analyzed by *, using the * (Section 3.7).
Any compounds * that did *.
 
     
7.6 Culling and Reformatting
All compounds that meet the appropriate acceptance criteria established in Section 3.7 will be consolidated as described in Section 3.8.
     
7.7 Data Capture and Registration
All data and documentation will be maintained as defined in Section 3.9. The * will continue as necessary going forward with a *.
     
7.8 *
The type of * will be left to the discretion of the Steering Committee.
*
8.0 Seventh Year of
Collaboration  2008
The goal for the last year is * compounds. The goal for protocol development will be met by * to meet the requirement. The anticipated quarterly production goal is * but will be at the discretion of the Steering Committee. The purification, characterization, culling/reformatting, data capture and registration requirements would be maintained as in the previous year.
9.0 Collaboration Management and Staffing
     
9.1 Steering Committee
The Steering Committee for this collaboration will have representatives from ArQule, and Pfizer. The committee will meet each year on a quarterly basis, and the Steering Committee members will establish the dates and locations of these meetings annually. These meetings will serve both to review overall progress, and to establish *. Key issues will include progress towards production goals, ensuring that the development pipeline is maintained, *, approve changes to plans, verify Pfizer compound delivery and manage conflict resolution. Most importantly, the Steering Committee may choose to change the priorities as a result of their assessment.
The scientific component of these meetings will be open to *, as well as *.
9.2 Staffing
* will be responsible for providing the appropriate staffing in order to meet the collaboration goals and deliverables. Chemistry development staff will be a combination of ph.d. And ms/bs staff with a variety of experience in library design and development. Production, purification and analytical staff will also be a combination of ph.d., Ms/bs and technician level as appropriate for each function.
 
All * employees assigned to this collaboration will have had the appropriate level of safety training. In addition, * will provide *. The detailed operations plans for all training will be determined and agreed upon by the Steering Committee and documented in the minutes of the meetings.
 -      will also provide * with exposure to *.
     
9.3 Library Planning and Management
The Chemistry Workgroup, which is comprised of ArQule staff as well as Pfizer staff and presently meets *, will be responsible for identifying and managing the protocol development and production plans. The recommendations from this group will be brought to the Steering Committee on a quarterly basis for final approval. The Library Design Workgroup, which will be comprised of * will also meet regularly and be responsible for the *. This group will also assure that the *. The scientific membership of the Steering Committee will meet on a * basis as the Strategic Workgroup in order to make and implement necessary interim decisions.
     
9.4 Key Personnel
Key Investigators
Steering Committee Members
     
9.5 Operations
All operational costs for * will be *. The annual expected expenses for * are approximated at $* per year and any excess expenses beyond the approximated amount will be approved by the Steering Committee and paid quarterly *. * will supply any necessary * that are *
Routine maintenance of the equipment to keep them operational would be the responsibility of *. * will also be responsible for any maintenance beyond routine and handled, at * expense by service contracts or for custom components by the *.
Appropriate documentation regarding protocol development, library production and analysis will be maintained according to Pfizer's and ArQule's documentation procedures. Pertinent data regarding the physical compounds * will be transferred by SD file and *
10.0 Pfizer *
     
10.1 Procedure for *
 
 *
     
10.2 Procedure for *
 *
     
10.3 Procedure for *
 *
     
10.4 Procedure for *
 *
 
     
11.0 Glossary
The following definitions are provided to clarify terms used in the Collaboration Plan and they relate directly to the activities described in such Plan. They are not intended, necessarily to correspond directly to definitions in Section 1 of the Agreement, unless there is a direct correlation between the term used in the Collaboration Plan, its definition below and its definition in Section 1 of the Agreement. For avoidance of doubt, the definition in Section 1 of the Agreement supercedes the definition of any term used herein:
ADME  Absorption Distribution Metabolism and Excretion are important pharmacokinetic parameters that contribute in part to determining the potential of a compound being a drug.
AIMS  Array Information Management System is the integrated software that tracks the array through the production, purification, analytical and reformatting process.
AMAP  Automated Molecular Assembly Plant parallel synthesis system that functions as a combinatorial chemistry synthesis platform comprising library protocols, automated transformations, robotic chemical process workstations, workflow procedures, compound purification systems, analytical QC systems, user interface software, library design software and information management software.
Array  The subset of library compounds that move through the production, purification, analytical and reformatting process as a unit.
ASPECT  The ArQule integrated analytical LIMS software that tracks all of the information regarding the ArQule specific analytical process.
CGN  Computer Generated Notebooks are three ring binders that have a computer-generated identifier that tracks loose-leaf information associated with a particular array synthesis.
Chemistry Workgroup  The group of Pfizer and ArQule scientists that meet biweekly to discuss the progress of the development and production and prepare and manage the quarterly development and production plans.
Culling  The process of removing the compounds of a library that do not conform to the acceptance criteria.
Development  The process of performing the necessary chemistry and monomer validation to produce a protocol that will go into Production
Development Goal  The work product that is to be achieved by Development in a given year.
Development Staff  The staff that is responsible for carrying out the necessary chemistry and monomer validation to produce a protocol for Production.
 *
HPLC  High performance liquid chromatography is an analytical separation method that separates a mixture into its components in order to determine sample purity and/or component quantity
 
HPLC Purification  The process of separating the components of a mixture into discrete segments separated by time on a column and collecting only the fraction(s) that contain(s) the compound(s) of interest.
HTS  High Throughput Screening
 *
IT  Information Technology
IP  Intellectual property
Library  The anticipated compounds to be made in production that are related by a common protocol.
Library Design  The process by which a set of compounds are constructed virtually and selected to give the most useful set of compounds with acceptable physical properties.
Library Design Workgroup  The group of Pfizer and ArQule scientists that will * the library design *.
Library Idea  The idea, scheme, template(s), around which a set of compounds will be made. This could also include literature precedent for the reaction(s) involved in constructing the library, and an analysis of necessary commercially available monomers to validate that an acceptable library could be made.
Library Synthesis  The synthesis of a library of compounds.
LIMS  Laboratory Information Management System is a software package dedicated to tracking the development and production samples through the analytical process.
LLE  Liquid-liquid extraction is a synthetic workup process of separating components into two immiscible liquid layers using the preferential solubility of each component for one of the two liquids. LLE is used as a clean up step during synthesis.
Monomer  Chemical reagents that couple to a core structure to provide diversity to the analogs of a library.
Monomer Selection  The process whereby the monomers that are to be used in a library are selected.
Monomer Validation  Each monomer selected to be in a library must undergo a coupling reaction with a representative coupling partner yielding product in a minimum yield and purity.
 *
Production  The process of performing the unit operations to synthesize library compounds, submit QC samples for analysis, then cull, reformat, package and ship the compound library with the associated data.
Production Goal  The work product that is to be achieved by Production in a given year.
Production Staff  The staff that are responsible for carrying out the production process.
Protocol  The set of instructions that include, monomers (passed and failed), reagents, solvents, reaction conditions, equipment, and process by which a library is synthesized.
 
Protocol Validation  After the reaction and monomers have been optimized, a subset of the library is run at the production facility. QC Analysis  Quality Control analysis of the products from a library, assuring that only products that meet the acceptance criteria are packaged and shipped.
Reformatting  The process of redistributing only the compounds that conform to the acceptance criteria into full microtiter plates.
Registration  The process of transferring the structural information as well as the associated pertinent production and analytical data to a database *.
SD File  Structure data file associates the compound structure with the pertinent information regarding that structure in a user defined format that can be used to transfer information between two registration databases easily, efficiently and effectively.
SPE  Solid phase extraction is a synthetic workup process that allows the separation of components by using their differential adsorption on a chemically modified solid support. SPE is used as a clean up step during synthesis.
Steering Committee  The group of Pfizer and ArQule staff that manage the collaboration.
Strategic Workgroup  The scientific core team of the Steering Committee that makes and implements decisions on an interim basis as necessary.
 *
Template  The structural component(s) of library members on which diversity elements are introduced by monomer attachment.
 *
 
 
This Certificate of Ownership is issued in connection with that certain Technology Acquisition Agreement, dated as of July 19, 1999 (the "Agreement") by and between Pfizer, Inc. and its Affiliates (collectively, "Pfizer") and ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule"). Capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the same respective meanings as those ascribed to them in the Agreement
1.     I, James Kyranos, the undersigned, being a duly elected and qualified Vice President of ArQule, on behalf of ArQule do hereby certify that:
By acceptance of this Certificate of Ownership, Pfizer acknowledges that the statements contained in paragraphs 1(a), (b) and (c) above are true, complete and accurate in all respects.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have hereunto set my hand and the corporate seal of ArQule to this Certificate of Ownership as of May 31, 2000.
 
               I, Michael D. Rivard, Vice President and Assistant Secretary of ArQule, do hereby certify that James Kyranos is a duly elected and qualified Vice President of ArQule, and that his signature set forth above is his true signature.
               IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have hereunto set my hand as of May 31, 2000
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
     THIS COMMON STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT dated as of December 19, 2001 (the "Agreement") is made between ARQULE, INC., a corporation organized under the laws of the State of Delaware ("ArQule" or the "Company"), and PFIZER HOLDINGS EUROPE ("Pfizer"), an unlimited liability company incorporated under the laws of the Republic of Ireland.
     ArQule desires to sell to Pfizer, and Pfizer desires to purchase from ArQule, pursuant to this Agreement, shares of ArQule's common stock, with an aggregate purchase price of $10,000,000, on the terms and conditions described herein and in reliance upon the representations, warranties and agreements contained herein.
     ArQule and Pfizer have agreed, in the Collaboration Agreement dated as of December 19, 2001 ("Collaboration Agreement"), that Pfizer shall purchase, over the next two years, up to an additional $8,000,000 of ArQule's common stock if ArQule meets certain performance requirements specified in the Collaboration Agreement, on the terms and conditions set forth in the Collaboration Agreement.
     Defined terms are set forth in Section 12.
     NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and of the covenants herein contained, the parties hereto mutually agree as follows:
     SECTION 1. . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, ArQule has authorized the sale to Pfizer of 755,258 shares of the common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Common Stock"), of ArQule at a price of $13.241 per share, at an aggregate purchase price of $10,000,000. Collectively, the shares of Common Stock which shall be purchased pursuant to this Section 1 are referred to herein as the "Shares."
Authorization of Sale of the Shares
     SECTION 2. . The aggregate purchase price for the Shares (the "Aggregate Purchase Price") shall be $10,000,000.
Aggregate Purchase Price
     SECTION 3. . The closing of the purchase and sale of the Shares (the "Closing") shall occur on or before December 28, 2001 at 10:00 a.m. at the offices of ArQule, 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts, or at such other time and date and at such other place as may be agreed upon by ArQule and Pfizer (the "Closing Date"). Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, at the Closing, Pfizer shall pay to ArQule an amount in cash or by wire transfer equal to the Aggregate Purchase Price and ArQule shall deliver to Pfizer one or more stock certificates in such denomination and registered in the name of Pfizer, or in such nominee name(s) as designated by Pfizer, representing the number of Shares being purchased.
Delivery of the Shares at the Closing
 
     SECTION 4. . ArQule hereby represents and warrants to, and covenants with, Pfizer as follows:
Representations, Warranties and Covenants of ArQule
          4.1 . ArQule is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware and has all requisite corporate power and authority to conduct its business as currently conducted and proposed to be conducted. ArQule is duly qualified to transact business and to own and use its property and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the failure to so qualify would reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the business, operations, properties, assets, prospects or conditions (financial or otherwise) of ArQule (a "Material Adverse Effect"). Except for Camitro Corporation and ArQule International, Inc., ArQule has no subsidiaries. Each listed subsidiary is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of California and Barbados, respectively, and each has all requisite corporate power and authority to conduct its business and own and use its property as currently conducted and proposed to be conducted. Each listed subsidiary is duly qualified to transact business and to own and use its property and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the failure to so qualify would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Organization and Qualification
          4.2 . ArQule is authorized to issue 50,000,000 shares of Common Stock, and 1,000,000 shares of undesignated preferred stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Preferred Stock"). As of November 15, 2001, there were 20,389,588 shares of Common Stock and no shares of Preferred Stock outstanding. No shares of capital stock, or securities convertible into or exercisable for capital stock or other rights affecting the capital stock, have been issued since such date except for issuances pursuant to ArQule's equity compensation plans or pursuant to outstanding options, warrants or rights, in each case as described in filings made with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). All outstanding shares of Common Stock have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable; and none of the outstanding shares of Common Stock were issued in violation of the preemptive rights, if any, of any stockholders of ArQule.
Authorized Capital Stock
          4.3 . ArQule has all corporate power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under this agreement and to issue the Shares. ArQule's execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement (a) has been duly authorized under Delaware law by all requisite corporate action by ArQule, (b) will not violate any applicable law, ordinance, rule or regulation or the Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation or Amended and Restated By-laws of ArQule or the charter documents of any other corporation of which ArQule owns at least 50% of the outstanding voting stock (an "ArQule Subsidiary") or any provision of any indenture, mortgage, agreement, contract or other material instrument to which ArQule or any ArQule Subsidiary is a party or by which any of their respective properties or assets is bound as of the date hereof, and (c) will not require any consent by any person under, constitute or result (upon notice or lapse of time or both) in a breach of any term, condition or provision of, or constitute a default or give rise to any right of termination or acceleration under any such indenture, mortgage, agreement, contract or other material instrument or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, security
Consents; Due Execution; Delivery and Performance of the Agreement
 
interest, mortgage, pledge, charge or other encumbrance upon any properties or assets of ArQule or any ArQule Subsidiary. Upon its execution and delivery, and assuming the valid execution thereof by Pfizer, the Agreement will constitute a valid and binding obligation of ArQule, enforceable against ArQule in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting creditors' and contracting parties' rights generally and except as enforceability may be subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
          4.4 . When issued and paid for, the Shares to be sold hereunder by ArQule will be validly issued and outstanding, fully paid and non-assessable.
Issuance, Sale and Delivery of the Shares
          4.5 . Subject to the accuracy of Pfizer's representations in Section 5.1 of this Agreement, the issuance of the Shares will constitute a transaction exempt from the registration requirements of Section 5 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act") in reliance upon Section 4(2) of the Securities Act and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.
Exempt Transaction
          4.6 . At the written request of Pfizer in connection with any sales of Shares by Pfizer, ArQule shall furnish to Pfizer, within three days after receipt of such request, a written statement confirming or denying ArQule's compliance with the filing requirements of the SEC set forth in SEC Rule 144 as amended from time to time.
Compliance with Rule 144
          4.7 . Neither this Agreement, nor any other items prepared or supplied to Pfizer by or on behalf of ArQule with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit a material fact necessary to make each statement contained herein or therein not misleading. There is no fact which ArQule has not disclosed to Pfizer in writing and of which any of its directors or executive officers is aware or should be aware (other than general economic conditions) which has had or would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect upon the business prospects of ArQule. ArQule further warrants that the annual report for the year ending December 31, 2001 on Form 10-K did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact and did not omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading as of the date filed.
Disclosure
          4.8 . All reports filed by ArQule with the SEC pursuant to the reporting requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), when filed, did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading. ArQule has made all filings with the SEC which it is required to make, and ArQule has not received any request from the SEC to file any amendment or supplement to any such reports. ArQule agrees that, as long as the Collaboration Agreement is in effect, it will furnish to Pfizer all annual and quarterly
Additional Information
 
reports generally furnished to ArQule's stockholders in the normal course, and SEC filings upon request.
          4.9 . As of the date hereof, there has been no material adverse change in the business, operations, properties, assets, prospects or condition (financial or otherwise) of ArQule since the filing date of ArQule's last report with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the reporting requirements of the Exchange Act.
No Material Changes
          4.10 . There is no action, suit, investigation or proceeding pending, or, to ArQule's knowledge, threatened, against ArQule and/or any ArQule Subsidiary(a) which questions the validity of this Agreement or the ability of ArQule to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby or (b) which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Litigation
          4.11 . To the best of ArQule's knowledge after due inquiry, there are no outstanding stockholder agreements, voting trusts, proxies or other arrangements or understandings among the stockholders of ArQule relating to the voting of their respective shares.
Voting Arrangements
          4.12 . The Common Stock of ArQule is listed on the Nasdaq National Market and ArQule knows of no reason or set of facts which is likely to result in the delisting of the Common Stock on the Nasdaq National Market System or the inability of such stock to continue to be included in the Nasdaq National Market.
Nasdaq National Market Designation
     SECTION 5. .
Representations, Warranties and Covenants of Pfizer
          5.1 . Pfizer represents and warrants to, and covenants with, ArQule that:
Investment Considerations
               (a) Pfizer is knowledgeable, sophisticated and experienced in making, and is qualified to make, decisions with respect to investments in shares presenting an investment decision like that involved in the purchase of the Shares, including investments in securities issued by companies comparable to ArQule, and has requested, received, reviewed and considered all information it deems relevant in making an informed decision to purchase the Shares;
               (b) Pfizer is acquiring the Shares in the ordinary course of its business and for its own account for investment only and with no present intention of distributing any of such Shares or any arrangement or understanding with any other persons regarding the distribution of such Shares;
               (c) Pfizer understands that the Shares are "restricted securities" under the federal securities laws inasmuch as they are being acquired from ArQule in a transaction not involving a public offering and that under such laws and applicable regulations such securities
 
may be resold without registration under the Securities Act only in certain limited circumstances. In this connection Pfizer represents that it is familiar with SEC Rule 144, as presently in effect, and understands the resale limitations imposed thereby and by the Securities Act;
               (d) Pfizer will not, directly or indirectly, offer, sell, pledge, transfer or otherwise dispose of (or solicit any offers to buy, purchase or otherwise acquire or take a pledge of) any of the Shares except in compliance with the Securities Act, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder;
               (e) Pfizer qualifies as an "accredited investor" within the meaning of Rule 501(a)(3) of Regulation D promulgated under the Securities Act; and
               (f) It is understood that the certificates evidencing the Shares shall bear the following legend unless and until the resale of the Shares pursuant to an effective Registration Statement (as defined below) or until the Shares may be sold under Rule 144 without restrictions:
          5.2 . Pfizer further represents and warrants to, and covenants with, ArQule that (a) Pfizer is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware and has full right, power, authority and capacity to enter into this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and has taken all necessary action to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, (b) the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement will not violate the charter documents of Pfizer or any other corporation of which Pfizer owns at least 50% of the outstanding voting stock (a "Pfizer Subsidiary") or any applicable law, ordinance, rule or regulation or any provision of any indenture, mortgage, agreement, contract or other material instrument to which Pfizer or any Pfizer Subsidiary is a party or by which Pfizer, any Pfizer Subsidiary, or any of their respective properties or assets is bound as of the date hereof, or result in a breach of or constitute (upon notice or lapse of time or both) a default under any such indenture, mortgage, agreement, contract or other material instrument or result in the creation or imposition of any material lien, security interest, mortgage, pledge, charge or encumbrance upon any assets of Pfizer or any Pfizer Subsidiary, and (c) upon the execution and delivery of this Agreement, and assuming the valid execution thereof by ArQule, this Agreement shall constitute a valid and binding obligation of Pfizer enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting
Due Execution, Delivery and Performance of the Agreement
 
creditors' and contracting parties' rights generally and except as enforceability may be subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
     SECTION 6. .
Conditions to the Obligations of the Purchaser
          The obligation of Pfizer to purchase the Shares at the Closing is subject to the fulfillment, or the waiver in writing by Pfizer, of the conditions set forth in this Section 6 on or before the Closing Date.
          6.1 . Each representation and warranty of ArQule contained in this Agreement shall be true on and as of the Closing Date with the same effect as though such representation and warranty had been made on and as of that date.
Accuracy of Representations and Warranties
          6.2 . ArQule shall have performed and complied with all agreements and conditions contained in this Agreement required to be performed or complied with by ArQule prior to or at the Closing.
Performance
          6.3 . Pfizer shall have received an opinion from Arnold & Porter (or other outside counsel chosen by ArQule and reasonably acceptable to Pfizer), counsel to ArQule dated as of the Closing Date, addressed to Pfizer, and substantially in the form attached hereto as .
Opinion of Counsel
Exhibit A
          6.4 . ArQule shall have delivered to counsel to Pfizer:
Certificates and Documents
               (a) a certificate of the Secretary or Assistant Secretary of ArQule dated as of the Closing Date, certifying as to (i) the incumbency of officers of ArQule executing this Agreement and all other documents executed and delivered in connection herewith, (ii) a copy of the By-Laws of ArQule, as in effect on and as of the Closing Date, and (iii) a copy of the resolutions of the Board of Directors of ArQule authorizing and approving ArQule's execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, all matters in connection with this Agreement, and the transactions contemplated thereby.
               (b) a certificate, executed by the duly authorized officer of ArQule as of the Closing Date, certifying to the fulfillment of all of the conditions to Pfizer's obligations under this Agreement, as set forth in this Section 6.
          6.5 . All corporate and other proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated at the Closing by this Agreement, and all documents and instruments incident to such transactions, shall be reasonably satisfactory in substance and form to Pfizer and its counsel, and Pfizer and its counsel shall have received all such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as they may reasonably request.
Other Matters
 
     SECTION 7. .
Conditions to the Obligations of ArQule
          The obligation of ArQule to issue and sell the Shares at the Closing is subject to the fulfillment, or the waiver by ArQule, of the conditions set forth in this Section 7 on or before the Closing Date.
          7.1 . Each representation and warranty of Pfizer contained in this Agreement shall be true on and as of the Closing Date with the same effect as though such representations and warranties had been made on and as of that date.
Accuracy of Representations and Warranties
          7.2 . Pfizer shall have delivered to counsel to ArQule:
Certificates and Documents
               (a) a certificate of the Secretary or Assistant Secretary of Pfizer dated as of the Closing Date, certifying as to (i) the incumbency of officers of Pfizer executing this Agreement and all other documents executed and delivered in connection herewith. (b) a certificate, executed by a duly authorized officer of Pfizer as of the Closing Date, certifying to the fulfillment of all of the conditions to ArQule's obligations under this Agreement, as set forth in this Section 7.
          7.3 . Pfizer shall have performed and complied with all agreements and conditions contained in this Agreement required to be performed or complied with by Pfizer prior to or at the Closing.
Performance
          7.4 . All corporate and other proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated at the Closing by this Agreement, and all documents and instruments incident to such transactions, shall be reasonably satisfactory in substance and form to ArQule and its counsel, and ArQule and its counsel shall have received all such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as they may reasonably request.
Other Matters
     SECTION 8. . Notwithstanding any investigation made by any party to this Agreement, all covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by ArQule and Pfizer herein, except as otherwise expressly provided herein, shall terminate upon the delivery to Pfizer of the Shares being purchased and the payment therefor. Except as otherwise provided herein, (i) the covenants, agreements, representations and warranties of ArQule made herein shall bind ArQule's successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of Pfizer's successors and assigns and (ii) the covenants, agreements, representations and warranties of Pfizer made herein shall bind Pfizer's successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of ArQule's successors and assigns.
Survival of Representations, Warranties and Agreements; Assignability of Rights
 
     SECTION 9. .
Incidental Registration
     For the purpose of this Section 9, the term "Registrable Shares" shall mean (i) all Shares, and (ii) Common Stock issued pursuant to stock splits, stock dividends and similar distributions with respect to such Shares. The term "Registration Statement" shall mean any Registration Statement filed by ArQule under the Securities Act for the offer and sale by ArQule in a public offering of not less than $5 million of Common Stock, which shall not include any offering made in connection with a business combination transaction or employee benefit plan.
          9.1 . ArQule covenants and agrees that it will:
Registration of Shares
               (a) Whenever ArQule proposes to file a Registration Statement, prior to such filing it shall give reasonable advance written notice to Pfizer of its intention to do so, and upon the written request of Pfizer which shall be given no later than 30 days after ArQule provides such notice (which request shall state the intended method of disposition of such Registrable Shares), ArQule shall use its best efforts to cause all Registrable Shares which ArQule has been requested to register to be registered under the Securities Act to the extent necessary to permit their sale or other disposition in accordance with the intended methods of distribution specified in the request of Pfizer; provided that: (i) ArQule shall not be required to make more than four (4) such registrations pursuant to this Section 9.1; (ii) ArQule shall have the right to postpone or withdraw any registration effected pursuant to this Section 9.1(a) without obligation or liability to any stockholder and (iii) ArQule shall have the right to postpone or withdraw any registration effected pursuant to this Section 9 without obligation to Pfizer (except that such registration shall not count as one of the two requests permitted under clause (i)) if, in the reasonable opinion of the Board of Directors of ArQule, such registration statement would be materially detrimental to ArQule.
               (b) In connection with any offering under this Section 9 involving an underwriter, and subject to the next sentence hereof, ArQule shall not be required to include any Registrable Shares in such underwritten public offer in such quantity as will, in the reasonable opinion of the managing underwriter, jeopardize the success of the offering by ArQule or materially adversely affect the price receivable by ArQule in such offering. If in the opinion of the managing underwriter the registration of all, or part of, the Registrable Shares which Pfizer has requested to be included would materially and adversely affect the success or the price receivable in such public offering, then ArQule shall be required to include in the underwriting only that number of Registrable Shares, if any, which the managing underwriter believes may be sold without causing such a material adverse effect; provided that any such number of Registrable Shares that ArQule shall be required to include in the underwriting shall be allocated, among Pfizer and the other holders, if any, that then have a right to request, and have requested, Registrable Shares to be included in the underwriting, in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective amounts of Registrable Shares which Pfizer and each such other holder has requested to be included in the underwriting.
 
          9.2 . ArQule shall pay the reasonable and actual Registration Expenses for all registrations pursuant to this Agreement. For purposes of this Section, the term "Registration Expenses" shall mean all expenses incurred by ArQule in complying with this Agreement, including, without limitation, all registration and filing fees, exchange listing fees, printing expenses, fees and disbursements of counsel for ArQule, out-of-pocket expenses of ArQule and the underwriters, state Blue Sky fees and expenses, and the expense of any special audits incident to or required by any such registration, but excluding underwriting discount and selling commissions Such underwriting discounts and selling commissions shall be borne pro rata by the selling holders in accordance with the number of shares of their Common Stock included in such registration.
Allocation of Expenses
          9.3 . In the event of any registration of Registrable Shares under the Securities Act pursuant to this Agreement, Pfizer agrees that, upon receipt of any notice from ArQule of (i) any request by the SEC for amendments or supplements to a Registration Statement or related prospectus covering any of Pfizer's Registrable Shares, (ii) the issuance by the SEC of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of a Registration Statement covering any of Pfizer's Registrable Shares or the initiation of any proceedings for that purpose, (iii) the receipt by ArQule of any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification of any Registrable Shares for sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose, (iv) the happening of any event that requires amending or supplementing the Registration Statement, prospectus, prospectus supplement or post-effective amendment so that any of the foregoing will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, or (v) ArQule's reasonable determination that a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement or a supplement to any related prospectus is required under the Securities Act; Pfizer will immediately discontinue disposition of such Registrable Shares. Pfizer further agrees that (x) it shall not resume its disposition of Registrable Shares pursuant to such Registration Statement or related prospectus unless it has received notice from ArQule that such Registration Statement or amendment has become effective under the Securities Act and has received a copy or copies of the related prospectus (as then amended or supplemented, as the case may be), unless the Registrable Shares are then listed on a national securities exchange and ArQule has advised Pfizer that ArQule has delivered copies of the related prospectus, as then amended or supplemented, to such exchange and (y) if so directed by ArQule, such holder will deliver to ArQule (at ArQule's expense) all copies, other than permanent file copies then in such stockholder's possession, of the prospectus covering such Registrable Shares current at the time of receipt of such notice.
Cessation of Sales
          9.4 .
Indemnification
               (a) In the event of any registration of any of the Registrable Shares under the Securities Act pursuant to this Agreement, then to the extent permitted by law ArQule shall indemnify and hold harmless Pfizer and each of its officers, directors and employees of Pfizer, if any, each underwriter of such Registrable Shares and each other persons, if any, who controls Pfizer or such underwriter within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act
 
against any losses, claims, damages, expenses or liabilities, joint or several, to which Pfizer, such underwriter or controlling person may become subject under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, state securities laws or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereto) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in any Registration Statement under which such Registrable Shares were registered under the Securities Act, or any preliminary prospectus or final prospectus contained in the Registration Statement, or any amendment or supplement to such Registration Statement, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and ArQule shall reimburse Pfizer, such underwriter and each such controlling person for any legal or any other expenses reasonably incurred by Pfizer, such underwriter or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; provided, however, that ArQule shall not be liable in any such cases to the extent that such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon any untrue statement or omission made in such Registration Statement, preliminary prospectus or prospectus, or any such amendment or supplement, in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to ArQule, in writing, by or on behalf of Pfizer, such underwriter or controlling person specifically for use in the preparation thereof.
               (b) In the event of any registration of any of the Registrable Shares under the Securities Act pursuant to this Agreement, then to the extent permitted by law, Pfizer and each other seller, if any, of Registrable Shares, severally and not jointly, shall indemnify and hold harmless ArQule, each of its directors, officers and employees, and each underwriter (if any) and each person, if any, who controls ArQule or any such underwriter within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities joint or several, to which ArQule, such directors and officers, underwriter or controlling person may become subject under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, state securities laws or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereto) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Registration Statement under which Registrable Shares were registered under the Securities Act, any preliminary prospectus or final prospectus contained in the Registration Statement, or any amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement, or arise out of or are based upon any omission or alleged omission to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, if the statement or omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to ArQule by such seller specifically for use in connection with the preparation of such Registration Statement, prospectus, amendment or supplement; provided, however, that the obligations of Pfizer hereunder shall be limited to an amount equal to the proceeds to Pfizer of Registrable Shares sold as contemplated herein.
               (c) Indemnifications of an underwriter pursuant to this Section 9.4 shall not be interpreted as providing relief of such underwriter from any or all of its due diligence obligations. Further, an underwriter shall not be entitled to indemnification pursuant to this section in the event that it fails to deliver to any seller of Registrable Shares any preliminary or
 
final or revised prospectus, as required by the Rules and Regulations of the Commission. Finally, no indemnification shall be provided pursuant to this Section in the event that any error in a preliminary prospectus of ArQule is subsequently corrected in the final prospectus of ArQule for a particular offering, and such final prospectus is delivered to the person seeking indemnity, in the case of a claim made under Section 9.4(a), or to all purchasers in the offering by ArQule in the case of a claim under Section 9.4(b) prior to the date of purchase of the securities.
               (d) Each party entitled to indemnification under this Section 9.4 (the Indemnified Party) shall give notice to the party required to provide indemnification (the Indemnifying Party) promptly after such Indemnified Party has been given notice of a claim as to which indemnity may be sought, and shall permit the Indemnifying Party to assume the defense of any such claim or any litigation resulting therefrom, that counsel for the Indemnifying Party, who shall conduct the defense of such claim or litigation, shall be approved by the Indemnified Party (whose approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed); and, , that the failure of any Indemnified Party to give notice as provided therein shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of its obligations under this Agreement except to the extent actually prejudiced. The Indemnified Party may participate in such defense at such Indemnified Party's expense, , that the Indemnifying Party shall pay such expense if representation of such Indemnified Party by the counsel retained by the Indemnifying Party would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interest between the Indemnified Party and any other party represented by such counsel in such proceeding. No Indemnifying Party, in the defense of any such claim or litigation shall, except with the consent of each Indemnified Party, consent to entry of any judgment or enter into any settlement.
provided
provided, further
provided, however
               (e) If the indemnity and reimbursement obligation provided for in this Section 9.4 is unavailable or insufficient to hold harmless a party entitled to indemnification in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) referred to therein, then the indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by the indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative fault of the indemnifying party on the one hand and the indemnified party on the other hand in connection with statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the indemnifying party or the indemnified party and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such untrue statement or omission. The parties hereto agree that it would not be just and equitable if contributions pursuant to this section were to be determined by allocation or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in the first sentence of this section. The amount paid by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to in the first sentence of this Section 9.4(d) shall be deemed to include any legal and other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified
pro rata
 
party in connection with investigating or defending any losses, claims, damages or liabilities which is the subject of this Section 9.4(d).
               (f) No indemnified party guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from the indemnifying party if the indemnifying party was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
          9.5 . Pfizer's incidental registration rights hereunder shall terminate as to any Shares upon the earlier of (i) when the Shares may be sold by Pfizer under Rule 144(k) under the Securities Act, or (ii) such time as no such Shares are held by Pfizer.
Termination
     SECTION 10. .
Covenants of Pfizer and ArQule
          10.1 .
Standstill Agreement
               (a) Unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms, for all purposes of this Section 10, shall have the meanings specified in this Section 10.1(a):
Certain Definitions
 
               (b) . Pfizer agrees that, for a period of [four(4)] years following the Closing Date, unless it has obtained the prior written consent of ArQule, it will not directly or indirectly (i) acquire beneficial ownership of any Voting Stock, any securities convertible into or exchangeable for Voting Stock, or any other right to acquire Voting Stock (except by way of stock dividends or other distributions or offerings made available to holders of any Voting Stock generally or additional purchased Voting Stock as set forth in the Collaboration Agreement), (ii) make a tender, exchange or other offer for Voting Stock which would result in such an acquisition, or (iii) engage in any solicitation of proxies (within the meaning of the federal securities laws) for the purpose of obtaining shareholder approval for any transaction that would result in such an acquisition, if the effect of such acquisition would be to increase the Voting Power of all Voting Stock then beneficially owned by Pfizer, or which Pfizer has a right to acquire, to an aggregate number of shares exceeding the Maximum Percentage of the total Voting Power of ArQule at the time in effect; that it will not be a violation of this Section 10.1 if the aggregate percentage of the total Voting Power of ArQule represented by Voting Stock beneficially owned by Pfizer or which Pfizer has a right to acquire is increased as a result of a recapitalization of ArQule on or after the date of this Agreement, repurchase by ArQule of any of its Common Stock or any other action taken by ArQule or its affiliates. In the event that Pfizer owns in the aggregate more than the Maximum Percentage of the total Voting Power of ArQule due to a repurchase by ArQule of any of its Common Stock Pfizer may, but is not required to request that ArQule repurchase that number of shares of its Common Stock from Pfizer necessary to reduce Pfizer's ownership of ArQule's
Prohibited Acquisitions
provided
 
Common Stock below the Maximum Percentage, at the current market price; , that the foregoing shall not be deemed to limit ArQule's remedies in the event that the excess Voting Stock is acquired in violation of this Section 10.1(b).
provided, however
               (c) . The parties agree that the restrictions set forth in Section 10.1(b) above shall not apply (a) if a public announcement is made of (i) the commencement of, or an intention to commence or make, a tender offer or exchange offer by any person other than Pfizer or an Affiliate for Voting Stock or (ii) a proposal of any business combination to effect a Change of Control of ArQule by any person other than Pfizer or an Affiliate or (b) Pfizer acquires Voting Stock as a result of the combination of Pfizer or an Affiliate with, or the acquisition by Pfizer or any Affiliate of, another entity.
Exceptions
               (d) . Any purchase which causes Pfizer to be in violation of the terms of Section 10.1(b) above shall not be effected by ArQule and shall be voidable at the option of ArQule by its giving written notice to the transferor, his transferee and Pfizer.
Prohibited Transfer
               (e) . Pfizer represents to ArQule that there is no Affiliate which, as of the date of this Agreement, owns of record or beneficially any (i) Voting Stock, or (ii) any other securities convertible or exchangeable (with or without the payment of additional consideration) into Voting Stock of ArQule. Pfizer covenants to ArQule that, if at any time while this Section 10.1 is in effect, any Affiliate of Pfizer becomes or intends to become the beneficial owner, as defined in regulations promulgated by the Securities and Exchange Commission, of any Voting Stock, or any securities convertible or exchangeable into Voting Stock, Pfizer will, whether prior to such ownership if possible, or, if not possible, as soon as practicable after such ownership, cause such Affiliate to agree to be bound by Section 10.1 of this Agreement.
Affiliates of Pfizer
          10.2 Each holder of Registrable Shares included in any Registration shall furnish to ArQule such information regarding such holder and the distribution proposed by such holder as ArQule may request in writing and as shall be required in connection with any registration, qualification or compliance referred to in Article 9.
Information by Holder.
          10.3 Pfizer, if requested by ArQule and an underwriter of Common Stock or other securities of ArQule, shall agree not to sell otherwise transfer or dispose of any Registrable Shares or other securities of ArQule held by such Stockholder for a specified period of time (not to exceed 90 days) following the effective date of a Registration Statement; that all executive officers and directors of ArQule enter into similar agreements. Such agreement shall be in writing in a form satisfactory to ArQule and such underwriter. ArQule may impose stop-transfer instructions with respect to the Registrable Shares or other securities subject to the foregoing restriction until the end of the stand-off period.
"Stand-Off" Agreement.
provided
 
          10.4 . Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, the provisions of this Section 10 shall terminate and be of no further force and effect upon the date five years after the Closing Date.
Term
     SECTION 11. .
Miscellaneous
          11.1 . Any consent, notice or report required or permitted to be given or made under this Agreement by one of the parties hereto to the other shall be in writing, delivered personally or by facsimile (and promptly confirmed by telephone, personal delivery or courier) or courier, postage prepaid (where applicable), addressed to such other party at its address indicated below, or to such other address as the addressee shall have last furnished in writing to the addressor and shall be effective upon receipt by the addressee.
Notices
          11.2 . This Agreement contains the entire understanding of the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof. All express or implied agreements and understandings, either oral or written, heretofore made are expressly merged in and made a part of this Agreement.
Entire Agreement
 
          11.3 . Neither this Agreement nor any of the rights and obligations contained herein may be assigned or otherwise transferred by either party without the consent of the other party; , that either ArQule or Pfizer may, without such consent, assign its rights and obligations under this Agreement (i) to any Affiliate, all or substantially all of the equity interest of which is owned and controlled by such party or its direct or indirect parent corporation, or (ii) in connection with a merger, consolidation or sale of substantially all of such party's assets to an unrelated third party; , that such party's rights and obligations under this Agreement shall be assumed by its successor in interest in any such transaction and shall not be transferred separate from all or substantially all of its other business assets, including those business assets. Any purported assignment in violation of the preceding sentence shall be void. Any permitted assignee shall assume all obligations of its assignor under this Agreement.
Assignment
provided, however
provided further
          11.4 . This Agreement may not be modified or amended except pursuant to an instrument in writing signed by ArQule and Pfizer. The waiver by either party hereto of any right hereunder or the failure to perform or of a breach by the other party shall not be deemed a waiver of any other right hereunder or of any other breach or failure by said other party whether of a similar nature or otherwise.
Amendments and Waivers
          11.5 . The headings of the various sections of this Agreement have been inserted for convenience of reference only and shall not be deemed to be part of this Agreement.
Headings
          11.6 . In case any provision contained in this Agreement should be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
Severability
          11.7 . This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York (without giving effect to the choice of law provisions thereof) and the federal law of the United States of America.
Governing Law
          11.8 . This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which, when taken together, shall constitute but one instrument, and shall become effective when one or more counterparts have been signed by each party hereto and delivered to the other parties.
Counterparts
          11.9 . Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, each party shall bear its own expenses in connection with this Agreement.
Expenses
          11.10 . Neither party hereto shall issue any press releases or otherwise make any public statement with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement without the prior consent of the other party which shall not be unreasonably withheld, except as may be required by applicable law or regulation.
Publicity
     SECTION 12. . The following terms are defined in the Sections indicated:
Definitions
 
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Common Stock Purchase Agreement to be executed by their duly authorized representatives as of the day and year first above written.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20030917120248.txt.gz
TIME:20030917120248
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
Item 5.  Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure
 
On July 17, 2003, ArQule, Inc. announced that it signed a definitive agreement to acquire Cyclis Pharmaceuticals, Inc.  On September 8, 2003, ArQule, Inc. announced that it had completed the acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticals, Inc. as contemplated by the previously-announced definitive agreement.  The press release announcing completion of the acquisition is filed as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 7.  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(c)  Exhibits
 
99.1  Text of Press Release dated September 8, 2003.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
Date:  September 16, 2003

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
For Immediate Release:
 
Woburn, Mass., Sept. 8, 2003  ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL), a drug discovery and development company, today announced that it has completed its acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a privately held cancer-therapeutics company. Cyclis was an Ampersand Ventures portfolio company.
 
"We are delighted to complete this acquisition," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO of ArQule.  "ArQule is now able to combine its strengths in small-molecule chemistry and intelligent drug design with Cyclis' molecular biology expertise.  We believe that this combination has the potential to deliver clinical candidates with improved activity and reduced toxicity over other molecular approaches and traditional cancer chemotherapy. We also welcome our Cyclis colleagues, including 13 research scientists, into the ArQule family."
 
On July 17, 2003, ArQule announced the signing of a definitive agreement to acquire all of Cyclis' outstanding shares on a fully diluted basis in exchange for approximately 4.6 million common shares of ArQule and $5 million in cash. This resulted in a transaction value of approximately $25 million. In addition, ArQule has assumed all of the outstanding debt and liabilities of Cyclis, which range between $5 and $6 million.
 
"I believe that combining Cyclis' cutting-edge discovery research with ArQule's proven strength in chemistry can produce a uniquely strong drug development platform," said Dr. Samuel K. Ackerman, Cyclis President and CEO, who will become an advisor to ArQule following the merger.
 
Portfolio Update
 
ArQule's oncology portfolio is based on a novel technology, Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT), which involves the activation of cell cycle checkpoint pathways and the resultant apoptosis, or programmed death, of abnormal cells. ArQule expects its lead cancer compound, CO-501, to enter Phase I clinical trials in 2003.  In addition to CO-501, ArQule is pursuing a second-generation program based on a similar mechanism of action for the same pathway. ArQule also is applying ACT to two other discovery programs that target different pathways. The first involves discovering
compounds to inhibit a series of proteins referred to as Cancer Survival Proteins or CSPs.  CSPs are known to block checkpoint-mediated apoptosis.  A second discovery effort is aimed at restoring the p53 pathway to cancer cells through an intracellular protein that has been shown to stimulate cancer cell death.
 
ArQule/2
 
In addition to cancer therapeutics, ArQule continues to advance its p38 MAP Kinase program for which the initial indication will be rheumatoid arthritis.  The Company has a number of compounds in advanced lead optimization that have demonstrated functional oral activity in a rat model of rheumatoid arthritis. In this established animal model, the data indicate that ArQule's compounds reduced joint swelling in a dose-dependent manner and were well tolerated at all doses studies.  ArQule recently commenced pilot-toxicology studies in order to meet its goal of selecting a GLP-toxicology candidate by the end of the year.
 
In addition to these internal programs, two pharmaceutical partners are conducting GLP-toxicology studies on two ArQule-identified compounds.
 
Chemical Technologies Update
 
ArQule continues to meet all of its obligations to pharmaceutical partners. In addition, the Company is pursuing business opportunities based on its chemical technologies platform.
 
ArQule, Inc., a recognized leader in small-molecule chemistry, is engaged in the discovery and development of novel drugs for the treatment of cancer and inflammatory diseases. ArQule is combining molecular biology expertise and a unique approach to anti-cancer therapies, Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT), with its small molecule chemistry expertise and method for discovering Optimal Chemical Entities (OCEs).  OCE's are small-molecule compounds designed for an optimal balance of drug-like properties. ArQule also provides high quality library design and compound production to pharmaceutical collaborators.
TM
TM
TM
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the acquisition of Cyclis may not create value for ArQule's shareholders; the ability to successfully integrate acquired technologies and assets; positive early stage preclinical results may not be repeated in later studies or in humans; as a result of unforeseen delays ArQule may not be able to identify a p38 MAP Kinase candidate for GLP-toxicology testing by the end of 2003; other compounds in the series may not demonstrate favorable characteristics; the ability to successfully satisfy milestones and deliver compounds to corporate collaborators; the ability to design OCEs; the progress of product research and development activities in ArQule's present portfolio and projected expenditures; the ACT approach may not improve efficacy nor reduce toxicity; the therapeutic index for CO-501 may prove narrower than expected giving ArQule less flexibility in selecting doses for the Phase I trial; due to the inability to enter into future collaborations with pharmaceutical or biotechnology companies or raise additional funds in uncertain equity markets, ArQule may not be able to commence clinical trials for CO-501 in 2003 or ever; ArQule's next-generation programs may fail; ArQule's chemistry expertise may not contribute to advancing its pipeline; the market opportunity for ArQule's compounds may disappoint and competition may
TM
become more challenging than anticipated; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 31, 2003.  The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20031024164545.txt.gz
TIME:20031024164545
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
Item 7.  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(c)  Exhibits
 
99.1   Text of Press Release dated October 23, 2003.
 
Item 12.  Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On October 23, 2003, ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2003.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
Date:  October 24, 2003
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
Contacts:
Stephen A. Hill, CEO
Jean M. Devine, Director of IR
ArQule, Inc.
(781) 994-0300
www.ArQule.com
 
For Immediate Release:
 
 
Woburn, Mass. Oct. 23, 2003  ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL), a drug discovery and development company, today reported its results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2003.
 
For the third quarter of 2003, ArQule reported revenues of $15,961,000, compared with $16,459,000 for the same period of 2002.  For the quarter, the Company reported a net loss of $29,909,000, or $1.22 per share, compared with a net loss of $5,468,000, or $0.26 per share, for the third quarter of 2002.   The third-quarter 2003 net loss figure includes an in-process research and development charge related to the acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticals of $30,359,000.
 
For the nine months ended September 30, 2003, revenues were $47,096,000, compared with revenues of  $46,658,000 for the first nine months of 2002.  ArQule reported a net loss of $29,622,000, or $1.28 per share, for the first nine months of 2003, compared with a net loss of $18,770,000, or $0.89 per share, for the first nine months of 2002. The nine-month 2003 net loss figure includes the above-mentioned in-process research and development charge.
 
ArQule ended the third quarter of 2003 with $74 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
"Our third quarter marked another period of strong achievement for ArQule.  Through the dedication and focus of our employees, we furthered ArQule's strategy of becoming a drug discovery and development organization with a therapeutic focus in oncology.  We advanced our pipeline programs, closed our strategic acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticals, began to integrate a novel biology approach to cancer treatment with our unique small-molecule chemistry expertise, and met all collaborator expectations," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and Chief Executive Officer.
 
Highlights of the Third Quarter
 
A Phase I clinical trial of ArQule's lead anti-cancer compound, ARQ 501 (formerly CO-501), began in late September.
 - 
                 
 
ArQule complemented its strengths in small-molecule chemistry through the acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticals. As a result, ArQule gained a novel anti-cancer biology approach, Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT); a lead clinical candidate, ARQ 501; a portfolio of cancer programs based on ACT; and, biology expertise.
 - 
                 
SM
SM
SM
 
ArQule named Dr. Chiang J. Li Chief Scientific Officer and Vice President, Head of ArQule Biomedical Institute.  Dr. Li, the co-inventor of Activated Checkpoint Therapy, is responsible for ArQule's discovery research, including target identification and target validation activities.
 - 
                 
SM
 
In its p38 MAP Kinase program for inflammation, ArQule advanced one compound, an Optimal Chemical Entity (OCE) named ARQ 101, into pilot toxicity studies, comprising acute toxicity, dose-range finding toxicity, genotoxicity and pharmacokinetics.  Based on results from these studies, ARQ 101 has been nominated as ArQule's first wholly owned GLP toxicity candidate.  ArQule plans to commence GLP-tox studies by the end of this year.
 - 
                 
 
ArQule fulfilled all requirements of its Pfizer and Bayer agreements and initiated a new pharmaceutical collaboration with Novartis Biomedical Research Institute.
 - 
                 
 
Financial Guidance
 
ArQule is updating financial guidance for the year ending December 31, 2003. ArQule now expects revenues to range between $58 and $60 million.  This increase from prior guidance of $56 to $58 million primarily reflects achievements at the high end of expectations for Pfizer.
 
The Company expects: the total cost of revenue to range between $37 and $38 million; total research and development expense to range between $20 and $21 million; marketing, general and administrative expense to range between $10 and $11 million; and, net investment income to range between $500,000 and $600,000.  All these figures are unchanged from second quarter guidance.
ArQule now expects its net loss for 2003 to range from $37 to $39 million, a reduction from previous guidance of $40 to $42 million.  This includes the impact of the in-process research and development charge of approximately $30 million related to the close of the Cyclis acquisition.
 
ArQule now expects its net use of cash to range between $22 and $24 million, a reduction from previous guidance of $24 to $26 million. This includes payments of substantially all of Cyclis' liabilities of approximately $5 million and the cash portion of the purchase price and closing-related costs of $7 million.
 
ArQule will hold a conference call today at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and Chief Executive Officer, will lead the call and be joined by Dr. Andrew Uprichard, Chief Operating Officer, and Dr. Chiang J. Li, Chief Scientific Officer.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112, and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820.  The replay access code is 699802.
 
ArQule, Inc. is engaged in the discovery and development of novel drugs for the treatment of cancer and inflammation.  The Company is combining molecular biology expertise and a unique approach to anti-cancer therapies, Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT), with its small-molecule chemistry expertise and method for discovering Optimal Chemical Entities (OCEs).  OCEs are small-molecule compounds designed for an optimal balance of drug-like properties. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production.
SM
SM
TM
TM
TM
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ability to integrate successfully ArQule's biology experience and ACT
SM
platform with its small-molecule chemistry expertise; the ability to design OCEsTM; the ACT
SM
approach may not improve efficacy nor reduce toxicity; the therapeutic index for ARQ 501 may prove narrower than expected giving ArQule less flexibility in selecting doses for the Phase I trial; positive early-stage preclinical results may not be repeated in later studies or in humans; other compounds in a series may not demonstrate favorable characteristics and the next-generation programs may fail; due to the inability to enter into future or maintain present collaborations with pharmaceutical or biotechnology companies or to raise additional funds in uncertain equity markets, ArQule may not be able to prosecute further clinical trials for ARQ 501; ArQule may fail to recruit adequate numbers of appropriate patients;  as a result of unforeseen delays ArQule may not be able to commence GLP toxicity studies this year for the OCEin the p38 MAP Kinase program; the ability to successfully satisfy milestones and deliver compounds to corporate collaborators; the progress of product research and development activities in ArQule's present portfolio and projected expenditures; ArQule's chemistry expertise may not contribute to advancing its  pipeline; the market opportunity for ArQule's compounds may disappoint and competition may become more challenging than anticipated; ArQule may fail to achieve the increased revenue forecasted herein, and the cost of revenue may exceed that which is forecasted herein; ArQule may use more cash than forecasted herein; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange
TM
 
Commission on March 31, 2003 and its Form S-3 filed with the Commission on October 8, 2003.  The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 
 
 
(A)  Basic and diluted net loss per share amounts were equal in all loss periods presented
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20031219154603.txt.gz
TIME:20031219154603
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
Item 5.  Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure
 
ArQule, Inc. today announced an increase in its expected revenues for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003.  The text of the press release announcing the expected increase is filed as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
Item 7.  Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits
 
(c)  Exhibits
 
99.1   Text of Press Release dated December 19, 2003.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
         Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
For Immediate Release:
 
Woburn, Mass. Dec. 19, 2003  As a consequence of achieving certain 2003 goals for its collaboration with Pfizer Inc., ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced an increase in its expected revenues for fiscal year 2003.  Some payments, which had been anticipated in January 2004, will now be paid in December 2003.  As a result, ArQule is updating financial guidance for the year ended December 31, 2003.  The Company expects to release its final results for 2003 and provide financial guidance for 2004 in mid-February 2004.
 
"I am pleased with ArQule's success in meeting Pfizer goals and appreciate the hard work of our employees who have continued to excel in this collaboration," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and CEO.  "Consistent with prior communications about ArQule's strategy and business model, we intend to prioritize management of cash flow to provide optimal support for our internal oncology programs. It should be noted that these early payments from Pfizer will not be included in our 2004 expectations. Moreover, following the successful completion of our three-year collaboration with Bayer, we do not anticipate any revenues from Bayer after 2003. As noted in the past, our revenue is likely to vary from quarter to quarter."
 
ArQule now expects 2003 revenues to range between $63 and $65 million.  This increase from prior guidance of $58 to $60 million reflects revenues from meeting certain goals in the Pfizer collaboration. The achievement of ArQule's 2003 collaboration goals triggers a $3 million equity investment from Pfizer. This marks the final of three planned investments in ArQule stock, for a total of $18 million, made by Pfizer since December 2001.
 
Updating the rest of its guidance for 2003, ArQule now expects: the total cost of revenue to range between $36 and $37 million; total research and development expense to range between $19 and $20 million; marketing, general and administrative expense to range between $9 and $10 million; and net investment income to range between $500,000 and $600,000. ArQule now expects its net loss for 2003 to range between $29 and $31 million, a reduction from previous guidance of $37 to $39 million. This figure includes the impact of the in-process research and development charge of approximately $30 million related to the close of the Cyclis acquisition. ArQule now expects its net use of cash to range between $11 and $13 million, a reduction from previous guidance of $22 to $24 million. This includes payment of substantially all of Cyclis' liabilities of approximately $5 million and the cash portion of the purchase price and closing-related costs of $7 million.
 
ArQule/2
 
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy
SM
(ACT
SM
) platform.  ACT
SM
compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. The Company's lead programs are ARQ 501 for solid cancers, presently in Phase 1 clinical trials, and ARQ 101, an optimized small-molecule compound targeting p38 MAP Kinase for rheumatoid arthritis, presently in preclinical (GLP-tox) studies.  In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ability to integrate successfully ArQule's biology experience and the ACT platform with its small-molecule chemistry expertise; the ability to improve the treatment of cancer patients; the ACT platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; payments may not be received on a timely basis resulting in inaccuracies of the financial projections contained herein; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 31, 2003, its Form S-3 filed with the Commission on October 8, 2003 and its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on November 12, 2003.  The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM
SM
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20040212071517.txt.gz
TIME:20040212071517
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
Item 5.  Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure
 
ArQule, Inc. today announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2003.  The text of the press release announcing the results is filed as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
Item 7.  Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits
 
(c)  Exhibits
 
99.1   Text of Press Release dated February 12, 2004.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
For Immediate Release:
 
 
Conference call scheduled for today at 9 a.m. Eastern Time
 
 ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and year ended 2003.
Woburn, Mass., Feb. 12, 2004
 
For the quarter ended December 31, 2003, ArQule reported revenues of $18,443,000, compared with $16,154,000 for the same period of 2002.   For the quarter, the Company reported a net loss of $5,129,000, or $0.18 per share, compared with a net loss of $59,104,000, or $2.78 per share, for the fourth quarter of 2002.   The fourth quarter of 2003 net loss includes a restructuring charge of $1,529,000 related to the Company's reassessment of its liability for its closed facility in California and a $4,750,000 loss related to a write-down of an investment in a privately-held company.  The fourth quarter 2002 net loss figure includes stock-based compensation, amortization of intangibles, goodwill and intangible asset impairment charges and restructuring charges associated with the Company's decision in December 2002 to reduce its workforce and close its facilities in California and the United Kingdom.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2003, ArQule's revenues were $65,539,000, compared with revenues of $62,812,000 for the year ended December 31, 2002.  The Company reported a net loss for the year ended December 31, 2003 of $34,751,000, or $1.43 per share.  This compares with a net loss of $77,875,000, or $3.67 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2002.  The 2003 net loss includes an in-process research and development charge related to the acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticals of $30,359,000, in addition to the above-mentioned restructuring and investment write-down charges (in the aggregate, $5,989,000).  The 2002 net loss figures include the effect of the above-mentioned charges.
 
As announced in December 2003, revenues for the fourth quarter and full year 2003 include revenues from Pfizer that had been anticipated in January 2004.  These revenues were related to the achievement of certain goals and deliverables by ArQule.
 
ArQule ended the year with $77 million of cash and marketable securities.  This figure includes a $3 million equity investment that Pfizer made in 2003 as a milestone in acknowledgement of ArQule meeting all of its 2003 deliverables.
 
 "These results provide a very solid base on which to continue ArQule's transition to becoming an innovative, well-financed, oncology-focused biotechnology company," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO of ArQule.  "Our cash position at the end of 2003 will allow us to dedicate approximately $25 million per year over the next three years to our Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) research and development program.  This will include our lead program, ARQ 501, currently in a Phase 1 clinical trial.  It will also support our multiple pipeline programs for compounds within our ACT portfolio, some of which have already commenced animal testing.  As will be described below, we will continue during 2004 to strengthen our position as an effective oncology company."
SM
SM
SM
 
Research and Development Program Update
 
Activated Checkpoint Therapy Platform
SM
 
ArQule's lead program, ARQ 501, is progressing according to plan. In the Phase 1 dose- escalation study, the fifth patient has been safely dosed. Dose-limiting toxicity has yet to be reached.  The Company is also in the planning stage for potential new studies that would explore the effect of combinations of ARQ 501 with approved chemotherapeutic agents in specific human tumor types. The Company has increased the resources applied to its next generation of compounds directed to a number of innovative biological targets within the ACT pathways.  During the course of 2004, ArQule will continue this process of reallocating resources away from some of its traditional activities in favor of greater support of its ACT research and development.
SM
SM
 
"We are delighted with the progress with ARQ 501 and very excited about our pipeline programs within the ACT platform. We have fine opportunities to further advance these programs in 2004," said Dr. Chiang Li, ArQule's Chief Scientific Officer and Vice President, Head of ArQule's Biomedical Institute.
SM
 
Other Programs
 
The Company is currently exploring out-licensing opportunities for its ion channel and p38 MAP Kinase inhibitor programs. These have reached lead optimization and GLP toxicity phases, respectively.  ArQule was pleased to receive a milestone payment from Wyeth on the submission of an IND derived from its Directed Array collaboration with them.  A second program for which ArQule could be eligible for milestone and royalty payments continues to progress through GLP toxicity studies at Solvay.
TM
Chemical Technologies
 
ArQule continues to have a productive relationship with Pfizer.  In response to Pfizer's evolving needs for chemistry support, ArQule has reduced its overall file enrichment effort and re-focused some of its resources to support rapid hit follow up.  Instead of increasing its infrastructure to support the required expansion of the original agreement in subsequent years, ArQule will maintain the 2004 compound production levels for potentially the remaining term of the agreement.  The revenue and expense consequences of this change are described more fully below in the Company's 2004 guidance.
 
2004 Financial Guidance
 
As previously reported, due to the successful achievement of certain goals during 2003, payments originally anticipated from Pfizer in January 2004 were received in December 2003.  In addition, the Company's three-year, $30 million collaboration with Bayer was successfully concluded during 2003.  On February 11, 2004, ArQule entered into a new agreement with Pfizer. This amends the previous collaboration agreement dated December 18, 2001. Under the terms of the amended agreement, based on the Company's achievement of production milestones, ArQule may receive up to $184.9 million in cash from 2004 through 2008. This potentially represents a total of $291.2 million in cash for the entire collaboration, down from $345 million as previously disclosed.  For 2004, expense guidance assumes a reduction in resources needed to support the Pfizer alliance, while increasing the resources available for internal research.  As a consequence of the skill-set needs in discovery research, this reallocation will result in the departure of up to 55 current employees through a reduction in force now being implemented and the recruitment of a number of new employees with the skills necessary for oncology research and development activities.  All costs related to this realignment are included in the Company's expense guidance for 2004.  As stated, ArQule does not anticipate a significant change to the total headcount for ArQule during 2004.
 
For 2004, ArQule expects revenues to range between $46 and $48 million, total cost of revenue to range between $34 and $35 million, total research and development expenses to range between $22 and $23 million and total marketing, general and administrative expenses to range between $9 and $10 million.  The Company expects net investment income to range between $400,000 and $600,000.  The Company expects to record a charge of between $1.2 and $1.4 million in the first quarter of 2004 associated with its decision to terminate approximately 55 employees.  ArQule expects its net loss per share to range between $0.66 and $0.70 for the year.  ArQule expects its net use of cash this year to range between $29 and $31 million, of which approximately $6 million will be spent on paying down debt on the building in Woburn.  This guidance does not assume any additional collaborations, acquisitions or in-licensing initiatives.
"Our guidance for 2004 reflects our confidence in the strength of our oncology programs.  We are well positioned to resource those programs effectively for a number of years," concluded Dr. Hill.
 
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO, and Louise A. Mawhinney, CFO, will lead the call.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112, and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820.  The access code is 672491.
 
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform.  ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. The Company's lead programs are ARQ 501 for solid cancers, presently in Phase 1 clinical trials, and ARQ 101, an optimized small-molecule compound targeting p38 MAP Kinase for rheumatoid arthritis, presently in preclinical (GLP-tox) studies.  In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production.   For more information about ArQule, please visit the Company's new website at www.ArQule.com.
SM
SM
SM
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 ("Reform Act"), which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule.  ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release.  Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements.  All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act.
Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation:  ARQ 501 may fail in clinical trials; possible delays in clinical trials; the ability to commercialize product candidates if ArQule fails to demonstrate adequately their safety and efficacy; the ability of its competitors to develop and market cancer products that are more effective and have fewer side effects;  the ability to integrate successfully ArQule's biology experience and the ACT
SM
platform with its small-molecule chemistry expertise; the ability to improve the treatment of cancer patients; the ACT
SM
platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the ACT
SM
 pipeline may prove disappointing;
payments may not be received on a timely basis resulting in inaccuracies of the financial projections contained herein; costs associated with the reduction in force may exceed expectations; ArQule may not achieve its production milestones in its collaboration with Pfizer and its revenue projections may fall short; the Company may not be able to attract and retain an adequate number of new employees with appropriate skills; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 31, 2003, its Form S-3 filed with the Commission on October 8, 2003 and its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on November 12, 2003.  The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20040402092213.txt.gz
TIME:20040402092213
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 5.  Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure
ArQule, Inc. today announced formation of a strategic alliance with the Roche Group in the field of oncology and revised its financial guidance for 2004. The text of the press release announcing the alliance and revised guidance is filed as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 7.  Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits
(c)   Exhibits
99.1     Text of Press Release dated April 2, 2004.
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: April 2, 2004

 
: Dr. Stephen A. Hill, CEO (781) 994-0300 www.ArQule.com
ArQule Contact
: Ms. Darien E. Wilson Director, Public Affairs (973) 562-2232
Roche Contact
For Immediate Release:
ROCHE AND ARQULE FORM STRATEGIC ALLIANCE IN ONCOLOGY
 Roche and ArQule (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced a partnership to discover and develop drug candidates targeting a new pathway in order to selectively kill cancer cells. The pathway influences the activation of a key cell death regulator called E2F. The activation of E2F plays a critical role in the programmed death of cancer cells, while leaving healthy cells unharmed. The partnership includes a compound in phase I clinical development.
Woburn, Mass., Apr. 02, 2004
"We are very excited about the possibility of specifically targeting cancer cells through the E2F pathway," said William M. Burns, Head of Roche's Pharmaceutical Division. "This broad alliance with ArQule adds to our existing programs with partners to develop clinically differentiated oncology drugs."
Under the terms of the agreement, Roche obtains an option to ArQule's E2F program in the field of cancer therapy. Roche will provide immediate research funding of $15 million, and significant financial support for ongoing research and development. ArQule will be responsible for advancing drug candidates from early stage development into phase II trials. Roche may opt to license worldwide rights for the development and commercialization of products resulting from this collaboration, by paying an option fee. Assuming the successful development and commercialization of a compound under the program, ArQule could receive up to $276 million in payments, plus royalties. Additionally, ArQule has the option to co-promote products in the US.
ArQule/2
 
"I view this partnership as the ideal combination of large and small company excellence in oncology. It allows Roche to access ArQule's expertise in E2F-related cancer biology and chemistry technology and provides ArQule with access to Roche's proven expertise in all aspects of oncology R&D and marketing," commented Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO of ArQule. Dr. Hill continued, "I believe this collaboration goes a long way to validating ArQule's emergence as a serious contributor to oncology research and development. Moreover, it does so in a way that allows us to continue to grow and develop as a company." ArQule's Activated Checkpoint Therapy platform comprises a portfolio of novel mechanistic approaches to cancer therapy. ArQule retains all rights to those programs that work independently of the E2F pathway.
SM
2004 Updated Guidance
As a result of the above collaboration, ArQule is revising its earlier guidance on 2004 results, as follows:
For 2004, ArQule expects revenues to range between $50 and $52 million, up from the previous guidance of $46 and $48 million. Total cost of revenue is expected to remain unchanged at between $34 and $35 million. Total research and development expenses are expected to range between $24 and $25 million, an increase of $2 million over previous guidance. Total marketing, general and administrative expenses are expected to remain unchanged at between $9 and $10 million. The Company expects net investment income to range between $600,000 and $800,000, an increase of $200,000 over previous guidance. ArQule expects its net loss per share to range between $0.52 and $0.56 for the year, down from the previous guidance of a range of between $0.66 and $0.70. ArQule expects its net use of cash this year to range between $14 and $16 million, of which approximately $6 million will be spent on paying down debt on the building in Woburn. This is down from a range of between $29 and $31 million. This guidance does not assume any additional collaborations, acquisitions or in-licensing initiatives.
ArQule will hold a conference call at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time. Dr. Stephen A. Hill, CEO and President will lead the call.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112 and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820. The access code is 642723.
ArQule/3
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint
 
Therapy (ACT)  platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer, Novartis, and Sankyo. For more information, please visit www.ArQule.com.
SM
SM
SM
Roche in Oncology
Within the last five years the Roche Group has become one of the world's leading providers of anti-cancer treatments, supportive care products and diagnostics. Its oncology business includes four marketed products with survival benefit: Herceptin, MabThera, Xeloda and Avastin, which has been launched in the US recently, treat a range of malignancies such as breast cancer, non-Hodgkin's lymphoma and colorectal cancer. Other key products include NeoRecormon (anemia in various cancer settings), Bondronat (prevention of skeletal events in breast cancer and bone metastases patients, hypercalcemia of malignancy), Kytril (chemotherapy and radiotherapy-induced nausea and vomiting) and Roferon-A (leukemia, Kaposi's sarcoma, malignant melanoma, renal cell carcinoma).
Roche is developing new tests which will have a significant impact on disease management for cancer patients in the future. With a broad portfolio of tumor markers for prostate, colorectal, liver, ovarian, breast, stomach, pancreas and lung cancer, as well as a range of molecular oncology tests, Roche will continue to be one of the world's leading providers of cancer focused treatments and diagnostics.
Roche Oncology has four research sites (two in the US, Germany and Japan) and four Headquarter Development sites (two in the US, UK and Switzerland).
About Roche
Headquartered in Basel, Switzerland, Roche is one of the world's leading innovation-driven healthcare groups. Its core businesses are pharmaceuticals and diagnostics.
Roche is number one in the global diagnostics market, the leading supplier of pharmaceuticals for cancer and a leader in virology and transplantation. As a supplier of products and services for the prevention, diagnosis and treatment of disease, Roche contributes on a broad range of fronts to improving people's health and quality of life.
ArQule/4
Roche employs roughly 65,000 people in 150 countries. The Group has alliances and R&D agreements with numerous partners, including majority ownership interests in Genentech and Chugai.
 
About Roche as a Partner
Roche is a valued partner to more than 60 companies worldwide. In 2003, Roche led the pharmaceutical industry in the number of product deals signed, bringing 10 potential products into the company, including a new antibiotic, a novel treatment for rheumatoid arthritis, and an exciting cardiovascular compound that can further benefit patients with diabetes. Roche's alliance strategy is to enable its partners to grow through a flexible and collaborative approach. Many of its partners, such as Memory, Ipsen, and Medivir have responded to this strategy by seeking broader, strategic alliances with Roche.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 ("Reform Act"), which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its product and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act.
Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: ARQ 501 and other compounds may fail in clinical trials; possible delays in clinical trials; the ability to commercialize product candidates if ArQule fails to demonstrate adequately their safety and efficacy; the ability of its competitors to develop and market cancer products that are more effective and have fewer side effects; the ability to integrate successfully ArQule's biology experience and the ACT platform with its small-molecule chemistry expertise; the ability to improve the treatment of cancer patients; the ACT platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; payments may not be received on a timely basis; ArQule may not achieve the milestones agreed upon for this strategic alliance; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 12, 2004, its Form S-3 filed with the Commission on December 15, 2003 and its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on November 12, 2003. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM
SM
SM


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20040421085420.txt.gz
TIME:20040421085420
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c)  Exhibits
99.1 Text of Press Release dated April 21, 2004.
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On April 21, 2004 ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the first fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2004. The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: April 21, 2004

 
Exhibit 99.1
: Dr. Stephen A. Hill, CEO Louise A. Mawhinney, CFO (781) 994-0300 www.ArQule.com
Contacts
For Immediate Release:
Conference call scheduled for today at 9 a.m. Eastern Time
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced results for its first quarter ended March 31, 2004.
Woburn, Mass., Apr. 21, 2004
For the quarter, ArQule's revenues were $11,761,000, compared with $15,653,000 for the same period of 2003. The Company reported a net loss of $5,251,000, or $0.18 per share, for the first quarter of 2004, compared with a net loss of $750,000, or $0.03 per share, for the first quarter of 2003. Net loss for the first quarter of 2004 included a restructuring charge of $1,072,000 related to the elimination of 53 positions during the quarter as part of the Company's efforts to shift resources to support its oncology research and development efforts.
ArQule ended the first quarter of 2004 with approximately $58 million in cash and marketable securities, compared with $77 million at December 31, 2003. Use of cash was high in the first quarter due to the timing of payables and receivables. The guidance for net decrease in cash during 2004 remains unchanged at between $14 million and $16 million, as stated in the April 2 press release.
nd
"This was a very successful quarter for ArQule. In February, we amended our collaboration with Pfizer. Under the amended deal we could potentially receive a total of $291.2 million in cash over the entire collaboration. In addition, we received a milestone payment from Wyeth for an IND filing based upon a compound whose discovery was facilitated through the collaborative Directed Array Program with ArQule. Our oncology research and development efforts to date have culminated in a strategic alliance with Roche to discover and develop drug candidates using the E2F pathway, thereby validating ArQule's emergence as a serious contributor to oncology research and development. Entering into this alliance will generate an immediate research and development payment of $15 million to ArQule, with the potential to earn up to $276 million plus royalties," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and CEO. "Our financial guidance for the year remains unchanged from the updated guidance given in our press release of April 2."
nd
 
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time. Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO and Louise Mawhinney, Vice President and CFO will participate in the call.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112 and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820. The access code is 864477.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer, Novartis, and Sankyo. For more information, please visit
SM
SM
SM
www.ArQule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 ("Reform Act"), which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: ARQ 501 and other compounds may fail in clinical trials; possible delays in clinical trials; the ability to commercialize product candidates if ArQule fails to demonstrate adequately their safety and efficacy; the ability of its competitors to develop and market cancer products that are more effective and have fewer side effects; the ability to integrate successfully ArQule's biology experience and the ACT platform with its small-molecule chemistry expertise; the ability to improve the treatment of cancer patients; the ACT platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; payments may not be received on a timely basis; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule; ArQule may not achieve the milestones agreed upon for its strategic alliances; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 12, 2004, its Form S-3 filed with the Commission on December 15, 2003 and its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on November 12, 2003. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM
SM
SM
 
(A) Basic and diluted net loss per share amounts were equal in both periods presented.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20040527132802.txt.gz
TIME:20040527132802
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 5. Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure
ArQule, Inc. today announced organizational changes in its board of directors. The text of the press release giving details of the changes is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
For Immediate Release:
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that Ariel Elia has resigned from the Board of Directors effective May 21, 2004. Mr. Elia had been Chairman of the Board since 2001 and a Director since 2000. Mr. Patrick Zenner was elected as his successor.
Woburn, Mass., May 27, 2004
"ArQule has benefited greatly from the wisdom and experience Ariel brought to the Board in his role as Director and Chairman. I am very grateful that Ariel has been able to provide significant leadership to our Board and to contribute to ArQule's emergence as an exciting R&D based oncology company," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and CEO. "I am also delighted to welcome Mr. Patrick Zenner as our new Chairman. Pat has been a member of ArQule's Board since 2002, and will provide continuity and leadership in his additional role as Chairman. I look forward to his support and counsel as we continue to build our company."
Mr. Patrick Zenner retired in 2001 from the position of President and Chief Executive Officer of Hoffmann-La Roche Inc., North America. Mr. Zenner is immediate past chairman of the HealthCare Institute of New Jersey and served on the Boards of Directors and Executive Committees of the Pharmaceutical Research & Manufacturers of America (PhRMA) and the Biotechnology Industry Organization (BIO). In addition, Mr. Zenner has been a member of numerous associations, including the American Foundation for Pharmaceutical Education, the Health Care Leadership Council and the National Committee for Quality Health Care. Mr. Zenner is currently on the Boards of Trustees of Creighton University and Fairleigh Dickinson University. In addition, Mr. Zenner is a member of the Boards of Directors of several other public and private companies.
Mr. Elia currently serves as Chairman of the European Advisory Board of E.Med Securities, as director of Altamir S.A., and as director of Yissum. Mr. Elia also serves as a Governor of both the Ben Gurion University and the Hebrew University of Jerusalem. Prior to his current positions, Mr. Elia was the Chief Executive Officer of Jouveinal Laboratories. Mr. Elia also spent 17 years with Merck & Co., serving both in Europe and in the U.S., most recently as Senior Vice President, International Division. Before joining Merck, Mr. Elia spent 12 years with American Home Products Corporation, serving as President of the International Household Products Division prior to his departure.
 
ArQule/2
Ms. Laura Avakian, Dr. Werner Cautreels and Mr. Tuan Ha-Ngoc were all re-elected to the Board of Directors at the 2004 Annual Stockholders' Meeting on May 19, 2004. They will each serve a three-year term. The company is currently undertaking a search for two new directors to fill the vacancies created by the resignations of Mr. Elia and Dr. Michael Rosenblatt (announced in November of last year).
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer, Novartis, and Sankyo. For more information, please visit www.ArQule.com.
SM
SM
SM
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 ("Reform Act"), which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; payments may not be received on a timely basis; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule; ArQule may not achieve the milestones agreed upon for its strategic alliances; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 7, 2004, its Form 10-K filed with the Commission on March 12, 2004 and its Form S-3 filed with the Commission on December 15, 2003. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM
SM


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20040723111633.txt.gz
TIME:20040723111633
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Text of Press Release dated July 23, 2004.
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On July 23, 2004 ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the second fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2004. The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date:   July 23, 2004

 
Exhibit 99.1
Dr. Stephen A. Hill, CEO Louise A. Mawhinney, CFO (781) 994-0300 www.ArQule.com
Contacts:
For Immediate Release:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today reported its results for the quarter ended June 30, 2004, and announced plans for a new study in pancreatic cancer. ArQule also announced the appointment of Daniel D. Von Hoff to its Scientific Advisory Board.
Woburn, Mass., July 23, 2004 
For the quarter ended June 30, 2004, ArQule reported revenues of $14,012,000 compared with $15,482,000 for the same period of 2003. The Company reported a net loss of $134,000 for the quarter ended June 30, 2004, which is essentially breakeven on a per share basis. This compares with net income of $1,038,000 or $0.04 per share, for the quarter ended June 30, 2003.
Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2004 were $25,773,000 compared with revenues of $31,135,000 for the same period of 2003. For the six months ended June 30, 2004, ArQule reported a net loss of $5,385,000, or $0.19 per share. This compares with net income of $285,000, or $0.01 per share, for the six months ended June 30, 2003. Net loss for the six months ended June 30, 2004 included a restructuring charge of $1,072,000 related to the elimination of 53 positions as part of the Company's efforts to shift resources to support its oncology research and development efforts.
ArQule ended the second quarter of 2004 with approximately $76 million in cash and marketable securities. Financial guidance for the year remains unchanged. The guidance for net decrease in cash during 2004 remains unchanged at between $14 million and $16 million.
"The financials are in line with our expectations, and with our guidance for the year," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and Chief Executive Officer. "We have had a good quarter in terms of progressing our research and development initiatives. The appointment of Dr. Von Hoff to the Scientific Advisory Board is very timely."
 
ArQule/2
Daniel D. Von Hoff Appointed to Scientific Advisory Board
Daniel D. Von Hoff, M.D. joins Gerard I. Evan, Ph.D., Alfred L. Goldberg, Ph.D., William G. Kaelin, Jr., M.D., Arthur B. Pardee, Ph.D., John L. Ryan, M.D., Ph.D., Sam R. Saks, M.D., and Robert A. Weinberg, Ph.D. on the ArQule Scientific Advisory Board.
Daniel D. Von Hoff, M.D., is Professor of Medicine, Molecular and Cellular Biology and Pathology, and Director of the Arizona Health Sciences Center's Cancer Therapeutics Program at The University of Arizona and Director of Translational Research at the Translational Research Institute (TGen). He is also Chief Scientific Officer for US Oncology Research. Dr. Von Hoff is developing molecularly targeted anticancer therapies, with particular concentration in the area of pancreatic cancer. He and his colleagues were involved in the development of mitoxantrone, fludarabine, paclitaxel, docetaxel, gemcitabine and CPT-11 and multiple other agents. His laboratory specializes in in-vitro drug sensitivity testing to individualize patient treatment, gene amplification and targeting telomere maintenance mechanisms. He is the author of over 503 papers, 126 book chapters and 843 abstracts. Dr. Von Hoff is past president of the American Association for Cancer Research, a fellow of the American College of Physicians and a member and past board member of the American Society of Clinical Oncology. He is associated in various capacities with many prominent publications, as founder, editor or co-editor, including "Investigational New Drugs  The Journal of New Anti-Cancer Agents," "Clinical Cancer Research," and "Molecular Cancer Therapeutics."
Research and Development Program Update
Clinical Trials
The ARQ 501 phase I monotherapy study continues to enroll successfully. The drug has been well tolerated and dose escalation will continue in order to identify the maximum tolerated dose. In the latter part of the year, a new phase Ib/II clinical study combining ARQ 501 with gemcitabine will open to enroll patients with advanced pancreatic cancer, the first human trial to explore the use of ARQ 501 in combination with a conventional chemotherapy agent. Planning is underway for additional studies to start in 2005.
Activated Checkpoint Therapy Research Programs
SM
ARQ 550RP
Development of an orally available second generation E2F targeted oncology product is underway.
ARQ 650RP
The Cancer Survival Protein ("CSP") modulation program, in contrast to the E2F program, is designed to modulate survival mechanisms acquired in the evolution of cancer cells, and thereby to selectively induce cancer cell death. CSPs are inappropriately upregulated in cancer cells and are required for cancer cell survival. The Company anticipates final selection of the clinical candidate within six to nine months. Meanwhile, the Company announces the discovery of a series of proprietary small molecular weight compounds from within its CSP modulation program. The CSP lead compound ARQ 707 is highly effective at killing a variety of human cancer cells in cultures. ARQ 707 has also demonstrated potent anti-tumor activity against human cancer in mice.
 
ArQule/3
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time. Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO, Louise A. Mawhinney, Vice President and CFO, will lead the call.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112, and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820. The access code is 106625.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer, Novartis, and Sankyo. For more information, please visit www.ArQule.com.
SM
SM
SM
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 ("Reform Act"), which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; payments may not be received on a timely basis; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule; ArQule may not achieve the milestones agreed upon for its strategic alliances; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the CSP program may prove ineffective and fail; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 7, 2004, its Form 10-K filed with the Commission on March 12, 2004 and its Form S-3 filed with the Commission on December 15, 2003. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM
SM
 
ArQule/4


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20041028070026.txt.gz
TIME:20041028070026
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
Table of Contents
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On October 28, 2004 ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2004. The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
99.1       Text of Press Release dated October 28, 2004.
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
Dr. Stephen A. Hill, CEO Louise A. Mawhinney, CFO (781) 994-0300 www.ArQule.com
Contacts:
For Immediate Release:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today reported its results for the quarter ended September 30, 2004.
Woburn, Mass., Oct. 28, 2004 
For the quarter ended September 30, 2004, ArQule reported revenues of $14,594,000 compared with $15,961,000 for the same period of 2003. These results are in line with our strategic shift of emphasis to oncology drug discovery, while continuing to advance our Pfizer and other chemistry collaborations. The Company reported net income of $1,472,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2004, or $0.05 per share. The net income includes a $1,496,000 reduction in the restructuring reserve associated with a lease commitment in California, such reduction resulting from execution of a sublease. This compares with a net loss of $29,909,000 or $1.22 per share, for the quarter ended September 30, 2003. The net loss in 2003 was primarily the result of a charge taken to write off in-process research and development costs of $30,359,000 associated with the acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
Revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2004 were $40,367,000 compared with revenues of $47,096,000 for the same period of 2003. For the nine months ended September 30, 2004, ArQule reported a net loss of $3,912,000, or $0.14 per share. This compares with a net loss of $29,622,000, or $1.28 per share, for the nine months ended September 30, 2003.
ArQule ended the third quarter of 2004 with approximately $77 million in cash and marketable securities.
Financial Guidance
ArQule is updating financial guidance for the year ended December 31, 2004. Net decrease in cash during 2004 is anticipated to be between $9 and $11 million, an improvement from our previous guidance of between $14 and $16 million, primarily due to improved efficiency and other cost saving initiatives. ArQule's guidance for revenue of between $50 and $52 million remains unchanged. The total cost of revenue is expected to range between $31 and $32 million, down from $34 and $35 million; total research and development expense is expected to range between $21 and $22 million, down from $24 and $25 million; marketing, general and administrative expense is expected to range between $9 and $10 million, which remains unchanged from prior guidance; restructuring accrual adjustments are expected to result in a net gain of $400,000, as opposed to a net charge of $1.1 million as disclosed in our previous guidance; and net investment income is expected to range between $900,000 and $1.1 million, up from a range of $600,000 to $800,000.
 
ArQule/2
ArQule now expects its net loss for 2004 to range from $10 to $11 million, or between $0.35 and $0.38 per share, down from previous guidance of $0.52 to $0.56 per share.
"We are pleased with the financial results, which we feel reflect our commitment to conserve cash, while maintaining a very aggressive research and development program, and meeting all of the requirements of our collaborations," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and Chief Executive Officer.
Research and Development Program Update
Clinical Trials
The ARQ 501 phase 1 monotherapy trial continues to enroll successfully. Recruitment is likely to continue into 2005 as the maximum tolerated dose has not yet been identified. The phase 1b/2 combination trial of ARQ 501 with gemcitabine is anticipated to open at two sites within the United States before the end of the year. The phase 1b dose escalation component will enroll any patients with advanced cancer, including those who have previously received gemcitabine. The Phase 2 component will commence upon identification of the maximum tolerated dose in phase 1b, and will be conducted at sites in both the United States and Europe. Treatment nave patients with advanced metastatic pancreatic cancer will be eligible for the study.
ArQule anticipates that a combination trial involving ARQ 501 and Taxotere will also open by the end of the year. This open label phase 1b dose escalation study will be conducted in the United States and enroll patients with advanced cancer, some of whom may have previously received Taxotere.
Preclinical Programs
ArQule's most advanced preclinical programs, 550RP (second generation E2F program) and 650RP (Cancer Survival Protein Program), are proceeding ahead of internal expectations, having demonstrated anti-tumor activity in animal xenograft models. The newly-announced B-RAF Kinase program, 350RP, is on track and has also demonstrated anti-tumor activity in animal models. The two earliest stage programs, 450RP (undisclosed checkpoint program) and 850RP (p53 pathway), have entered lead identification.
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time. Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and CEO, and Louise A. Mawhinney, Vice President and CFO, will lead the call.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112, and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820. The access code is 863777.
 
ArQule/3
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer and Novartis. For more information, please visit www.ArQule.com.
SM
SM
SM
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: ArQule's financial guidance may be inaccurate due to intrinsic or extrinsic factors; the ACT platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the efforts to achieve synergy between ArQule's chemistry platform and its biological approaches may be unsuccessful; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 4, 2004, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on May 7, 2004 and its Form 10-K filed with the Commission on March 12, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM
SM
 
ArQule/4


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050124163603.txt.gz
TIME:20050124163603
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
(d) Election of Directors. On January 19, 2005, the directors of ArQule, Inc. elected William Messenger to ArQules Board of Directors, effective immediately. He will also serve on the Boards Audit Committee. The press release describing Mr. Messengers professional background and qualifications is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Messenger and any other person associated with ArQule pursuant to which he was selected as a director.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Text of Press Release dated January 20, 2005.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Exhibit 99.1
Dr. Stephen A. Hill, CEO Louise A. Mawhinney, CFO (781) 994-0300
Contacts:
www.ArQule.com
For Immediate Release:
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) is pleased to announce the appointment of Mr. William Messenger to its Board of Directors, effective immediately. Mr. Messenger brings a strong background in business leadership, strategy development and corporate governance. His business experience includes sales and marketing with IBM Corporation, and consultancy at McKinsey & Co. More recently he held senior positions at Advance Metabolic
Woburn, Mass., Jan. 20, 2005
Systems
. He is currently Managing Director of Lexington Sycamore Group, providing strategic consulting services to healthcare organizations, and is Director of the Mockler Center for Faith and Ethics in the Workplace at Gordon-Conwell Theological Seminary in Massachusetts.
Mr. Messenger holds a Bachelors degree in Physics from Case Western Reserve University, an MBA from Harvard Business School, and Masters degree in Divinity from Boston University.
"I am delighted to welcome Will Messenger to our Board of Directors," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and Chief Executive Officer. "His background and interest in strategic leadership, corporate governance and workplace ethics will match ArQule's strong commitment in these areas and will compliment the contribution of our current Board."
"ArQule is an exciting company with excellent people and technologies," said Mr. Messenger. "I am really pleased to have a chance in this role to help the company make a difference in people's lives."
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer and Novartis. For more information, please visit .
SM
SM
SM
www.ArQule.com
ArQule/2
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT
SM
platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT
SM
pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's
Form 10-Q
filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2004, its
Form 10-Q
filed with the Commission on August 4, 2004, its
Form 10-Q
filed with the Commission on May 7, 2004 and its
Form 10-K
filed with the Commission on March 12, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050125172900.txt.gz
TIME:20050125172900
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
Section 8.  Other Events
Item 8.01. Other Events
     On December 23, 2003 the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") declared effective the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-11181) (the "Registration Statement") of ArQule, Inc. (the "Company"), which permits the Company to issue up to an aggregate of $50,000,000 of common stock. The prospectus dated December 23, 2003 included in the Registration Statement (the "Prospectus").
     On January 25, 2005 the Company issued a press release announcing that it had entered into an agreement to sell on an agency basis up to 5,788,095 shares of the Company's common stock at a price of $5.25 per share (the "Shares"). J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. is acting as placement agent in connection with the offering of the Shares. A copy of the press release is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
     The Company filed with the Commission on January 25, 2005 the Prospectus, together with a supplement to the Prospectus, dated January 24, 2005 (the "Prospectus Supplement") relating to the issuance and sale of the Shares. In connection with the filing of the Prospectus and Prospectus Supplement with the Commission and the offering of the Shares, the Company is filing the Placement Agent Agreement relating thereto as part of this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.2. The Company is also filing the form of Subscription Agreement and the Escrow Agreement as Exhibits 99.3 and 99.4 respectively.
Section 9.  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01(c) Exhibits
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: January 25, 2005

 
Exhibit 99.1
Dr. Stephen A. Hill, CEO Louise A. Mawhinney, CFO (781) 994-0300 www.ArQule.com
Contacts:
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that it has entered into subscription agreements for the sale, in a registered direct offering, of shares of its common stock at $5.25 per share. The transaction is expected to provide aggregate gross proceeds of up to $31 million to ArQule. The shares of common stock offered by ArQule in this transaction were registered under the Company's existing shelf registration statement on Form S-3, which was declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 23, 2003. The closing is expected to occur on January 28, 2005.
Woburn, Mass., Jan. 25, 2005
This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any state or jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer and Novartis. For more information, please visit
SM
SM
SM
www.ArQule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. Actual results may differ materially
 
from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACTpipeline may fail or prove disappointing; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2004, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on August 4, 2004, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on May 7, 2004 and its Form 10-K filed with the Commission on March 12, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM
SM

 
Exhibit 99.2
January 24, 2005
J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. 277 Park Avenue, 3 Floor New York, New York 10172
rd
Dear Sir or Madam:
     ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), proposes to sell to certain purchasers (each a "" and, collectively, the ""), pursuant to the terms of this Placement Agent Agreement (this ""), an aggregate of up to 5,788,095 shares of Common Stock, par value $.01 per share (the ""), of the Company. The aggregate of 5,788,095 shares so proposed to be sold is hereinafter referred to as the "." The Company hereby confirms its agreement with J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. ("") as follows (certain terms used herein are defined in Section 13 hereof):
Company
Purchaser
Purchasers
Agreement
Common Stock
Stock
JPMorgan
     1. . On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements of the Company herein contained, and subject to all the terms and conditions of this Agreement:
AGREEMENT TO ACT AS PLACEMENT AGENT; PLACEMENT OF SECURITIES
     (a) The Company hereby authorizes JPMorgan (in such capacity, the "") to act as its exclusive agent to solicit offers for the purchase of all or part of the Stock from the Company in connection with the proposed offering of the Stock (the ""). Prior to the earlier of (i) the date on which this Agreement is terminated and (ii) the Closing Date (as defined in Section 3), the Company shall not, without the prior consent of the Placement Agent, solicit or accept offers to purchase Stock (other than pursuant to the exercise of options or warrants to purchase shares of Common Stock that are outstanding at the date hereof) otherwise than through the Placement Agent.
Placement Agent
Offering
     (b) The Placement Agent agrees, as agent of the Company, to use its best commercially practicable efforts to solicit offers to purchase the Stock from the Company on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Base Prospectus (as defined below) and the Prospectus Supplement (as defined below). The Placement Agent agrees to use its best commercially practicable efforts to assist the Company in obtaining performance by each Purchaser whose offer to purchase Stock has been solicited by the Placement Agent and accepted by the Company, but the Placement Agent shall not, except to facilitate such acceptance by the Company or as otherwise provided in this Agreement, be obligated to disclose the identity of any potential purchaser. The Placement Agent shall not have any liability to the Company in the event any such purchase is not consummated for any reason. Under no circumstances will the Placement Agent be obligated to purchase any Stock for its own account and, in soliciting purchases of Stock, the Placement Agent shall act solely as the Company's agent and not as principal.
 
     (c) Subject to the provisions of this Section 1, offers for the purchase of Stock may be solicited by the Placement Agent as agent for the Company at such times and in such amounts as the Placement Agent deems advisable. The Placement Agent shall communicate to the Company, orally or in writing, each reasonable offer to purchase Stock received by it as agent of the Company. The Company shall have the sole right to accept offers to purchase the Stock and may reject any such offer, in whole or in part. The Placement Agent shall have the right, in its discretion reasonably exercised, without notice to the Company, to reject any offer to purchase Stock received by it, in whole or in part, and any such rejection shall not be deemed a breach of its agreement contained herein.
     (d) Concurrently with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the Company, the Placement Agent and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as escrow agent (the ""), shall enter into an Escrow Agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto (the ""), pursuant to which an escrow account will be established, at the Company's expense, for the benefit of the Company and the Purchasers (the ""). Prior to the Closing Date, each of the Purchasers will deposit in the Escrow Account an amount equal to the price per share for the Stock set forth on the cover page of the Prospectus Supplement multiplied by the number of shares of Stock to be purchased by such Purchaser (the "").
Escrow Agent
Exhibit A
Escrow Agreement
Escrow Account
Escrow Funds
     (e) As compensation for services rendered, on the Closing Date the Company shall pay to the Placement Agent by wire transfer of immediately available funds to an account or accounts designated by the Placement Agent, an amount equal to six percent (6%) of the gross proceeds received by the Company from the sale of the Stock.
     (f) No Stock which the Company has agreed to sell pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed to have been purchased and paid for, or sold by the Company, until such Stock shall have been delivered to the Purchaser thereof against payment by such Purchaser. If the Company shall default in its obligations to deliver Stock to a Purchaser whose offer it has accepted, and from which it has received payment for such Stock, the Company shall indemnify and hold the Placement Agent harmless against any loss, claim or damage arising from or as a result of such default by the Company.
     2. The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, the Placement Agent and the Purchasers that:
REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE COMPANY.
     (a) The Company meets the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ""), and has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") a registration statement on such Form (Registration File No. 333-111181), which became effective as of December 23, 2003, for the registration under the Securities Act of the Stock for the transactions described therein, including the Offering. Such registration statement meets the requirements set forth in Rule 415(a)(1)(x) under the Securities Act and complies in all other material respects with said Rule. The Company will file with the
Securities Act
Commission
 
Commission, pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act, a supplement to the form of prospectus included in such registration statement relating to the Offering and has provided the Placement Agent with a copy of such supplement. Such registration statement, including the exhibits thereto, as amended at the date of this Agreement, is hereinafter called the ";" such prospectus in the form in which it appears in the Registration Statement is hereinafter called the ";" and the supplemented form of prospectus, in the form in which it will be filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated thereunder (the "") (including the Base Prospectus as so supplemented) is hereinafter called the "." Any reference herein to the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein (the "") pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 which were filed under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), on or before the date of this Agreement, or the issue date of the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement, as the case may be; and any reference herein to the terms "," "" or "" with respect to the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement shall be deemed to refer to and include the filing by the Company of any document under the Exchange Act after the date of this Agreement, or the issue date of the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement, as the case may be, on or before the Closing Date (as defined below), incorporated or deemed to be incorporated therein by reference. All references in this Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "," "," "," "" or "" in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement (and all other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement, as the case may be. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or the use of the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement has been issued, and, to the Company's knowledge, no proceeding for any such purpose is pending, has been initiated or is threatened by the Commission.
Registration Statement
Base Prospectus
Rules and Regulations
Prospectus Supplement
Incorporated Documents
Exchange Act
amend
amendment
supplement
contained
included
described
set forth
stated
     (b) The Registration Statement contains all exhibits and schedules required by the Securities Act. The Registration Statement, at the time it became effective, complied in all material respects with the Securities Act and the Exchange Act and the applicable Rules and Regulations and did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading. Each of the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, as of its respective date, complies or will comply, as the case may be, in all material respects with the Securities Act and the Exchange Act and the applicable Rules and Regulations. The Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, taken as a whole, as amended or supplemented, will not contain as of the date of the Prospectus Supplement and the Closing Date, any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The Incorporated Documents, when they were filed with the Commission, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Exchange Act and the applicable rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and none of such documents, when they were filed with the Commission, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the
 
statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Base Prospectus or Prospectus Supplement prior to the consummation of the Offering, when such documents are filed with the Commission, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Exchange Act and the applicable rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, as applicable, and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company makes no representations or warranties in this Section 2(b) with respect to statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with the Placement Agent's Information (as defined in Section 15). No post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement reflecting any facts or events arising after the effective date thereof which represent, individually or in the aggregate, a fundamental change in the information set forth therein is required to be filed with the Commission.
     (c) The Company has not distributed and will not distribute, prior to the completion of the distribution of the Stock, any offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Stock other than the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement or the Registration Statement and copies of the documents incorporated by reference therein.
     (d) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, has full corporate power and corporate authority to own or lease its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement and as now being conducted, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation and in good standing in all jurisdictions in which the character of the property owned or leased or the nature of the business transacted by it makes qualification necessary, except where failure to be so qualified would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the business, properties, financial condition or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiary taken as a whole (a ""). Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement and on to this Agreement, the Company does not own, and at the Closing Date will not own, directly or indirectly, any shares of stock or any other equity or long term debt securities of any corporation or have any equity interest in any firm, partnership, joint venture, association or other entity. ArQule U.K., Ltd., a company organized under the laws of the United Kingdom, is the only subsidiary of the Company, and such subsidiary has conducted no material business operations since April 1, 2004.
Material Adverse Effect
Schedule 2(d)
     (e) The Stock being issued and sold pursuant to the Transaction Documents (as defined in Section 13) has been duly authorized and, when issued and paid for in accordance with the terms of the Transaction Documents, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and free of any preemptive or similar rights (except those that have been waived by the holder thereof) and will conform in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement.
     (f) The Company has an authorized capitalization as set forth in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company have been duly and validly authorized and issued, are fully paid and non-assessable and conform to the description thereof contained in the
 
Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement and, except as set forth in the Registration Statement, Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement and except for options granted under any of the Company's stock option plans described therein, no options, warrants or other rights to purchase, agreements or other obligations to issue, or rights to convert any obligations into or exchange any securities for, shares of capital stock of, or ownership interests in, the Company are outstanding.
     (g) The Company has full corporate power and authority to execute and deliver the Transaction Documents and to consummate the transactions contemplated herein and therein. The Transaction Documents have been duly authorized and validly executed and delivered by the Company and constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable in accordance with their terms, except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting creditors' and contracting parties' rights generally and except as enforceability may be subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law) and except as the indemnification agreements of the Company herein may be legally unenforceable.
     (h) None of the execution and delivery of the Transaction Documents, the issuance and sale of the Stock by the Company hereunder and thereunder, the fulfillment of the terms of the Transaction Documents or the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents, will (i) violate any law, rule, regulation, judgment, injunction, decree, determination, award or order of any court or governmental agency or instrumentality, domestic or foreign, or (ii) conflict with or result in any breach of any of the terms of or constitute a default (with or without the giving of notice or the passage of time or otherwise) under, or result in the termination of or the creation or imposition of any mortgage, lien, security interest or other charge or encumbrance of any nature under the terms of: (A) any material contract or agreement to which the Company is a party or by which the Company or any of the assets and properties of the Company is bound, other than any such conflict, breach or default which would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or (B) the Company's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation (the "") or the Company's Amended and Restated By-laws (the ""). None of the execution and delivery of the Transaction Documents, the issuance and sale of the Stock by the Company hereunder and thereunder, the fulfillment of the terms of the Transaction Documents or the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents requires any consent, approval, order or authorization of, or registration with, or the giving of notice to, any governmental or public body or authority or any other person, except for (i) such notices, consents or approvals which have previously been given or obtained or which will be given or obtained on or before the Closing Date, (ii) notices and filings that may be required under applicable state and federal securities laws that will be undertaken by the Company after the Closing Date and (iii) such notices or filings that would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Certificate of Incorporation
Bylaws
     (i) There is no contract, lease, instrument or other document of a character required by the Securities Act or the Rules and Regulations to be described in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, or to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement, which is not described or filed as required.
 
     (j) All existing minute books of the Company since January 1, 2002, including all existing records of all meetings and actions of the board of directors (including, Audit, Compensation and Corporate Governance Committees) and stockholders of the Company through the date of the latest meeting and action (collectively, the "") are complete and all approved minutes accurately reflect, in all material respects, all transactions referred to in such Corporate Records. There are no material transactions, agreements or other actions that have been consummated by the Company that are not properly approved and/or recorded in the Corporate Records.
Corporate Records
     (k) Except as set forth in or as described in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement, no person or entity has the right to require registration of shares of Common Stock or other securities of the Company because of the filing or effectiveness of the Registration Statement or otherwise, and the Company is not required under the terms and conditions of any existing agreement to which the Company is a party or otherwise bound to file any registration statement for the registration of any securities of any person or register any such securities pursuant to any other registration statement filed by the Company under the Securities Act for a period of at least 90 days after the date hereof.
Schedule 2(k)
     (l) As of the dates specified, the consolidated financial statements of the Company, together with related notes and schedules, included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement complied and will comply in form in all material respects with Regulation S-X promulgated by the Commission with respect thereto. Such financial statements and related notes and schedules have been prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles, consistently applied, during the period involved (except (i) as may be otherwise indicated in such financial statements or the notes thereto, or (ii) in the case of unaudited interim statements, to the extent they may not include footnotes or may be condensed or summary statements) and fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company as of the dates thereof and its results of operations and cash flows for the periods then ended (subject, in the case of unaudited statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments).
     (m) Except as set forth in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement, there is no material legal or governmental proceeding pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, to which the Company is a party or of which the business or property of the Company is subject that is not disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement under the heading "Legal Proceedings." There are no requests for confidential treatment of information currently pending before the Commission. Except as set forth in , there is no investigation, inquiry or proceeding by the Commission of or against the Company currently pending, and, to the Company's knowledge, no such investigation, inquiry or proceeding has been threatened.
Schedule 2(m)
     (n) Except as set forth in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement, the Company has good and marketable title to its properties, free and clear of all material security interests, mortgages, pledges, liens, charges, encumbrances and claims of record. The properties of the Company are, in the aggregate, in good repair (reasonable wear and tear excepted), and suitable for their respective uses. To the Company's knowledge, any real property held under lease by the Company is held under valid, subsisting
 
and enforceable leases with such exceptions as are not material and do not interfere with the conduct of the business of the Company. The Company owns or leases all such properties as are necessary to its business or operations as now conducted.
     (o) The Company is not (i) in violation of its Certificate of Incorporation, Bylaws or other organizational documents, (ii) in violation of any law, administrative regulation, ordinance or order of any court or governmental agency, arbitration panel or authority applicable to the Company, which violation, individually or in the aggregate, would be reasonably likely to have a Material Adverse Effect, or (iii) in default (and there exists no condition which, with or without the passage of time or giving of notice or otherwise, would constitute a default) in the performance of any bond, debenture, note or any other evidence of indebtedness in any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust or any other agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party or by which the Company is bound or by which the property of the Company is bound, which would be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
     (p) The Company has fulfilled its obligations, if any, under the minimum funding standards of Section 302 of the United States Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 ("") and the regulations and published interpretations thereunder with respect to each "" (as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA and such regulations and published interpretations) in which employees of the Company are eligible to participate, and each such Plan is in compliance with the presently applicable provisions of ERISA and such regulations and published interpretations, except for such instances of non-compliance as could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. No "" (as defined in Section 406 of ERISA, or Section 4975 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time (the "")) has occurred with respect to any employee benefit plan which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Except as could not be reasonably expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, Company has not incurred any unpaid liability to the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation (other than for the payment of premiums in the ordinary course) or to any such plan under Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA
Plan
prohibited transaction
Code
     (q) The Company carries, or is covered by, insurance in such amounts and covering such risks as it reasonably believes is adequate for the conduct of its business and the value of its properties.
     (r) The Company owns, possesses or has obtained all licenses, permits, certificates, consents, orders, approvals and other authorizations from, and has made all declarations and filings with, all federal, state, local and other governmental authorities (including foreign regulatory agencies), all self-regulatory organizations and all courts and other tribunals, domestic or foreign, necessary to own or lease, as the case may be, and to operate its properties and to carry on its business as conducted as of the date hereof, except where such failure to do so would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and the Company has not received any notice of any proceeding relating to the revocation or modification of any such license, permit certificate, consent, order, approval or other authorization, except as described in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement, and the Company is in compliance with all laws and regulations relating to the conduct of its business as conducted as of the date hereof, except where such noncompliance would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
     (s) PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, who has certified certain financial statements of the Company and delivered its report with respect to the audited consolidated financial statements and schedules included in the Base Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement or the Registration Statement, or incorporated by reference therein, is an independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations.
     (t) The Company has filed all material tax returns required to be filed, which returns are true and correct in all material respects, and the Company, to its knowledge, is not in default in the payment of any taxes, including penalties and interest, assessments, fees and other charges, shown thereon due or otherwise assessed, other than those being contested in good faith and for which adequate reserves have been provided or those currently payable without interest which were payable pursuant to said returns or any assessments with respect thereto.
     (u) The Company maintains a system of internal accounting controls that the Company reasonably believes are sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability of assets; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.
     (v) Neither the Company nor any of its officers or directors, or to the Company's knowledge, any of their affiliates (as such term is defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act), has taken or will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed or intended to stabilize or manipulate the price of any security of the Company, or which caused or resulted in, or which might in the future reasonably be expected to cause or result in, stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Common Stock.
     (w) The Company (i) is in compliance with any and all applicable foreign, federal, state and local laws and regulations relating to the protection of the environment or hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants (); (ii) has received all permits, licenses or other approvals required of it under applicable Environmental Laws to conduct its business ; and (iii) is in compliance with all terms and conditions of any such permit, license or approval; except where such noncompliance with Environmental Laws, failure to receive require permits, licenses or other approvals or failure to comply with the terms and conditions of such permits, licenses or approvals would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. There are no pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened Environmental Claims (as defined below) against the Company. "" means any and all administrative, regulatory or judicial actions, suits, demands, demand letters, claims, liens, notices of noncompliance or violation, investigations or proceedings relating in any way to any Environmental Law.
"Environmental Laws"
Environmental Claims
 
     (x) The Company has ownership or license or legal right to use all patent, copyright, trade secret, trademark, customer lists, designs, manufacturing or other processes, computer software, systems, data compilation, research results or other proprietary rights used in the business of the Company and material to the Company (collectively, "") other than Intellectual Property generally available on commercial terms from other sources and other than Intellectual Property where lack of ownership, license or right to use could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. All of such patents, registered trademarks and registered copyrights owned by the Company have been duly registered in, filed in or issued by the United States Patent and Trademark Office, the United States Register of Copyrights or the corresponding offices of other jurisdictions and have been maintained and renewed in accordance with all applicable provisions of law and administrative regulations in the United States and all such jurisdictions, except where the failure to do so could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. All material licenses or other material agreements under which (i) the Company is granted rights in Intellectual Property, other than Intellectual Property generally available on commercial terms from other sources, or (ii) the Company has granted rights to others in Intellectual Property owned or licensed by the Company, are, to the knowledge of the Company, in full force and effect and, to the knowledge of the Company, there is no material default by the Company thereunder. The Company believes it has taken all steps required in accordance with sound business practice and business judgment to establish and preserve its ownership of or rights to all material Intellectual Property. To the knowledge of the Company, the present business, activities and products of the Company do not infringe any intellectual property of any other person, except where such infringement could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Except as set forth in or as described in the Base Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement or the Registration Statement, no proceeding charging the Company with infringement of any adversely held Intellectual Property has been filed. To the knowledge of the Company, the Company is not making unauthorized use of any confidential information or trade secrets of any person. Neither the Company nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any of its employees has any agreements or arrangements with any persons other than the Company related to confidential information or trade secrets of such persons other than such agreements that would not materially restrict the Company from conducting its business as currently conducted.
Intellectual Property
Schedule 2(x)
     (y) The Common Stock is registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Exchange Act and is listed on The Nasdaq National Market (the ""), and the Company has taken no action designed to terminate, or reasonably likely to have the effect of terminating, the registration of the Common Stock under the Exchange Act or delisting the Common Stock from the Nasdaq Stock Market. The Company has filed, or promptly following the execution of this Agreement will file, a Notification Form for Listing of Additional Shares with the Nasdaq Stock Market with respect to the Stock.
Nasdaq Stock Market
     (z) Since January 1, 2002, the Company has made all required filings pursuant to the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and all such filings, as may have been amended, complied in all material respects with the Exchange Act and such rules and regulations promulgated hereunder as of the date filed with the Commission.
     (aa) No relationship, direct or indirect, exists between or among the Company on the one hand, and the directors, officers, stockholders, customers or suppliers of the Company on the other hand, which is required by the Securities Act to be described in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement which is not so described.
 
     (bb) The Company is not an "" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
investment company
     (cc) The Company is not a party to any contract, agreement or understanding with any person that would give rise to a valid claim against the Company or the Placement Agent for a brokerage commission, finder's fee or like payment in connection with the offering and sale of the Stock.
     (dd) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement (excluding, for purposes of this paragraph, any exhibits thereto), since September 30, 2004 there has not been (i) any Material Adverse Effect, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, (ii) any obligation, direct or contingent, that is material to the Company, incurred by the Company, except obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, (iii) any dividend or distribution of any kind declared, paid or made on the capital stock of the Company, or (iv) any loss or damage (whether or not insured) to the physical property of the Company which has been sustained which has had a Material Adverse Effect.
     Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company and delivered to the Placement Agent or counsel for the Placement Agent in connection with the offering of the Stock shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company, as to the matters covered thereby, to the Placement Agent and the Purchasers.
     3. . The time and date of closing and delivery of the documents required to be delivered to the Placement Agent pursuant to Section 6 hereof shall be at 10:00 A.M., New York time, on January 28, 2005 (the "") at the offices of Dechert LLP, at 4000 Bell Atlantic Tower, 1717 Arch Street, Philadelphia, PA 19013. At the Closing, the Escrow Agent will disburse the Escrow Funds from the Escrow Account to the Company as provided in the Escrow Agreement and the Company shall deliver the shares of Stock to the Purchasers who have deposited in the Escrow Account an amount equal to the price per share for the Stock, which delivery may be made through the facilities of the Depository Trust Company.
THE CLOSING
Closing Date
     4. . The Company agrees with the Placement Agent:
FURTHER AGREEMENTS OF THE COMPANY
     (a) (i) To make no further amendment or supplement prior to the Closing Date to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus Supplement, which shall be reasonably disapproved by the Placement Agent in good faith promptly after reasonable notice thereof; (ii) for so long as the delivery of a prospectus is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Stock, to advise the Placement Agent promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the time when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective or any supplement to the Prospectus Supplement or any amended Prospectus Supplement has been filed and to furnish the Placement Agent with copies thereof; (iii) to use its best commercially practicable efforts to file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or
 
information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 15 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act subsequent to the date of the Prospectus Supplement and for so long as the delivery of a prospectus is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Stock; (iv) to advise the Placement Agent, promptly after it receives notices thereof, for so long as the delivery of a prospectus is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Stock, (x) of any request by the Commission to amend the Registration Statement or to amend or supplement the Prospectus Supplement or for additional information relating thereto and (y) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto or any order directed at any Incorporated Document or any amendment or supplement thereto or any order preventing or suspending the use of the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement or any amendment or supplement thereto, of the suspension of the qualification of the Stock for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, of the institution or threatening of any proceeding for any such purpose, or of any request by the Commission for the amending or supplementing of the Registration Statement or Prospectus Supplement or for additional information relating thereto; and, (v) in the event of the issuance of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Base Prospectus or Prospectus Supplement or suspending any such qualification, promptly to use its best commercially practicable efforts to obtain the withdrawal of such order.
     (b) To comply with the Securities Act and the Exchange Act, and the rules and regulations thereunder, so as to permit the completion of the distribution of the Stock as contemplated in the Transaction Documents and the Prospectus Supplement. If during the period in which a prospectus is required by law to be delivered by the Placement Agent or a dealer in connection with the distribution of Stock contemplated by the Prospectus Supplement, any event shall occur as a result of which, in the judgment of the Company or in the reasonable opinion of the Placement Agent or counsel for the Placement Agent, it becomes necessary to amend or supplement the Prospectus Supplement in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing at the time the Prospectus Supplement is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading, or, if it is necessary at any time to amend or supplement the Prospectus Supplement to comply with any law, the Company promptly will prepare and file with the Commission, and furnish at its own expense to the Placement Agent and to such dealers, an appropriate amendment to the Registration Statement or supplement to the Prospectus Supplement so that the Prospectus Supplement as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances when it is so delivered, be misleading, or so that the Prospectus Supplement will comply with such law. Before amending the Registration Statement or supplementing the Base Prospectus in connection with the Offering, the Company will furnish the Placement Agent with a copy of such proposed amendment or supplement and will not file such amendment or supplement to which the Placement Agent reasonably objects.
     (c) To deliver promptly to the Placement Agent such number of the following documents as the Placement Agent shall reasonably request: (i) the Base Prospectus; (ii) the Prospectus Supplement (not later than 10:00 A.M., New York time, on the second Business Day following the execution and delivery of this Agreement) and any amendment or supplement thereto (not later than 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on the Business Day following the date of such amendment or supplement); and (iii) any document incorporated by reference in the Base Prospectus or Prospectus Supplement. The Company will pay the expenses of printing or other production of all documents relating to the Offering.
 
     (d) To make generally available to its stockholders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than eighteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Securities Act), an earnings statement of the Company (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations (including, at the option of the Company, Rule 158).
     (e) To pay the fee, if any, of the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. ("") in connection with its review of the Offering.
NASD
     (f) Not to directly or indirectly offer, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, contract to sell, or otherwise dispose of any shares of Common Stock or securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock for a period of 90 days from the date of the Prospectus Supplement without the prior written consent of the Placement Agent other than (i) the Company's sale of the Stock hereunder, (ii) the issuance of shares or options to purchase shares pursuant to qualified stock option plans and currently outstanding options, warrants or rights, (iii) securities issued to a collaborative partner of the Company solely in connection with a corporate partnering transaction; , , that before issuing any shares to a collaborative partner, the Company shall obtain from such collaborative partner an agreement to be bound by a letter substantially in the form of , pursuant to which such collaborative partner shall agree not to directly or indirectly offer, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, contract to sell, or otherwise dispose of any shares of Common Stock or securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock for a period of 90 days from the date of the Prospectus Supplement, without the prior written consent of the Placement Agent; or (iv) in connection with a Sale of the Company. The Company will cause each of its executive officers and directors listed on hereto to furnish to the Placement Agent, prior to the Closing Date, a letter, substantially in the form of hereto, pursuant to which each such person shall agree not to directly or indirectly offer, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, contract to sell, or otherwise dispose of any shares of Common Stock or securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock for a period of 90 days from the date of the Prospectus Supplement, without the prior written consent of the Placement Agent, other than the exercise of currently outstanding options or in connection with a Sale of the Company.
provided
however
Exhibit C
Exhibit B
Exhibit C
     (g) Prior to the Closing Date, to furnish to the Placement Agent, as soon as they have been prepared (if at all), copies of any unaudited interim consolidated financial statements of the Company for any periods subsequent to the periods covered by the financial statements appearing or incorporated by reference in the Base Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement or the Registration Statement.
     (h) Prior to the Closing Date, not to issue any press release or other communication directly or indirectly or hold any press conference with respect to the Company, its condition, financial or otherwise, or earnings, business affairs or business prospects (except for communications in the ordinary course of business and consistent with the past practices of the Company and of which the Placement Agent is notified), without the prior written consent of the Placement Agent, unless in the judgment of the Company and its counsel, and after notification to the Placement Agent, such press release or communication is required by law.
 
     (i) Between the date hereof and the Closing Date, to promptly disclose to the Placement Agent in writing any information that gives the Company any reason to believe that any of the conditions set forth in Section 6 will not be satisfied as of the Closing Date.
     (j) To apply the net proceeds received by the Company from the sale of the Stock pursuant to this Agreement in the manner specified in the Prospectus Supplement under the heading "".
Use of Proceeds
     (k) To maintain, at its expense, a registrar and transfer agent for the Stock.
     (l) To supply the Placement Agent with copies of all correspondence to and from, and all documents issued to and by, the Commission in connection with the registration of the Stock under the Securities Act.
     (m) To take from time to time such reasonable actions as required to permit the Stock to continue to be listed and authorized for trading on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
     (n) To furnish to the Placement Agent such further information, certificates and documents as the Placement Agent may reasonably request.
     5. . The Company agrees with the Placement Agent to pay (a) the costs incident to the authorization, issuance, sale, preparation and delivery of the Stock to the Purchasers and any taxes payable in that connection; (b) the costs incident to the Registration of the Stock under the Securities Act; (c) the costs incident to the preparation, printing and distribution of the Registration Statement, Base Prospectus and Prospectus Supplement and any amendments and exhibits thereto or any document incorporated by reference therein, and the costs of printing, reproducing and distributing, the Transaction Documents by mail, telex or other means of communication; (d) the fees and expenses incurred in connection with filings, if any, made with the NASD; (e) any applicable listing or other fees; (f) all fees and expenses of the registrar and transfer agent of the Stock; (g) the fees and expenses of the Escrow Agent incurred pursuant to the Escrow Agreement; and (h) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of the obligations of the Company under the Transaction Documents (including, without limitation, the fees and expenses of the Company's counsel and the Company's independent accountants). The Company further agrees with the Placement Agent to pay the costs and expenses of the Placement Agent to the extent set forth in the engagement letter, dated December 22, 2004, by and between the Placement Agent and the Company (the "").
PAYMENT OF EXPENSES
Engagement Letter
     6.  The obligations of the Placement Agent and the closing of the sale of the Stock hereunder are subject to the accuracy, when made and on the Closing Date, of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company contained herein, to the accuracy of the statements of the Company made in any certificates pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company in all material respects to the extent not otherwise qualified by materiality, and in all respects to the extent qualified by materiality, of their obligations hereunder, and to each of the following additional terms and conditions:
CONDITIONS TO THE OBLIGATIONS OF THE PLACEMENT AGENT AND THE SALE OF THE STOCK
.
 
     (a) No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been initiated or threatened by the Commission, and any request for additional information on the part of the Commission (to be included in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement or otherwise) shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of the Placement Agent. Any filings required to be made by the Company in accordance with Section 4(a) shall have been timely filed with the Commission.
     (b) The Placement Agent shall not have discovered and disclosed to the Company on or prior to the Closing Date that the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement or any amendment or supplement thereto contains an untrue statement of a fact which, in the opinion of counsel for the Placement Agent (after consultation with Company and its counsel), is material or omits to state any fact which, in the opinion of such counsel, is material and is required to be stated therein or is necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
     (c) All corporate proceedings and other legal matters incident to the authorization, form and validity of each of the Transaction Documents, the Stock, the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement and all other legal matters relating to the Transaction Documents and the transactions contemplated hereby shall be reasonably satisfactory in all material respects to counsel for the Placement Agent, and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel all documents and information that they may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters.
     (d) Arnold & Porter LLP shall have furnished to the Placement Agent, such counsel's written opinion, as counsel for the Company, addressed to the Placement Agent and the Purchasers and dated the Closing Date in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Placement Agent, to the effect that, subject to customary qualifications and assumptions:
          (i) the Company is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the state of Delaware, is duly qualified to do business and is in good standing as a foreign corporation in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and has all corporate authority necessary to own or hold its properties and to conduct the business in which it is engaged as described in the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, except where the failure to so qualify or have such authority, singularly or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
          (ii) the Company has the authorized capitalization as set forth in the Base Prospectus as supplemented by the Prospectus Supplement, and the Stock when issued and delivered to and paid for by the purchasers thereof as contemplated by this Agreement, will be duly and validly authorized and issued, fully paid and non-assessable and will conform in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Base Prospectus as supplemented by the Prospectus Supplement;
          (iii) there are no preemptive or other rights to subscribe for or to purchase, nor any restriction upon the voting or transfer of, any shares of the Stock pursuant to the Company's
 
Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws or any material agreement or other instrument known to such counsel;
          (iv) the Transaction Documents have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
          (v) the execution, delivery and performance of the Transaction Documents by the Company and the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby will not result in any violation of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws of the Company or, to the knowledge of such counsel, any judgment, order or decree of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties or assets;
          (vi) the Registration Statement was declared effective under the Securities Act as of the date and time specified in such opinion, the Prospectus Supplement was filed with the Commission pursuant to the subparagraph of Rule 424(b) of the Rules and Regulations specified in such opinion on the date specified therein and, to the knowledge of such counsel, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued and, to the knowledge of such counsel, no proceeding for that purpose is pending or threatened by the Commission;
          (vii) except for the registration of the Stock under the Securities Act and such consents, approvals, authorizations, registrations or qualifications as may be required under applicable state securities laws in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Stock, no consent, approval, authorization or order of, or filing or registration with, any court, governmental agency or governmental body is required for the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by the Company and the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby;
          (viii) except as set forth in , to such counsel's knowledge, no person or entity has the right to require registration of shares of Common Stock of the Company because of the completion of the Offering, except for persons and entities who have expressly waived such right or who have been given proper notice and have failed to exercise such right within the time or times required under the terms and conditions of such right;
Schedule 2(k)
     In addition, such counsel shall state that it has participated, in the course of serving as special counsel to the Company in connection with the preparation of the Registration Statement and Prospectus Supplement, in discussions with representatives of the Company, the Placement Agent, and the Placement Agent's counsel during which the contents of drafts of the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement were discussed. Such counsel also shall state that, although it has made no independent investigation or verification of the correctness and completeness of the information included in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus Supplement, nothing has come to its attention that has caused it to believe that either the Registration Statement or any amendments thereto, at the time the Registration Statement or any such amendments became effective, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the
 
statements therein not misleading or that the Prospectus Supplement, as of the Closing, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (it being understood that such counsel need express no belief as to the financial statements, including the notes and schedules thereto, or any other financial or statistical information, or the information regarding the Placement Agent or the method of distribution of the Stock included in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus Supplement).
     (e) The Company shall have furnished to the Placement Agent and the Purchasers a certificate, dated the Closing Date, executed by its President and Chief Executive Officer and its Chief Financial Officer stating that (i) such officers have examined the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement and, in their opinion, the Registration Statement as of its effective date and the Prospectus Supplement (taken together with the Base Prospectus), as of the date of the Prospectus Supplement and the date of such certificate, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact and did not omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading (in the case of the Prospectus Supplement, taken together with the Base Prospectus, in light of the circumstances in which such statements were made), (ii) since the effective date of the Registration Statement no event has occurred which should have been set forth in a supplement or amendment to the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement and which has not been so set forth, (iii) as of the Closing Date, the representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement are true and correct and the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to the Closing Date, and (iv) subsequent to the date of the most recent financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, there has been no material adverse change in the financial position or results of operation of the Company, or any change, or any development including a prospective change, in or affecting the condition (financial or otherwise), results of operations, business or prospects of the Company, except as set forth in the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement.
     (f) At the time of the execution of this Agreement, the Placement Agent shall have received from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP a draft of a letter, addressed to the Placement Agent and the Company and dated such date, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Placement Agent and PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP (i) confirming that it is an independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations and (ii) stating the conclusions and findings of such firm with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained or incorporated by reference into the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement (the "").
Comfort Letter
     (g) On the Closing Date, the Placement Agent shall have received the Comfort Letter duly executed by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP addressed to the Placement Agent and the Company and dated the Closing Date.
     (h) Since the date of the latest audited financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, there has been no event,
 
development or occurrence which has had or that would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, the effect of which is, in the judgment of the Placement Agent, so material and adverse as to make it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the sale or delivery of the Stock on the terms and in the manner contemplated by the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement.
     (i) The Stock shall have been listed and authorized for trading on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
     (j) At the time of execution of this Agreement, the Company shall have furnished to the Placement Agent a letter substantially in the form of hereto from each executive officer and director of the Company listed on hereto.
Exhibit C
Exhibit B
     (k) Subsequent to the execution and delivery of this Agreement, there shall not have occurred any of the following: (i) trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange, the Nasdaq Stock Market or the American Stock Exchange or in the over-the-counter market, or trading in any securities of the Company on any exchange or in the over-the-counter market, shall have been suspended or minimum or maximum prices or maximum ranges for prices shall have been established on any such exchange or such market by the Commission, by such exchange or by any other regulatory body or governmental authority having jurisdiction, (ii) a banking moratorium shall have been declared by Federal or state authorities or a material disruption has occurred in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States, (iii) there shall have been a declaration of a national emergency or a declaration of war by the United States or (iv) there shall have occurred such a material adverse change in general economic, political or financial conditions (or the effect of international conditions on the financial markets in the United States shall be such) as to make it, in the sole judgment of the Placement Agent, impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the sale or delivery of the Stock on the terms and in the manner contemplated by the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement.
     (l) No action shall have been taken and no statute, rule, regulation or order shall have been enacted, adopted or issued by any governmental agency or body which would, as of the Closing Date, prevent the issuance or sale of the Stock; and no injunction, restraining order or order of any other nature by any federal or state court of competent jurisdiction shall have been issued as of the Closing Date which would prevent the issuance or sale of the Stock.
     (m) The Company shall have prepared and filed with the Commission a Current Report on Form 8-K with respect to the Offering, including as an exhibit thereto this Agreement and any other documents relating thereto.
     (n) The Company shall have entered into the Escrow Agreement with the Placement Agent and the Escrow Agent and such agreement shall be in full force and effect.
     (o) Prior to the Closing Date, the Company shall have furnished to the Placement Agent such further information, certificates and documents as the Placement Agent may reasonably request.
 
     All opinions, letters, evidence and certificates mentioned above or elsewhere in this Agreement shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to counsel for the Placement Agent.
     7. 
Indemnification and Contribution.
     (a) The Company shall indemnify and hold harmless the Placement Agent, its affiliates, directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls the Placement Agent within the meaning of either Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act (collectively the "" and each a "") against any loss, claim, damage or liability, joint or several, or any action in respect thereof, to which that Placement Agent Indemnified Party may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such loss, claim, damage, liability or action arises out of or is based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Base Prospectus, the Registration Statement or the Prospectus Supplement or in any amendment or supplement thereto or (ii) the omission or alleged omission to state in the Base Prospectus, the Registration Statement or the Prospectus Supplement or in any amendment or supplement thereto a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and shall reimburse the Placement Agent Indemnified Party promptly upon demand for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by that Placement Agent Indemnified Party in connection with investigating or preparing to defend or defending against or appearing as a third party witness in connection with any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action as such expenses are incurred; , , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement in or omission or alleged omission from the Base Prospectus, the Registration Statement or the Prospectus Supplement or any such amendment or supplement in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company through the Placement Agent specifically for use therein, which information the parties hereto agree is limited to the Placement Agent's Information (as defined in Section 15). This indemnity agreement is not exclusive and will be in addition to any liability, which the Company might otherwise have and shall not limit any rights or remedies which may otherwise be available at law or in equity to the Placement Agent Indemnified Party.
Placement Agent Indemnified Parties
Placement Agent Indemnified Party
provided
however
     (b) The Placement Agent shall indemnify and hold harmless the Company, its officers, employees, representatives and agents, each of its directors and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act (collectively the "" and each a "") against any loss, claim, damage or liability, joint or several, or any action in respect thereof, to which the Company Indemnified Parties may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such loss, claim, damage, liability or action arises out of or is based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Base Prospectus, the Registration Statement or the Prospectus Supplement or in any amendment or supplement thereto, or (ii) the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, but with respect to each of clause (i) and this clause (ii) only to the extent that the untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information concerning the Placement Agent furnished to the Company by the Placement Agent
Company Indemnified Parties
Company Indemnified Party
 
specifically for use therein, and shall reimburse the Company Indemnified Parties promptly upon demand for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such parties in connection with investigating or preparing to defend or defending against or appearing as third party witness in connection with any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action as such expenses are incurred. This indemnity agreement is not exclusive and will be in addition to any liability, which the Placement Agent and the Purchasers might otherwise have and shall not limit any rights or remedies which may otherwise be available at law or in equity to the Company Indemnified Parties. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7(b), in no event shall any indemnity under this Section 7(b) with respect to the Placement Agent exceed the total compensation received by the Placement Agent in accordance with Section 1(f).
     (c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section 7 of notice of any claim or the commencement of any action, the indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under this Section 7, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the claim or the commencement of that action; , , that the failure to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have under this Section 7 except to the extent it has been materially prejudiced by such failure; and, , , that the failure to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have to an indemnified party otherwise than under this Section 7. If any such claim or action shall be brought against an indemnified party, and it shall notify the indemnifying party thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it wishes, jointly with any other similarly notified indemnifying party, to assume the defense thereof with counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party. After notice from the indemnifying party to the indemnified party of its election to assume the defense of such claim or action, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to the indemnified party under this Section 7 for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by the indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation; , , that any indemnified party shall have the right to employ separate counsel in any such action and to participate in the defense thereof but the fees and expenses of such counsel shall be at the expense of such indemnified party unless (i) the employment thereof has been specifically authorized by the indemnifying party in writing, (ii) such indemnified party shall have been advised by such counsel that there may be one or more legal defenses available to it which are different from or additional to those available to the indemnifying party and in the reasonable judgment of such counsel it is advisable for such indemnified party to employ separate counsel or (iii) the indemnifying party has failed to assume the defense of such action in a reasonably prompt manner and employ counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party, in which case, if such indemnified party notifies the indemnifying party in writing that it elects to employ separate counsel at the expense of the indemnifying party, the indemnifying party shall not have the right to assume the defense of such action on behalf of such indemnified party. It is understood, however, that the indemnifying party shall not, in connection with any one such action or separate but substantially similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances, be liable for the reasonable fees and expenses of more than one separate firm of attorneys at any time for all such indemnified parties, which firm shall be designated in writing by the Placement Agent, if the indemnified parties under this Section 7 consist of any Placement Agent Indemnified Party, or by the Company if the indemnified parties under this Section 7 consist of any Company Indemnified Parties. Each indemnified party, as a condition of the
provided
however
provided
further
provided
however
 
indemnity agreements contained in Sections 7(a) and 7(b) shall use all reasonable efforts to cooperate with the indemnifying party in the defense of any such action or claim. Subject to the provisions of Section 7(d) below, no indemnifying party shall be liable for any settlement, compromise or the consent to the entry of judgment in connection with any such action effected without its written consent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld), but if settled with its written consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff in any such action other than a judgment entered with the consent of such indemnified party, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify and hold harmless any indemnified party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment.
     (d) If at any time an indemnified party shall have requested that an indemnifying party reimburse the indemnified party for reasonable fees and actual out-of-pocket expenses of counsel, such indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of the nature contemplated by this Section 7 effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 60 days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the request for reimbursement, (ii) such indemnifying party shall have received notice of the terms of such settlement at least 30 days prior to such settlement being entered into and (iii) such indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed such indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement.
     (e) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 7 is unavailable or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under Section 7(a) or 7(b), then each indemnifying party shall, in lieu of indemnifying such indemnified party, contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such loss, claim, damage or liability, or action in respect thereof, (i) in such proportion as shall be appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Placement Agent on the other from the offering of the Stock or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Placement Agent on the other with respect to the statements or omissions which resulted in such loss, claim, damage or liability, or action in respect thereof, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Placement Agent on the other with respect to such offering shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from the offering of the Stock purchased under this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company bears to the total compensation received by the Placement Agent with respect to the Stock purchased under this Agreement. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company on the one hand or the Placement Agent on the other, the intent of the parties and their relative knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such untrue statement or omission; that the parties hereto agree that the written information furnished to the Company by the Placement Agent for use in the Prospectus Supplement consists solely of the Placement Agent's Information. The Company and the Placement Agent agree that it would not be just and equitable if contributions pursuant to this Section 7(e) were to be determined by pro rata allocation or by any other method of allocation which does not take into account the equitable considerations referred to herein. The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the loss, claim, damage or liability, or
provided
 
action in respect thereof, referred to above in this Section 7(e) shall be deemed to include, for purposes of this Section 7(e), any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7(e), the Placement Agent shall not be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Stock was offered and sold to the public less the amount of any damages which the Placement Agent has otherwise paid or become liable to pay by reason of any untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
     8. This Agreement may be terminated by the Placement Agent in its absolute discretion by notice given to the Company if, at any time after the execution and delivery of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date: (a) in the judgment of the Placement Agent there shall have occurred any Material Adverse Effect; or (b) any of the events described in Sections 6(h) or 6(k) have occurred, and such event singly or together with any other event, makes it, in the Placement Agent's judgment, impracticable or inadvisable to market the Stock or otherwise proceed with the sale of the Stock in the manner and on the terms contemplated in the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement. This Agreement may be terminated by the Placement Agent or the Company if, at any time after the execution and delivery of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date, either party delivers to the other ten days' prior written notice that it desires to terminate this Agreement. Any termination pursuant to this Section 8 shall be without liability on the part of any party hereto to any other party except that the provisions of Sections 5, 7 and 9 shall at all times be effective and shall survive such termination.
TERMINATION.
     9. The Placement Agent will not use confidential information obtained from the Company pursuant to this Agreement or its other relationships with the Company other than in connection with the performance by the Placement Agent of its services hereunder. The Placement Agent will not furnish any such confidential information to other companies or other third parties. The Company also acknowledges that Placement Agent has no obligation to use in connection with this Agreement, or to furnish to the Company, confidential information obtained from other companies.
CONFIDENTIALITY.
     10. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Placement Agent, the Company and their respective successors. Nothing expressed or mentioned in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any person other than the persons mentioned in the preceding sentence any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement, or any provisions herein contained, this Agreement and all conditions and provisions hereof being intended to be and being for the sole and exclusive benefit of such persons and for the benefit of no other person; except that the representations, warranties, covenants, agreements and indemnities of the Company contained in this Agreement shall also be for the benefit of the Placement Agent Indemnified Parties, and the indemnities of the Placement Agent shall also be for the benefit of the Company Indemnified Parties. It is understood that the Placement Agent's responsibility to the Company is solely contractual in nature and the Placement Agent do not owe the Company, or any other party, any fiduciary duty as a result of this Agreement.
SUCCESSORS; PERSONS ENTITLED TO BENEFIT OF AGREEMENT.
 
     11. The respective indemnities, covenants, agreements, representations and warranties of the Company and the Placement Agent as set forth in this Agreement or made by them, respectively, pursuant to this Agreement, shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of the Placement Agent, the Company or any person controlling any of them and shall survive delivery of and payment for the Stock.
SURVIVAL OF INDEMNITIES, REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES, ETC.
     12. All statements, requests, notices and agreements hereunder shall be in writing, and:
NOTICES.
     (a) if to the Placement Agent, shall be delivered or sent by mail, telex or facsimile transmission to J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., 277 Park Avenue, 11 Floor, New York, NY 10172, Attention: Robert Vincent, Esq. (facsimile: (212) 270-7487), with a copy to Dechert LLP, 4000 Bell Atlantic Tower, 1717 Arch Street, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania 19103, Attention: James A. Lebovitz, Esq. (facsimile: (215) 994-2222); and
th
     (b) if to the Company, shall be delivered or sent by mail, telex or facsimile transmission to ArQule, Inc., 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, Attention: Stephen A. Hill (facsimile: (781) 503-0009), with copies to (i) ArQule, Inc., 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, Attention: General Counsel (facsimile: (781) 994-0587), and (ii) Arnold & Porter LLP, 555 Twelfth Street, NW, Washington, DC 20004, Attention: Richard E. Baltz, Esq. (facsimile: (202) 942-5999).
     13. The terms which follow, when used in this Agreement, shall have the meanings indicated.
DEFINITIONS OF CERTAIN TERMS.
     "" shall mean any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday, a legal holiday, a day on which banking institutions or trust companies are authorized or obligated by law to close in New York City or any day on which the Nasdaq Stock Market is not open for trading.
Business Day
     "" shall have the meaning set forth in 35 U.S.C.  135.
Interference Proceeding
     "" shall mean any transaction or series of related transactions involving: (a) any merger, consolidation or other similar transaction (i) in which a person or "group" (as defined in the Exchange Act and the rules promulgated thereunder) of persons acquires beneficial or record ownership of securities representing more than 50% of the outstanding Common Stock of the Company or (ii) in which the Company issues securities representing more than 50% of the outstanding Common Stock of the Company; or (b) any sale or disposition of more than 50% of the assets of the Company.
Sale of the Company
     "" or "" shall mean to the actual knowledge of any of the persons holding the following executive offices of the Company: President and Chief Executive Officer; Vice President and Chief Financial Officer; and Vice President and General Counsel.
to the knowledge of the Company
to the Company's knowledge
 
     "" shall mean this Agreement and the Escrow Agreement.
Transaction Documents
     14. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without giving effect to the conflicts of laws principles thereof. The Company and the Placement Agent irrevocably submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Federal and State courts in Manhattan, New York with respect to any action, proceeding, claim or counterclaim brought by or on behalf of any party related to or arising out of this Agreement or the performance of services hereunder and agree to waive trial by jury in any such action, proceeding, claim or counterclaim.
GOVERNING LAW; VENUE
.
     15. . The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that, for all purposes of this Agreement, the only written information furnished by the Placement Agent consists solely of the following statement concerning the Placement Agent contained in the first paragraph under the heading "Plan of Distribution" in the Prospectus Supplement: "Pursuant to the placement agent agreement, J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. has agreed to act as placement agent in connection with the offering."
PLACEMENT AGENT'S INFORMATION
     16. . The invalidity or unenforceability of any Section, paragraph or provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other Section, paragraph or provision hereof. If any Section, paragraph or provision of this Agreement is for any reason determined to be invalid or unenforceable, there shall be deemed to be made such minor changes (and only such minor changes) as are necessary to make it valid and enforceable.
P
ARTIAL UNENFORCEABILITY
     17. . This Agreement, the Engagement Letter and the Escrow Agreement together constitute the entire agreement of the parties to this Agreement and supersede all prior written or oral and all contemporaneous oral agreements, understandings and negotiations with respect to the subject matter hereof. In this Agreement, the masculine, feminine and neuter genders and the singular and the plural include one another. The section headings in this Agreement are for the convenience of the parties only and will not affect the construction or interpretation of this Agreement. This Agreement may be amended or modified, and the observance of any term of this Agreement may be waived, only by a writing signed by the Company and the Placement Agent.
GENERAL
     18. . This Agreement may be signed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument.
COUNTERPARTS
 
     If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of the agreement between the Company and the Placement Agent, kindly indicate your acceptance in the space provided for that purpose below.
Accepted as of the date first above written:
J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES INC.

 
Exhibit 99.3
ArQule, Inc. 19 Presidential Way Woburn, Massachusetts 01801
The undersigned (the "") hereby confirms its agreement with you as follows:
Investor
This Subscription Agreement (this "") is made as of the date set forth below between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), and the Investor.
1.
Agreement
Company
The Company has authorized the sale and issuance to certain investors of up to 5,788,095 shares (the "") of its Common Stock, par value $.01 per share (the ""), for a purchase price of $5.25 per share (the "").
2.
Shares
Common Stock
Purchase Price
The offering and sale of the Shares (the "") are being made pursuant to an effective Registration Statement on Form S-3 (including the Prospectus contained therein (the ""), the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ""). Promptly following the consummation of the sale of the Shares pursuant to the Offering, the Company will file a Prospectus Supplement (the "") with the Commission containing certain supplemental information regarding the Shares and terms of the Offering.
3.
Offering
Base Prospectus
Registration Statement
Commission
Prospectus Supplement
The Company and the Investor agree that the Investor will purchase from the Company, and the Company will issue and sell to the Investor, the Shares set forth below for the aggregate purchase price set forth below. The Shares shall be purchased pursuant to the Terms and Conditions for Purchase of Shares attached hereto as and incorporated herein by this reference as if fully set forth herein. Unless otherwise requested by the Investor and agreed to by the Company, the Shares purchased by the Investor will be delivered by electronic book-entry, registered in the Investor's name and address as set forth below and will be released by American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, the Company's transfer agent (the ""), to the Investor at the Closing (as defined in the Terms and Conditions for Purchase of Shares).
4.
Annex I
Transfer Agent
The Investor represents that, except as set forth below, (a) it has had no position, office or other material relationship within the past three years with the Company or its affiliates and (b) it has no direct or indirect affiliation or association with any NASD member. Exceptions:
5.
 
Number of Shares: _________________
Aggregate Purchase Price: $___________
     Please confirm that the foregoing correctly sets forth the agreement between us by signing in the space provided below for that purpose.
Agreed and Accepted this ___day of January, 2005:
ARQULE, INC.
 
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company has authorized the sale of the Shares.
1. Authorization and Sale of the Shares.
2. Agreement to Sell and Purchase the Shares; Placement Agent.
     At the Closing (as defined in ), the Company will sell to the Investor, and the Investor will purchase from the Company, upon the terms and conditions hereinafter set forth, the number of Shares set forth on the signature page to which these Terms and Conditions for Purchase of Shares are attached as (the "") for the aggregate purchase price therefor set forth on the Signature Page.
2.1. Purchase and Sale.
Section 3.1
Annex I
Signature Page
     The Company proposes to enter into this same form of Subscription Agreement with certain other investors (the "") and expects to complete sales of Shares to them. The Investor and the Other Investors are hereinafter sometimes collectively referred to as the "," and this Agreement and the Subscription Agreements executed by the Other Investors are hereinafter sometimes collectively referred to as the "."
2.2. Other Investors.
Other Investors
Investors
Agreements
     Investor acknowledges that the Company intends to pay J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. (the "") fees (the "") in respect of the sale of Shares to the Investors.
2.3. Placement Agent.
Placement Agent
Placement Fees
     The Company has entered into a Placement Agent Agreement (the "") with the Placement Agent that contains certain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements of the Company. A copy of the Placement Agent Agreement is available upon request.
2.4. Placement Agent Agreement.
Placement Agent Agreement
3. Closings and Delivery of the Shares and Funds.
     The completion of the purchase and sale of the Shares (the "") will occur at a place and time (the "") to be specified by the Company and the Placement Agent, and of which the Investors will be notified in advance by the Placement Agent. At the Closing, (a) the Company will cause the Transfer Agent to deliver to the Investor the number of Shares set forth on the signature page hereto registered in the name of the Investor or, if so indicated on the Stock Certificate Questionnaire attached hereto as , in the name of a nominee designated by the Investor and (b) the aggregate purchase price for the Shares being purchased by the Investor will be delivered by or on behalf of the Investors to the Escrow Agent (as defined in Section 3.3 hereof) for the benefit of the Company.
3.1. Closing.
Closing
Closing Date
Exhibit A
     
3.2. Closing Conditions.
     The Company's obligation to issue the Shares to the Investor will be subject to the accuracy as of the Closing Date of the representations and warranties made by the Investor and the fulfillment of those undertakings of the Investor to be fulfilled at or prior to the applicable Closing Date.
(a) Conditions to the Company's Obligations.
 
     The Investor's obligation to purchase the Shares will be subject to the fulfillment of those undertakings of the Company to be fulfilled at or prior to the applicable Closing Date contained in the Placement Agent Agreement (collectively, the ""), or the waiver thereof by the Placement Agent. The Investor's obligations are expressly not conditioned on the purchase by any or all of the other Investors of the Shares that they have agreed to purchase from the Company, and the Investor acknowledges that the Company may sell less than all of the Shares in the Offering.
(b) Conditions to the Investor's Obligations.
Company Closing Conditions
     Promptly after the execution of this Agreement by the Investor and the Company, the Investor shall remit by wire transfer the amount of funds equal to the aggregate purchase price for the Shares being purchased by the Investor to the following account designated by the Company and the Placement Agent pursuant to the terms of that certain Escrow Agreement (the "") dated as of January ___, 2005, by and among the Company, the Placement Agent and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (the ""):
3.3. Delivery of Funds.
Escrow Agreement
Escrow Agent
Such funds shall be held in escrow until the Closing and delivered by the Escrow Agent on behalf of the Placement Agent and the Investors to the Company upon the satisfaction, in the sole judgment of the Placement Agent, or the waiver, in the sole discretion of the Placement Agent, of the Company Closing Conditions. The Placement Agent shall have no rights in or to any of the escrowed funds, unless the Placement Agent and the Escrow Agent are notified in writing by the Company in connection with the Closing that a portion of the escrowed funds shall be applied to the Placement Fees. The Company and the Investor agree to indemnify and hold the Placement Agent and the Escrow Agent harmless from and against any and all losses, costs, damages, expenses and claims (including, without limitation, court costs and reasonable attorneys fees) ("") arising under this Section 3.3 or otherwise with respect to the funds held in escrow pursuant hereto or arising under the Escrow Agreement, except for Losses resulting from the willful misconduct or gross negligence of the Placement Agent or the Escrow Agent. Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in no event shall the Placement Agent or the Escrow Agent be liable for any special, indirect or consequential loss or damage of any kind whatsoever (including but not limited to lost profits), even if the Placement Agent or the Escrow Agent has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action.
Losses
     Promptly after the execution of this Agreement by the Investor and the Company, the Investor shall direct the broker-dealer at which the account or
3.4. Delivery of Shares.
 
accounts to be credited with the Shares are maintained, which broker/dealer shall be a DTC participant, to set up a Deposit/Withdrawal at Custodian ("") instructing the Transfer Agent to credit such account or accounts with the Shares by means of an electronic book-entry delivery. Such DWAC shall indicate the settlement date for the deposit of the Shares, which date shall be provided to the Investor by the Placement Agent. Simultaneously with the delivery to the Company by the Escrow Agent of the funds held in escrow pursuant to Section 3.3 above, the Company shall direct the Transfer Agent to credit the Investor's account or accounts with the Shares pursuant to the information contained in the DWAC.
DWAC
4. Representations, Warranties and Covenants of the Investor.
     The Investor represents and warrants to, and covenants with, the Company that (a) the Investor is knowledgeable, sophisticated and experienced in making, and is qualified to make decisions with respect to, investments in shares presenting an investment decision like that involved in the purchase of the Shares, including investments in securities issued by the Company and investments in comparable companies, and has requested, received, reviewed and considered all information it deemed relevant in making an informed decision to purchase the Shares, and (b) the Investor, in connection with its decision to purchase the number of Shares set forth on the Signature Page, relied only upon the Registration Statement and the Company's regular reports on Forms 10-K, 10-Q, and 8-K as filed by the Company with the Commission.
4.1.
     The Investor acknowledges, represents and agrees that no action has been or will be taken in any jurisdiction outside the United States by the Company or the Placement Agent that would permit an offering of the Shares, or possession or distribution of offering materials in connection with the issue of the Shares, in any jurisdiction outside the United States where action for that purpose is required. Each Investor outside the United States will comply with all applicable laws and regulations in each foreign jurisdiction in which it purchases, offers, sells or delivers Shares or has in its possession or distributes any offering materials, in all cases at its own expense. The Placement Agent is not authorized to make any representation or use any information in connection with the issue, placement, purchase and sale of the Shares, except as set forth or incorporated by reference in the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus Supplement.
4.2.
     The Investor further represents and warrants to, and covenants with, the Company that (a) the Investor has full right, power, authority and capacity to enter into this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and has taken all necessary action to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, and (b) this Agreement constitutes a valid and binding obligation of the Investor enforceable against the Investor in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting creditors' and contracting parties' rights generally and except as enforceability may be subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law) and except as the indemnification agreement of the Investor herein may be legally unenforceable.
4.3.
     The Investor understands that nothing in this Agreement or any other materials presented to the Investor in connection with the purchase and sale of the Shares constitutes legal, tax or investment advice. The Investor has consulted such legal, tax and investment advisors as it, in its sole discretion, has deemed necessary or appropriate in connection with its purchase of Shares.
4.4.
 
     The Investor represents, warrants and agrees that it has not engaged in any short selling of the Company's securities, or established or increased any "put equivalent position" as defined in Rule 16(a)-1(h) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 with respect to the Company's securities, within the past 10 trading days.
4.5.
Notwithstanding any investigation made by any party to this Agreement or by the Placement Agent, all covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Company and the Investor herein will survive the execution of this Agreement, the delivery to the Investor of the Shares being purchased and the payment therefor.
5. Survival of Representations, Warranties and Agreements.
All notices, requests, consents and other communications hereunder will be in writing, will be mailed (a) if within the domestic United States by first-class registered or certified airmail, or nationally recognized overnight express courier, postage prepaid, or by facsimile or (b) if delivered from outside the United States, by International Federal Express or facsimile, and will be deemed given (i) if delivered by first-class registered or certified mail domestic, three business days after so mailed, (ii) if delivered by nationally recognized overnight carrier, one business day after so mailed, (iii) if delivered by International Federal Express, two business days after so mailed, and (iv) if delivered by facsimile, upon electric confirmation of receipt and will be delivered as addressed as follows:
6. Notices.
 
This Agreement may not be modified or amended except pursuant to an instrument in writing signed by the Company and the Investor.
7. Changes.
The headings of the various sections of this Agreement have been inserted for convenience of reference only and will not be deemed to be part of this Agreement.
8. Headings.
In case any provision contained in this Agreement should be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein will not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
9. Severability.
This Agreement will be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the internal laws of the State of New York, without giving effect to the principles of conflicts of law that would require the application of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
10. Governing Law.
This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which will constitute an original, but all of which, when taken together, will constitute but one instrument, and will become effective when one or more counterparts have been signed by each party hereto and delivered to the other parties.
11. Counterparts.
 

 
Exhibit 99.4
     THIS ESCROW AGREEMENT ("") is made and entered into as of the 24 day of January, 2005, by and among JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., a national banking association (the ""), ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "").
Agreement
th
Escrow Agent
Company
Placement Agent
     WHEREAS, the Company proposes to sell an aggregate of up to 5,788,095 shares of its common stock, par value $.01 per share (the ""), for an aggregate of up to $30,387,500, all as described in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-111181) (which, together with all amendments or supplements thereto is referred to herein as the "");
Shares
Registration Statement
     WHEREAS, the Shares are being offered by the Company to subscribers identified by the Placement Agent, pursuant to the terms of the Placement Agent Agreement, dated January 24, 2005, by and between the Company and the Placement Agent (the "");
Placement Agent Agreement
     WHEREAS, unless the transactions contemplated by the Placement Agent Agreement have been abandoned pursuant to the terms thereof, or unless otherwise agreed to by the Company and the Placement Agent, the closing of the purchase and sale of the Shares shall take place on January 28, 2005 (the "");
Closing Date
WHEREAS, the offering of the Shares may be terminated pursuant to the terms of the Placement Agent Agreement (the date of such termination, if so terminated, is referred to herein as the "");
Termination Date
     WHEREAS, with respect to each of the subscription payments received from subscribers, the Company and the Placement Agent propose to establish an escrow account with the Escrow Agent in the name of the Company at 4 New York Plaza, 21 Floor, New York, New York 10004; and
st
     WHEREAS, the Escrow Agent is willing to receive and disburse the proceeds from the offering of the Shares in accordance herewith.
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual agreements contained herein and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
     1. . The subscribers for the Shares shall wire to the Escrow Agent funds of the subscribers delivered in payment for the Shares (the ""). Upon receipt of funds from such subscribers, the Escrow Agent shall credit such funds to a non-interest bearing account held by the Escrow Agent. The wire instructions for such
Deposit of Escrowed Funds
Escrowed Funds
 
subscriber funds are set forth in the notice provision for the Escrow Agent in Section 9 of this Agreement.
     2. . Upon receipt of the Escrowed Funds, the Escrow Agent shall acknowledge such receipt in writing to the Company and the Placement Agent and shall hold and disburse the same pursuant to the terms and conditions of this Agreement. The Escrow Agent shall have no duty to verify whether the amounts and property delivered comport with the requirements of any other agreement.
Acceptance
     3. . The Placement Agent shall furnish or cause to be furnished to the Escrow Agent, at the time of each deposit of funds pursuant to Section 1, a list, substantially in the form of hereto, containing the name of, the address of, the number of Shares subscribed for by, the subscription amount to be delivered to the Escrow Agent on behalf of, and the social security or taxpayer identification number of, each subscriber whose funds are being deposited. The Escrow Agent shall promptly notify the Placement Agent and the Company of any discrepancy between the subscription amounts set forth on any list delivered pursuant to this Section 3 and the subscription amounts received by the Escrow Agent. The Escrow Agent is authorized to revise such list to reflect the actual subscription amounts received and the release of any subscription amounts pursuant to Section 4.
List of Subscribers
Exhibit A
     4. .
Withdrawal of Subscription Amounts
          (a) If the Escrow Agent shall receive a notice, substantially in the form of hereto (an ""), from the Company, the Escrow Agent shall, promptly after receipt of such Offering Termination Notice, send to each subscriber listed on the list held by the Escrow Agent pursuant to Section 3 whose total subscription amount shall not have been released pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section 4, in the manner set forth in paragraph (d) of this Section 4, a check to the order of such subscriber in the amount of the remaining subscription amount held by the Escrow Agent as set forth on such list held by the Escrow Agent. The Escrow Agent shall notify the Company and the Placement Agent of the distribution of such funds to the subscribers.
Exhibit B
Offering Termination Notice
          (b) In the event that (i) the Shares have been subscribed for and funds in respect thereof shall have been deposited with the Escrow Agent on or before the Termination Date and (ii) no Offering Termination Notice shall have been delivered to the Escrow Agent, the Company and the Placement Agent shall deliver to the Escrow Agent a joint notice, not less than one (1) nor more than three (3) business days prior to the Closing Date, substantially in the form of hereto (a ""), designating how the proceeds of such subscriptions are to be distributed on the Closing Date, and identifying the subscribers and the number of Shares to be sold to each subscriber on the Closing Date. The Escrow Agent, after receipt of such Closing Notice, on the Closing Date, shall pay to the Company and the Placement Agent, in federal or other immediately available funds and otherwise in the manner specified in such Closing Notice, an amount equal to the aggregate of the subscription amounts paid by the subscribers identified in such Closing Notice for the Shares to be sold on the Closing Date as set forth on the list held by the Escrow Agent pursuant to Section 3.
Exhibit C
Closing Notice
 
          (c) If at any time and from time to time prior to the release of any subscriber's total subscription amount pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section 4 from escrow, the Company shall deliver to the Escrow Agent a notice, substantially in the form of hereto (a ""), to the effect that any or all of the subscriptions of such subscriber have been rejected by the Company (a ""), the Escrow Agent, promptly after receipt of such Subscription Termination Notice, to the extent of the sum of such subscriber's Rejected Subscription amount as set forth in the Subscription Termination Notice, send to such subscriber, in the manner set forth in paragraph (d) of this Section 4, a check to the order of such subscriber in the amount of such Rejected Subscription amount.
Exhibit D
Subscription Termination Notice
Rejected Subscription
          (d) For the purposes of this Section 4, any check that the Escrow Agent shall be required to send to any subscriber shall be sent to such subscriber by first class mail, postage prepaid, at such subscriber's address furnished to the Escrow Agent pursuant to Section 3.
     5. .
Escrow Agent; Duties and Liabilities
          (a) It is expressly understood and agreed by the parties that (i) the duties of the Escrow Agent, as herein specifically provided, are purely ministerial in nature; (ii) the Escrow Agent shall not have any duty to deposit the Escrowed Funds except as provided herein, (iii) the Escrow Agent shall not be responsible or liable in any manner whatsoever for, or have any duty to inquire into, the sufficiency, correctness, genuineness or validity of the notices it receives hereunder, or the identity, authority or rights of any of the parties; (iv) the Escrow Agent shall have no duties or responsibilities in connection with the Escrowed Funds, other than those specifically set forth in this Agreement; (v) the Escrow Agent shall not incur any liability in acting upon any signature, written notice, request, waiver, consent, receipt, or any other paper or document reasonably believed by the Escrow Agent to be genuine; (vi) the Escrow Agent may assume that any person purporting to have authority to give notices on behalf of any of the parties in accordance with the provisions hereof has been duly authorized to do so; (vii) the Escrow Agent shall incur no liability whatsoever except for such resulting from its willful misconduct or gross negligence, as long as the Escrow Agent has acted in good faith in the performance of its duties hereunder; and (viii) upon the Escrow Agent's performance of its obligations under Section 4 hereof, the Escrow Agent shall be relieved of all liability, responsibility and obligation with respect to the Escrowed Funds or arising out of or under this Agreement.
          (b) The Escrow Agent shall not be under any obligation to take any legal action in connection with this Agreement or towards its enforcement or performance, or to appear in, prosecute or defend any action or legal proceeding, or to file any return, or pay or withhold any income or other tax payable with respect to any Escrowed Funds or the disbursement thereof, any payment of or in respect of which shall constitute a Loss under Section 6 below, and the Placement Agent and the Company agree to provide to the Escrow Agent such information and documentation as the Escrow Agent may reasonably request in connection therewith.
          (c) In the event of any disagreement relating to the Escrowed Funds or the disbursement thereof resulting in adverse claims or demands being made in connection with the Escrowed Funds or in the event that the Escrow Agent is in doubt as to what action it should take
 
hereunder, the Escrow Agent shall be entitled to retain the Escrowed Funds, but only to the extent of the Escrowed Funds in controversy, until the Escrow Agent shall have received a final non-appealable order of a court of competent jurisdiction directing delivery of the Escrowed Funds, in which event the Escrow Agent shall disburse the Escrowed Funds in accordance with such order. Any court order shall be accompanied by a legal opinion by counsel for the presenting party satisfactory to the Escrow Agent to the effect that the order is final and non-appealable. The Escrow Agent shall act on such court order and legal opinion without further question. If a proceeding for such determination is not begun and diligently continued, the Escrow Agent may make an ex parte application, or bring any appropriate action, for leave to deposit the Escrowed Funds in the Supreme Court of the State of New York, County of New York seeking such determination or such declaratory relief as the Escrow Agent shall deem reasonably necessary under the circumstances, and the parties each hereby irrevocably consent to the entering of an ex parte order pursuant to all applicable laws, rules and procedures of the State of New York and such court. The Escrow Agent shall be reimbursed by the Company for all of the Escrow Agent's reasonable costs and expenses of such action or proceeding, including, without limitation, attorneys' fees and disbursements.
          (d) The Escrow Agent does not have any interest in the Escrowed Funds deposited hereunder and is serving as escrow agent only and having only possession thereof. Any payments of income from the Escrowed Funds shall be subject to withholding regulations then in force with respect to United States federal or state income taxes. The parties hereto shall provide the Escrow Agent with appropriate Internal Revenue Service Forms W-9 for tax identification number certification or non-resident alien certifications. Section 5(c), Section 5(d) and Section 6 shall survive any termination of this Agreement or the resignation of the Escrow Agent in accordance with Section 5(h) below.
          (e) None of the provisions of this Agreement shall require the Escrow Agent to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise to incur any liability, financial or otherwise, in the performance of any of its duties hereunder, or in the exercise of any of its rights or powers if it shall have reasonable grounds for believing that repayment of such funds or indemnity satisfactory to it against such risk or liability is not assured to it.
          (f) The Escrow Agent may consult with independent counsel and the advice or any opinion of counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection in respect of any action taken or omitted by it hereunder in good faith and in accordance with such advice or opinion of counsel.
          (g) The Escrow Agent may execute any of the trusts or powers hereunder to perform any (and the Escrow Agent may execute any of the trusts or powers hereunder to perform any other duties hereunder with the written consent of the Company, which consent may not unreasonably withheld) either directly or through agents, attorneys, custodians or nominees appointed with due care, and shall not be responsible for any willful misconduct or gross negligence on the part of any agent, attorney, custodian or nominee so appointed.
          (h) The Escrow Agent may at any time resign by giving ten (10) days written notice of resignation to the Company and the Placement Agent. Upon receiving such notice of
 
resignation, the Company and the Placement Agent shall promptly appoint a successor and, upon the acceptance by the successor of such appointment, release the resigning Escrow Agent from its obligations hereunder by written instrument, a copy of which instrument shall be delivered to the resigning Escrow Agent and the successor. If no successor shall have been so appointed and have accepted appointment within forty-five (45) days after the giving of such notice of resignation, the resigning Escrow Agent may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor.
          (i) Any partnership, corporation or other similar entity into which the Escrow Agent may be merged or converted or with which it may be consolidated, or any partnership, corporation or other similar entity resulting from any merger, conversion or consolidation to which the Escrow Agent shall be a party, or any partnership, corporation or other similar entity succeeding to the business of the Escrow Agent shall be the successor of the Escrow Agent hereunder without the execution or filing of any paper with any party hereto or any further act on the part of any of the parties hereto except where an instrument of transfer or assignment is required by law to effect such succession, anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding.
          (j) No printed or other matter in any language (including, without limitation, the Registration Statement, the prospectus and prospectus supplement relating to the Registration Statement, notices, reports and promotional material) which mentions the Escrow Agent's or the Company's name or the rights, powers, or duties of the Escrow Agent shall be issued by the other parties hereto or on such parties' behalf unless the Escrow Agent or the Company, as the case may be, shall first have given its specific written consent thereto. The Escrow Agent hereby consents to the use of its name and the reference to the escrow arrangement in the Placement Agent Agreement, the Registration Statement and the prospectus and prospectus supplement relating to the Registration Statement.
     6. . The Company hereby agrees to indemnify and hold the Escrow Agent harmless from any and all liabilities, obligations, damages, losses, claims, encumbrances, costs or expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) (any or all of the foregoing herein referred to as a "") arising hereunder or under or with respect to the Escrowed Funds, except for Losses resulting from the willful misconduct or gross negligence of the Escrow Agent. Anything in this agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in no event shall the Escrow Agent be liable for special, indirect or consequential loss or damage of any kind whatsoever (including but not limited to lost profits), even if the Escrow Agent has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action.
Indemnification of Escrow Agent
Loss
     7. . The Company agrees to (a) pay the Escrow Agent upon execution of this Agreement and from time to time thereafter reasonable compensation for the services to be rendered hereunder, which unless otherwise agreed in writing shall be as described in attached hereto, and (b) pay or reimburse the Escrow Agent upon request for all expenses, disbursements and advances, including reasonable attorney's fees and expenses, incurred or made by it in connection with the performance, delivery, modification and termination of this Agreement.
Fees
Schedule 1
     8. . In the event funds transfer instructions are given (other than in writing at the time of execution of this Agreement, as indicated in attached hereto),
Security Procedures
Schedule 2
 
whether in writing, by telecopier or otherwise, the Escrow Agent is authorized to seek confirmation of such instructions by telephone call-back to the person or persons designated in attached hereto, and the Escrow Agent may rely upon the confirmation of anyone purporting to be the person or persons so designated. The persons and telephone numbers for call-backs may be changed only in a writing actually received and acknowledged by the Escrow Agent. If the Escrow Agent is unable to contact any of the authorized representatives identified in , the Escrow Agent is hereby authorized to seek confirmation of such instructions by telephone call-back to any one or more of the executive officers of the Company or the Placement Agent, as applicable (each an ""), as the Escrow Agent may select. Such Executive Officer shall deliver to the Escrow Agent a fully executed Incumbency Certificate, and the Escrow Agent may rely upon the confirmation of anyone purporting to be any such officer. The Escrow Agent and the beneficiary's bank in any funds transfer may rely solely upon any account numbers or similar identifying numbers provided by the Company or the Placement Agent to identify (a) the beneficiary, (b) the beneficiary's bank or (c) an intermediary bank. The Escrow Agent may apply any of the escrowed funds for any payment order it executes using any such identifying number, even when its use may result in a person other than the beneficiary being paid, or the transfer of funds to a bank other than the beneficiary's bank or an intermediary bank designated; provided that the Escrow Agent has no knowledge that such identifying number is inaccurate. The parties to this Agreement acknowledge that these security procedures are commercially reasonable.
Schedule 3
Schedule 3
Executive Officers
     9. . Any notice or demand desired or required to be given hereunder shall be in writing and deemed given when sent by facsimile transmission with receipt confirmed to the facsimile number set forth below and addressed as follows:
Notices
 
or to such other address or account information as hereafter shall be designated in writing by the applicable party to the other parties hereto.
     10. . This Agreement and any exhibits and schedules hereto constitute the entire agreement between the parties hereto pertaining to the subject matters hereof, and supersede all negotiations, preliminary agreements and all prior and
Entire Agreement
 
contemporaneous discussions and understandings of the parties in connection with the subject matters hereof. Any exhibits and schedules hereto are hereby incorporated into and made a part of this Agreement.
     11. . No amendment, waiver, change or modification of any of the terms, provisions or conditions of this Agreement shall be effective unless made in writing and signed by the parties or by their duly authorized agents. Waiver of any provision of this Agreement shall not be deemed a waiver of future compliance therewith and such provision shall remain in full force and effect.
Amendments
     12. . In the event any provision of this Agreement is held invalid, illegal or unenforceable, in whole or in part, the remaining provisions of this Agreement shall not be affected thereby and shall continue to be valid and enforceable.
Severability
     13. . This Agreement shall be governed and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without regard to any applicable principles of conflicts of law.
Governing Law
     14. . ANY LEGAL ACTION OR PROCEEDING WITH RESPECT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY BE BROUGHT IN THE COURTS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK OR OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA FOR THE SOUTHERN DISTRICT OF NEW YORK, AND, BY EXECUTION AND DELIVERY OF THIS AGREEMENT, THE COMPANY HEREBY ACCEPTS FOR ITSELF AND IN RESPECT OF ITS PROPERTY, GENERALLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY, THE JURISDICTION OF THE AFORESAID COURTS AND APPELLATE COURTS FROM ANY THEREOF. THE COMPANY HEREBY IRREVOCABLY CONSENTS TO THE SERVICE OF PROCESS OUT OF ANY OF THE AFOREMENTIONED COURTS IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING BY THE MAILING OF COPIES THEREOF TO THE COMPANY BY REGISTERED OR CERTIFIED MAIL, POSTAGE PREPAID, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, TO THE COMPANY AT ITS ADDRESS SPECIFIED HEREIN. THE COMPANY HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ANY OBJECTION, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY OBJECTION TO THE LAYING OF VENUE OR BASED ON THE GROUNDS OF FORUM NON CONVENIENS, WHICH IT MAY NOW OR HEREAFTER HAVE TO THE BRINGING OF ANY SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING IN SUCH RESPECTIVE JURISDICTIONS.
Submission to Jurisdiction
     15. . The titles or captions of paragraphs in this Agreement are provided for convenience of reference only, and shall not be considered a part hereof for purposes of interpreting or applying this Agreement, and such titles or captions do not define, limit, extend, explain or describe the scope or extent of this Agreement or any of its terms or conditions.
Headings and Captions
     16. . Words and phrases herein shall be construed as in the singular or plural number and as masculine, feminine or neuter gender, according to the context.
Gender and Number
     17. . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all of which together shall constitute one
Counterparts
 
and the same instrument, and in making proof hereof, it shall not be necessary to produce or account for more than one such counterpart.
     18. . This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective legal representatives, heirs, successors and assigns, and the subscribers of the Shares. Nothing in this Agreement, express or implied, is intended to confer upon any party, other than the parties hereto (and their respective legal representatives, heirs, successors and assigns), any rights, remedies, obligations or liabilities.
Binding Effect on Successors and Assigns
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement as of the date first above written.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050131171510.txt.gz
TIME:20050131171510
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Section 8.  Other Events
Item 8.01. Other Events
     On January 28, 2005, the Company issued a press release announcing that it closed its previously announced offering. The Company sold an aggregate of 5,788,095 shares of its common stock at the purchase price of $5.25 per share, for aggregate gross proceeds of $28,559,248.82.
     A copy of the Company's press release is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9.  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01(c) Exhibits
     99.1 Press Release dated January 28, 2005
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
For Immediate Release:
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that it has closed its previously announced registered direct offering. The company sold approximately 5.78 million shares of its common stock at $5.25 per share, for aggregate proceeds of approximately $30 million. The small group of investors included both existing and new shareholders. J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. acted as exclusive placement agent for the transaction.
Woburn, Mass., Jan. 28, 2005
This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any state or jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer and Novartis. For more information, please visit www.ArQule.com.
SM
SM
SM
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT
SM
platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT
SM
pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2004, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on August 4, 2004, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on May 7, 2004 and its Form 10-K filed with the Commission on March 12, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050210170341.txt.gz
TIME:20050210170341
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On February 10, 2005 ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter and year ended December 31, 2004. The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 10, 2005

 
Exhibit 99.1
Dr. Stephen A. Hill, CEO Louise A. Mawhinney, CFO (781) 994-0300
Contacts:
www.ArQule.com
For Immediate Release:
Conference call scheduled for today at 9 a.m. Eastern Time
 ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL), today announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and year ended 2004.
Woburn, Mass., Feb. 10, 2005
For the quarter ended December 31, 2004, ArQule reported revenues of $14,088,000, compared with $18,443,000 for the same period of 2003. For the quarter, the Company reported a net loss of $371,000, or $0.01 per share, compared with a net loss of $5,129,000, or $0.18 per share, for the fourth quarter of 2003. The fourth quarter of 2003 net loss includes a restructuring charge of $1,529,000 related to the Company's reassessment of its liability for its closed facility in California and a $4,750,000 loss related to a write-down of an investment in a privately-held company.
For the year ended December 31, 2004, ArQule's revenues were $54,455,000, compared with revenues of $65,539,000 for the year ended December 31, 2003. The Company reported a net loss for the year ended December 31, 2004 of $4,284,000, or $ 0.15 per share. This compares with a net loss of $34,751,000, or $1.43 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2003. The 2003 net loss includes an in-process research and development charge related to the acquisition of Cyclis Pharmaceuticals of $30,359,000, in addition to the above-mentioned restructuring and investment write-down charges.
ArQule ended the year with $72 million of cash and marketable securities.
On January 28, 2005, the Company announced the completion of a registered direct stock offering. The Company sold 5.78 million shares of common stock at $5.25 per share, for aggregate proceeds of $28.5 million after commissions and offering expenses.
 
ArQule/2
2005 Financial Guidance
For 2005, ArQule expects revenues to be approximately $53 million, total cost of compound development revenues to range between $33 and $34 million, total research and development expenses to range between $36 and $39 million and total marketing, general and administrative expenses to range between $9.5 and $10 million. The Company expects net investment income to range between $1.5 and $2.0 million. ArQule expects its net loss to range between $24 and $28 million, and its net loss per share to range between $0.70 and $0.82 for the year. ArQule expects to end the year with between $71 and $75 million in cash and cash equivalents. This guidance does not assume any additional collaborations, acquisitions or in-licensing initiatives.
"We continue to be confident in the overall potential of our oncology programs as reflected in our increased investment in discovery efforts and the execution of clinical trials. We are also mindful of the need to maintain sufficient financial resources to pursue our strategies. The completion of our recent stock offering is an important step in ensuring the Company will continue to have a three year cash horizon," concluded Dr. Stephen A. Hill.
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time. Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and Chief Executive Officer, and Louise A. Mawhinney, Chief Financial Officer, will lead the call.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112, and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820. The access code is 6243212.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer and Novartis. For more information, please visit .
SM
SM
SM
www.ArQule.com
 
ArQule/3
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act.
Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the expected revenues may fall short due to failed collaborations; cost of revenue may exceed the guidance; expenses for research and development and for marketing, general and administration may exceed the guidance; net investment income may fall short of the guidance due to a difficult investment climate; the ACT platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2004, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on August 4, 2004, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on May 7, 2004 and its Form 10-K filed with the Commission on March 12, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM
SM
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050218075123.txt.gz
TIME:20050218075123
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.02. Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
Effective March 1, 2005, the Companys employment agreement with its Vice President, Legal, General Counsel & Secretary will terminate in conjunction with the executives departure. The executive will receive severance benefits for termination without cause in accordance with the terms of the agreement. The agreement was filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission on March 12, 2004 as Exhibit 10.46 to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050407094938.txt.gz
TIME:20050407094938
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Table of Contents
Section 1Registrant's Business and Operations
Item 1.01 Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement
On January 19, 2005, the Compensation and Nominating Committee of the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. awarded cash bonuses to the Company's named executive officers (as defined in Item 402(a)(3) of Regulation S-K promulgated by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission) in respect of the Company's performance for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2004. Bonuses were awarded as follows:
On January 19, 2005, the Compensation and Nominating Committee of the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. granted stock option awards under its 1994 Amended and Restated Equity Incentive Plan to the Company's named executive officers in respect of the Company's performance for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2004. Awards were granted as follows:
Table of Contents
On January 19, 2005, the Compensation and Nominating Committee of the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. approved base salaries and bonus ranges for the Company's named executive officers for fiscal year 2005. The Compensation and Nominating Committee annually evaluates the performance and determines the total compensation of the Company's named executive officers based on the Committee's assessment of each individual's responsibilities and performance, the Company's performance and compensation for comparable positions in similar, publicly-traded biotechnology and biopharmaceutical companies located in the northeastern United States. The base salaries and bonus ranges are as follows:
Dr. Hill, Dr. Li, and Ms. Mawhinney have employment agreements with the Company.
Mr. Jacobs' employment and employment contract were terminated without cause effective March 1, 2005
*
Section 9Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1      Form of Agreement pursuant to the ArQule, Inc. Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: April 6, 2005

 
Exhibit 99.1
Form of Agreement pursuant to the ArQule, Inc. Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan
     
1. 
Plan Incorporated by Reference
. This Option is issued pursuant to the terms of the Plan and may be amended as provided in the Plan. Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined in this certificate have the meanings given to them in the Plan. This certificate does not set forth all of the terms and conditions of the Plan, which are incorporated herein by reference. The Committee administers the Plan and its determinations regarding the operation of the Plan are final and binding. Copies of the Plan may be obtained upon written request without charge from the Company.
     
2. 
Option Price
. The price to be paid for each share of Common Stock issued upon exercise of the whole or any part of this Option is the Option Price set forth on the face of this certificate.
     
3. 
Exercisability Schedule
. This Option may be exercised at any time and from time to time for the number of shares and in accordance with the exercisability schedule set forth on the face of this certificate, but only for the purchase of whole shares. This Option may not be exercised as to any shares after the Expiration Date.
     
4. 
Method of Exercise
. To exercise this Option, the Optionholder shall deliver written notice of exercise to the Company specifying the number of shares with respect to which the Option is being exercised accompanied by payment of the Option Price for such shares in cash, by certified check or in such other form, including shares of Common Stock of the Company valued at their Fair Market Value on the date of delivery, as the Committee may approve. Promptly following such notice, the Company will deliver to the Optionholder a certificate representing the number of shares with respect to which the Option is being exercised.
     
5. 
Rights as a Stockholder or Employee
. The Optionholder shall not have any rights in respect of shares as to which the Option shall not have been exercised and payment made as provided above. The Optionholder shall not have any rights to continued employment by the Company or its Affiliated by virtue of the grant of this Option.
     
6. 
Recapitalization, Mergers, Etc
. As provided in the Plan, in the event of corporate transaction affecting the Company's outstanding Common Stock, the Committee shall equitably adjust the number and kind of shares subject to this Option and the exercise price hereunder or make provision for a cash payment. If such transaction involves a consolidation or merger of the Company with another entity, the sale or exchange of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company or a reorganization or liquidation of the Company, then in lieu of the foregoing, the Committee may upon written notice to the Optionholder provide that this Option shall terminate on a date not less than 20 days after the date of such notice unless theretofore exercised. In connection with such notice, the Committee may in its discretion accelerate or waive any deferred exercise period.
     
7. 
Option Not Transferable
. This Option is not transferable by the Optionholder otherwise than by will or the laws of descent and distribution, and is exercisable, during the Optionholder's lifetime, only by the Optionholder. The naming of a Designated Beneficiary does not constitute a transfer.
     
8. 
Exercise of Option After Termination of Employment
. If the Optionholder's employment with (a) the Company, (b) an Affiliate, or (c) a corporation (or parent or subsidiary corporation of such corporation) issuing or assuming a stock option in a transaction to which section
424(a)
of the Code applies, is terminated for any reason other than by disability (within the meaning of section
22(e)(3)
of the Code) or death, the Optionholder may exercise the rights which were available to the Optionholder at the time of such termination only within three months from the date of termination. If Optionholder's employment is terminated as a result of disability, such rights may be exercised within twelve months from the date of termination. Upon the death of the Optionholder, his or her Designated
 
Beneficiary shall have the right, at any time within twelve months after the date of death, to exercise in whole or in part any rights that were available to the Optionholder at the time of death. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no rights under this Option may be exercised after the Expiration Date.
     
9. 
Compliance with Securities Laws
. It shall be a condition to the Optionholder's right to purchase shares of Common Stock hereunder that the Company may, in its discretion, require (a) that the shares of Common Stock reserved for issue upon the exercise of this Option shall have been duly listed, upon official notice of issuance, upon any national securities exchange or automated quotation system on which the Company's Common Stock may then be listed or quoted, (b) that either (i) a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933 with respect to the shares shall be in effect, or (ii) in the opinion of counsel for the Company, the proposed purchase shall be exempt from registration under that Act and the Optionholder shall have made such undertakings and agreements with the Company as the Company may reasonably require, and (c) that such other steps, if any, as counsel for the Company shall consider necessary to comply with any law applicable to the issue of such shares by the Company shall have been taken by the Company or the Optionholder, or both. The certificates representing the shares purchased under this Option may contain such legends as counsel for the Company shall consider necessary to comply with any applicable law.
     
10. 
Payment of Taxes
. The Optionholder shall pay to the Company, or make provision satisfactory to the Company for payment of, any taxes required by law to be withheld with respect to the exercise of this Option. The Committee may, in its discretion, require any other Federal or state taxes imposed on the sale of the shares to be paid by the Optionholder. In the Committee's discretion, such tax obligations may be paid in whole or in part in shares of Common Stock, including shares retained from the exercise of this Option, valued at their Fair Market Value on the date of delivery. The Company and its Affiliated may, to the extent permitted by law, deduct any such tax obligations from any payment of any kind otherwise due to the Optionholder.
     
11. 
Notice of Sale of Shares Required
. The Optionholder agrees to notify the Company in writing within 30 days of the disposition of any shares purchased upon exercise of this Option if such disposition occurs within two years of the date of the grant of this Option or within one year after such purchase.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050411132419.txt.gz
TIME:20050411132419
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
(d) Election of Directors. On April 8, 2005, the directors of ArQule, Inc. elected Michael J. Astrue to ArQules Board of Directors. The press release describing Mr. Astrues professional background and qualifications is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Astrue and any other person associated with ArQule pursuant to which he was selected as a director.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Text of Press Release dated April 11, 2005.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Dr. Stephen A. Hill, CEO Louise A. Mawhinney, CFO (781) 994-0300
Contacts:
www.ArQule.com
For Immediate Release:
Woburn, Mass., April 11, 2005
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) is pleased to announce the appointment of Mr. Michael J. Astrue to its Board of Directors, effective April 8, 2005. Mr. Astrue is President and Chief Executive Officer of Transkaryotic Therapies, Inc. He brings two decades of public and private sector experience in the biotechnology and pharmaceutical industries. He has served as Chairman of the Massachusetts Biotechnology Council and, before joining Transkaryotic Therapies, was Vice President, Secretary, and General Counsel for Biogen, Inc. Mr. Astrue was also a partner at the law offices of Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., held several positions with the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, including General Counsel, and served as Associate Counsel to the President, where he advised and represented former Presidents Ronald Reagan and George Bush.
Mr. Astrue holds a Bachelors degree from Yale University, and a J.D. from Harvard Law School.
"I am honored that Michael Astrue has agreed to offer his extensive and unique professional and biotechnology experience to ArQule. He will be a great addition to our current Board of Directors," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, ArQule's President and Chief Executive Officer.
"I believe ArQule has developed an innovative technology platform that will allow it to emerge as a significant player in the area of oncology and I am delighted to become part of their team," said Mr. Astrue.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including a collaboration with Pfizer. For more information, please visit .
SM
SM
SM
www.ArQule.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT
SM
platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT
SM
pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's
Form 10-K
filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 16, 2005, its
Form 10-Q
filed with the Commission on November 9, 2004, its
Form 10-Q
filed with the Commission on August 4, 2004, and its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on May 7, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050421114956.txt.gz
TIME:20050421114956
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 21, 2005, ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2005. The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL), today announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2005.
Woburn, Mass., April 21, 2005
For the quarter ended March 31, 2005, ArQule reported revenue of $13,943,000, compared with $11,761,000 for the same period of 2004. The Company reported a net loss of $1,442,000, or $0.04 per share, for the quarter, compared with a net loss of $5,251,000, or $0.18 per share, for the first quarter of 2004. The first quarter of 2004 net loss includes a restructuring charge of $1,072,000 related to the Company's shift in focus towards oncology drug research and development.
ArQule ended the quarter with $85.5 million in cash and marketable securities, and $10.5 million in accounts receivable. On January 28, 2005, the Company completed a registered direct stock offering. The Company sold 5.78 million shares of common stock at $5.25 per share, for aggregate proceeds of $28.3 million after commissions and offering expenses.
"The first quarter of 2005 ended strongly, with three clinical trials ongoing, a promising preclinical pipeline, and sufficient cash to fund our operations for the next several years. We are on track to meet our 2005 goals, and have the resources and the science to do so," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill.
The Company intends to present updated ARQ 501 clinical data from its ongoing phase 1 monotherapy study at the forthcoming ASCO meeting in May.
 
ArQule/2
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time. Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and Chief Executive Officer, and Louise A. Mawhinney, Chief Financial Officer, will lead the call.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (888) 203-1112, and outside the U.S. (719) 457-0820. The access code is 5539409
.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer. For more information, please visit .
SM
SM
SM
www.ArQule.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. In addition, the financial results referred to above, and the attached condensed statement of operations, reflect information that may change as a result of events that occur subsequent to the close of the fiscal quarter, but prior to the filing of the corresponding quarterly report.
 
ArQule/3
Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the expected revenues may fall short due to failed collaborations; cost of revenue may exceed the guidance; expenses for research and development and for marketing, general and administration may exceed the guidance; net investment income may fall short of the guidance due to a difficult investment climate; the ACT
SM
platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT
SM
pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 16, 2005, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on November 9, 2004, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on August 4, 2004, and its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on May 7, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050506160034.txt.gz
TIME:20050506160034
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Section 1  Registrant's Business and Operations
Item 1.01 Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement.
     On April 29, 2005, we disclosed in our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the Quarter Ended March 31, 2005 that we had entered into a purchase and sale agreement whereby we agreed to sell our corporate headquarters in Woburn, Massachusetts to ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC, an affiliate of Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc. ("the Purchaser") and simultaneously lease the facility from the Purchaser. On May 2, 2005, we completed the transaction by conveying the real estate in exchange for the purchase price and entering into a lease with the Purchaser, as landlord. At closing, the Purchaser acquired two parcels of land and our headquarters building in exchange for payment to us of approximately $40.1 million. We leased our existing facility and the land on which it is situated for a period of ten years at an initial annual rate of approximately $2.9 million, subject to annual escalations. We are also responsible for all real property taxes, and specified insurance and maintenance costs (other than repair for structural elements). We have options to extend the lease for up to an additional ten years. We did not lease the remaining adjacent parcel of land conveyed to the Purchaser. The press release announcing completion of the transaction is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference. The forms of the purchase and sale agreement and lease are attached as Exhibits 10.1 and 10.2 hereto, respectively, and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.01 Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets.
     The information set forth above in Item 1.01 of this current report on Form 8-K regarding the sale of land and our headquarters building is hereby incorporated into this Item 2.01 by reference. Unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated financial information relating to the transaction is attached as Exhibit 99.2 and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: May 6, 2005

EXHIBIT 10.1 AGREEMENT OF PURCHASE AND SALE THIS AGREEMENT OF PURCHASE AND SALE ("Agreement") is made as of April 28, 2005 ("Contract Date"), between (i) ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Purchaser"), and (ii) ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Seller"). ARTICLE 1. INTERPRETATION 1.1 DEFINITIONS. For purposes of this Agreement, the following capitalized terms shall have the meanings indicated: 1.1.1 ACTION: any action, suit, arbitration, governmental investigation or other legal proceeding. 1.1.2 CLOSING: the consummation of the purchase and sale of the Property as contemplated by this Agreement. 1.1.3 CLOSING DATE: the date on which the Closing occurs. 1.1.4 CODE: the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. 1.1.5 CONTRACT DATE: as defined in the Preamble. 1.1.6 CONTRACT: any contract for services, maintenance and supplies, or equipment leases to which Seller is a party and which is = necessary for the use, maintenance, operation, or equipping of the Property, and all amendments thereto. 1.1.7 DAMAGES: damages (other than indirect, special or consequential damages), liabilities, losses, claims, costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses). 1.1.8 DEPOSIT: as defined in Section 2.2. 1.1.9 DUE DILIGENCE PERIOD: as defined in Section 5.1.1. 1.1.10 ENVIRONMENTAL LAWS: all Legal Requirements in effect as of the Contract Date relating to the protection of the environment or to human health, or regulating the manufacture, use or disposal of Hazardous Substances. 1.1.11 ENVIRONMENTAL REPORTS: collectively, (1) Phase 1 Environmental Site Assessment performed by Haley & Aldrich (November 2000); (2) Reliance Letter of Haley & Aldrich (January 25, 2001); (3) Soil Stockpile Opinion - Haley & Aldrich (February 26, 2001); (4) AST Permit Clarification - Haley & Aldrich (March 13, 2001); and (5) Report on Oil and Hazardous Material Site Evaluation - Haley & Aldrich (September 1997). 1.1.12 EXISTING SURVEY: as defined in Section 5.2.2.
1.1.13 HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCE: any pollutant, contaminant or any toxic, radioactive or otherwise hazardous substance, including petroleum, its derivatives, by-products and other hydrocarbons, asbestos, and toxic mold, in each case as regulated under Environmental Laws. 1.1.14 IMPROVEMENTS: the building located on the Land, having an address of 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts and a tax lot designation of 195 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts, including all heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems serving such building, and all laboratory casework and fume hoods located therein. 1.1.15 INITIAL DEPOSIT: as defined in Section 2.2. 1.1.16 INTANGIBLE PROPERTY: collectively, (i) all assignable guarantees and warranties that relate to the Improvements, (ii) all assignable permits, certificates of occupancy, and other public approvals that relate to the Land or the Improvements and (iii) all plans and specifications for the Improvements. 1.1.17 LAND: collectively, the parcels of land more fully described on Exhibit D, together with all right, title and interest of the Seller in and to (i) all rights, ways, easements, privileges and appurtenances to such parcel, (ii) all strips and gores appurtenant to such parcel, and (iii) any land lying in the bed of any streets, roads and alleys appurtenant to such parcel. 1.1.18 LEGAL REQUIREMENT: any federal, state, local or municipal constitution, law, statute, ordinance, rule, order or regulation. 1.1.19 OBJECTIONS: as defined in Section 5.2.3. 1.1.20 PERMITTED EXCEPTIONS: collectively, (i) the matters approved or deemed approved by Purchaser in accordance with Section 5.2, and (ii) the liens for real estate taxes and other assessments not yet due and payable. 1.1.21 PERSON: a natural person or any legal or governmental entity. 1.1.22 PROPERTY: collectively, (i) the Land and the Improvements and Seller's fee simple interest therein, and (ii) the Intangible Property and all right title and interest of Seller therein and thereto. 1.1.23 PURCHASE PRICE: as defined in Section 2.2. 1.1.24 PURCHASER: as defined in the Preamble. 1.1.25 PURCHASER INDEMNIFIED PARTIES: as defined in Section 7.5.1. 1.1.26 PURCHASER'S DESIGNEE: as defined in Section 11.1. 1.1.27 SECOND DEPOSIT: as defined in Section 2.2. 2
1.1.28 SERVICE CONTRACT: any contract for services, maintenance and supplies, equipment leases, and any other contract or agreement to which Seller is a party relating to the use, maintenance, operation, provisioning or equipping of the Property, and all amendments thereto. 1.1.29 SELLER: as defined in the Preamble. 1.1.30 SELLER'S KNOWLEDGE: the actual current knowledge of Steven M. Lacerte, Vice President of Facilities, without any obligation to review any files or make inquiry of any Person. No knowledge of any other Person shall be imputed to Seller. 1.1.31 SELLER'S LEASE: as defined in Section 2.5. 1.1.32 SETTLEMENT STATEMENT: a HUD-1 or similar settlement statement executed by Purchaser and Seller at closing. 1.1.33 SURVEY STANDARDS: as defined in Section 5.2.2. 1.1.34 TITLE COMMITMENT: as defined in Section 5.2.1. 1.1.35 TITLE COMPANY: Chicago Title Insurance Company, which is also serving as escrow agent hereunder. 1.2 GOVERNING LAW. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts (without reference to conflicts of laws principles). 1.3 CAPTIONS, NUMBERING AND HEADINGS. Captions, numbering and headings of Articles, Sections, Schedules and Exhibits in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not be considered in the interpretation of this Agreement. References in this Agreement to Articles, Sections, Schedules and Exhibits shall be deemed to be references to such Articles, Sections, Schedules and Exhibits in this Agreement unless otherwise expressly specified. 1.4 NUMBER; GENDER. Whenever required by the context, the singular shall include the plural, the neuter gender shall include the male gender and female gender, and vice versa. 1.5 BUSINESS DAY. In the event that the date for performance of any obligation under this Agreement falls on other than a business day, then such obligation shall be performed on the next succeeding business day. 1.6 SEVERABILITY. In the event that one or more of the provisions of this Agreement shall be held to be illegal, invalid or unenforceable, each such provision shall be deemed severable and the remaining provisions of this Agreement shall continue in full force and effect, unless this construction would operate as an undue hardship on Seller or Purchaser or would constitute a substantial deviation from the general intent of the parties as reflected in this Agreement. 3
1.7 NO ORAL MODIFICATIONS OR WAIVERS. No modification of this Agreement shall be valid or effective unless the same is in writing and signed by Seller and Purchaser. No purported waiver of any of the provisions of this Agreement shall be valid or effective unless the same is in writing and signed by the party against whom it is sought to be enforced. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the parties agree that the time for performance of any matter to be performed pursuant to this Agreement may be modified by electronic mail sent by the party against whom it is sought to be enforced or such party's counsel. 1.8 EXHIBITS. All Schedules and Exhibits referenced in this Agreement are incorporated by this reference as if fully set forth in this Agreement, and all references to this Agreement shall be deemed to include all such Schedules and Exhibits. 1.9 INTEGRATION. This Agreement, all Schedules and Exhibits appended to this Agreement, and the documents and agreements referenced in this Agreement contain the entire understanding between Seller and Purchaser with respect to the sale of the Property, and are intended to be a full integration of all prior or contemporaneous agreements, conditions, understandings or undertakings between Seller and Purchaser with respect thereto. There are no promises, agreements, conditions, undertakings, understandings, warranties or representations, whether oral, written, express or implied, between Seller and Purchaser with respect to the sale of the Property other than as are expressly set forth in this Agreement, the Schedules and Exhibits appended to this Agreement, and the documents and agreements referenced in this Agreement. 1.10 NO CONSTRUCTION AGAINST DRAFTER. This Agreement has been negotiated and prepared by Seller and Purchaser and their respective attorneys and, should any provision of this Agreement require judicial interpretation, the court interpreting or construing such provision shall not apply the rule of construction that a document is to be construed more strictly against one party. 1.11 INCLUDING. The term "including," and variants thereof, shall mean "including without limitation." ARTICLE 2. SALE OF PROPERTY 2.1 SALE AND PURCHASE. Subject to and in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, Seller shall sell to Purchaser, and Purchaser shall purchase from Seller, the Property. 2.2 PURCHASE PRICE. 2.2.1 The purchase price ("Purchase Price") for the sale and purchase of the Property shall be Forty Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($40,100,000). 2.2.2 The Purchase Price shall be payable as follows: 2.2.2.1 Within one (1) business day following the Contract Date, Purchaser shall deposit into escrow with the Title Company the sum of Two Hundred 4
Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000) ("Initial Deposit") by wire transfer of immediately available funds. 2.2.2.2 On or prior to the expiration of the Due Diligence Period, Purchaser shall deposit into escrow with the Title Company the sum of Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000) ("Second Deposit") by wire transfer of immediately available funds. 2.2.2.3 The Initial Deposit and, if and when made, the Second Deposit, together with any interest accrued on either of them, shall be referred to collectively as the "Deposit." The Deposit shall be held in accordance with Section 8.1. At Closing, the Deposit shall be paid to or at the direction of Seller and credited against the Purchase Price. 2.2.2.4 At Closing, Purchaser shall pay the balance of the Purchase Price (net of the Deposit) to or at the direction of Seller by wire transfer of immediately available funds, and Seller and Purchaser shall cause the Title Company to release the Deposit to Seller. 2.3 [Reserved] 2.4 CONDITION OF PROPERTY. 2.4.1 Purchaser acknowledges that (i) assuming Purchaser does not terminate this Agreement in accordance with Section 5.1.1 on or before the end of the Due Diligence Period, Purchaser will be deemed to confirm as of such date that Purchaser has been given a reasonable opportunity to inspect and investigate the Property, all improvements thereon and all aspects relating thereto, including all of the physical, environmental and operational aspects of the Property, either independently or through agents and experts of Purchaser's choosing, and (ii) Purchaser will acquire the Property based solely upon Purchaser's own investigation and inspection thereof and the representations, warranties and covenants of Seller expressly set forth in this Agreement. SELLER AND PURCHASER AGREE THAT, EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED FOR IN THIS AGREEMENT, (I) THE PROPERTY SHALL BE SOLD AND PURCHASER SHALL ACCEPT POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY ON THE CLOSING DATE "AS IS," "WHERE IS," AND "WITH ALL FAULTS," AND (II) SUCH SALE SHALL BE WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED, STATUTORY OR OTHERWISE, INCLUDING ANY WARRANTY OF INCOME POTENTIAL, OPERATING EXPENSES, USES, MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND SELLER HEREBY DISCLAIMS AND RENOUNCES ANY SUCH REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY. PURCHASER FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT, EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THIS AGREEMENT, SELLER SHALL BE UNDER NO DUTY TO MAKE ANY AFFIRMATIVE DISCLOSURE REGARDING ANY MATTER WHICH MAY BE KNOWN TO SELLER, OR ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, CONTRACTORS, AGENTS OR EMPLOYEES, AND THAT IT IS RELYING SOLELY UPON ITS OWN INSPECTION OF THE PROPERTY AND NOT UPON ANY REPRESENTATIONS MADE TO IT BY ANY PERSON WHOMSOEVER ON SELLER'S BEHALF. 5
2.4.2 Except with respect to any Damages arising out of any breach of any express representation, warranty or covenant set forth in this Agreement, Purchaser hereby waives, releases and forever discharges Seller, and its officers, directors and employees, from any and all Damages, whether known or unknown, which Purchaser has or may have in the future, arising out of or in connection with the Property, including the physical, environmental, governmental, economic or legal condition of the Property. For the foregoing purposes, Purchaser hereby specifically waives the provisions of any law the import of which is that a general release does not extend to claims which the creditor does not know or suspect to exist in the creditor's favor at the time of executing the release, which if known by the creditor must have materially affected a settlement with the debtor. 2.4.3 The provisions of this Section 2.4 shall be applicable to (and each reference herein to "Purchaser" shall be deemed to be an explicit reference to) Purchaser, each Purchaser's Designee, and each of their respective successors, heirs and assignees. The provisions of this Section 2.4 shall survive the Closing without limitation as to time. 2.5 SELLER'S LEASE. From and after the Closing Date, Purchaser shall lease to Seller such portion of the Property as is described in the form of lease attached hereto as Exhibit C (the "Seller's Lease") on such terms and conditions as are contained therein. No lease commission shall be payable by Seller or Purchaser in connection with the Seller's Lease. ARTICLE 3. SELLER'S REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES Seller hereby represents and warrants to Purchaser as follows: 3.1 GOOD STANDING. Seller is a corporation, duly formed, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the state of its organization, and qualified to transact business and in good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. Seller has full power and authority to execute this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 3.2 DUE AUTHORIZATION. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by Seller and the consummation by Seller of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement have been duly and validly authorized by all requisite actions of Seller. Assuming the due execution and delivery of this Agreement by Purchaser, this Agreement constitutes the valid and binding obligation of Seller, enforceable against Seller in accordance with its terms. 3.3 NO VIOLATIONS. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by Seller and the consummation by Seller of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not: (i) violate any Legal Requirement or any order of any court or governmental authority that is binding on Seller or the Property; or (ii) result in a breach of or default under any contract or other agreement to which Seller is a party or by which the Property is bound (including any rights of first offer or first refusal) or any provision of the organizational documents of Seller. 6
3.4 BANKRUPTCY. Seller is not the subject debtor under any federal, state or local bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or any other proceeding for dissolution, liquidation or winding up of its assets. 3.5 LITIGATION. Except as set forth on Schedule 3.5, there are no Actions pending or, to Seller's knowledge, threatened before any court or governmental authority (i) relating to the ownership, operation, development, use or occupancy of the Property or (ii) against Seller, which if adversely determined would affect Seller's ability to enter into or perform its obligations under this Agreement. 3.6 LEASES. Except as set forth in Schedule 3.6 attached hereto, there are no leases, subleases or occupancy agreements affecting the Property. Except as set forth in Schedule 3.6, Seller has not granted to any third party any rights to purchase the Property or any rights of first refusal with respect to the sale or lease of the Property. 3.7 SERVICE CONTRACTS. There are no Service Contracts that would be binding on Purchaser following the Closing. 3.8 VIOLATIONS OF LAW. Except as set forth on Schedule 3.8, Seller has received no written notice from any governmental authority alleging a violation of any Legal Requirement affecting the Property that has not been corrected. Seller shall have the right to update Schedule 3.8 to reflect any such written notice that is received by Seller after the Contract Date. 3.9 CONDEMNATION. There are no pending condemnation actions with respect to the Property, and to Seller's Knowledge there are no threatened or contemplated condemnation actions with respect to the Property. Seller shall have the right to update the representation set forth in this Section 3.9 to reflect (i) any condemnation that becomes pending after the Contract Date, or (ii) any threatened or contemplated condemnation that first becomes known to Seller after the Contract Date, in which event the provisions of Article 9 shall control. 3.10 ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS. Seller has received no written notice from any governmental authority of any actual or potential violation of or failure to comply with any Environmental Laws with respect to the Property which remains uncorrected, or of any actual or threatened obligation to undertake or bear the cost of any clean-up, removal, containment, or other remediation under any Environmental Law with respect to the Property which remains unperformed. To Seller's Knowledge, other than (i) as disclosed in the Environmental Reports, (ii) Hazardous Substances used in the ordinary course of maintaining and cleaning the Property, (iii) Hazardous Substances used in connection with the research, development, manufacturing and other operations of Seller and (iv) Hazardous Substances used as fuels, lubricants or otherwise in connection with vehicles, machinery and equipment located at the Property in commercially reasonable amounts, no Hazardous Substances are present on or in the Property. 3.11 FOREIGN PERSON. Seller is not a "foreign person" as defined in Section 1445 of the Code. 7
ARTICLE 4. PURCHASER'S REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES Purchaser hereby represents and warrants to Seller as follows: 4.1 GOOD STANDING. Purchaser is a limited liability company, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Delaware, and has full power and authority to conduct the business in which it is now engaged. Purchaser is duly qualified to do business and in good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, or will be so qualified and in good standing as of the Closing Date. 4.2 DUE AUTHORIZATION. This Agreement constitutes the valid and binding obligation of Purchaser, enforceable against Purchaser in accordance with its terms. 4.3 NO VIOLATIONS. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by Purchaser and the consummation by Purchaser of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not: (i) violate any Legal Requirement or any order of any court or governmental authority that is binding on Purchaser; or (ii) result in a breach of or default under (A) any contract or other agreement to which Purchaser is a party or (B) any provision of the organizational documents of Purchaser. 4.4 BANKRUPTCY. Purchaser is not the subject debtor under any federal, state or local bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or any other proceeding for dissolution, liquidation or winding up of its assets. 4.5 LITIGATION. There are no Actions pending or, to Purchaser's knowledge, threatened against Purchaser before any court or governmental authority, an adverse determination of which would materially adversely affect (i) the financial condition of Purchaser, or (ii) Purchaser's ability to enter into or perform this Agreement. 4.6 TERRORIST ORGANIZATIONS LISTS. Purchaser is not acting, directly or indirectly, for or on behalf of any Person named by the United States Treasury Department as a Specifically Designated National and Blocked Person, or for or on behalf of any Person designated in Executive Order 13224 as a Person who commits, threatens to commit, or supports terrorism. Purchaser is not engaged in the transaction contemplated by this Agreement directly or indirectly on behalf of, or facilitating such transaction directly or indirectly on behalf of, any such Person. ARTICLE 5. ACTIONS PENDING CLOSING 5.1 DUE DILIGENCE PERIOD. 5.1.1 Purchaser shall have a period from the Contract Date through 5:00 p.m. Pacific Time on April 28, 2005 ("Due Diligence Period") within which to undertake such inspections and investigations of the Property as Purchaser deems desirable to evaluate the financial and physical condition of the Property and such other matters that Purchaser may deem relevant. If Purchaser, in its sole discretion, shall determine that the Property or any matters related to the Property are unsatisfactory, then Purchaser may terminate this Agreement by written notice ("Termination Notice") given 8
to Seller prior to the end of the Due Diligence Period. If Purchaser elects not to terminate this Agreement in such manner, then Purchaser shall deliver the Second Deposit to the Title Company in accordance with Section 2.2.2.2. Time is of the essence with respect to the giving of a Termination Notice and the delivery of the Second Deposit in accordance with this Section 5.1. Upon the giving of a Termination Notice prior to the expiration of the Due Diligence Period, this Agreement shall terminate, the Title Company shall return the Initial Deposit to Purchaser and neither party to this Agreement shall thereafter have any further rights or liabilities under this Agreement other than those that expressly survive termination of this Agreement. 5.1.2 Prior to Closing, Purchaser and Purchaser's agents and contractors shall have the right to enter upon the Land and the Improvements thereon at reasonable times and upon reasonable prior notice to Seller. Purchaser and Purchaser's agents and contractors shall be accompanied by a representative of Seller during any such entry upon the Land and the Improvements. Purchaser agrees that all inspections of the Property shall be conducted in a manner not unreasonably disruptive to Seller, guests, invitees or employees at the Property or otherwise to the operation of the Property. Seller shall have the right to require Purchaser and its representatives to be accompanied by a representative of Seller during any entry onto the Property pursuant to this Section 5.1.2. In the event Purchaser desires to conduct any physically invasive due diligence such as sampling of soils or drilling wells, Purchaser shall request Seller's prior consent thereto, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. Prior to entry onto the Property, Purchaser shall provide Seller with a certificate of insurance evidencing that Purchaser maintains a commercial general liability policy that names Seller as an additional insured, in such amounts and from such insurers as Seller shall approve, such approval not to be unreasonably withheld. Purchaser shall (i) restore the Property, at its own expense, to substantially the same condition which existed prior to any inspections or other activities of Purchaser thereon; and (ii) be responsible for and pay any and all liens by contractors, subcontractors, materialmen, or laborers performing the inspections or any other work for Purchaser, its agents or contractors on or related to the Property. Purchaser agrees to and hereby does indemnify, defend and hold harmless Seller, its affiliates, members, partners, shareholders, officers, directors, employees, agents, representatives, licensees, guests and invitees, and the successors of any of the foregoing, harmless from and against any and all claims and damages arising from property damage, mechanic's and materialmen's liens, damage due to personal injury, and costs, including attorneys' fees and remediation costs, associated with any release of Hazardous Materials caused by the entry by Purchaser and/or any of Purchaser's agents or contractors onto the Property pursuant to this Section 5.1.2, provided that Purchaser shall not be liable to Seller for the mere discovery by Purchaser or its agents or contractors of any existing condition at the Property. Purchaser's obligations pursuant to this Section 5.1 shall survive the Closing (without limitation as to time) or earlier termination of this Agreement. 5.1.3 During the term of this Agreement, Seller shall make available to Purchaser for inspection and copying at the Property or at Seller's offices, or at Seller's option deliver to Purchaser, such documents, materials and information concerning the physical condition of the Property, the structural integrity of the Property, title matters and compliance of the Property with Legal Requirements as are in Seller's possession. 9
Notwithstanding the foregoing, Seller shall have no obligation to deliver to Purchaser (i) materials that Seller shall have obtained or developed in connection with the potential sale of the Property, (ii) materials that relate primarily to Seller's financial affairs, business or research and development operations as distinguished from the operation of the Property and (iii) materials that are subject to attorney-client privilege or reveal trade secrets. 5.1.4 Purchaser shall, at Seller's election and at no cost to Seller (but without representation or warranty of any kind), furnish to Seller copies of any third-party reports (other than those that are proprietary to Purchaser or are integral to Purchaser's national business plan) received by Purchaser relating to any inspections of the Property conducted on Purchaser's behalf. Upon any termination of this Agreement (other than a termination resulting from a default by Seller), Purchaser shall assign all of its right, title and interest in any such reports to Seller (without representation or warranty of any kind). Purchaser's obligation in this Section 5.1.4 shall survive the termination of this Agreement. 5.2 TITLE AND SURVEY. 5.2.1 Purchaser has been provided with a title insurance commitment for the Property for an ALTA Owner's Policy of Title Insurance dated February 7, 2005 ("Title Commitment"), accompanied by a copy of all documents referred to as exceptions in the Title Commitment. 5.2.2 Purchaser has been provided with a survey of the Property dated February 16, 2001 ("Existing Survey"). Promptly following the Contract Date, Purchaser shall order either an update of the Existing Survey or, if required by Purchaser, a new survey of the Property ("Survey") prepared in accordance with the Minimum Standard Detail Requirements and Classifications for ALTA/ACSM Land Title Surveys published in 1999 ("Survey Standards"). 5.2.3 On or before the expiration of the Due Diligence Period ("Title Objection Date"), Purchaser shall notify Seller of any items in the Survey that were not disclosed in the Existing Survey or in the Title Commitment that are unsatisfactory to Purchaser ("Objections"). Except to the extent that Purchaser so notifies Seller of any Objections, any item reflected in the Title Commitment, and any item shown on the Existing Survey, shall be deemed to have been approved by Purchaser and shall be Permitted Exceptions for all purposes under this Agreement. 5.2.4 If Purchaser timely notifies Seller of any Objections, Seller may, but shall not be obligated to, endeavor to cure the Objections to Purchaser's and the Title Company's reasonable satisfaction. Seller shall give notice to Purchaser on or before the date that is five (5) days following the date on which Purchaser notified Seller of its Objections stating whether Seller agrees to cure each such Objection prior to the Closing. If Seller fails timely to give such notice, then Seller shall be conclusively deemed to have elected not to cure any such Objections. Seller shall endeavor to cure at or before the Closing any Objection that it has agreed to cure in accordance with this Section 5.2.4, 10
provided that Seller shall have the right to extend the Closing for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days in the aggregate if necessary to effect such cure. Seller may use a portion of the Purchase Price to effect such cure at Closing, and a title insurance endorsement reasonably acceptable to Purchaser that affirmatively insures over any Objection shall constitute cure of such Objection. 5.2.5 If Seller elects (or is deemed to elect) not to agree to cure any such Objections, then Purchaser may either (i) waive such Objections, without any reduction of the Purchase Price, in which event such waived Objections shall become Permitted Exceptions for all purposes under this Agreement or (ii) terminate this Agreement by written notice to Seller, whereupon the Initial Deposit shall be promptly returned to Purchaser and the parties shall have no further rights or liabilities under this Agreement other than those that expressly survive the termination of this Agreement. Purchaser shall make the election described in the preceding sentence by written notice to Seller on or before the expiration of the Due Diligence Period, and in the event Purchaser does not make such election, Purchaser shall be conclusively deemed to have waived all Objections other than those that Seller has agreed to cure in accordance with Section 5.2.4. 5.2.6 Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 5.2, Seller shall cure at or before the Closing (i) any mortgage lien created by, through or under Seller, other than any UCC financing statement filed with respect to a Contract involving a lease of Seller's personal property, (ii) any recorded mechanics' lien or materialmen's lien resulting from work performed for Seller (it being agreed that Seller shall be entitled to cure such liens by bonding over the same in a manner reasonably acceptable to Purchaser), and (iii) any judgment lien, tax lien (other than taxes not yet due and payable) or other lien securing a monetary amount, created by, through or under Seller, which may be removed by the payment of a liquidated sum of money, provided that Seller shall not be required to expend more than $500,000.00 in the aggregate with respect to Objections described in clauses (ii) and (iii). Seller may use a portion of the Purchase Price to effect such cure at Closing. 5.3 OPERATION OF PROPERTY. Prior to Closing: 5.3.1 Seller shall continue to operate the Property in the ordinary course of business consistent with the practices and procedures in effect as of the Contract Date, except to the extent that this Agreement expressly provides otherwise. 5.3.2 Seller shall maintain all Improvements substantially in their present condition, except for reasonable wear and tear and damage by casualty or condemnation. 5.3.3 Seller shall continue to maintain the insurance currently carried by it with respect to the Property. 5.3.4 Seller shall cooperate with Purchaser (at no cost to Seller) in connection with Purchaser's efforts to secure extensions of time for certain permits issued 11
by governmental authorities relating to the development of the Expansion Lot (as defined in Seller's Lease). 5.4 CONTRACTS. Prior to Closing, Seller shall not enter into any new Contract that would be binding on Purchaser from and after Closing. 5.5 UPDATES TO REPRESENTATIONS. Prior to Closing, Seller and Purchaser shall each promptly notify the other in writing if it becomes aware of any fact or condition that is inconsistent with any of Seller's representations or warranties under this Agreement. Purchaser shall be bound by any state of facts of which it is aware prior to Closing, notwithstanding any representation or warranty to the contrary made hereunder by Seller. Accordingly, Seller shall not be deemed to have breached any representation or warranty made hereunder to the extent that Purchaser was aware prior to Closing that such representation or warranty was not accurate. 5.6 SATISFACTION OF CONDITIONS. Prior to Closing, Seller and Purchaser shall each use good faith, commercially reasonable efforts to satisfy the conditions to Closing set forth in Article 6. ARTICLE 6. CONDITIONS TO CLOSING 6.1 PURCHASER'S CONDITIONS TO CLOSING. The obligation of Purchaser to consummate the Closing shall be subject to the satisfaction of each of the following conditions, any or all of which may be waived in whole or in part by Purchaser: 6.1.1 Each of Seller's representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement (as modified by all modifications and updates expressly permitted by Section 5.5 or Section 7.6) shall be correct in all material respects as of the Closing Date. 6.1.2 Seller shall have performed all of its material obligations under this Agreement required at or prior to Closing, including execution of Seller's Lease as tenant thereunder. 6.1.3 Title to the Land and Improvements shall be good and marketable fee simple title, subject only to the Permitted Exceptions, and insurable at standard rates in an amount equal to the Purchase Price. 6.2 FAILURE OF PURCHASER'S CONDITION. In the event of the failure of any condition set forth in Section 6.1, Purchaser, at its sole election, may (i) terminate this Agreement and receive a return of the Deposit, (ii) waive the condition and proceed to Closing, or (iii) extend the Closing Date for such additional period of time (not to exceed thirty (30) days in the aggregate) as may be reasonably required to allow such condition to be satisfied. Nothing set forth in this Section 6.2 shall affect Purchaser's rights or remedies under Section 8.3 with respect to any breach of this Agreement by Seller. 12
6.3 SELLER'S CONDITIONS TO CLOSING. The obligation of Seller to consummate the Closing shall be subject to the satisfaction of each of the following conditions, any or all of which may be waived in whole or in part by Seller: 6.3.1 Each of Purchaser's representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement shall be correct in all material respects as of the Closing Date. 6.3.2 Each of Purchaser's representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement shall be correct in all material respects as if made by Purchaser's Designee as of the Closing Date. 6.3.3 Purchaser shall have performed all of its material obligations under this Agreement required at or prior to Closing, including execution of Seller's Lease as landlord thereunder. 6.4 FAILURE OF SELLER'S CONDITION. In the event of the failure of any condition precedent set forth in Section 6.3, Seller, at its sole election, may (i) terminate this Agreement, (ii) waive the condition and proceed to Closing, or (iii) extend the Closing Date for such additional period of time (not to exceed thirty (30) days in the aggregate) as may be reasonably required to allow Purchaser to satisfy such condition. Nothing set forth in this Section 6.4 shall affect Seller's rights or remedies under Section 8.2 with respect to any breach of this Agreement by Purchaser. ARTICLE 7. CLOSING 7.1 CLOSING. 7.1.1 Closing shall be held on May 2, 2005, or on such earlier date as is mutually agreed upon by Seller and Purchaser, subject to extension as expressly provided in this Agreement. Closing shall be conducted through an escrow with the Title Company, and Seller and Purchaser shall execute (or cause their counsel to execute) such additional instructions to the Title Company as may be required in connection therewith. 7.1.2 Pre-closing ("Pre-Closing") shall be held on the business day immediately preceding the scheduled date for Closing. At Pre-Closing, Seller and Purchaser shall execute and deliver to the Title Company all documents and deliveries required under Sections 7.2 and 7.3, other than the Settlement Statement and payment of the Purchase Price. Seller and Purchaser shall complete and execute the Settlement Statement, and Purchaser shall pay the portion of the Purchase Price required pursuant to Section 2.2.2.4 to the Title Company at Closing by wire transfer of immediately available funds, such that the amounts due to or on behalf of Seller pursuant to the Settlement Statement shall be wire transferred into a bank account or accounts designated by Seller no later than 1:00 p.m. local time at the Property on the Closing Date. 7.2 SELLER'S CLOSING DELIVERIES. At or prior to Closing, Seller shall deliver to the Title Company the following: 13
7.2.1 A deed substantially in the form of Exhibit A conveying the fee estate in the Land and Improvements, with such modifications as are required by local law so that such deed will be in recordable form, duly executed and acknowledged by Seller, and dated as of the Closing Date. 7.2.2 An assignment and assumption in the form of Exhibit B, transferring to Purchaser all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to the Intangible Property, duly executed by Seller, and dated as of the Closing Date. 7.2.3 Subject to the provisions of Section 7.6 hereof, a certificate, duly executed by Seller, confirming that its representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement are correct in all material respects as if made on the Closing Date, modified as Seller may determine to be required to reflect additional or changed facts or circumstances (including additional facts or circumstances which may have become known to Seller after the execution of this Agreement, but prior to Closing). 7.2.4 A title affidavit, in customary form reasonably satisfactory to the Title Company and Seller, with respect to mechanics' liens and parties in possession, duly executed by Seller, provided that such affidavits shall not subject Seller to any material liabilities other than as may be required by Section 5.2. 7.2.5 An affidavit, in the form required by the Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, to the effect that Seller is not a foreign person within the meaning of the Code. 7.2.6 Such evidence of the power and authority of Seller to consummate the transactions described in this Agreement as may be reasonably required by Purchaser or Title Company. 7.2.7 A written direction to the Title Company to disburse the Deposit to Seller in accordance with Section 8.1.2.2. 7.2.8 A Settlement Statement, duly executed by Seller. 7.2.9 The Seller's Lease duly executed by Seller as tenant thereunder, dated as of the Closing Date. 7.2.10 To the extent required by any Contract, notice in form approved by Purchaser, informing the parties other than Seller to such Contract of the change in ownership of the Property. 7.2.11 Such other documents and instruments as are customary and as may be reasonably requested by Purchaser or the Title Company, to effectuate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 7.3 PURCHASER'S CLOSING DELIVERIES. At or prior to Closing, Purchaser shall deliver to the Title Company the following: 14
7.3.1 An assignment and assumption of the Intangible Property in the form of Exhibit B, duly executed by Purchaser (or by Purchaser's Designee), and dated as of the Closing Date. 7.3.2 A certificate, duly executed by Purchaser, confirming that its representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement are correct in all material respects as if made on the Closing Date (or noting any exceptions). 7.3.3 Such evidence of the power and authority of Purchaser and Purchaser's Designee to consummate the transactions described in this Agreement as may be reasonably required by Seller or Title Company. 7.3.4 A written direction to the Title Company to disburse the Deposit to Seller in accordance with Section 8.1.2.2. 7.3.5 The balance of the Purchase Price. 7.3.6 A Settlement Statement, duly executed by Purchaser or Purchaser's Designee. 7.3.7 The Seller's Lease duly executed by Purchaser as landlord thereunder, dated as of the Closing Date. 7.3.8 Such other documents and instruments as are customary and as may be reasonably requested by Seller or the Title Company to effectuate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 7.4 CLOSING COSTS. All escrow or settlement fees of the Title Company shall be borne by Purchaser. All state, county and local taxes and fees related to the transfer and recordation of the deed transferring title to the Property to Seller and of the recordation of a memorandum of Seller's Lease shall be borne by Seller. Seller and Purchaser shall each bear its own counsel's fees and expenses in connection with the transactions described in this Agreement. Purchaser shall pay all costs of Purchaser's due diligence investigations of the Property, title insurance premiums and costs, costs of the Survey, and all costs of Purchaser's financing. 7.5 INDEMNIFICATION. 7.5.1 Subject to any express provisions of this Agreement to the contrary, from and after Closing, Seller hereby agrees to indemnify Purchaser, Purchaser's Designees, and their respective directors, officers, employees, partners, members and affiliates (collectively, "Purchaser Indemnified Parties"), and to hold Purchaser Indemnified Parties harmless from and against, any and all Damages paid or incurred by Purchaser Indemnified Parties due to any breach of any representation or warranty made by Seller in this Agreement. 7.5.2 In connection with any indemnification claim under Section 7.5.1, Purchaser shall afford Seller a full opportunity to defend such claims, using counsel 15
reasonably acceptable to Purchaser, in the name of Purchaser and generally shall cooperate with Purchaser in the defense of such claim. 7.5.3 Seller's indemnification of Purchaser pursuant to Section 7.5.1 shall terminate on the date that is nine (9) months after the Closing Date. From and after Closing, the indemnification provisions in this Section 7.5 shall be the exclusive remedy of Purchaser in connection with any of the matters described in this Section 7.5 and the transaction described in this Agreement, and Purchaser hereby waives and releases any other rights or remedies it may have under applicable law or at equity in connection therewith. 7.5.4 Seller shall only have liability for any individual indemnity claim under this Section 7.5 to the extent the actual damages suffered by Purchaser from such individual claim exceed $50,000. Further, Seller's aggregate liability for any actual damages suffered by Purchaser for all indemnity claims made under this Section 7.5 shall not exceed $500,000. 7.6 SUBSEQUENT CHANGES TO SELLER'S REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES. Seller covenants and agrees to notify Purchaser in writing of any state of facts becoming known to Seller after the date hereof which would render materially inaccurate any of the representations and warranties made by Seller promptly after such facts become known to Seller. In such event, Purchaser may, as its sole remedy, terminate this Agreement upon written notice to Seller given within two (2) days after receipt of Seller's notification and receive a return of the Deposit, whereupon neither Seller nor Purchaser shall have any further liability hereunder except for those matters which either expressly or by their very nature survive termination. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Purchaser shall not have the right to terminate this Agreement, as aforesaid, if Seller commences and diligently pursues the cure of the condition which has rendered the affected representation and warranty to be materially inaccurate and in fact effects such cure not later than sixty (60) days after the originally-scheduled date for Closing. 7.7 SURVIVAL. 7.7.1 Except where this Agreement expressly provides for a longer period, the representations, warranties, covenants and indemnities of Seller and Purchaser set forth in this Agreement shall survive Closing until the date that is nine (9) months after the Closing Date, and any action on any such representation, warranty, covenant or indemnity must be instituted on or before such date. 7.7.2 Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, if at or prior to Closing Purchaser obtains actual knowledge that any representation or warranty of Seller under this Agreement (as the same is modified pursuant to Section 7.6) is inaccurate in any respect, but nonetheless proceeds to Closing, Purchaser shall be deemed to have waived any right to make a claim arising out of such inaccuracy. 16
ARTICLE 8. ESCROW, DEFAULT, REMEDIES 8.1 ESCROW TERMS. 8.1.1 The Title Company shall promptly give notice to Purchaser and Seller upon its receipt of any portion of the Deposit from Purchaser in accordance with this Agreement. The Title Company shall invest the Deposit in an interest bearing money market account at such bank as the Title Company may elect and shall be approved by Purchaser and Seller. The Title Company shall not be liable for any loss of such investment (unless due to the Title Company's gross negligence or willful misconduct). All interest on the Deposit shall be treated by the Title Company for income tax purposes as earned by Purchaser, and Purchaser's tax identification number for this purpose is 04-3221586. 8.1.2 The Title Company shall deliver the Deposit to Seller or to Purchaser, as the case may be, under the following conditions: 8.1.2.1 the Deposit shall be delivered to Purchaser if, prior to 5:00 p.m. (Pacific Standard Time) on the last day of the Due Diligence Period, Purchaser has delivered to Seller and Title Company written notice of termination of this Agreement in accordance with Section 5.1. 8.1.2.2 the Deposit shall be delivered to or at the direction of Seller at Closing upon receipt by the Title Company of a statement executed by Seller and Purchaser that the Deposit may be so released; or 8.1.2.3 the Deposit shall be delivered to Seller following receipt by the Title Company of written demand therefor from Seller, stating that Purchaser has defaulted in the performance of its obligations under this Agreement and specifying the Section of this Agreement which entitles Seller to receive the Deposit, if Purchaser shall not have given written notice of objection in accordance with Section 8.1.3; or 8.1.2.4 the Deposit shall be delivered to Purchaser following receipt by the Title Company of written demand therefor from Purchaser stating that Seller has defaulted in the performance of its obligations under this Agreement or that this Agreement was terminated under circumstances entitling Purchaser to the return of the Deposit, and specifying the Section of this Agreement which entitles Purchaser to the return of the Deposit, if Seller shall not have given written notice of objection in accordance with Section 8.1.3; or 8.1.2.5 the Deposit shall be delivered as directed by joint written instructions of Seller and Purchaser. 8.1.3 Upon the filing of a written demand for the Deposit by Seller or Purchaser pursuant to Section 8.1.2.3 or 8.1.2.4, the Title Company shall promptly give notice thereof (including a copy of such demand) to the other party. The other party shall have the right to object to the delivery of the Deposit, by giving notice of such objection to the Title Company at any time within five (5) business days after such party's receipt 17
of notice from the Title Company, but not thereafter. Failure to deliver such objection notice within such period shall be deemed to be a waiver of such party's right to object to the Title Company's compliance with such demand. Such objection notice shall set forth the basis for objecting to the delivery of the Deposit. Upon receipt of such notice of objection, the Title Company shall promptly give a copy of such notice to the party who filed the written demand. The foregoing five (5) business day period does not constitute a cure period in which either Seller or Purchaser, as the case may be, shall be required to accept tender of cure of any default under this Agreement. 8.1.4 If the Title Company shall have received the notice of objection provided for in Section 8.1.3 within the time therein prescribed, the Title Company shall continue to hold the Deposit until (i) the Title Company receives written notice from Seller and Purchaser directing the disbursement of the Deposit, in which case the Title Company shall then disburse the Deposit in accordance with said direction, or (ii) litigation is commenced between Seller and Purchaser, in which case the Title Company shall deposit the Deposit with the clerk of the court in which said litigation is pending, or (iii) the Title Company takes such affirmative steps as the Title Company may elect, at the Title Company's option, in order to terminate the Title Company's duties hereunder (but in no event disbursing the Deposit to either Seller or Purchaser), including depositing the Deposit in court and commencing an action for interpleader, the costs thereof to be borne by whichever of Seller or Purchaser is the losing party. 8.1.5 The Title Company may rely and act upon any instrument or other writing reasonably believed by it to be genuine and purporting to be signed and presented by any person or persons purporting to have authority to act on behalf of Seller or Purchaser, as the case may be, and shall not be liable in connection with the performance of any duties imposed upon the Title Company as escrow agent by the provisions of this Agreement, except for the Title Company's own gross negligence, willful misconduct or default. The Title Company shall have no duties or responsibilities except those set forth herein. The Title Company shall not be bound by any modification or termination of this Agreement unless the same is in writing and signed by Purchaser and Seller, and, if the Title Company's duties hereunder are affected, unless the Title Company shall have given prior written consent thereto. The Title Company shall be reimbursed by Seller and Purchaser for any expenses (including reasonable legal fees and disbursements of outside counsel, including all of the Title Company's fees and expenses with respect to any interpleader action pursuant to Section 8.1.4) incurred in connection with this Agreement, and such liability shall be joint and several; provided that, as between Purchaser and Seller, the prevailing party in any dispute over the Deposit shall be entitled to reimbursement of any such expenses paid to the Title Company. In the event that the Title Company shall be uncertain as to the Title Company's duties or rights hereunder, or shall receive instructions from Purchaser or Seller that, in the Title Company's opinion, are in conflict with any of the provisions hereof, the Title Company shall be entitled to continue to hold the Deposit pursuant to Section 8.1.4, and may decline to take any other action. 8.1.6 The Title Company shall have the right at any time to resign as escrow agent upon ten (10) business days prior notice to Seller and Purchaser. Seller and 18
Purchaser shall jointly select a successor escrow agent and shall notify the Title Company of the name and address of such successor escrow agent within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice from the Title Company of its intent to resign as escrow agent. If the Title Company has not received notice of the name and address of such successor escrow agent within such period, the Title Company shall have the right to select on behalf of Seller and Purchaser a bank or trust company to act as its successor hereunder. At any time after the ten (10) business day period, the Title Company shall have the right to deliver the Deposit to any successor selected hereunder, provided such successor shall execute and deliver to Seller and Purchaser an assumption agreement whereby it assumes all of the Title Company's obligations hereunder as escrow agent. Upon the delivery of all such amounts and such assumption agreement, the successor shall become the escrow agent for all purposes under this Section 8.1 and shall have all of the rights and obligations of the Title Company under this Section 8.1, and the Title Company shall have no further responsibilities or obligations hereunder as escrow agent. 8.2 PURCHASER'S DEFAULT. If Purchaser defaults in its obligation to proceed to Closing in accordance with this Agreement, or if any condition set forth in Section 6.3 is not satisfied and Seller elects not to proceed to Closing, and if such default is not cured and/or such condition is not satisfied within five (5) days after Seller has given Purchaser written notice of the same, then the Title Company shall, subject to Sections 8.1.3 and 8.1.4, pay the Deposit to Seller, as full and complete liquidated damages, and as the exclusive and sole right and remedy of Seller. Upon payment of the Deposit to Seller pursuant to this Section 8.2, this Agreement shall terminate and neither party shall have any further obligations or liabilities to the other party, except for obligations that expressly survive termination of this Agreement. Purchaser acknowledges that Seller's actual damages caused by Purchaser's default in its obligation to proceed to Closing would be difficult to determine precisely and that the Deposit, as liquidated damages, is a fair and reasonable approximation. Seller hereby waives any right to recover damages (whether actual, consequential, punitive or other) as a result of Purchaser's default in its obligation to proceed to Closing in accordance with this Agreement or as a result of any conditions set forth in Section 6.3 not being satisfied, except for the liquidated damages as described in this Section 8.2. 8.3 SELLER'S DEFAULT. If Seller defaults in its obligation to proceed to Closing in accordance with this Agreement, or if any condition set forth in Section 6.1 is not satisfied and Purchaser elects not to proceed to Closing, and if such default is not cured and/or such condition is not satisfied within five (5) days after Purchaser has given Seller written notice of the same, then Purchaser shall be entitled, as its sole remedy, to either (i) specific performance of this Agreement, provided that any action for specific performance must be initiated no later than sixty (60) days after the date that Closing is otherwise required to occur under this Agreement, or (ii) terminate this Agreement and, subject to Sections 8.1.3 and 8.1.4, receive a return of the Deposit. Upon return of the Deposit to Purchaser pursuant to this Section 8.3, this Agreement shall terminate and neither party shall have any further obligations or liabilities to the other party, except for obligations that expressly survive termination of this Agreement. Purchaser hereby waives any right to recover damages (whether actual, consequential, punitive or other) as 19
a result of Seller's default in its obligation to proceed to Closing in accordance with this Agreement or as a result of any condition set forth in Section 6.1 not being satisfied. ARTICLE 9. CASUALTY AND CONDEMNATION 9.1 NOTICE TO PURCHASER. Seller shall give Purchaser notice of the following promptly upon becoming aware of the same: (i) any pending or threatened condemnation affecting the Property prior to Closing, and (ii) any material fire or other casualty affecting the Property and occurring prior to Closing. 9.2 MINOR CASUALTY OR CONDEMNATION. If prior to Closing, (i) condemnation proceedings are commenced against all or any portion of the Property, and such proceedings do not materially adversely affect the continued operation of the Property in substantially the same manner as the Property is operated on the Contract Date, or (ii) the Property is damaged by fire or other casualty to the extent that the cost of repairing such damage is reasonably estimated by Seller and Purchaser, each acting reasonably and in good faith, to be five percent (5%) of the Purchase Price, or less, then this Agreement shall continue in full force and effect and the Purchase Price shall not be reduced except as hereinafter set forth, but Purchaser shall be entitled to an assignment of all of the proceeds payable to Seller of fire or other casualty insurance (other than those proceeds expended by or on behalf of Seller prior to Closing to restore the Property), all business interruption or rent loss insurance proceeds (if any) payable with respect to the period from and after Closing, and all condemnation awards payable to Seller (other than any portion of the award in respect of income lost prior to Closing or expended by or on behalf of Seller prior to Closing to restore the Property), as the case may be, and Seller shall have no obligation to repair or restore the Property; provided, however, that in the case of any insured casualty, the Purchase Price shall be reduced by the "deductible" applied by the applicable Seller's insurer with respect to such fire or casualty and not paid by Seller prior to Closing. 9.3 MAJOR CASUALTY OR CONDEMNATION. If prior to Closing, (i) condemnation proceedings are commenced against all or any material portion of the Property and such proceedings are not covered by Section 9.2, or (ii) the Property is damaged by fire or other casualty and such damage is not covered by Section 9.2, either Purchaser or Seller shall have the right, upon notice in writing to the other party delivered within ten (10) days after Seller gives Purchaser notice of such matter as described in this Section 9.3, to terminate this Agreement, whereupon this Agreement shall terminate, the Title Company shall return the Deposit to Purchaser and neither party to this Agreement shall thereafter have any further rights or liabilities under this Agreement other than those that expressly survive termination of this Agreement. If neither party timely elects to terminate this Agreement, then this Agreement shall continue in full force and effect and the Purchase Price shall not be reduced except as hereinafter set forth, but Purchaser shall be entitled to an assignment of all of the proceeds payable to Seller of fire or other casualty insurance (other than those proceeds expended by or on behalf of Seller prior to Closing to restore the Property), all business interruption or rent loss insurance proceeds (if any) payable with respect to the period from and after Closing, and all condemnation awards payable to Seller (other than any portion of the award in respect of income lost prior to Closing or 20
expended by or on behalf of Seller prior to Closing to restore the Property), as the case may be, and Seller shall have no obligation to repair or restore the Property; provided, however, that in the case of any insured casualty, the Purchase Price shall be reduced by the "deductible" applied by the applicable Seller's insurer with respect to such fire or casualty and not paid by such Seller prior to Closing. ARTICLE 10. CERTAIN TAX MATTERS 10.1 TAX APPEALS. If any appeal of any taxes or assessments relating to the Property is pending as of the Closing Date, Seller shall be entitled to receive any rebate or credit resulting from such appeal, and shall pay all expenses of prosecuting such appeal. 10.2 TRANSACTION TAXES. Seller shall be responsible for its federal and state income, franchise and similar taxes applicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Purchaser shall be responsible for any bulk sales taxes, personal property sales taxes, and similar taxes applicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 10.3 SURVIVAL. This Article 10 shall survive Closing. ARTICLE 11. MISCELLANEOUS 11.1 ASSIGNMENT. Neither Seller nor Purchaser shall assign this Agreement without the consent of the other. Notwithstanding the foregoing, without Seller's consent, Purchaser shall have the right to assign the right to receive the Property at Closing to another Person ("Purchaser's Designee"), subject to the following conditions: (i) such Purchaser's Designee owns, is wholly owned (directly or indirectly) by Purchaser; (ii) Purchaser shall give notice given to Seller no later than ten (10) days after the Contract Date of the identity of Purchaser's Designee; and (iii) such assignment shall not delay or otherwise adversely affect Closing. Upon any such assignment, Purchaser's Designee shall be deemed to have assumed for the benefit of Seller all obligations of Purchaser under this Agreement, but such assignment shall not relieve Purchaser of its obligations under this Agreement. 11.2 NOTICES. Notices and other communications required or permitted under this Agreement shall be in writing and delivered by hand against receipt or sent by recognized overnight delivery service, by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, with return receipt requested or by facsimile. All notices shall be addressed as follows: If to Seller: ArQule, Inc. 19 Presidential Way Woburn, MA 01801 Attention: Chief Financial Officer Fax: 781-994-0587 21
with a copy to: Arnold & Porter LLP 555 Twelfth Street, N.W. Washington, DC 20004 Attention: Kenneth L. Schwartz Fax: 202-942-5999 If to Purchaser: ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC c/o Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc. 135 North Robles Avenue, Suite 250 Pasadena, CA 91101 Attention: Corporate Secretary Fax: 626-578-7318 with a copy to: Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr 60 State Street Boston, MA 02109 Attention: Katharine Bachman Fax: 617-526-5000 If to Title Company: Chicago Title Insurance Company Maggie G. Watson 700 S. Flower Street, Suite 800 Los Angeles, CA 90017 Fax: 213-488-4380 or to such other addresses as may be designated by a proper notice. Notices shall be deemed to be effective on and as of a particular day upon receipt (or refusal thereof) if delivered on or before 5:00 Pacific Time in the following manner: if personally delivered, sent by recognized overnight delivery service, or sent by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, with return receipt requested, or upon electronically verified transmission, if such delivery is by facsimile. 11.3 WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL; JURISDICTION. SELLER AND PURCHASER EACH HEREBY WAIVES ANY RIGHT TO JURY TRIAL IN THE EVENT ANY PARTY FILES AN ACTION RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR TO THE TRANSACTIONS OR OBLIGATIONS CONTEMPLATED BY THIS AGREEMENT. Any action, suit or proceeding arising out of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated by this Agreement shall be brought exclusively in the federal or state court having jurisdiction over Boston, Massachusetts, and Seller and Purchaser agree that such courts are the most convenient forum for resolution of any such action and further agree to submit to the jurisdiction of such courts and waive any right to object to venue in such courts. 11.4 COUNTERPARTS AND EFFECTIVENESS. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts which, when taken together, shall constitute a single binding 22
instrument. Execution and delivery of this Agreement by facsimile shall be sufficient for all purposes and shall be binding on any Person who so executes. 11.5 BROKERAGE. Purchaser represents to Seller that no broker, finder or similar consultant has acted on its behalf in connection with this Agreement or the Seller's Lease. Seller represents to Purchaser that other than CB Richard Ellis Lynch Murphy Walsh Advisors ("Broker"), no broker, finder or similar consultant has acted on its behalf in connection with this Agreement or the Seller's Lease. Seller shall pay all fees of Broker in connection with this Agreement and the Seller's Lease, if any. Purchaser and Seller each shall indemnify and hold the other harmless from claims make by any broker, finder or similar consultant claiming through it for a commission, fee or compensation in connection with this Agreement or Seller's Lease, and such indemnity shall survive Closing without limitation as to time. The indemnification obligations set forth in this Section 11.5 shall survive Closing or any termination of this Agreement. 11.6 CONFIDENTIALITY. Purchaser and Seller shall each maintain as confidential any and all information and material obtained about the other which is furnished to it by the other in connection with this Agreement, and such obligation shall survive any termination of this Agreement and shall survive Closing. Purchaser and Seller shall each maintain as confidential the terms of this Agreement and such obligation shall survive any termination of this Agreement, but shall terminate at Closing. Purchaser shall maintain as confidential any and all information and material about the Property which is furnished to it by or on behalf of Seller, and such obligation shall survive any termination of this Agreement but shall terminate at Closing. Confidential information shall not include information and material which (i) becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of a disclosure prohibited by this Section 11.6, (ii) is known to Purchaser or Seller, as the case may be, on a non-confidential basis, prior to its receipt of such information and material from the other party, or (iii) becomes available to Purchaser or Seller, as the case may be, on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the other party which is not prohibited from disclosing the same. Notwithstanding the foregoing, (a) each of Purchaser and Seller may disclose confidential information to its employees, agents or advisors, and to potential investors or lenders, in each case on a need-to-know basis after the recipients of the information have been informed of the confidential nature of such information and directed not to disclose such information except in accordance with this Section 11.6, (b) each of Purchaser and Seller may disclose confidential information to the extent required by applicable law or the rules of any applicable securities exchange, and (c) Purchaser and Seller, following prior notice to and consultation with the other, may disclose the transaction contemplated by this Agreement to the extent necessary to obtain consents or approvals contemplated by this Agreement. 11.7 BULK SALES COMPLIANCE. Seller and Purchaser acknowledge that they do not intend to comply with and have agreed to waive the provisions of any statutory bulk sale or similar requirements applicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and Seller and Purchaser agree to rely upon the adjustment provisions of this Agreement to address any matters that would otherwise be subject to such bulk sale requirements. 23
11.8 PUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENTS. Neither Seller nor Purchaser shall make any public statement or issue any press release prior to the date that is one hundred eighty (180) days after the Closing with respect to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated by this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other party (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed) except as otherwise required by law. If either party determines that applicable legal requirements require disclosure of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby prior to Closing, then, not less than twenty-four (24) hours prior to such disclosure, such party shall notify and provide the other party an opportunity to comment on the disclosing party's form of press release, securities filing or other written disclosure. Securities filings of either party that effect a republication of previously issued press releases or public statements shall not require notice to or the consent of the other party. 11.9 RECORDATION. Neither Seller nor Purchaser shall record this Agreement or any notice of this Agreement in the land records of any jurisdiction. 11.10 TIME OF ESSENCE. Time is of the essence with respect to all obligations of Seller and Purchaser under this Agreement. [SIGNATURES ON FOLLOWING PAGE] 24
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Seller and Purchaser have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the Contract Date: SELLER : ARQULE, INC. 19 Presidential Way Woburn, MA 01801 By: /s/ Louise A. Mawhinney Name: Louise A. Mawhinney Its: Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary PURCHASER: ARE-MA REGION NO. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company By: Alexandria Real Estate Equities, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership By: ARE-QRS Corp., a Maryland corporation By: /s/ Jennifer Pappas Name: Jennifer Pappas Its: Vice President and Assistant Secretary JOINDER OF THE TITLE COMPANY The undersigned is joining this Agreement to evidence its agreement to receive, hold and disburse the Deposit in accordance with the terms of the Agreement. CHICAGO TITLE INSURANCE COMPANY By: /s/ Gus Aguilar ___________________________________ Name: Gus Aguilar __________________________________ Its: Senior Escrow Officer __________________________________ 25
LIST OF EXHIBITS
EXHIBIT A (FORM OF DEED) QUITCLAIM DEED ARQULE, INC., a Delaware corporation having an address of 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801 (the "Grantor"), for full consideration of FORTY MILLION ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND and 00/100 DOLLARS ($40,100,000.00) paid, grants with QUITCLAIM COVENANTS to ARE-MA REGION NO. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company having an address c/o Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc., 135 N. Los Robles Avenue, Suite 250, Pasadena, CA 91101, certain parcels of land located off Presidential Way in the City of Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, described as follows: Lot 11 and Lot 12: Two contiguous parcels of Registered Land on Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Lot 11 and Lot 12 on Land Court Plan 36099-D, a copy of which is filed with the Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court with Certificate of Title No. 212009. Parcel 5B-1 A parcel of land situated near Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Parcel 5B-1 on a plan entitled, "Subdivision Plan of Land in Woburn, Massachusetts," dated January 16, 2001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc., recorded Middlesex South Registry of Deeds in Plan Book 32475, Page 319. Such conveyance is made to subject to and with the benefit of all easements, agreements and restrictions of record insofar as the same are applicable and in force, including, without limitation, that certain Easement and Agreement between 500 MetroNorth Corporation Center LLC and MetroNorth Corporate Center LLC, dated December 7, 2000, recorded with Middlesex South Registry of Deeds in Book 32138, Page 391, and filed with Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court as Document No. 1158395. Said premises do not constitute all or substantially all of the assets of Grantor pursuant to Massachusetts General Laws, Chapter 62C, Section 51. For Grantor's title see Quitclaim Deeds of MetroNorth Corporate Center II LLC, each dated March 2, 2001, the first deed being filed with said Registry District as Document No. 1164612, noted on Certificate of Title No. 220836, and the second deed being Prperty Address: 19 a/k/a 195 Presidential Way and 215 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA
recorded with said Registry of Deeds in Book 32475, Page 324, and filed with said Registry District as Document No. 1164613, noted on Certificate of Title No. 220837. EXECUTED as a sealed instrument this 29th day of April, 2005. ARQULE, INC. By:____________________________________ Name: Louise A. Mawhinney Title: Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary COMMONWEALTH OF MASSACHUSETTS On this _____ day of April, 2005, before me, the undersigned notary public, personally appeared _________________________________, proved to me through satisfactory evidence of identification, which was personal knowledge of identity to be the person whose name is signed on the preceding or attached document, and acknowledged to me that he/she signed it voluntarily for its stated purpose as _________________________ of ArQule, Inc. _______________________________________ Notary Public My Commission Expires:_________________
EXHIBIT B (FORM OF ASSIGNMENT) ASSIGNMENT OF INTANGIBLE PROPERTY DATE: May __, 2005 ASSIGNOR: ARQULE, INC. a Delaware corporation ASSIGNEE: ARE-MA REGION NO. 20, LLC, a Massachusetts limited liability company RECITALS: I. Assignor presently owns the real property described in Exhibit A to this Assignment and the improvements and personal property located thereon (the "Property"). II. Assignor and Assignee have entered into that certain Agreement of Purchase and Sale dated as of April 28, 2005 (the "Purchase Agreement"), wherein Assignor agreed to sell and Assignee agreed to buy the Property; III. Assignor desires to sell the Property to Assignee, and in connection therewith, Assignor desires to assign to Assignee and Assignee desires to acquire Assignor's interest, if any, in and to the following described rights, interests and property inuring to the benefit of Assignor and relating to the Property. FOR VALUABLE CONSIDERATION, the receipt and adequacy of which are hereby acknowledged, Assignor agrees as follows: A. Assignment. Assignor assigns, transfers, sets over, and conveys to Assignee, to the extent the same are assignable and only to the extent the same relate to the Property, all of Assignor's right, title, and interest, if any, in and to (i) any warranties and/or guaranties, express or implied, from contractors, builders, manufacturers, and/or suppliers inuring to the benefit of Assignor and relating solely to the Property, and (ii) any licenses or permits relating to the Property. B. Binding Effect. This Assignment shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. C. Construction; Definitions. This Assignment shall be construed according to the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings given to such terms in the Purchase Agreement. D. Indemnification. Assignor agrees to indemnify, protect, defend and hold Assignee harmless from and against any and all liabilities, losses, costs, damages and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) directly or indirectly arising out of or related to any failure of
Assignor to perform any of the obligations assigned hereby prior to the date hereof. Assignee agrees to indemnify, protect, defend and hold Assignor harmless from and against any and all liabilities, losses, costs, damages and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) directly or indirectly arising out of or related to any failure of Assignee to perform any of the obligations assigned hereby from and after the date hereof IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Assignee has caused this Assignment to be executed effective as of the ___ day of May, 2005. ASSIGNOR: ARQULE, INC., a Delaware corporation By:____________________________________ Name: Louise A. Mawhinney Title: Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary ASSIGNEE: ARE-MA REGION NO. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company By: ALEXANDRIA REAL ESTATE EQUITIES, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership, Managing Member By: ARE-QRS CORP., a Maryland corporation, General Partner By:____________________________________ Name: Title: - 4 -
Exhibit A Legal Description Lot 11 and Lot 12: Two contiguous parcels of Registered Land on Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Lot 11 and Lot 12 on Land Court Plan 36099-D, a copy of which is filed with the Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court with Certificate of Title No. 212009. Parcel 5B-1 A parcel of land situated near Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Parcel 5B-1 on a plan entitled, "Subdivision Plan of Land in Woburn, Massachusetts," dated January 16, 2001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc., recorded Middlesex South Registry of Deeds in Plan Book 32475, Page 319. - 1 -
EXHIBIT C (FORM OF SELLER'S LEASE) [Omitted and filed as separate exhibit to Form 8-K] - 1 -
EXHIBIT D (LEGAL DESCRIPTION OF LAND) PARCEL 1: A parcel of land situated near Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Lot 5B-1 on a plan entitled "Subdivision Plan of Land in Woburn, Massachusetts," prepared for National Development, dated January 16, 2001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc. recorded with Middlesex South Registry of Deeds in Plan book 32475, Page 319. PARCELS 2 AND 3: Two contiguous parcels of Registered Land on Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Lot 11 and Lot 12 on Land Court Plan 36099-D, a copy of which is filed with the Middlesex South Registry of Deeds with Certificate of Title No. 212009. Together with the right to use Presidential Way for all purposes for which streets and ways are commonly used in the City of Woburn. Together with the benefit of and subject to the provisions of the Easement and Agreement dated December 7, 2000, by and between 500 MetroNorth Corporate Center LLC and MetroNorth Corporate Center LLC, recorded in Book 32138, Page 391, and filed as Document No. 1158395. -1 -

Exhibit 10.2 LEASE by and between ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC Landlord and ARQULE, INC. Tenant Dated: May __, 2005 Premises at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts
TABLE OF CONTENTS - i -
ARTICLE V Casualty or Taking............................................. 22 5.1. Casualty....................................................... 22 5.2. Taking......................................................... 23 5.3. Restoration.................................................... 24 5.4. Award.......................................................... 24 ARTICLE VI Defaults....................................................... 25 6.1. Events of Default.............................................. 25 6.2. Remedies....................................................... 25 6.3. Remedies Cumulative............................................ 26 6.4. Landlord's Rights to Cure Defaults............................. 26 6.5. Effect of Waivers of Default................................... 26 6.6. No Accord and Satisfaction..................................... 27 6.7. Interest on Overdue Sums....................................... 27 ARTICLE VII Mortgages...................................................... 27 7.1. Rights of Mortgage Holders..................................... 27 7.2. Superiority of Lease: Option to Subordinate.................... 28 ARTICLE VIII Miscellaneous Provisions....................................... 28 8.1. Notices from One Party to the Other............................ 28 8.2. Quiet Enjoyment................................................ 29 8.3. Recordation of Lease........................................... 29 8.4. Bind and Inure: Limitation of Landlord's Liability............ 29 8.5. Acts of God.................................................... 29 8.6. Landlord's Default; Tenant's Right of Self-Help................ 30 8.7. Brokerage...................................................... 30 8.8. Applicable Law and Construction................................ 30 8.9. Submission Not an Offer........................................ 31 8.10. Security Deposit............................................... 31 8.11. Parties Responsible for Costs of Own Obligations............... 32 8.12. Limitation on Damages.......................................... 32 ARTICLE IX First Opportunity; Right of First Refusal...................... 32 9.1. Tenant's Right of First Opportunity to Purchase................ 32 9.2. Tenant's Right of First Refusal................................ 33 ARTICLE X Development of Expansion Lot................................... 33 10.1. Tenant's Approval Right During Term............................ 33 10.2. Activities on Expansion Lot.................................... 34 10.3. Construction Activities of Landlord on Expansion Lot........... 34 10.4. Expansion Right................................................ 34 ARTICLE XI Landlord's Representations And Warranties...................... 36 11.1. Representations and Warranties of Landlord..................... 36
- ii -
EXHIBIT A DESCRIPTION OF PRIMARY LOT EXHIBIT B DESCRIPTION OF EXPANSION LOT EXHIBIT C FIXTURES, FURNISHINGS AND EQUIPMENT OF TENANT TO BE REMOVED FROM PREMISES EXHIBIT D NOTICE OF LEASE EXHIBIT E FORM OF PURCHASE AGREEMENT - iii -
LEASE AGREEMENT ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the "Landlord"), hereby leases and demises to ARQULE, INC., a Delaware corporation (the "Tenant") and Tenant hereby leases from Landlord, the Premises (as described in Section 1.1 of this Lease) on the terms and provisions of this Lease. ARTICLE I REFERENCE DATA 1.1. Incorporated References. Each reference in this Lease to any of the following subjects shall be construed to incorporate the data stated for that subject in this Section 1.1. Primary Lot: The parcel of land described in Exhibit A attached hereto. Expansion Lot: The parcel of land described in Exhibit B attached hereto. Cross-Easements: Those rights and easements appurtenant to the Primary Lot for drainage facilities, water and sewer and other utility lines, granted pursuant to recorded instruments, including the Easement and Agreement made as of December 7, 2000, and recorded in the Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court as Document No. 1158395 (the "Easement and Agreement" and together with the Declaration of Protective Covenants (hereinafter defined) and other appurtenant easements, the "Cross Easements"). Landlord shall not amend or modify any Cross Easements without the prior consent of Tenant, which may be withheld by Tenant in its reasonable discretion. Premises: The Primary Lot, the Building and the Cross-Easements. Building: The building located on the Primary Lot. Rentable Area of Building: 128,325 square feet on three levels. The 19,473 square feet of mechanical space in the Building is excluded from the Rentable Area of Building and the calculation of Annual Fixed Rent. - 1 -
Original Address of Landlord: ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC c/o Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc. 135 North Robles Avenue, Suite 250 Pasadena, CA 91101 Attention: Corporate Secretary Original Address of Tenant: 19 Presidential Way Woburn, MA 01801 Landlord's Representative: Thomas Andrews Tenant's Representative: Steven M. Lacerte Security Deposit: $1,604,063 (equal to six (6) months' of Annual Fixed Rent during Original Term in the form of a Letter of Credit) Term Commencement Date: May __, 2005 Original Term: If the Term Commencement Date is the first day of a calendar month, the period beginning on the Term Commencement Date and ending on the day before the tenth (10th) anniversary of the Term Commencement Date. If the Term Commencement Date is a day other than the first day of a calendar month, the period beginning on the Term Commencement Date and ending on the last day of the month in which the tenth (10th) anniversary of the Term Commencement Date occurs (whichever of the foregoing expiration dates is applicable, the "Original Term Expiration Date"). Extended Terms: Two (2) five (5) year periods, subject to the provisions of Section 2.2. Intended Uses: General office, manufacturing, research and development (including RDNA, genetic, biomedical and combinational chemistry, and animal testing), testing laboratory, other accessory general office and manufacturing uses, and other uses ancillary and/or related thereto, including but not limited to parking. - 2 -
Other Charges: Amounts payable by the owner of the Primary Lot under that certain Declaration of Protective Covenants dated May 27, 1988, and recorded with the Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court as Document No. 777192, as amended by Amendment to Declaration of Covenants dated October 12, 1989, and recorded with the Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court as Document Number 809254 (collectively, the "Declaration of Protective Covenants") and the Easement and Agreement. Lease Year: (a) If the Term Commencement Date is the first day of a calendar month, each one year period beginning on the Term Commencement Date and each anniversary thereof and ending on the day before the next succeeding such anniversary and (b) If the Term Commencement Date is a day other than the first day of a calendar month, each one year period beginning on the first day of the calendar month immediately after the month in which the Term Commencement Date occurs, and each anniversary of such day, and ending on the day before the next succeeding such anniversary. Appropriate pro-rations shall be made for any partial months or other periods prior to the commencement of the first Lease Year. Broker(s): CBRE Lynch Murphy Walsh Advisors Public Liability Insurance Limits Comprehensive General Liability Limit of (per occurrence):: $5,000,000 Annual Fixed Rent: Determined under Sections 2.3 and 2.4 of this Lease. 1.2. Exhibits. The Exhibits listed below in this Section are incorporated in this Lease by reference and are to be construed as a part of this Lease: EXHIBIT A: Description of Primary Lot. EXHIBIT B: Description of Expansion Lot. EXHIBIT C: Fixtures, Furnishings and Equipment of Tenant to be removed from Premises EXHIBIT D: Form of Notice of Lease EXHIBIT E: Form of Purchase Agreement - 3 -
ARTICLE II LEASE GRANT; EXTENDED TERMS 2.1. Term. Landlord leases the Premises to Tenant and Tenant leases the Premises from Landlord, for the Term. 2.2. Option to Extend Term. Tenant shall have two (2) separate options to extend the then term of this Lease, in each case for an additional five (5) year period (i.e., for a total, if any of such options is exercised as provided herein, of ten (10) successive years beyond the Original Term) (each five (5) year period being referred to herein as an "Extended Term"), provided (i) to exercise any such option, Tenant shall give notice in writing to Landlord of its exercise not less than twelve (12) months prior to expiration of the Original Term or the first Extended Term, as applicable (the "Exercise Date"), and (ii) no default continuing beyond any applicable notice, grace or cure period in the obligations of Tenant under this Lease shall exist at the time each such notice is given. All of the terms and provisions of this Lease shall be applicable during each such Extended Term except that (i) Tenant shall have no option to extend the Term of this Lease beyond the second Extended Term and (ii) the Annual Fixed Rent for each Extended Term shall be adjusted in accordance with Section 2.4 hereof. The word "Term" or "term" as used herein shall mean the Original Term, plus any of the Extended Terms as to which Tenant shall have exercised its option under this Section 2.2. 2.3. Annual Fixed Rent During the Original Term. For the Original Term of this Lease the Annual Fixed Rent for the Building shall be as set forth below: 2.4. Annual Fixed Rent During Extended Terms. (a) If Tenant shall exercise its option(s) to extend the Term pursuant to Section 2.2, the Annual Fixed Rent shall be adjusted, effective as of the first day of each Extended Term (each an "Adjustment Date"), to equal ninety-five (95%) of the Market Rent (as hereinafter determined and defined) as of the applicable Adjustment Date. "Market Rent" shall be computed as of each Adjustment Date at the fair market rental rate (per square foot of Rentable Area) that would be agreed upon between a landlord and a tenant entering into a new - 4 -
lease for "as is" space in a comparable building, taking into account and giving effect to (i) the estimated savings to Landlord of costs and expenses associated with leasing the Premises to Tenant rather than to a third party, including without limitation leasing commissions and lost rent due to vacancy periods and (ii) in determining comparability, considerations such as size, configuration, location (i.e., suburbs of Boston, excluding Cambridge, MA and Boston city limits), quality, age and condition of premises and lease term, assuming the landlord and tenant are informed and well-advised and each is acting in what it considers its own best interests. Market Rent shall include the provision by Landlord to Tenant of a tenant improvement allowance, free rent and/or other special concessions ("Fair Market Concessions") in amounts that would be agreed upon between a landlord and a tenant entering into a new lease for comparable space as to location (i.e., suburbs of Boston, excluding Cambridge, MA and Boston city limits), configuration, size and use, in a comparable building as to location, quality, reputation and age, with a comparable build-out, and a comparable term, assuming the landlord and tenant are informed and well-advised and each is acting in what it considers its own best interests. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 2.4(a), the determination of Market Rent pursuant to Section 2.4(b) shall exclude the value of Tenant's Property and any installations, alterations or additions to the Premises made after the date of this Lease. In determining the Market Rent, the net present value approach shall be utilized (with an appropriate discount rate) to reflect the fact that Landlord will realize the savings set forth in clause (i) above immediately upon the commencement of the applicable Extended Term. (b) Landlord and Tenant shall negotiate in good faith to determine the Annual Fixed Rent (including Fair Market Concessions) for the applicable Extension Period, for a period of thirty (30) days after the date on which Landlord receives Tenant's written notice of Tenant's election to exercise the extension option provided for under this Section. In the event Landlord and Tenant are unable to agree upon the Annual Fixed Rent for any Extension Period within said thirty (30)-day period, the Market Rent for the Premises shall be determined by two (2) licensed real estate brokers, one of whom shall be named by the Landlord and one of whom shall be named by Tenant. Each real estate broker so selected shall be licensed in the jurisdiction in which the Building is located as a real estate broker specializing in the field of laboratory/biotech leasing in the suburban Boston, Massachusetts area, having no less than ten (10) years' experience in such field, and recognized as ethical and reputable within the field. Landlord and Tenant agree to make their appointments promptly within ten (10) days after the expiration of the thirty (30)-day period, or sooner if mutually agreed upon. Each broker, within fifteen (15) days after both brokers have been selected, shall submit his or her determination of the Market Rent and the Fair Market Concessions. If the higher determination of Market Rent is not more than ten percent (10%) of the lower determination (based on net present values using an annual discount rate of five percent (5%)), then the Market Rent shall be the average of the two (2) rental rate and concession determinations. If the higher determination of Market Rent is greater than 10% of the lower determination of Market Rent, then the two (2) brokers selected by Landlord and Tenant shall promptly select a third broker within ten (10) days after they have delivered their determinations. The third broker shall meet all the qualifications required above for the first two (2) brokers and shall make its determination of the Market Rent within ten (10) days after he or she has been appointed. In such event, the Market Rent shall be the determination of the three brokers (on a net present value basis as described above) that is not the highest or the lowest determination, provided, that, if any two brokers have an identical determination of Market Rent, such determination shall be the Market Rent hereunder for the - 5 -
applicable Extension Term. Subject to Section 2.4(c), Landlord and Tenant shall each pay the fee of the broker selected by it, and they shall equally share the payment of the fee of the third broker. (c) If the Market Rent is determined by brokers pursuant to Section 2.4(b), Tenant shall have the right, within ten (10) days after such determination, to revoke its notice to extend the term of this Lease, in which event Tenant shall be obligated to pay the fees of all of the brokers engaged to determine Market Rent, and the Term of this Lease shall expire at the end of the then current Term. If Tenant does not revoke its notice to extend the Term of this Lease pursuant to the immediately preceding sentence, then, within thirty (30) days after the Market Rent is determined, whether by agreement of Landlord and Tenant or by brokers, as aforesaid, the parties shall promptly execute a supplement to this Lease confirming the same. ARTICLE III RENT 3.1. Annual Fixed Rent. Tenant covenants and agrees to pay rent ("Annual Fixed Rent") to Landlord at the original Address of Landlord or at such other place or to such other person or entity as Landlord may by written notice to Tenant from time to time direct, at the Annual Fixed Rent set forth in, or determined by the provisions of, Article II, in equal installments equal to 1/12th of the Annual Fixed Rent in advance on the first day of each calendar month during the Term; and for any portion of a calendar month at the beginning of the Term, prorated for such portion. 3.2. Additional Rent. Tenant covenants and agrees to pay as Additional Rent to Landlord an administrative management fee in the amount of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000) per year, which amount shall be due and payable on the first anniversary of the Commencement Date and on each anniversary of the Commencement Date during the Original Term. In addition, Tenant shall pay the amounts provided for in Section 3.3 and Section 3.4 as Additional Rent. 3.3. Real Estate Taxes. (a) Each year during the Term, Landlord shall submit to Tenant a statement of all invoices for Real Estate Taxes (hereinafter defined) payable by Tenant pursuant to this Section 3.3, and Tenant shall pay the same to Landlord not later than ten (10) days prior to the date on which the same may be paid without interest or penalty. For purposes of this Lease, the term "Real Estate Taxes" shall mean: (i) all taxes, assessments (special or otherwise), levies, fees, water and sewer rents and charges and all other governmental levies and charges, general and special, ordinary and extraordinary foreseen and unforeseen, to the extent allocable to the Term hereof, imposed with respect to the ownership or operation of the Primary Lot or the Building; and (ii) all charges for utilities furnished to the Premises which may become a lien on the Building or the Primary Lot (collectively "taxes and assessments" or if singular "tax or assessment"). "Real Estate Taxes" shall not include any income, sales, gross receipts, value added, estate, transfer, capital gains, inheritance, succession, gift, franchise, capital stock tax, any income taxes arising out of or related to the ownership and operation of the Primary Lot or the Building or any taxes relating to the Expansion Lot. Tenant shall have the right to apply to the - 6 -
appropriate governmental authority or agency to have taxes and assessments assessed directly to Tenant, and Landlord shall cooperate with Tenant completing such application and documentation necessary to effect such direct assessment. In the case of any such taxes and assessments assessed directly to Tenant, Tenant shall cause the same to be paid on or prior to the date on which the same may be paid without interest or penalty. (b) With respect to any taxes and assessments assessed directly to Landlord, Landlord shall pay all taxes and assessments to the applicable government authorities before or on the dates due, and shall promptly provide to Tenant evidence of such payment. (c) With respect to taxes and assessments which may lawfully be paid in installments, for the purpose of this Section 3.3, taxes and assessments in any period shall include only such portion of the same which is required to be paid within such period and any interest payable thereon computed (whether or not such is the case) as if Landlord had elected to pay the same over the longest period permitted by law. (d) If, at any time during the Term, the present system of ad valorem taxation of real property shall be changed so that in lieu of the whole or any part of the ad valorem tax on real property, there shall be assessed on Landlord a capital levy or other tax on the gross rents received with respect to the Primary Lot and Building, or both, or a federal, state, county, municipal, or other local income, franchise, excise or similar tax, assessment, levy or charge (distinct from any now in effect) measured by or based, in whole or in part, upon gross rents, then any and all of such taxes, assessments, levies or charges, to the extent so measured or based ("Substitute Taxes"), shall be payable by Tenant without duplication; provided, however, Tenant's obligation with respect to the aforesaid Substitute Taxes shall be limited to the amount thereof as computed at the rates that would be payable if the Premises were the only property of Landlord. Landlord shall furnish to Tenant a copy of any notice of any public, special or betterment assessment received by Landlord concerning the Premises and charged to Tenant hereunder promptly upon Landlord's receipt thereof. (e) If Landlord shall obtain any abatement or refund on account of any real estate taxes as to which Tenant shall have paid payments hereunder, then, within thirty (30) days after receiving the same, Landlord shall refund to Tenant Tenant's portion of any such abatement or refund, after deducting therefrom the reasonable costs and expenses incurred by Landlord in obtaining such abatement or refund. (f) For so long as taxes are assessed directly against Landlord, if at least twenty (20) days prior to the last day for filing an application for abatement of taxes or assessments for any tax year, Tenant shall give notice to Landlord that it desires to file an application for abatement of such taxes and assessments or to otherwise contest the assessed valuation of the Primary Lot and Building for such tax year, and if within ten (10) days after the receipt of such notice, Landlord does not give notice back to Tenant that Landlord shall itself file such application or commence such contest, then Tenant shall have the right either in its own name or in the name of Landlord but at its own cost and expense to file such application or commence such contest. If within ten (10) days after receipt by Landlord of such notice from Tenant, Landlord shall give Tenant notice that Landlord shall itself file such application or commence such contest, then Landlord shall do so prior to the expiration of the time for the - 7 -
filing of the same at its own cost and expense. In any event, if any abatement by whomever prosecuted shall be obtained, the cost and expense of obtaining the same shall be the first charge upon such abatement and shall be reimbursed to the party expending the same from the proceeds thereof, prior to any other distribution. If Tenant shall file an application for abatement or commence such contest pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph, Tenant shall prosecute the same to final determination with reasonable diligence and shall not, without Landlord's consent (which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), settle, compromise or discontinue the same except that Tenant may discontinue the prosecution of the same at any time after giving Landlord notice thereof and a reasonable opportunity to assume prosecution of the same. If Landlord shall file an application for abatement or commence such contest, Landlord shall prosecute the same to final determination with reasonable diligence and shall not without Tenant's consent (which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), settle, compromise, or discontinue the same except that Landlord may discontinue the prosecution of the same at any time after giving Tenant notice thereof and a reasonable opportunity to assume prosecution of the same. If either party shall file an application for an abatement or commence such contest, the other will cooperate and furnish any pertinent information in its files reasonably required by the prosecuting party. In every case, any abatement, refund, rebate or credit received shall be paid first to the party which prosecuted such abatement in the amount of the costs and expenses expended by it in such connection, and the balance to each party (within thirty (30) days after receipt) in the proportion that it paid the tax or assessment being abated, refunded, rebated or credited. Landlord shall pay any sums due to Tenant from any abatement within thirty (30) days after receipt of the same even if this Lease shall have expired. Tenant shall timely pay all sums payable under this Lease in respect of taxes and assessments notwithstanding the pendency of an abatement proceeding or any such contest. (g) Real Estate Taxes assessed for a real estate tax fiscal year which extends after the Term or earlier termination of this Lease shall be apportioned between Landlord and Tenant at the expiration of the Term. 3.4. Insurance. Throughout the Term, subject to Section 3.5(b), Landlord shall obtain and maintain the insurance listed in Sections 3.4(b) and 3.4(c), at Tenant's sole cost and expense, which shall be payable by Tenant as Additional Rent, and Tenant shall obtain and maintain the insurance listed in Section 3.4(a) at Tenant's sole cost and expense: (a) Commercial general liability insurance indemnifying Landlord and Tenant, and if Landlord shall elect, Landlord's mortgagees, against all claims and demands for any injury to person or property which may be claimed to have occurred on the Premises or on the sidewalk or ways immediately adjoining the Premises (including, without limitation the main access driveway), in amounts which shall, at the beginning of the Term, be at least equal to the limits set forth in Section 1.1, and, from time to time during the Term, shall be for such higher limits, if any, as are reasonably required by Landlord; provided, however, that such increases shall not be required more than biannually, shall not be required if comparable landlords of comparable buildings do not require such increases, and shall not exceed those amounts then customarily carried on properties similar to the Premises in the greater Boston area; (b) Direct risk of physical loss (all risk) insurance which shall in no event be less than 100% replacement value of the Premises (in the Yield-Up Condition), together with - 8 -
rental loss coverage in an amount equal to one year's Annual Fixed Rent and estimated additional rent, insuring the Building and its rental value with a replacement cost coverage endorsement and agreed value endorsement, together with deductibles not to exceed $250,000; and (c) Insurance against loss or damage from sprinklers and from leakage or explosions or cracking of boilers, pipes carrying steam or water, or both, pressure vessels or similar apparatus (to the extent that any of the foregoing are present in the Premises), in the so-called "broad form", in such amounts and with such deductibles as Landlord may reasonably determine, and insurance against such other hazards and in such amounts as may from time to time be required by a bank, insurance company or other lending institution holding a mortgage on the Building and/or the Primary Lot. 3.5. Certain Provisions Applicable to Insurance Policies. (a) Policies for insurance provided for under the provisions of Sections 3.4(b) and 3.4(c) shall have a deductible not in excess of $250,000, and shall, in case of loss, be first payable to the holders of any mortgages on the fee simple interest in the Building and/or the Primary Lot under a standard mortgagee's clause, and shall be deposited with the holder of any mortgage or with Landlord, as Landlord may elect. Landlord, Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc. (so long as it is an indirect owner of the Landlord) and, if required, Landlord's mortgagee, shall be named as an additional insured for general liability in all such policies issued therefor. All policies for insurance required under the provisions of Section 3.4 shall be obtained from responsible companies qualified to do business in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and in good standing therein, having a Best's Insurance Rating of at least "A minus" and a financial size category of at least "VIII". All policies for insurance required hereunder shall also state that any loss will be payable in accordance with such policy, notwithstanding any act or omission of either Landlord or Tenant. Each of Landlord and Tenant agrees to furnish the other party with copies of certificates on ACORD form 27 of all such insurance which such party is obligated to obtain pursuant to Section 3.4 prior to the beginning of the Term hereof and during each Extension Term. Each such policy shall be noncancelable with respect to the interest of Tenant without at least thirty (30) days, prior written notice thereto. In the event of a claim under any insurance policies, Landlord and Tenant shall cooperate with one another and provide the other party with copies of such insurance policies upon request. (b) Tenant shall pay the costs of insurance obtained by Landlord pursuant to Section 3.4 (including general coverages, such as earthquake, fidelity, etc typically maintained by Landlord or its affiliates for similar properties, provided, that, at such time as the Premises is no longer owned by an organization that, together with its affiliates, owns more than ten properties similar to the Premises, the foregoing shall include only coverages typically maintained by owners of properties similar to the Premises in the greater Boston metropolitan area) as Additional Rent within thirty (30) days after delivery of an invoice therefor by Landlord, together with reasonable supporting documentation of such costs. In the event that Landlord obtains any such insurance pursuant to a blanket insurance policy, Tenant shall be obligated to pay only those insurance costs allocable to the Premises on an equitable basis. Upon request from time to time by Tenant, Landlord shall provide reasonable supporting documentation of how it allocates insurance costs under its blanket insurance policy to the Premises. - 9 -
3.6. Waiver of Subrogation. Landlord and Tenant shall each procure an appropriate clause in or endorsement to any property insurance covering the Premises, the Building and personal property, fixtures and equipment located therein, wherein the insurance companies shall waive subrogation or consent to a waiver of right of recovery, and Landlord and Tenant agree not to make any claim against, or seek to recover from, the other for any loss or damage to its property or the property of others resulting from fire or other hazards to the extent covered by such property insurance; provided, however, that the release, discharge, exoneration and covenant not to sue contained herein shall be limited by and coextensive with the terms and provisions of the waiver of subrogation or waiver of right of recovery. If either party shall be unable to obtain the inclusion of such clause even with the payment of an additional premium, then such party shall attempt to name the other party as a loss payee under the policy. If it shall not be possible to have the other party named as a loss payee, even with the payment of an additional premium, then the first party shall not be required to obtain such waiver of subrogation or consent to waiver provision and such party shall so notify the first party and the first party's agreement to name the other party as an additional insured shall be satisfied. Tenant acknowledges that Landlord shall not carry insurance on, and shall not be responsible for, (i) Tenant's Property, and (ii) any loss suffered by Tenant due to interruption of Tenant's business. 3.7. Utilities. Tenant shall pay directly to the proper authorities charged with the collection thereof all charges for water, sewer, gas, electricity, telephone and other utilities or services used or consumed on the Premises, whether designated as a charge, tax, assessment fee or otherwise, including, without limitation, water and sewer use charges and taxes, if any, all such charges to be paid as the same from time to time become due. If Tenant is not charged directly by the respective utility for any of such utilities or services, Tenant shall from time to time, within ten (10) days of receipt of Landlord's reasonably documented invoice therefor, pay to Landlord such charges. Landlord shall not be liable for any interruption or failure in the supply of any such utilities to the Premises; provided, however, that such failure or interruption does not arise out of any willful act of Landlord or any of Landlord's employees, servants, licensees, invitees, contractors, affiliates, agents, or consultants (together, the "Landlord's Parties"). Notwithstanding the foregoing, Tenant shall have the right to terminate this Lease upon notice to Landlord if any interruption or failure in the supply of any utilities to the Premises shall continue for more than one hundred eighty (180) consecutive days. If Landlord receives any proceeds from a loss of rents insurance policy due to the interruption or failure to provide utilities to the Premises, Landlord shall abate the Annual Fixed Rent to the extent of the insurance proceeds received by Landlord. In addition, Landlord shall use its best efforts to restore any interrupted utility service affecting Tenant's use of the Premises. 3.8. Net Lease; Nonterminability by Tenant. (a) The Annual Fixed Rent, the Additional Rent and all other amounts payable hereunder to Landlord shall be paid without notice or demand and without setoff, abatement, suspension, deferment, reduction or deduction except as otherwise provided in this Lease or by operation of law, and Landlord shall have no obligations in respect of the Premises or Tenant, except as otherwise expressly provided herein. - 10 -
(b) This Lease shall not terminate, nor shall Tenant have any right to terminate this Lease, nor shall the obligations and liabilities of Tenant set forth herein be otherwise affected, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Lease or by operation of law or by final decree or final judgment of any court having jurisdiction. ARTICLE IV ADDITIONAL COVENANTS 4.1. Tenant's Affirmative Covenants. Tenant covenants at its expense at all times during the Term and for such further time as Tenant occupies the Premises or any part thereof: (a) Perform Obligations. To perform promptly all of the obligations of Tenant set forth in this Lease; and to pay when due the Annual Fixed Rent and Additional Rent and all charges, rates and other sums which by the terms of this Lease are to be paid by Tenant. (b) Use. To use the Premises only for the Intended Uses, and from time to time to procure all licenses and permits necessary therefor at Tenant's sole expense and to provide copies thereof to Landlord. (c) Repair and Maintenance. To keep and maintain the Premises in good condition and repair, including the plumbing, electrical, lighting, roof membrane, interior mechanical systems, and all doors, door frames, and door openers, and all windows, frames and plate glass located on and serving the Premises, except for (a) reasonable use and wear, (b) damage resulting from Casualty or Taking (which shall instead be governed by Article V), (c) portions of the Premises that Landlord is obligated to repair and maintain in accordance with Section 4.2, and (d) damage resulting from the negligent or other acts or omissions of Landlord or Landlord's Parties ("Landlord's Negligence") (Landlord hereby agreeing, subject to the waiver of subrogation provisions of Section 3.7 and in the case of a Casualty or Taking subject to the provisions of Article V, to perform at Landlord's sole expense any repair or maintenance to the Premises made necessary by Landlord's Negligence); to keep in a safe, secure and sanitary condition all trash and rubbish temporarily stored at the Premises; to arrange for and be responsible for all of the costs of a trash and rubbish removal service in connection with Tenant's use of the Premises; and to make all interior repairs and replacements (which shall not include replacements of the Structural Components or foundation of the Building), which are required to keep the Premises in good order, condition and repair as required hereunder, and to do all other work necessary for the foregoing purposes whether the same may be ordinary or extraordinary, foreseen or unforeseen. (d) Compliance with Law and Insurance Requirements. To make all repairs, alterations, additions or replacements to the Premises required by any law or ordinance or any order or regulation of any public authority other than to the Structural Components and foundation of the Building; to keep the Premises equipped with all safety appliances so required; to pay all municipal, county, or state taxes assessed against the leasehold interest hereunder, or against personal property of any kind on or about the Premises; not to dump, flush, or in any way introduce any hazardous substances or any other toxic substances into the septic, sewage or other waste disposal system serving the Premises except in compliance with a valid sewer use permit; - 11 -
not to generate, store or dispose of hazardous substances in or on the Premises or dispose of hazardous substances from the Premises (including any discharge to the sewer system serving the Premises) except for use, storage, generation and off-site disposal of hazardous substances normally attendant to Building operations and Tenant's manufacturing, research and development processes in compliance with the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended, 42 U.S.C. Section 6901 et seq., the Massachusetts Hazardous Waste Management Act, M.G.L. c. 21 C, as amended, the Massachusetts Oil and Hazardous Material Release Prevention and Response Act, M.G.L. c. 2lE, as amended, and all other applicable codes, regulations, ordinances and laws; to notify Landlord of any incident which would require the filing of a notice under applicable law; to provide Landlord, from time to time upon Landlord's reasonable request, a list of hazardous substances which Tenant uses or stores on the Premises, subject to such confidentiality, proprietary information and trade secret assurances as Tenant may reasonably impose on Landlord, and without further disclosure of such records and information to third parties; and to comply with the orders and regulations of all governmental authorities with respect to zoning, building, fire, health and other codes, regulations, ordinances or laws applicable to Tenant's specific use of the Premises, except that Tenant may defer compliance so long as the validity of any such law, ordinance, order or regulation shall be contested by Tenant in good faith and by appropriate legal proceedings, if Tenant first gives Landlord appropriate assurance against any loss, cost or expense on account thereof. The term "hazardous substances" as used in this paragraph shall mean "hazardous substances" as defined in the Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, as amended, 42 U.S.C. Section 9601 and regulations adopted pursuant to said Act. Landlord acknowledges that the Primary Lot and the Expansion Lot are located adjacent to the Industri-plex Superfund site. Tenant acknowledges that Tenant's Intended Uses will include the generation and storage of hazardous substances on the Premises. Without limitation of any of Tenant's obligations under this Lease in respect of the Premises or Landlord, Tenant agrees to indemnify, defend with counsel acceptable to Landlord and hold harmless Landlord, all of Landlord's mortgagees and their respective officers, directors, principals, agents and employees from and against all loss, cost or damage that any of them may incur or be liable for in connection with any condition on the Premises or arising on the Premises relating to the release or threat of release of hazardous substances in respect of the Premises and directly attributable to the act, omission or neglect of Tenant or any of Tenant's employees, agents, independent contractors or invitees including, without limitation, any condition not in conformity with the requirements of applicable law. Within fifteen (15) days thereafter, Tenant shall provide copies to Landlord of any notice that Tenant may receive, from or give to any governmental authority or any other party in respect of any release or threat of release of hazardous substances in respect of the Premises. Landlord and Landlord's environmental consultants shall have the right from time to time, upon not less than 24 hours' advance notice to Tenant and accompanied by a representative of Tenant, to enter the Premises, subject to Tenant's rights and Landlord's obligations under Section 4.6, to undertake at Landlord's sole cost an assessment thereof to determine whether any release or threat of release of hazardous substances has occurred, and Tenant shall cooperate with Landlord (which cooperation shall not include Tenant's expenditure of money to third parties) in undertaking such assessment, including, without limitation, providing copies of such reports and such other information as Landlord or its consultant may reasonably request, but subject to such - 12 -
confidentiality, proprietary information and trade secret assurances as Tenant may reasonably impose on Landlord, and without further disclosure of such records and information to third parties; provided, however, Tenant may elect to undertake such assessment using its own consultants if satisfactory to Landlord and the holders of mortgages on the Premises and said consultants shall provide to Landlord and such holders such assessment and a reliance letter from such consultants regarding the aforesaid without additional charges beyond those which Landlord would have incurred if Landlord's consultant had undertaken said assessment. Tenant shall promptly correct any such condition if (a) such condition does not comply with the requirements of applicable law or permits or approvals, (b) such condition was caused by the act, omission, or neglect of Tenant or any of Tenant's employees, agents, independent contractors or invitees, and (c) Landlord gives written notice of such condition to Tenant (with Tenant recognizing that Landlord shall have no duty to Tenant to conduct such assessment or to give such notice to Tenant) in accordance with the Massachusetts Contingency Plan and the requirements of any other applicable law. If such assessment discloses any such release that exceeds reportable quantities under applicable law and was caused by the act or omission of Tenant or any of its employees, agents, contractors, or invitees, Tenant shall promptly reimburse Landlord for all costs and expense Landlord may incur in undertaking such assessment as Additional Rent. 4.2. Landlord's Repair and Maintenance Obligations. Subject to the provisions of Article V of this Lease, Landlord covenants, at its sole expense at all times during the Term to keep in good order, condition and repair the structural components, structural components of the roof, exterior walls, foundation and the parking areas and driveways located on the Premises and/or serving the Building (collectively, "Structural Components"). Without limitation of the foregoing, Landlord shall be responsible, at its sole expense, for all capital replacements of the Structural Components and for causing such Structural Components to be in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations during the entire Term. Landlord shall not be responsible for damage to the Premises resulting from the negligence or other acts or omissions of Tenant or Tenant's employees, servants, agents, contractors licensees, affiliates, consultants or invitees ("Tenant's Negligence"), Tenant hereby agreeing to perform at Tenant's expense any repair or maintenance to the Premises made necessary by Tenant's Negligence; provided, however, that if such damage to the Premises results from a Casualty (as defined in Section 5.1) caused by Tenant's Negligence, Landlord shall repair, maintain or restore the Premises or portion thereof in accordance with and to the extent required by Article V. 4.3. Tenant's Work. Tenant shall procure at Tenant's sole expense all necessary permits and licenses before undertaking any work on the Premises; to do all such work in a good and workmanlike manner employing materials of good quality and so as to conform with all applicable zoning, building, fire, health and other codes, regulations, ordinances and laws; to keep the Premises at all times free of liens for labor and materials, and to discharge or bond over such liens forthwith after notice thereof from Landlord; to employ for such work only contractors approved by Landlord which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned; to require all contractors employed by Tenant to carry worker's compensation insurance in accordance with statutory requirements and commercial general liability insurance covering such contractors on or about the Premises in amounts that at least equal the limits set forth in Section 1.1; and to save Landlord harmless and indemnified from all injury, loss, claims or damage to any person or property due to such work (provided, however, that Tenant shall not - 13 -
be required to indemnify and save Landlord harmless from Landlord's negligent or intentional acts or omissions to act) and, upon Landlord's request, to furnish to Landlord statements from all contractors and subcontractors certifying payment in full of any obligation owed to them in respect of work undertaken on the Premises. 4.4. Tenant's Indemnity. Tenant hereby agrees to defend, with counsel reasonably acceptable to Landlord (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned), all actions against Landlord, any partner, trustee, stockholder, officer, director, employee, beneficiary or member or manager of Landlord, holders of mortgages secured by the Building and/or the Primary Lot and any other party having an interest in the Premises ("Indemnified Parties") with respect to, and to pay, protect, indemnify and save harmless, to the extent permitted by law, all Indemnified Parties from and against, any and all liabilities, losses, damages, costs, expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees), causes of action, suits, claims, demands or judgments of any nature arising from (i) injury to or death of any person, or damage to or loss of property, on or about the Premises, or connected with the use, condition or occupancy thereof except to the extent caused by the negligent or intentional act or omission to act of Landlord, (ii) violation of this Lease by Tenant, or (iii) any wrongful act, fault, wrongful omission, or other misconduct of Tenant or its agents, contractors, licensees, sublessees or invitees. Nothing in this Section 4.4, however, shall derogate from the effectiveness of insurance required to be maintained by Tenant under this Lease naming Landlord as an insured. This Section 4.4 is further subject to the waiver of subrogation provisions in Section 3.7. 4.5. Landlord's Indemnity. Landlord hereby agrees to defend, with counsel reasonably acceptable to Tenant (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned), all actions against Tenant, any partner, trustee, stockholder, officer, director, employee, beneficiary or member or manager of Tenant ("Tenant Indemnified Parties") with respect to, and to pay, protect, indemnify and save harmless, to the extent permitted by law, all Tenant Indemnified Parties from and against, any and all liabilities, losses, damages, costs, expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees), causes of action, suits, claims, demands or judgments of any nature arising from (i) injury to or death of any person, or damage to or loss of property, on or about the Premises, or connected with the use, condition or occupancy thereof to the extent caused by the negligent or intentional act or omission to act of Landlord, (ii) violation of this Lease by Landlord, or (iii) any wrongful act, fault, wrongful omission, or other misconduct of Landlord or its agents, contractors, licensees, sublessees or invitees. Nothing in this Section 4.5, however, shall derogate from the effectiveness of insurance required to be maintained by Tenant under this Lease naming Landlord as an insured. This Section 4.5 is further subject to the waiver of subrogation provisions in Section 3.7. Landlord further agrees to indemnify, defend with counsel acceptable to Tenant and hold harmless Tenant and its officers, directors, principals, agents and employees from and against all loss, cost or damage that any of them may incur or be liable for in connection with any condition on the Premises or arising on the Premises relating to the release or threat of release of hazardous substances in respect of the Premises and directly attributable to the act, omission or neglect of Landlord or any of Landlord's employees, agents, independent contractors or invitees including, without limitation, any condition not in conformity with the requirements of applicable law. 4.6. Landlord's Right to Enter. Landlord and its agents shall be permitted to enter into the Premises at reasonable times and upon reasonable advance notice to examine the Premises, make - 14 -
such repairs and replacements as Landlord may be entitled to make under this Lease, without, however, any obligation to do so except as provided in this Lease, to view the Premises for Tenant's compliance with Tenant's obligations under this Lease, and show the Premises to prospective purchasers and lenders, and, during the last twelve (12) months of the Term or earlier if Tenant shall be in default under this Lease beyond applicable notice, grace and cure periods, to show the Premises to prospective tenants and to keep affixed in suitable places notices of availability of the Premises. Landlord's exercise of its right of access to the Premises as provided in this Lease shall be subject to the following: (a) Landlord shall not unreasonably interfere with Tenant's business activities, (b) Landlord shall indemnify and hold harmless Tenant from and against all loss, cost and expense resulting from the negligent or intentional act or omission to act of Landlord in the course of exercise of such right, (c) Landlord shall, except in the case of an emergency, enter the Premises only when accompanied by a representative of Tenant during normal business hours and upon not less than 24 hours' notice, in order to ensure the continued confidentiality of Tenant's business materials, and (d) Landlord shall at all times adhere to such safety, security, confidentiality, proprietary information and trade secret rules and guidelines as Tenant may reasonably impose. 4.7. Personal Property at Tenant's Risk. All of the furnishings, fixtures, equipment, effects and property of every kind, nature and description of Tenant and of all persons claiming by, through or under Tenant which, during the continuance of this Lease or any occupancy of the Premises by Tenant or anyone claiming under Tenant, may be on the Premises, shall, as between the parties, be at the sole risk and hazard of Tenant and if the whole or any part thereof shall be destroyed or damaged by fire, water or otherwise, or by the leakage or bursting of water pipes, steam pipes, or other pipes, by theft or from any other cause, no part of said loss or damage is to be charged to or to be borne by Landlord, except that Landlord shall in no event be indemnified or held harmless or exonerated from any liability to Tenant or to any other person, for any injury, loss, damage or liability resulting from Landlord's Negligence. Tenant shall insure Tenant's personal property. 4.8. Payment of Cost of Enforcement. Tenant shall pay on demand Landlord's expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, incurred in successfully enforcing any obligation of Tenant under this Lease continuing beyond applicable notice, grace and cure periods or in curing any default by Tenant under this Lease as provided in Section 6.4. 4.9. Yield-Up. (a) At the expiration of the Term or earlier termination of this Lease, Tenant shall surrender all keys to the Premises and shall remove the furnishings, fixtures and equipment set forth in Exhibit C attached hereto, as defined below. Tenant shall have the right, but not the obligation, to remove any installments, alterations or improvements made by Tenant during the Term. Tenant shall repair all damage caused by such removal and to yield-up the Premises in broom-clean condition and in the same good order and repair in which Tenant is obliged to keep and maintain the Premises by the provisions of this Lease (except for reasonable wear and tear, damage by Casualty and Taking and damage resulting from Landlord's Negligence). (b) Upon surrender of the Premises in accordance with this Section 4.9, the Premises shall be free of Hazardous Materials brought upon, kept, used, stored, handled, treated, - 15 -
generated in, or released or disposed of from, the Premises by any person other than a Landlord Party (collectively, "TENANT HAZMAT OPERATIONS") and released of all Hazardous Materials Clearances. At least three (3) months prior to the surrender of the Premises at the end of the Term, Tenant shall deliver to Landlord a narrative description of the actions proposed to be taken by Tenant (the "SURRENDER PLAN") in order to surrender the Premises free of Hazardous Materials and in a manner that results in the release of all Hazardous Materials Clearances at the expiration or earlier termination of the Term. Such Surrender Plan shall be accompanied by a current listing of (i) all Hazardous Materials licenses and permits held by or on behalf of any Tenant Party with respect to the Premises, and (ii) all Hazardous Materials used, stored, handled, treated, generated, released or disposed of from the Premises, and shall be subject to the reasonable review and approval of an environmental consultant selected by Landlord and reasonably acceptable to Tenant to ensure that the Surrender Plan is likely to result in the surrender of the Premises free of all Hazardous Materials and in a manner that results in the release of all Hazardous Materials Clearances. In connection with the review and approval of the Surrender Plan, upon the request of Landlord, Tenant shall deliver to Landlord or its consultant such additional non-proprietary information concerning Tenant HazMat Operations as Landlord shall reasonably request. On or before such surrender, Tenant shall deliver to Landlord evidence that the approved Surrender Plan shall have been completed, and Landlord shall have the right, at Landlord's sole cost and expense, to cause Landlord's environmental consultant to inspect the Premises and perform such additional procedures as may be deemed reasonably necessary to confirm that the Premises will be surrendered free of all Hazardous Materials and that all Hazardous Materials Clearances have or will be issued as of the effective date of such surrender or early termination of the Lease. Tenant shall reimburse Landlord, as Additional Rent, for the actual out-of pocket expense incurred by Landlord for Landlord's environmental consultant to review and approve the Surrender Plan and to visit the Premises and verify satisfactory completion of the same, which cost shall not exceed $5,000. Landlord shall have the unrestricted right to deliver such Surrender Plan and any report by Landlord's environmental consultant with respect to the surrender of the Premises to third parties with a need to access to the information contained in the Surrender Plan. The term "HAZARDOUS MATERIALS" means any substances, materials or wastes currently or in the future deemed or defined in any applicable law as "hazardous substances", "toxic substances", "contaminants", "pollutants" or words of similar import, but shall expressly exclude any such substances or materials contained in the Premises and/or used in connection with the electrical, HVAC and other systems serving the Premises (such as hydraulic oil used for the elevators and water treatment in the boilers) to the extent the presence of such substances or materials is required for the proper operation of the Premises and such systems and is in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations. (c) If Tenant shall fail to prepare or submit a Surrender Plan approved by Landlord, or if Tenant shall fail to complete the approved Surrender Plan, or if such Surrender Plan, whether or not approved by Landlord, shall fail to result in the surrender of the Premises free of Hazardous Materials and in the issuance of all Hazardous Materials Clearances, then Landlord shall have the right, from and after the expiration of the Term or the earlier termination of this Lease, and continuing through and including the date that is 180 days thereafter, to take such actions as Landlord may deem reasonably appropriate to assure that all Hazardous Materials are removed from the Premises and all Hazardous Materials Clearances are issued, the reasonable costs of which actions shall be reimbursed by Tenant as Additional Rent. - 16 -
(d) The yield-up of the Premises in accordance with the foregoing provisions of this Section 4.9 shall be referred to as the "Yield-Up Condition." Landlord and Tenant shall conduct an inspection of the Premises prior to the end of the Term to facilitate Landlord's identification of the items to be removed under this Section 4.9. Any property not so removed that remains on or at the Premises shall be deemed abandoned and may be removed and disposed of by Landlord in such manner as Landlord shall determine, provided, that, Tenant shall have no obligation to pay Landlord any expense incurred by it is effecting such removal and disposition and in making any incidental repairs and replacements to the Premises and for use and occupancy during the period after the expiration of the Term and prior to Tenant's performance of its obligations under this Section 4.9. 4.10. Estoppel Certificates. (a) Upon not less than ten (10) business days' prior notice from Landlord, Tenant shall execute and deliver to Landlord a statement in writing certifying that this Lease is unmodified and in full force and effect and that except as stated therein Tenant has no knowledge of any defenses, offsets or counterclaims against its obligations to pay the Annual Fixed Rent and to perform its other covenants under this Lease (or, if there have been any modifications that the same is in full force and effect as modified and stating the modifications and, if there are any defenses, offsets or counterclaims, setting them forth in reasonable detail), the dates to which the Annual Fixed Rent have been paid and a statement that Landlord is not in default hereunder beyond applicable notice, grace and cure periods (or if in default beyond applicable notice, grace and cure periods, the nature of such default, in reasonable detail). Any such statement delivered pursuant to this Section 4.10 may be relied upon by any prospective purchaser or mortgage of the Premises, or any prospective assignee of any such mortgage. (b) Upon not less than ten (10) business days' prior notice from Tenant, Landlord shall execute and deliver to Tenant a statement in writing certifying that this Lease is unmodified and in full force and effect and that except as stated therein Landlord has no knowledge of any defenses, offsets or counterclaims against its obligations to perform its covenants under this Lease, (or, if there have been any modifications that the same is in full force and effect as modified and stating the modifications and, if there are any defenses, offsets or counterclaims, setting them forth in reasonable detail), the dates to which the Annual Fixed Rent has been paid and a statement that Tenant is not in default hereunder beyond applicable notice, grace and cure periods (or if in default beyond applicable notice, grace and cure periods, the nature of such default, in reasonable detail). Any such statement delivered pursuant to this Section 4.10 may be relied upon by any prospective lender, subtenant or assignee of Tenant. 4.11. Park Restrictions. Each of Landlord and Tenant shall comply with the restrictions and covenants set forth in Declaration of Protective Covenants. 4.12. Holding Over. Tenant covenants that it will vacate the Premises immediately upon the expiration or sooner termination of this Lease. If Tenant retains possession of the Premises or any part thereof after the termination of the Term without Landlord's express consent, Tenant shall be treated as a tenant at sufferance and shall pay to Landlord the following percentages of Annual Fixed Rent payable during the last Lease Year preceding expiration or termination of the term: 110% for the first month of such holdover, 125% for the second and - 17 -
third months of such holdover and 150% thereafter. Landlord's acceptance of such rent shall not in any manner adversely affect Landlord's rights to evict Tenant from the Premises; provided, however, that such rent shall constitute liquidated damages and Tenant shall have no obligation to pay separate or additional damages incurred by Landlord. Landlord may elect to refuse payment of holdover rent pursuant to this Section 4.12 and in such event Landlord shall have the right to remove Tenant through summary proceedings for holding over beyond the expiration of the Term of this Lease. 4.13. Assignment and Subletting. (a) Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, Tenant shall not assign this Lease or sublet all or any portion of the Premises without Landlord's prior written consent, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned. Within twenty (20) days after delivery by Tenant of any request for Landlord's consent to a sublease or assignment, Landlord shall deliver notice to Tenant indicating whether it consents or does not consent to such proposed sublease or assignment. If Landlord withholds its consent, such notice shall contain a detailed explanation of the factors considered and conclusions arrived at by Landlord in withholding its consent. If Landlord fails to deliver such notice to Tenant within such twenty (20) day period, Landlord shall be deemed to have consented to the proposed assignment or sublease. The sole factors that Landlord may consider in determining whether to consent or not to consent to a sublease or assignment are (a) whether the proposed subtenant or assignee has sufficient net worth and working capital to perform the obligations under the proposed this Lease or the proposed sublease, as the case may be and (b) whether the use and occupancy of the Premises by the proposed subtenant or assignee would result in additional material financial risks to Landlord. Landlord acknowledges that Tenant may, from time to time, desire to grant Tenant's lender(s) a security interest in the equipment and furnishings that Tenant may install or maintain in the Premises and that Tenant shall have the right to grant such security interests without the consent of Landlord, provided that no such security interest shall encumber any fixture that Tenant is not entitled under the terms of this Lease to remove at the expiration of the Term. Any attempted assignment of this Lease without the prior written approval of Landlord shall be void. No assignment approved or permitted to be made without Landlord's consent under the next following paragraph of this Section 4.13, and no indulgence granted by Landlord to any assignee or sublessee, shall in any way impair the continuing primary liability (which after an assignment shall be joint and several with the assignee) of Tenant hereunder, and no approval in a particular instance shall be deemed to be a waiver of the obligation to obtain Landlord's approval in any other case. (b) Notwithstanding the terms of Section 4.13(a), Landlord agrees that Tenant shall have the right, without Landlord's consent, to assign this Lease or sublease all or a portion of the Premises, as applicable as follows: (i) Tenant shall have the right to assign this Lease to a Credit Entity (hereinafter defined). As used herein, a "Credit Entity" shall mean any person that immediately following such assignment and having given effect thereto will have a publicly traded unsecured senior debt rating of "Baa2" or better from Moody's Investor's Services, Inc. or a rating of "BBB" or better from Standard & Poor's Corporation (or comparable ratings from successor - 18 -
rating agencies) (or, if such Person does not then have rated debt, a determination that by either of such rating agencies its unsecured senior debt would be so rated by such agency); (ii) Tenant shall have the right to sublease all or a portion of the Premises to a Credit Entity; or (iii) Tenant shall have the right to assign this Lease or sublet all or any portion of the Premises to any corporation, person or entity directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by, or under common control with, Tenant (an "Affiliate of Tenant") or to any successor by merger, consolidation or acquisition of all or substantially all of the assets of Tenant, provided that, in the case of an assignment to an Affiliate of Tenant or to a successor by merger, consolidation or acquisition of all or substantially all of the assets of Tenant, such assignee shall have a net worth and working capital sufficient to enable such assignee to meet Tenant's financial obligations hereunder. (c) In connection with any assignment of the Lease permitted without the consent of Landlord pursuant to Section 4.13(b), effective on the date of the assignment, Tenant shall be released from all obligations under this Lease arising prior to such effective date. (d) If Landlord's consent is required with respect to any assignment of this Lease or any sublease of the Premises or any part thereof, and Landlord shall grant such consent, Tenant shall, in consideration therefor, pay to Landlord, as Additional Rent, an amount equal to one-half of: (i) in the case of an assignment, one-half (1/2) of all sums and other consideration paid to Tenant by the assignee for, or by reason of, such assignment to the extent such sums are in excess of the obligations assumed by the assignee to pay Annual Fixed Rent, Additional Rent and other sums under this Lease; and (ii) in the case of a sublease, one-half (1/2) of any rents, additional charges, or other consideration payable under the sublease by the subtenant to Tenant that are in excess of the Annual Fixed Rent and Additional Rent accruing during the term of the sublease in respect of the subleased space (at the rate per square foot payable by Tenant hereunder) pursuant to the terms hereof; after deducting in both such cases all of Tenant's reasonable out-of-pocket expenses actually and directly incurred in connection with such sublease or assignment including, without limitation, reasonable legal fees, brokerage commissions, marketing costs, alterations to the space, rent concessions, tenant improvements or allowance, or any rent-free period, such expenses to be amortized over the term of the sublease (in the case of a sublease) or over the remaining term of this Lease (in the case of an assignment where the consideration is not paid in a lump sum on the date of such assignment). The sums payable under this Section 4.13(d) shall be paid to Landlord as and when payable by the subtenant or assignee to Tenant. 4.14. Waste; Nuisance. Tenant shall not commit any nuisance or allow or suffer any waste to the Premises. - 19 -
4.15. Installations, Alterations or Additions. (a) Tenant shall not make any installations, alterations or additions in, to or on the Premises which would have a material adverse effect on the structural or external architectural integrity of the Premises, or the cost of which would exceed $250,000 with respect to a single project, without obtaining the prior written consent of Landlord, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned. In all cases where plans are prepared for any work to be done by Tenant having a cost of more than $250,000 or involving structural modifications, Tenant shall furnish copies of the same to Landlord no less than fifteen (15) days prior to the date on which Tenant shall commence work in the Premises and in all such cases, Tenant shall provide to Landlord as-built plans in respect of such work promptly after Tenant completes the same. (b) Installations, alterations or improvements performed by Tenant in or at the Building shall not require Landlord's prior consent if such installations, alterations or improvements would not have a material adverse effect on the structural or architectural integrity of the Premises. Landlord shall not have the right to require Tenant to remove at the end of the Term Tenant's Property or any installations, alterations or additions made during the Term. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this Section 4.15 shall require Tenant to obtain Landlord's consent to the installation, removal or substitution of Tenant's Property (hereinafter defined) in connection with the operation of Tenant's business so long as such installation, removal or substitution does not adversely affect in any material respect any structural component of the Building. "Tenant's Property" shall mean all of the following located in or used by Tenant in connection with the Premises (which shall be the sole property of Tenant): all personal property of any type whatsoever, all trade fixtures, machinery, office equipment, manufacturing equipment and used in connection with Tenant's business, production equipment, laboratory equipment, office equipment, furniture, together with all additions thereto, substitutions therefor and replacements thereof. (c) The following procedures shall apply with respect to any installations, alterations or additions in, to or on the Premises that require Landlord's prior consent pursuant to Section 4.15(a): Tenant shall submit to Landlord for review and comment construction plans, specifications and drawings for the Proposed Alterations ("Construction Drawings"). Landlord shall deliver its written comments on the Construction Drawings to Tenant not later than ten (10) business days after Landlord's receipt of the same. If Landlord does not respond within ten (10) business days to any request by Tenant for consent to the Construction Drawings, then Landlord's consent shall be deemed given. Such process shall continue until the Construction Drawings are approved or deemed approved by Landlord. Any disputes in connection with such comments shall be resolved in accordance with Section 4.15(d) hereof. (d) In the event of any dispute regarding the design of the Proposed Alterations, which is not settled within ten (10) business days after notice of such dispute is delivered by one party to the other, Tenant shall make the final decision regarding the design of the Tenant Improvements, provided (i) Tenant acts reasonably and such final decision is either consistent with or a compromise between Landlord's and Tenant's positions with respect to such dispute, and (ii) such dispute does not involve a proposed modification or alteration of the exterior shell of the Building. - 20 -
(e) Landlord and Tenant hereby agree that disputes over Proposed Alterations that are not resolved pursuant to Section 4.15(c), (each, an "ARBITRATION MATTER") which cannot be resolved between Landlord and Tenant will be submitted to binding arbitration. If either party delivers to the other a demand for arbitration of an Arbitration Matter, then Landlord and Tenant shall meet (which meeting may take place by telephone conference) within three (3) business days after delivery of the demand for arbitration and make a good faith attempt to mutually appoint a single Arbitrator (as defined below) to determine the Arbitration Matter. If Landlord and Tenant are unable to agree upon a single Arbitrator, then each shall, by written notice delivered to the other within five (5) business days after the meeting, select an Arbitrator. If either party fails to timely give notice of its selection for an Arbitrator, the other party's Arbitrator shall be the sole Arbitrator. If each party selects an Arbitrator, then the two Arbitrators so appointed shall, within five (5) business days after their appointment, appoint a third Arbitrator, who shall be the sole Arbitrator. If the two Arbitrators so selected cannot agree on the selection of the third Arbitrator within the time above specified, then either party, on behalf of both parties, may request such appointment of such third Arbitrator by application to any state court of general jurisdiction in the jurisdiction in which the Premises are located, upon 5 business days prior written notice to the other party of such intent. The Arbitrator shall hold an arbitration proceeding, to be attended by Landlord and Tenant, within ten (10) business days of the Arbitrator's appointment. The decision of the Arbitrator shall be made within two (2) days after the arbitration proceeding. Each party shall pay the fees and expenses of the Arbitrator appointed by or on behalf of such party. The fees and expenses of any single Arbitrator or the third Arbitrator shall be borne equally by both parties. The parties hereby waive any right to appeal the decision of the Arbitrator. An "ARBITRATOR" for purposes of this Section only shall be any person appointed by or on behalf of either party pursuant to the provisions hereof and shall be a retired judge of the Superior Court or Land Court of Middlesex County, Massachusetts or an individual otherwise mutually agreed to by Landlord and Tenant. (f) Landlord shall not charge any fees for such approvals or in connection with the construction of any such alterations. 4.16. Signage. Tenant shall have the right, without the consent of Landlord, to display Tenant identification signage on the exterior and interior of the Building, in the parking areas serving the Building and on the Primary Lot. The size, design and placement of said signage shall be in compliance with applicable laws. Tenant shall have no obligation to remove any signage upon the expiration or earlier termination of this Lease. 4.17. Parking. Tenant shall have the exclusive right to use and occupy the parking areas located on the Land. 4.18. Landlord's Additional Covenants. Except for mortgages granted with respect to the Premises to secure a financing, Landlord shall not encumber the Premises or permit any other person to use or occupy the Premises without the prior consent of Tenant. Without the prior written consent of Tenant, Landlord shall not construct any installations, alterations or additions on, to or under the Premises, except to the extent necessary to perform its obligations under this Lease. - 21 -
ARTICLE V CASUALTY OR TAKING 5.1. Casualty. (a) If, at any time during the Term, the Building or the Premises are damaged or destroyed by a fire or other insured casualty, Landlord shall notify Tenant within 30 days after discovery of such damage (a "Restoration Notice") as to the amount of time Landlord reasonably estimates it will take to restore the Premises, as applicable (the "Restoration Period"). If the Restoration Period is estimated to exceed fifteen (15) months (the "Maximum Restoration Period"), Landlord may, in such notice, elect to terminate this Lease as of the date that is seventy-five (75) days after the date of discovery of such damage or destruction; provided, however, that notwithstanding Landlord's election to restore, Tenant may elect to terminate this Lease by written notice to Landlord delivered within forty-five (45) days of receipt of a notice from Landlord estimating a Restoration Period for the Premises longer than the Maximum Restoration Period. Unless either Landlord or Tenant so elects to terminate this Lease pursuant to this Section 5.1, Landlord shall promptly restore the Premises (including all tenant improvements that were part of the Premises as of the date of this Lease), as needed to obtain any license, clearance or other authorization of any kind required to enter into and restore the Premises issued by any Governmental Authority having jurisdiction over the use, storage, handling, treatment, generation, release, disposal, removal or remediation of Hazardous Materials (hereinafter defined) in, on or about the Premises (collectively referred to herein as "HAZARDOUS MATERIALS CLEARANCES"); provided, however, that if repair or restoration of the Premises is not substantially complete as of the end of the Maximum Restoration Period, Landlord shall cease all work, and Tenant may by written notice to Landlord delivered within five (5) business days of the expiration of Maximum Restoration Period, elect to terminate this Lease. If Tenant elects to terminate this Lease, Landlord shall be relieved of its obligation to make repairs or restoration, and this Lease shall terminate as of the date of discovery of such damage or destruction. Landlord shall retain any Rent paid and the right to any Rent payable by Tenant and applicable to the date of termination. If Tenant does not timely elect to terminate, this Lease shall remain in full force and effect, and Landlord shall complete all repairs and restoration as soon as reasonably practicable. (b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 5.1(a), (i) if there is Material Damage (as hereinafter defined) and the date set forth in the Restoration Notice is more than twelve (12) months from the date of such damage, then Tenant shall have the right to terminate this Lease by giving notice to Landlord (a "TENANT TERMINATION NOTICE"), not later than thirty (30) days following Tenant's receipt of the Restoration Notice. If this Lease is terminated by Landlord pursuant to Section 5.1(a) or by Tenant pursuant to this Section 5.1(b), (a) the Term shall expire upon the thirtieth (30th) day after notice of termination is given or on such later date as Tenant reasonably requires so long as Tenant is continuously and diligently using good faith commercially reasonable efforts to relocate, (b) Tenant's liability for Rent shall cease proportionately as of the date Tenant vacates the Premises, and (c) any prepaid Rent for any period after the date Tenant's liability for Rent has ceased shall be refunded by Landlord to Tenant. - 22 -
(c) For purposes of this Article V, the term "MATERIAL DAMAGE" shall mean either (i) fifteen percent (15%) or more of the rentable area of the Premises is damaged and thereby rendered untenantable or not reasonably usable by Tenant for its then current Permitted Use, or (ii) a portion of the Premises is damaged and as a result thereof, Tenant is denied reasonable use or access to a material portion of the Premises. (d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Article V, either Landlord or Tenant may terminate this Lease if the Premises are damaged during the last 18 months of the Term and a third party architect or engineer reasonably acceptable to both Landlord and Tenant determines that it will take more than five (5) months to repair or restore such damage, or if insurance proceeds are not available for such repair or restoration. Rent shall be abated from the date of discovery of such damage or destruction until the Premises are repaired and restored, in the proportion which the area of the Premises, if any, which is not usable by Tenant bears to the total area of the Premises, unless Landlord provides Tenant with other space during the period of repair that is suitable for the temporary conduct of Tenant's business. Such abatement shall be the sole remedy of Tenant, and except as provided in this Section 5.1, Tenant waives any right to terminate the Lease by reason of damage or casualty loss. (e) The provisions of this Lease, including this Section 5.1, constitute an express agreement between Landlord and Tenant with respect to any and all damage to, or destruction of, all or any part of the Premises, and any statute or regulation which is now or may hereafter be in effect shall have no application to this Lease or any damage or destruction to all or any part of the Premises, the parties hereto expressly agreeing that this Section 5.1 sets forth their entire understanding and agreement with respect to such matters. 5.2. Taking. (a) If during the Term the entire Premises shall be taken or condemned by any public authority or for any public use or destroyed by the action of any public authority (including by sale under threat of such a taking) (a "Taking"), then this Lease shall terminate on the date on which title vests in such public authority, and the Annual Fixed Rent and Additional Rent shall be abated on and as of such date, and the parties' obligations hereunder shall cease. If only a part of the Premises shall be subject to a Taking, then, except as hereinafter provided in this Article, this Lease and the Term shall continue in full force and effect, provided that from and after the date of the vesting of title, the Annual Fixed Rent shall be modified to reflect the reduction of the Premises and/or the Building as a result of such Taking. (b) If there is a Taking of more than fifty percent (50%) of the Building, Landlord may elect to terminate this Lease by notice to Tenant given within thirty (30) days after the effective time of such Taking, and this Lease shall terminate effective as of the date set forth in Landlord's notice which shall in no event be earlier than thirty (30) days from the date of such notice. (c) If (i) the part of the Premises subject to a Taking contains more than ten percent (10%) of the total area of the Building or a material portion of the parking area located on the Land, (and, with respect to the parking areas, Landlord is unable to provide Tenant with replacement parking reasonably acceptable to Tenant), immediately prior to such acquisition or - 23 -
condemnation, or (ii) if, by reason of such acquisition or condemnation, Tenant no longer has reasonable means of access to ten percent (10%) or more of the area of the Building, then Tenant may terminate this Lease by notice to Landlord, and this Lease shall end and expire on the effective time of the Taking. (d) Upon any termination of this Lease pursuant to the provisions of this Section 5.2, Annual Fixed Rent and Additional Rent shall be apportioned as of, and shall be paid or refunded up to and including, the date of such termination. (e) Upon any acquisition or condemnation of all or any part of the Premises, Landlord shall receive the entire award for any such acquisition or condemnation, and Tenant shall have no claim against Landlord or the condemning authority for the value of any unexpired portion of the Term. Nothing contained in this Article V shall be deemed to prevent Tenant from making a separate claim in any condemnation proceedings for Tenant's Property, alterations installed by Tenant or improvements, the then value of any Tenant's fixtures or personal property and for any moving expenses. 5.3. Restoration. If neither Tenant nor Landlord exercises its election to terminate provided in Section 5.1 or 5.2, as may be applicable, then this Lease shall continue in full force and effect and a just proportion of the Annual Fixed Rent and other charges hereunder, according to the nature and extent of the damages sustained, shall be abated from the date of Casualty or Taking until Landlord shall have substantially completed the restoration of the Premises, as provided under this Article V. Landlord shall complete such restoration with as soon as practicable diligence at Landlord's expense, and the Premises shall be put by Landlord in a condition as nearly as practicable to their condition immediately prior to such Casualty or Taking, subject to zoning and building laws or ordinances then in existence. 5.4. Award. Irrespective of the form in which recovery may be had, all rights to damages for all such Takings, subject to the allocation provisions sets forth below, shall belong to Landlord in all cases; provided, however, that Tenant shall have the right to pursue any separate claim to which it is entitled for Tenant's Property and Tenant's trade fixtures and moving and relocation expenses. Landlord and Tenant agree that the net proceeds of the damages treated as belonging to Landlord under this Section 5.4 (except to the extent utilized for restoration) shall be allocated as follows: first, to Landlord in the amount equal to the then fair market value of the Premises in the Yield-Up Condition; second, to Tenant in the amount of the then unamortized (determined on a straight-line basis over the Original Term of this Lease) cost of Tenant's Property (exclusive of Tenant's Property not encompassed within such Taking) (except to the extent the same are treated as trade fixtures and a separate award is made on account thereof to Tenant); third, to Tenant in the amount of the then fair market value of Tenant's leasehold interest in the Premises; and fourth, to Landlord in the amount of the balance of the net proceeds. The procedures for the determination of Market Rent under Section 2.4 of this Lease shall be applicable to the determination of the fair market value of the Premises. In the case of a Taking which permanently reduces the Premises, the Annual Fixed Rent and other charges due hereunder shall be equitably abated or adjusted for the balance of the Term. - 24 -
ARTICLE VI DEFAULTS 6.1. Events of Default. (a) If Tenant shall default in the performance of any of its obligations to pay the Annual Fixed Rent and if such default shall continue for ten (10) days after written notice from Landlord designating such default (provided that Landlord shall not be required to give any such notice more than two (2) times in any twelve (12)-month period), or (b) if Tenant shall default in the performance of any of its obligations to pay Additional Rent hereunder and if such default shall continue for ten (10) days after written notice from Landlord designating such default, or (c) if within thirty (30) days after written notice from Landlord to Tenant specifying any other default or defaults Tenant has not commenced diligently to correct the default or defaults so specified or does not thereafter diligently prosecute such correction to completion within a reasonable period of time under the circumstances, or (d) if any assignment for the benefit of creditors shall be made by Tenant without Landlord's consent, or (e) if Tenant's leasehold interest shall be taken on execution or other process of law in any action against Tenant, or (f) if a lien or other involuntary encumbrance is filed against Tenant's leasehold interest and is not discharged or bonded within forty-five (45) days thereafter, or (g) if a petition is filed by Tenant for liquidation or for reorganization or an arrangement or any other relief under any provision of the Bankruptcy Code as then in force and affect, or (h) if an involuntary petition under any of the provisions of said Bankruptcy Code is filed against Tenant and such involuntary petition is not dismissed within sixty (60) days thereafter, then, and in any of such cases, Landlord and the agents and servants of Landlord lawfully may, in addition to and not in derogation of any remedies for any preceding breach of covenant, immediately or at any time thereafter and without demand or notice and with or without process of law (forcibly, if necessary, to the extent permitted by law) enter into and upon the Premises or any part thereof in the name of the whole, or mail a notice of termination addressed to Tenant, and repossess the same as of Landlord's former estate and expel Tenant and those claiming through or under Tenant and remove its and their effects (forcibly, if necessary, to the extent permitted by law) without being deemed guilty of any manner of trespass and without prejudice to any remedies which might otherwise be used for arrears of rent or prior breach of covenant, and upon such entry or mailing as aforesaid this Lease shall terminate and Landlord, without notice to Tenant, may store Tenant's effects and those of any person claiming through or under Tenant at the expense and risk of Tenant and, if Landlord so elects, may sell such effects at public auction or private sale and apply the net proceeds to the payment of all sums due to Landlord from Tenant, if any, and pay over the balance, if any, to Tenant. 6.2. Remedies. In the event that this Lease is terminated under any of the circumstances contained in Section 6.1, Tenant covenants to pay forthwith to Landlord, as compensation, the excess of the total rent reserved for the residue of the Term over the fair market rental value of the Premises for the residue of the Term, which shall be calculated on a net present value basis using a discount rate equal to the Prime Rate as published in the "Money Rates" Section of The Wall Street Journal ("Prime Rate"). In calculating the rent reserved there shall be included, in addition to the Annual Fixed Rent and Additional Rent, the value of all other considerations agreed to be paid or performed by Tenant during the residue. Tenant further covenants as - 25 -
additional and cumulative obligation after any such termination to pay punctually to Landlord all the sums and to perform all the obligations which Tenant covenants in this Lease to pay and to perform in the same manner and to the same extent and at the same time as if this Lease had not been terminated. In calculating the amounts to be paid by Tenant pursuant to the preceding sentence, Tenant shall be credited with any amount paid to Landlord as compensation as provided in this Section 6.2, and also with the net proceeds of any rent obtained by Landlord by reletting the Premises, after deducting all Landlord's reasonable expenses in connection with such reletting; including, without limitation, all repossession costs, brokerage commissions, fees for legal services and expenses of preparing the Premises for such reletting, it being agreed that Landlord shall use reasonable efforts to (i) relet the Premises or any part or parts thereof for a term or terms which may at Landlord's option be equal to or less than or exceed the period which would otherwise have constituted the balance of the Term, which may include granting such concessions and free rent as Landlord in its reasonable judgment considers advisable or necessary to relet the same and (ii) make such alterations, repairs and decorations in the Premises as Landlord in its reasonable judgment considers advisable or necessary to relet the same, and no action of Landlord in accordance with the foregoing or failure to relet or to collect rent under reletting shall operate or be construed to release or reduce Tenant's liability as aforesaid. Nothing contained in this Lease shall, however, limit or prejudice the right of Landlord to prove and obtain in proceedings for bankruptcy or insolvency by reason of the termination of this Lease, an amount equal to the maximum allowed by any statute or rule of law in effect at the time when, and governing the proceedings in which, the damages are to be proved, whether or not the amount be greater than, equal to, or less than the amount of the loss or damages referred to above. 6.3. Remedies Cumulative. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, any and all rights and remedies which either party may have under this Lease, and at law and equity, shall be cumulative and shall not be deemed inconsistent with one another, and any two or more of all such rights and remedies may be exercised at the same time insofar as permitted by law. 6.4. Landlord's Rights to Cure Defaults. Landlord may, but shall not be obligated to, cure, at any time following notice to Tenant and expiration of all applicable cure, notice and grace periods (except in cases of emergency, in which case only such notice, if any, as may be reasonable under the circumstances need be given), any default by Tenant under this Lease; and whenever Landlord so elects, all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by Landlord, including reasonable attorneys' fees, in curing a default shall be paid by Tenant to Landlord as Additional Rent on demand, together with interest thereon at the Delinquency Rate (as defined in Section 6.7) from the date of payment by Landlord to the date of payment by Tenant. 6.5. Effect of Waivers of Default. Any consent or permission by either party to any act or omission which otherwise would be a breach of any covenant or condition herein, or any waiver by either party of the breach of any covenant or condition herein, shall not in any way be held or construed (unless expressly so declared) to operate so as to impair the continuing obligation of any covenant or condition herein, or otherwise, except as to the specific instance, operate to permit similar acts or omissions. - 26 -
The failure of either party to seek redress for violation of, or to insist upon the strict performance of, any covenant or condition of this Lease shall not be deemed a waiver of such violation nor prevent a subsequent act, which would have originally constituted a violation, from having all the force and effect of an original violation. The receipt by Landlord of rent with knowledge of the breach of any covenant of this Lease shall not be deemed to have been a waiver of such breach by Landlord. No consent or waiver, express or implied, by either party to or of any breach of any agreement or duty shall be construed as a waiver or consent to or of any other breach of the same or any other agreement or duty. 6.6. No Accord and Satisfaction. No acceptance by Landlord of a lesser sum than the Annual Fixed Rent, Additional Rent or any other charge then due shall be deemed to be other than on account of the earliest installment of such rent or charge due, unless Landlord elects by notice to Tenant to credit such sum against the most recent installment due, nor shall any endorsement or statement on any check or any letter accompanying any check or payment as rent or other charge be deemed an accord and satisfaction, and Landlord may accept such check or payment without prejudice to Landlord's right to recover the balance of such installment or pursue any other remedy provided in this Lease. 6.7. Interest on Overdue Sums. If Tenant fails to pay any installment of Annual Fixed Rent, Additional Rent and other charges payable by Tenant to Landlord within ten (10) business days after the due date thereof (without regard to any requirement of notice from Landlord or any period of grace allowed to Tenant under this Lease before Landlord is allowed to exercise any remedy on account thereof), the amount so unpaid shall bear interest at an annual rate (the "Delinquency Rate") equal to 400 basis points above the Prime Rate, if such rate is in excess of any maximum interest rate permissible under applicable law, the Delinquency Rate shall be the maximum interest rate permissible under applicable law, commencing with the due date and continuing through the day preceding the date on which payment of such delinquent payment with interest thereon is paid. Similarly, if Landlord fails to pay any amount payable to Tenant by Landlord within ten (10) business days after the due date thereof, the amount so unpaid shall bear interest at the Delinquency Rate, commencing with the due date and continuing through the date preceding the date on which payment of such delinquent payment with interest thereon is paid. ARTICLE VII MORTGAGES 7.1. Rights of Mortgage Holders. The word "mortgage" as used herein includes mortgages, deeds of trust or other similar instruments evidencing other voluntary liens or encumbrances, and modifications, consolidations, extensions, renewals, replacements and substitutes thereof. The word "holder" shall mean a mortgagee, and any subsequent holder or holders of a mortgage. In the event of any act or omission by Landlord which would give Tenant the right to terminate this Lease or to claim a partial or total eviction, Tenant shall not exercise any such right (a) until it shall have given notice, by certified or registered mail, of such act or omission to the holder of any mortgage encumbering the Premises whose name and address shall have been - 27 -
furnished to Tenant in writing, at the last address so furnished, and (b) unless Landlord or such holder shall have failed to commence to remedy such act or omission within thirty (30) days after such notice or thereafter diligently to prosecute such remedy to completion. In the event any proceedings are brought for the foreclosure of, or in the event of exercise of the power of sale under, any mortgage now or hereafter encumbering the Premises, or any part thereof, Tenant shall attorn to the purchaser upon such foreclosure or sale or upon any grant of a deed in lieu of foreclosure and recognize such purchaser as Landlord under this Lease if so requested by such purchaser, so long as such purchaser recognizes all of Tenant's rights under this Lease. 7.2. Superiority of Lease: Option to Subordinate. Unless Landlord exercises the option set forth below in this Section 7.2, this Lease shall be superior to and shall not be subordinate to any mortgage on the Premises. Landlord shall have the option to subordinate this Lease to any mortgage of the Premises provided that the holder of record thereof enters into a subordination and non-disturbance agreement with Tenant, in form reasonably acceptable to Tenant (the "SNDA"), by the terms of which such holder will agree (a) to recognize the rights of Tenant under this Lease and not to disturb Tenant's possession of the Premises so long as Tenant is not in default of its obligations hereunder beyond applicable notice, grace and cure periods, (b) to cure any repair or maintenance default which shall be continuing upon acquisition of the Premises by such holder, (c) to perform Landlord's obligations hereunder arising on and after the date of such holder's acquisition of title and (d) to accept Tenant as tenant of the Premises under the terms and conditions of this Lease in the event of acquisition of title by such holder through foreclosure proceedings or otherwise, and Tenant will agree to recognize the holder of such mortgage as Landlord in such event, and which agreement shall be made expressly to bind and inure to the benefit of the successors and assigns of Tenant and of the holder and upon anyone purchasing said Premises at any foreclosure sale. Tenant and Landlord agree to execute and deliver any appropriate and mutually acceptable instruments necessary to carry out the agreements contained in this Section 7.2. Any such mortgage to which this Lease shall be subordinated may contain such terms, provisions and conditions as the holder deems usual or customary; subject to the provisions of the SNDA. ARTICLE VIII MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS 8.1. Notices from One Party to the Other. All notices and other communications required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and addressed, if to Tenant, at the Original Address of Tenant or such other address as Tenant shall have last designated by notice in writing to Landlord and, if to Landlord, at the Original Address of Landlord or such other address as Landlord shall have last designated by notice in writing to Tenant. Any notice shall be given by mailing to such address postage prepaid, registered or certified mail, return receipt requested or by delivery by a nationally-recognized overnight delivery service which provides delivery receipts, or delivered to such address by hand. Any notice shall be effective upon receipt or tender of delivery. - 28 -
8.2. Quiet Enjoyment. Landlord agrees that upon Tenant's paying the rent and performing and observing the terms, covenants, conditions and provisions on its part to be performed and observed, Tenant shall and may peaceably and quietly have, hold and enjoy the Premises during the Term without any manner of hindrance or molestation from Landlord or anyone claiming under Landlord, subject, however, to Landlord's remedies under this Lease in the event of a default by Tenant hereunder. 8.3. Recordation of Lease. Tenant shall, at its sole cost, have the right to record this Lease in the land records of the jurisdiction in which the Building is located. Both parties shall, upon the request of either, execute, deliver and record a Notice of Lease in the form attached hereto as Exhibit D, with such modifications as may be permitted by applicable statute, or otherwise agreed to by the parties. If this Lease is terminated before the originally scheduled expiration of the Term, the parties shall execute, deliver and record an instrument acknowledging such fact and the actual date of termination of this Lease, and Tenant hereby appoints Landlord its attorney-in-fact, coupled with an interest, with full power of substitution to execute such instrument. 8.4. Bind and Inure: Limitation of Landlord's Liability. The obligations of this Lease shall run with the land, and this Lease shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. No owner of the Premises shall be liable under this Lease except for breaches of Landlord's obligations occurring while owner of the Premises, provided, however, that (a) any successor Landlord shall be obligated to cure any repair or maintenance default of a prior Landlord which shall be continuing upon acquisition of the Premises by such successor Landlord and (b) any successor Landlord (other than a mortgagee or a person acquiring title on foreclosure or conveyance in lieu of foreclosure) shall be obligated to cure any payment default of a prior Landlord which shall be continuing upon acquisition of the Premises by such successor Landlord. The obligations of Landlord shall be binding upon the assets of Landlord which comprise the Premises, any portion thereof, and any rents, proceeds, insurance proceeds and condemnation awards arising therefrom. In no event shall Landlord be liable to Tenant for any indirect, consequential or punitive damages arising out of a breach by Landlord of its obligations hereunder. No individual partner, trustee, stockholder, officer, director, employee, beneficiary, member or manager of Landlord shall be personally liable under this Lease and Tenant shall look solely to Landlord's interest in the Premises (including any rents and profits) therefrom arising after enforcement is sought, or arising prior to enforcement (to the extent the latter have not been distributed or used by Landlord) in pursuit of its remedies upon an Event of Default under Section 6.1, and the assets of Landlord and its partners, trustees, stockholders, officers, employees, beneficiaries, members or managers shall not be subject to levy, execution or other enforcement procedure for the satisfaction of the remedies of Tenant; provided that the foregoing provisions of this sentence shall not constitute a waiver of any obligation evidenced by this Lease and provided further that the foregoing provisions of this sentence shall not limit the right of Tenant to name Landlord or any partner or trustee thereof as party defendant in any action or suit in connection with this Lease so long as no personal money judgment shall be asked for or taken against any partner, trustee, stockholder, officer, employee beneficiary, member or manager of Landlord. 8.5. Acts of God. In any case where either party hereto is required to do any act, then, except where specifically provided in this Lease to the contrary, delays caused by or resulting - 29 -
from acts of God, war, civil commotion, fire, flood or other casualty, government regulations, moratoria, unusually severe weather, or other causes beyond such party's reasonable control which are unrelated to labor difficulties and shortages of labor, materials or equipment shall not be counted in determining the time during which such act shall be completed, whether such time be designated by a fixed date, a fixed time or a "reasonable time", and such time shall be deemed to be extended by the period of such delay. 8.6. Landlord's Default; Tenant's Right of Self-Help. Landlord shall not be deemed to be in default in the performance of any of its obligations hereunder unless it shall fail to perform such obligations and unless within thirty (30) days after notice from Tenant to Landlord specifying such default Landlord has not commenced diligently to correct the default so specified or has not thereafter diligently pursued such correction to completion. Except only as specifically otherwise provided in this Lease, Tenant shall have no right, for any default by Landlord, to offset or counterclaim against any rent due hereunder. If, by reason of any failure which is not due to any act or omission of Tenant or any employee, agent, contractor, licensee, or invitee of Tenant, Tenant's use and enjoyment of the Premises materially is impaired by reason of Landlord's failure to comply with its obligations under this Lease, then Tenant may give Landlord and all holders of mortgages on the Premises written notice thereof, and if Landlord or any said holder (if such holder shall elect to do so) shall fail to begin correction of such condition by a date which is ten (10) days after Landlord's receipt of such notice, Tenant shall have the right, but shall not be required, to perform such repair or restoration work as is reasonably necessary to cure the condition. In the event of the proper exercise of such right of self-help by Tenant in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph, Landlord agrees to pay Tenant, within thirty (30) days of billing, the reasonable costs incurred by Tenant in curing such condition or, in the event Landlord fails to so reimburse Tenant within such thirty-day period, Tenant shall have the right to offset said amounts against Tenant's Annual Fixed Rent obligations next-coming due hereunder. Landlord shall pay on demand Tenant's expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred by Tenant in successfully enforcing any obligation of Landlord under this Lease. 8.7. Brokerage. Each of Tenant and Landlord warrants and represents to the other that it has had no dealings with any broker or agent in connection with this Lease other than the Broker(s) named in Article I and covenants to defend with counsel approved by the other, hold harmless and indemnify the other from and against any and all cost, expense or liability for any compensation, commissions and charges claimed by any broker or agent other than the Broker(s) named in Article I with respect to its dealings in connection with this Lease or the negotiation thereof. The brokerage commission of Broker shall be paid by Tenant pursuant to a separate agreement. 8.8. Applicable Law and Construction. This Lease shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. If any term, covenant, condition or provision of this Lease or the application thereof to any person or circumstances shall be declared invalid or unenforceable by the final ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction having final review, the remaining terms, covenants conditions and provisions of this Lease and their application thereof to persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby and shall - 30 -
continue to be enforced and recognized as valid agreements of the parties, and in the place of such invalid or unenforceable provision, there shall be substituted a like, but valid and enforceable, provision which comports to the findings of the aforesaid court and most nearly accomplishes the original intention of the parties. There are no prior oral or written agreements between Landlord and Tenant affecting this Lease. This Lease may be amended, and the provisions hereof may be waived or modified, only by instruments in writing executed by Landlord and Tenant. The titles of the several Articles and Sections contained herein are for convenience only and shall not be considered in construing this Lease. Unless repugnant to the context, the words "Landlord" and "Tenant" appearing in this Lease shall be construed to mean those named above and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns, and those holding title or claiming through or under them respectively. If there be more than one tenant the obligations imposed by this Lease upon Tenant shall be joint and several. Time is of the essence with respect to all terms and conditions of this Agreement. 8.9. Submission Not an Offer. The submission of a draft of this Lease or a summary of some or all of its provisions does not constitute an offer to lease or demise the Premises, it being understood and agreed that neither Landlord nor Tenant shall be legally bound with respect to the leasing of the Premises unless and until this Lease has been executed by both Landlord and Tenant and a fully executed copy delivered. 8.10. Security Deposit. Tenant shall deposit with Landlord a security deposit equal to six (6) months of Annual Fixed Rent in the total amount of One Million Six Hundred Four Thousand Sixty-Three and no/100 Dollars ($1,604,063.00) in the form of an unconditional, irrevocable letter of credit without documents, with Landlord as beneficiary, in whole or in part, and providing for payment in Boston, Massachusetts ("SECURITY DEPOSIT"). The letter of credit shall be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Landlord, shall be drawn on a domestic commercial money center bank with a letter of credit paying office located in Boston, Massachusetts reasonably satisfactory to Landlord and shall be addressed to, and payable upon simple demand by, Landlord and Landlord's mortgagee(s) as co-beneficiaries, which demand shall be accompanied by a statement of an authorized officer or agent of Landlord stating that the drawing represents amounts due to Landlord from Tenant under this Lease. The letter of credit shall provide for multiple draws and multiple successors or co-beneficiaries. The Security Deposit shall be held by Landlord as security for the faithful performance by Tenant of all of the terms, covenants, and conditions of this Lease applicable to Tenant. If, after notice and beyond the expiration of any applicable grace period (or, if Landlord is prevented from giving notice by the automatic stay of a Bankruptcy court or by any other legal prohibition, without notice) Tenant fails to make the payment of rent or other money due hereunder, timely perform or observe any obligation of Tenant under this Lease, Landlord may (but shall not be required to) use, apply or retain all or any part of the Security Deposit for the payment of any amount which Landlord may spend by reason of Tenant's default, or for compensation to Landlord for any loss or damage which Landlord may suffer or be entitled to by reason of Tenant's failure to timely perform or observe any obligation of Tenant under this Lease. If any portion of the Security Deposit is so used or applied, Tenant shall, within ten (10) days after written demand therefor, deposit with Landlord a supplemental letter of credit in an amount sufficient to restore the Security Deposit to its original amount and otherwise in form and substance as required for the original letter of credit. If Tenant fully and faithfully performs every provision of this Lease to be performed by it, the Security Deposit or any balance thereof shall be returned (without - 31 -
interest) to Tenant at Lease expiration or termination and after Tenant has vacated the Premises. Failure of Tenant to deliver a replacement letter of credit to Landlord at least ten (10) days prior to the expiration date of any current letter of credit shall constitute a separate event entitling Landlord to draw down immediately and entirely on the current letter of credit and the proceeds shall constitute a cash Security Deposit. Landlord shall not be required to keep the cash Security Deposit separate from Landlord's general funds or be deemed to be a trustee of same. Tenant shall pay when due all fees, charges and costs imposed by the issuing bank for the issuance, transfer or amendment of the letter of credit and/or any supplemental letter of credit. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 8.10, on the Term Commencement Date, Tenant shall have the right to deposit cash in the amount of One Million Six Hundred Four Thousand Sixty-Three and no/100 Dollars ($1,604,063.00) as the Security Deposit hereunder in lieu of a letter of credit, and shall, within thirty (30) days after the Term Commencement Date, deliver to Landlord the letter of credit referenced above in this Section 8.10. Within two (2) business days after Tenant delivers to Landlord an original letter of credit in accordance with this Section 8.10, Landlord shall refund to Tenant the cash security deposit by wire transfer of immediately available funds. 8.11. Parties Responsible for Costs of Own Obligations. Except where specifically provided herein to the contrary, each party shall bear all costs and expenses of performing its obligations under this Lease. 8.12. Limitation on Damages. In no event shall Tenant be liable for any indirect, consequential or punitive damages arising from a breach of Tenant's obligations under this Lease. ARTICLE IX FIRST OPPORTUNITY; RIGHT OF FIRST REFUSAL 9.1. Tenant's Right of First Opportunity to Purchase. Landlord will not during the Term of this Lease (the "First Opportunity Period") sell the Premises or any portion thereof to a third party without first complying with the following (the "First Opportunity Rights"): (a) Landlord will not sell the Premises to a third party unless it first gives Tenant written notice of its intention to sell or attempt to sell the Premises and setting forth in detail terms and conditions upon which it would be willing to sell (a "Sale Offer") the Premises to Tenant; and (b) Tenant will have thirty (30) days after receipt of a Sale Offer (the "Offer Period") within which to accept any such Sale Offer. Failure of Tenant to accept any such Sale Offer within such Offer Period shall constitute and be deemed a rejection of such Sale Offer. If Tenant accepts such Sale Offer within such Offer Period, each of Landlord and Tenant shall execute and deliver to the other the Purchase Agreement in substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit E ("Purchase Agreement") within thirty (30) days after Tenant accepts such Sale Offer. If Tenant does not accept such Sale Offer within the Offer Period, or, if after accepting any such Sale Offer within the Offer Period, Tenant fails to execute and deliver the Purchase Agreement within thirty (30) days after Tenant accepts such Sale Offer, then Landlord shall be - 32 -
free, for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days after the expiration of the Offer Period, to sell the Premises (i) at a price which is not less than ninety-five percent (95%) of the purchase price offered to Tenant in the Sale Offer or (ii) on other terms and conditions materially more beneficial to buyer than those offered to Tenant in the Sale Offer, without re-offering the Premises to Tenant at such reduced price and/or better terms, as applicable, by written notice (the "Reduced Offer"), whereupon Tenant shall have thirty (30) days to accept the Reduced Offer. If Tenant shall fail within such thirty (30) day period to accept the Reduced Offer or if Tenant shall accept the Reduced Offer but shall fail to execute and deliver the Purchase Agreement within thirty (30) days after accepting the Reduced Offer, Landlord shall again be free for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days to sell the Premises to any other party in the same manner as aforesaid. If Landlord shall fail to accept a bona fide offer to sell the Premises in accordance with terms of Section this Section 9.1(b) within the time periods specified herein, then Tenant's right of first opportunity to purchase set forth in Section 9.1(a) and this Section 9.1(b) shall again become applicable. 9.2. Tenant's Right of First Refusal. If, during the Term of this Lease, Landlord shall receive an offer to purchase the Premises and Landlord desires to accept such offer (the "Landlord's Offer"), Landlord shall give written notice of the terms of Landlord's Offer and Landlord's desire to accept Landlord's Offer to Tenant (the "Landlord's Offer Notice"). If Tenant desires to acquire the Premises on the terms and conditions in Landlord's Offer Notice, Tenant shall give Landlord notice thereof (the "Tenant's Acceptance Notice") within the earlier to occur of (a) five (5) business days after the date on which Landlord gives Tenant Landlord's Offer Notice, if Tenant shall have declined a Sale Offer or Reduced Offer within the preceding twelve (12) month period or (b) thirty (30) days after the date on which Landlord gives Tenant Landlord's Offer Notice if Tenant shall not have declined a Sale Offer or Reduced Offer within the preceding twelve (12) month period, and, in the event that Tenant delivers a Tenant's Acceptance Notice, Landlord and Tenant shall promptly thereafter execute and deliver the Purchase Agreement. If Tenant does not give Tenant's Acceptance Notice to Landlord within such five (5) business day period or thirty (30) day period, as applicable, Landlord shall be entitled to accept Landlord's Offer and consummate the sale of the Premises free of Tenant's rights under this Section 9.2. ARTICLE X DEVELOPMENT OF EXPANSION LOT 10.1. Tenant's Approval Right During Term. Tenant hereby acknowledges that Landlord may desire to develop the Expansion Lot by constructing a building or other improvements thereon ("Expansion Building"). In the event Landlord desires to construct the Expansion Building, Landlord shall give notice to Tenant describing its development plan in detail reasonably satisfactory to Tenant. Tenant shall, within thirty (30) days after receipt of such notice and a development plan in detail reasonably satisfactory to Tenant, either approve or disapprove the proposed development in writing. Tenant's approval of the plans for the Expansion Building shall not be unreasonably withheld or conditioned, provided, that, Landlord acknowledges and agrees that it shall be reasonable for Tenant to withhold its approval to any design for the Expansion Building (i) to the extent such design is not for a first class office building, laboratory building, medical research facility, health care research facility or a - 33 -
combination of any of the foregoing comparable to the first class quality of the Building and other buildings located in MetroNorth Corporate Center (120 Presidential Way, 150 Presidential Way, 10 Presidential Way and 235 Presidential Way) or (ii) if it is not in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations. Any special permit obtained by Landlord with respect to the Expansion Building shall be deemed to be in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations, provided, that, Landlord acknowledges and agrees that Tenant shall have the right to disapprove any proposed use or design of the Expansion Building that is noxious or that would have a material adverse effect on Tenant's use and occupancy of the Premises. 10.2. Activities on Expansion Lot. In connection with any activities of Landlord on or affecting the Expansion Lot, Landlord hereby covenants and agrees to (i) abide by, and cause its contractors and agents to abide by, the building rules and regulations regarding construction activities at the Building, exclusive of any rules and regulations which conflict with the terms of this Lease or which have not been provided as of the date hereof to Tenant, (ii) not damage the Building or any portion of the Primary Lot and (iii) not unreasonably disturb the use, occupancy or enjoyment by Tenant or its successors and assigns of any portion of the Building or the Primary Lot. 10.3. Construction Activities of Landlord on Expansion Lot. Landlord understands and acknowledges that Tenant operates a manufacturing facility at the Premises that may be adversely affected by noise or vibrations caused by construction activities on the Primary Lot or the Expansion Lot. In connection with performing any construction activities on the Primary Lot or the Expansion Lot, Landlord will use its best efforts to avoid adversely affecting Tenant's manufacturing facility. Landlord shall provide Tenant with not less than seventy-two (72) hours' advance notice of any construction activities on the Primary Lot or Expansion Lot that could potentially have an adverse effect on Tenant's manufacturing facility or other operations. If Tenant thereafter notifies Landlord that such proposed construction activities will likely have an adverse effect on Tenant's manufacturing or other operations, Landlord shall use its best efforts to employ any and all available alternatives to the extent necessary to avoid adversely affecting Tenant's manufacturing and other operations (such as performing the work during other than Tenant's business hours; employing alternative construction methods, etc.). 10.4. Expansion Right. Subject to the terms of this Section 10.4, except during the final eighteen (18) months of the Term of this Lease, Tenant shall have the following rights to lease space in the Expansion Building (the "Expansion Space"). (a) Tenant's Preconstruction Expansion Option. Before construction of the Expansion Building is commenced and before Landlord shall enter into any binding arrangement with any third party to lease all or part of the Expansion Building, Landlord shall provide Tenant a notice (the "Preconstruction Expansion Notice") setting forth the terms and conditions under which Landlord would be willing to lease space to Tenant ("Tenant's Preconstruction Expansion Option"). Within thirty (30) days after Landlord's notice, Tenant shall inform Landlord whether it elects to lease space in the Expansion Building according to the terms set forth in the Preconstruction Expansion Notice. If Tenant does not so inform Landlord within such thirty (30) day period, Tenant shall be deemed to have elected not to lease such space in the Expansion Building. If Tenant so elects, Landlord shall offer the space to Tenant on the terms described in the Preconstruction Expansion Notice, except that Tenant shall have the right to specify that the - 34 -
term of its lease for the space in the Expansion Building shall be coterminous with the Term for its space in the Building (including any Extension Term), provided, that, the term of its lease for space in the Expansion Building shall in no event be less than five (5) years. If Tenant does not so elect, or is deemed not to have so elected, Landlord shall be free to enter into a lease with any other party for a rent with an effective value not less than 95% of the effective value of the rent in the Preconstruction Expansion Notice, which amount shall be determined based on the rental rate, rent escalations, tenant incentives and other concessions; provided, however, Landlord shall not be free to enter into a lease with any other party for rent with an effective value less than 95% of the effective value of the rent in the Preconstruction Expansion Notice without providing Tenant another Preconstruction Expansion Notice as provided above. The provisions of this Section 10.4(a) shall apply to all lease arrangements that Landlord enters into with respect to the Expansion Building prior to commencement of construction thereof. In the event Landlord does not commence construction of the Expansion Building within two (2) years of the date Tenant does not elect, or is deemed not to have elected, to lease space in the Expansion Building according to the terms set forth in the Preconstruction Expansion Notice, and Landlord continues to desire to construct the Expansion Building, Landlord shall, except during the final eighteen (18) months of the Term of this Lease (as the same may have been extended), provide to Tenant another Preconstruction Expansion Notice as provided above, which notice shall be subject to the rights of third parties who have previously agreed to lease space in the Expansion Building. (b) Tenant's Offer. Within thirty (30) days after the date of commencement of construction of the Expansion Building, Landlord shall grant to Tenant a right of first offer ("Offer Right") to lease all or part of the Expansion Building (the "Offer Notice"). The Offer Notice shall include (i) the size and location of any and all available space in the Expansion Building ("Expansion Space"), (ii) Landlord's reasonable good faith determination of Landlord's anticipated rental rate and tenant incentives and other terms and conditions for the Expansion Space, (iii) the date that the Expansion Space will be available to Tenant, (iv) the length of the term for which such Expansion Space can be leased to Tenant and (v) such other terms as Landlord shall elect. Tenant may, within ten (10) days after its receipt of the Offer Notice, elect to exercise its right to lease the Expansion Space covered by such Offer Notice on Landlord's proposed rental terms. If Tenant fails to exercise its right within such ten (10) day period after Tenant's receipt of the Offer Notice, Tenant shall be deemed to have waived its right under this Section 10.4(b) as to such Expansion Space (but not as to any other space in the Expansion Building) for a period of twelve (12) calendar months after the date on which Landlord gives the Offer Notice; provided, however, that if Tenant does not exercise its right under this Section 10.4(b), Landlord may not lease such Expansion Space for less than 95% of the effective value of the rent in the Offer Notice, which amount shall be determined based on the rental rate, rent escalations, tenant incentives, rent abatements and other concessions, without first providing Tenant another Offer Notice as provided above. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if Tenant fails to exercise its right under this Section 10.4(b) and Landlord fails to lease such Expansion Space on terms as described in the preceding sentence, within twelve (12) calendar months after the date on which Landlord gives the Offer Notice, or if Landlord leases such Expansion Space and such Expansion Space thereafter again becomes available for lease, then Tenant's rights under this Section 10.4(b) shall be reinstated as to such Expansion Space and Landlord shall provide Tenant with another Offer Notice as provided above. Tenant's rights under this Section 10.4(b) shall be subject to the rights of other tenants leasing space in the Building or the Expansion Building at the time Tenant exercises its Offer Right. - 35 -
(c) Except for work and allowances constituting tenant incentives as shown in the Preconstruction Expansion Notice or the Offer Notice, or unless Landlord expressly agrees in writing to the contrary, the Expansion Space leased by Tenant shall be leased in its "then-existing" condition and shall be provided to Tenant broom clean (it being expressly understood by Tenant that Landlord shall not be required to complete any work or provide any tenant improvement allowance with respect to the Expansion Space). (d) If Tenant exercised its rights under this Section 10.4 by electing to lease the space in the Expansion Building (including Expansion Space), Landlord and Tenant shall execute a written lease (the "Expansion Building Lease") confirming the terms, provisions and conditions applicable to the space leased by Tenant. The foregoing provisions of this Article X are intended to benefit Tenant and its successors and assigns and to run with Tenant's leasehold and/or fee interest (as the case may be) in the Building and the Primary Lot and shall be memorialized in a recordable instrument and recorded in the land records as a covenant burdening the Expansion Lot. ARTICLE XI LANDLORD'S REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES 11.1. Representations and Warranties of Landlord. To induce Tenant to execute this Lease and perform its obligations hereunder, Landlord hereby represents and warrants to Tenant as of the date hereof as follows: (a) Landlord is a limited liability company, duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the State of Delaware. Landlord has all requisite power to own, lease and operate its assets, and to carry on its business as now conducted. Landlord has full power to execute, deliver and carry out the terms and provisions of this Lease and all documents required on its part to be executed and has taken all necessary company action to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of this Lease and all other agreements and instruments executed in connection herewith and the performance of those provisions of this Lease required on its part to be carried out. The persons executing this Lease (and all other agreements and instruments entered into by Landlord in furtherance hereof), on behalf of Landlord, have the authority to bind Landlord to the terms and conditions of this Lease (and all said agreements and instruments). Neither the execution and delivery of this Lease and said agreements and instruments to be executed by Landlord in connection herewith, nor the incurrence by Landlord of the obligations herein set forth, nor the consummation by Landlord of the transactions herein contemplated, nor compliance by Landlord with the terms of this Lease and said agreements and instruments will conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of, or constitute a default under, the limited liability company agreement of Landlord, or to the knowledge of Landlord, any bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness, contract, indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement, lease or other agreement or instrument, to which Landlord is a party or by which any of its properties may be bound. This Lease constitutes, and all agreements and documents required to be executed by Landlord hereunder when so executed and delivered shall constitute, the legal, valid and binding obligations of Landlord enforceable against Landlord in accordance with their respective terms. Any order, permission, consent, approval, license, - 36 -
authorization, registration or filing with, or exemption by, any governmental agency which is required for the execution or delivery of this Lease, or said agreements and instruments by Landlord has been obtained or made. (b) Landlord is not in default or violation of any order, writ injunction, decree or demand of any governmental authority. (c) Landlord (i) is not in receivership or dissolution, (ii) has not made an assignment for the benefit of creditors or admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as they mature, (iii) has not been adjudicated a bankrupt or filed a petition in voluntary bankruptcy or a petition or answer seeking reorganization or an arrangement with creditors under the Federal bankruptcy law or any other similar law or statute of the United States or any jurisdiction and no such petition has been filed against Landlord, and (iv) to the best of its knowledge, none of the foregoing are pending or threatened. (d) Landlord has not granted or conveyed to anyone other than Tenant, any right or option to acquire the Property or any party thereof or any easement, license or lease except for matters of record of the Property or other right relating to the use or possession of the Property. - 37 -
WITNESS the execution hereof under seal as of the day and year first above written. TENANT: 19 Presidential Way Woburn, MA 01801 By: /s/ Louise A. Mawhinney Name: Louise A. Mawhinney Title: Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary LANDLORD: ARE-MA REGION NO. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company By: Alexandria Real Estate Equities, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership By: ARE-QRS Corp., a Maryland corporation By: /s/ Jennifer Pappas _________________________________________ Name: Jennifer Pappas _________________________________________ Its: Vice President & Assistant Secretary _________________________________________ - 38 -
EXHIBIT A DESCRIPTION OF PRIMARY LOT Lot 11: A parcel of land on Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Lot 11 on Land Court Plan 36099-D, a copy of which is filed with the Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court with Certificate of Title No. 212009. - 1 -
EXHIBIT B DESCRIPTION OF EXPANSION LOT Lot 12: A parcel of land on Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Lot 12 on Land Court Plan 36099-D, a copy of which is filed with the Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court with Certificate of Title No. 212009. Parcel 5B-1 A parcel of land situated near Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Parcel 5B-1 on a plan entitled, "Subdivision Plan of Land in Woburn, Massachusetts," dated January 16, 2001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc., recorded Middlesex South Registry of Deeds in Plan Book 32475, Page 319. - 1 -
EXHIBIT C FIXTURES, FURNISHINGS AND EQUIPMENT OF TENANT TO BE REMOVED FROM PREMISES - - NMRs, LCMSs, and all other Analytical and Research laboratory equipment, whether fastened to the building or not* - - ArQule AMAP and ssAMAP customized production and research-based equipment, whether fastened to the building or not* - - Autoclaves, biosafety cabinets, incubators, stability chambers, and all other biology-related equipment, whether fastened to the building or not* - - Machine shop equipment, whether fastened to the building or not - - External N2 storage tank, which is leased from supplier - - Custom solvent delivery and collection system - - Fitness Center equipment - - Equipment located in Server Room and Network closets - - Built-in A/V equipment, including videoconferencing, teleconferencing, and telecommunications equipment - - Radio/microwave tower on roof, leased from supplier - - All equipment added after the signing of the lease, whether fastened to the building or not* * Exemptions do not include fume hoods, casework, and lab benches 1
EXHIBIT D NOTICE OF LEASE This notice of lease has been executed and delivered in accordance with the Massachusetts General Laws to give notice of the lease described below, but is not intended to modify or amend any of the terms of said lease, and in the event of any inconsistency between the terms of this notice of lease and the terms of the lease described below, the lease described below shall govern. Landlord: ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company having an office at c/o Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc., 135 N. Los Robles Avenue, Suite 250, Pasadena, CA 01101 Tenant: ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation having an office at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801 Date of Lease: May __, 2005 Term of Lease: 10-year period commencing on the Term Commencement Date, together with two options to extend for 5-years each as provided in and on the terms set forth in Section 2.2 of the Lease. Term Commencement Date: ___________________ Premises: The leased premises consist of the following: A parcel of land on Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Lot 11 on Land Court Plan 36099-D, a copy of which is filed with the Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court with Certificate of Title No. 212009. Expansion Lot: The Expansion Lot consists of the following: Lot 12: A parcel of land on Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Lot 12 on Land Court Plan 36099-D, a copy of which is filed with the Middlesex South Registry District of the Land Court with Certificate of Title No. 212009. 1
Parcel 5B-1 A parcel of land situated near Presidential Way, Woburn, Middlesex County, Massachusetts, shown as Parcel 5B-1 on a plan entitled, "Subdivision Plan of Land in Woburn, Massachusetts," dated January 16, 2001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc., recorded Middlesex South Registry of Deeds in Plan Book 32475, Page 319. Other: The Lease contains, as to the Premises and/or the Expansion Lot (i) certain rights of first offer for the Tenant; (ii) certain rights of first refusal for the Tenant; (iii) certain expansion rights for the Tenant; and (iv) certain approval rights of the Tenant with respect to future development on the Expansion Lot by the Landlord. WITNESS the execution hereof under seal as of this 2nd day of May, 2005. LANDLORD: ARE-MA REGION NO. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company By: ALEXANDRIA REAL ESTATE EQUITIES, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership, Managing Member By: ARE-QRS CORP., a Maryland corporation, General Partner Name: Title: TENANT: ARQULE, INC. By: /s/ Louise A. Mawhinney Name: Louise A. Mawhinney Title: Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary 2
COMMONWEALTH OF MASSACHUSETTS On this _____ day of May, 2005, before me, the undersigned notary public, personally appeared _________________________________, proved to me through satisfactory evidence of identification, which was personal knowledge of identity to be the person whose name is signed on the preceding or attached document, and acknowledged to me that he/she signed it voluntarily for its stated purpose as _________________________ of ArQule, Inc. _______________________________________________ Notary Public My Commission Expires:_________________________ COMMONWEALTH OF MASSACHUSETTS On this _____ day of May, 2005, before me, the undersigned notary public, personally appeared _________________________________, proved to me through satisfactory evidence of identification, which was personal knowledge of identity to be the person whose name is signed on the preceding or attached document, and acknowledged to me that he/she signed it voluntarily for its stated purpose as _________________________ of ARE-QRS Corp. _______________________________________________ Notary Public My Commission Expires:_________________________ 3
EXHIBIT E FORM OF PURCHASE AGREEMENT AGREEMENT OF PURCHASE AND SALE (REPURCHASE OF PROPERTY BY ARQULE, INC. PURSUANT TO SELLER'S LEASE) THIS AGREEMENT OF PURCHASE AND SALE ("Agreement") is made as of ___________________ ("Contract Date"), between (i) ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Seller"), and (ii) ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Purchaser"). ARTICLE 1. INTERPRETATION 1.1 DEFINITIONS. For purposes of this Agreement, the following capitalized terms shall have the meanings indicated: 1.1.1 ACTION: any action, suit, arbitration, governmental investigation or other legal proceeding. 1.1.2 CLOSING: the consummation of the purchase and sale of the Property as contemplated by this Agreement. 1.1.3 CLOSING DATE: the date on which the Closing occurs. 1.1.4 CODE: the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. 1.1.5 CONTRACT DATE: as defined in the Preamble. 1.1.6 CONTRACT: any contract for services, maintenance and supplies, or equipment leases to which Seller is a party and which is necessary for the use, maintenance, operation, or equipping of the Property, and all amendments thereto. 1.1.7 DAMAGES: damages (other than indirect, special or consequential damages), liabilities, losses, claims, costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses). 1.1.8 DEPOSIT: as defined in Section 2.2. 1.1.9 ENVIRONMENTAL LAWS: all Legal Requirements in effect as of the Contract Date relating to the protection of the environment or to human health, or regulating the manufacture, use or disposal of Hazardous Substances. 1.1.10 EXISTING SURVEY: as defined in Section 5.2.2. 1.1.11 HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCE: any pollutant, contaminant or any toxic, radioactive or otherwise hazardous substance, including petroleum, its derivatives, 1
by-products and other hydrocarbons, asbestos, and toxic mold, in each case as regulated under Environmental Laws. 1.1.12 IMPROVEMENTS: the building located on the Land, having an address of 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts and a tax lot designation of 195 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts, including all heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems serving such buildings, and all laboratory casework and fume hoods located therein. 1.1.13 INTANGIBLE PROPERTY: collectively, (i) all assignable guarantees and warranties that relate to the Improvements, (ii) all assignable permits, certificates of occupancy, and other public approvals that relate to the Land or the Improvements and (iii) all plans and specifications for the Improvements. 1.1.14 LAND: collectively, the parcels of land more fully described on Exhibit C (excluding the Expansion Lot, as such term is defined in Seller's Lease) together with all right, title and interest of the Seller in and to (i) all rights, ways, easements, privileges and appurtenances to such parcel, (ii) all strips and gores appurtenant to such parcel, and (iii) any land lying in the bed of any streets, roads and alleys appurtenant to such parcel. 1.1.15 LEGAL REQUIREMENT: any federal, state, local or municipal constitution, law, statute, ordinance, rule, order or regulation. 1.1.16 OBJECTIONS: as defined in Section 5.2.3. 1.1.17 PERMITTED EXCEPTIONS: collectively, (i) the matters approved or deemed approved by Purchaser in accordance with Section 5.2 and set forth on Schedule 5.2 hereof, and (ii) the lien for real estate taxes and other assessments not yet due and payable. 1.1.18 PERSON: a natural person or any legal or governmental entity. 1.1.19 PROPERTY: collectively, (i) the Land and the Improvements and Seller's fee simple interest therein, and (ii) the Intangible Property and all right title and interest of Seller therein and thereto. 1.1.20 PURCHASE PRICE: as defined in Section 2.2. 1.1.21 PURCHASER: as defined in the Preamble. 1.1.22 PURCHASER INDEMNIFIED PARTIES: as defined in Section 7.5.1. 1.1.23 PURCHASER'S DESIGNEE: as defined in Section 11.1. 1.1.24 SERVICE CONTRACT: any contract for services, maintenance and supplies, equipment leases, and any other contract or agreement to which Seller is a party 2
relating to the use, maintenance, operation, provisioning or equipping of the Property, and all amendments thereto. 1.1.25 SELLER: as defined in the Preamble. 1.1.26 SELLER'S KNOWLEDGE: the actual current knowledge of __________________, without any obligation to review any files or make inquiry of any Person. No knowledge of any other Person shall be imputed to Seller. 1.1.27 SELLER'S LEASE: that certain lease dated ___________, 2005 by and between Seller, as landlord and Purchaser, as tenant and all other leases then encumbering the Land. 1.1.28 SETTLEMENT STATEMENT: a HUD-1 or similar settlement statement executed by Purchaser and Seller at closing. 1.1.29 SURVEY STANDARDS: as defined in Section 5.2.2. 1.1.30 TITLE POLICY: as defined in Section 5.2.1. 1.1.31 TITLE COMPANY: Chicago Title Insurance Company, which is also serving as escrow agent hereunder. 1.2 GOVERNING LAW. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts (without reference to conflicts of laws principles). 1.3 CAPTIONS, NUMBERING AND HEADINGS. Captions, numbering and headings of Articles, Sections, Schedules and Exhibits in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not be considered in the interpretation of this Agreement. References in this Agreement to Articles, Sections, Schedules and Exhibits shall be deemed to be references to such Articles, Sections, Schedules and Exhibits in this Agreement unless otherwise expressly specified. 1.4 NUMBER; GENDER. Whenever required by the context, the singular shall include the plural, the neuter gender shall include the male gender and female gender, and vice versa. 1.5 BUSINESS DAY. In the event that the date for performance of any obligation under this Agreement falls on other than a business day, then such obligation shall be performed on the next succeeding business day. 1.6 SEVERABILITY. In the event that one or more of the provisions of this Agreement shall be held to be illegal, invalid or unenforceable, each such provision shall be deemed severable and the remaining provisions of this Agreement shall continue in full force and effect, unless this construction would operate as an undue hardship on Seller or Purchaser or would constitute a substantial deviation from the general intent of the parties as reflected in this Agreement. 3
1.7 NO ORAL MODIFICATIONS OR WAIVERS. No modification of this Agreement shall be valid or effective unless the same is in writing and signed by Seller and Purchaser. No purported waiver of any of the provisions of this Agreement shall be valid or effective unless the same is in writing and signed by the party against whom it is sought to be enforced. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the parties agree that the time for performance of any matter to be performed pursuant to this Agreement may be modified by electronic mail sent by the party against whom it is sought to be enforced or such party's counsel. 1.8 EXHIBITS. All Schedules and Exhibits referenced in this Agreement are incorporated by this reference as if fully set forth in this Agreement, and all references to this Agreement shall be deemed to include all such Schedules and Exhibits. 1.9 INTEGRATION. This Agreement, all Schedules and Exhibits appended to this Agreement, and the documents and agreements referenced in this Agreement contain the entire understanding between Seller and Purchaser with respect to the sale of the Property, and are intended to be a full integration of all prior or contemporaneous agreements, conditions, understandings or undertakings between Seller and Purchaser with respect thereto. There are no promises, agreements, conditions, undertakings, understandings, warranties or representations, whether oral, written, express or implied, between Seller and Purchaser with respect to the sale of the Property other than as are expressly set forth in this Agreement, the Schedules and Exhibits appended to this Agreement, and the documents and agreements referenced in this Agreement. 1.10 NO CONSTRUCTION AGAINST DRAFTER. This Agreement has been negotiated and prepared by Seller and Purchaser and their respective attorneys and, should any provision of this Agreement require judicial interpretation, the court interpreting or construing such provision shall not apply the rule of construction that a document is to be construed more strictly against one party. 1.11 INCLUDING. The term "including," and variants thereof, shall mean "including without limitation." ARTICLE 2. SALE OF PROPERTY 2.1 SALE AND PURCHASE. Subject to and in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, Seller shall sell to Purchaser, and Purchaser shall purchase from Seller, the Property. 2.2 PURCHASE PRICE. 2.2.1 The purchase price ("Purchase Price") for the sale and purchase of the Property shall be $________________________. 2.2.2 The Purchase Price shall be payable as follows: 2.2.2.1 Within one (1) business day following the Contract Date, Purchaser shall deposit into escrow with the Title Company the sum of Two Hundred 4
Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000) ("Deposit") by wire transfer of immediately available funds. 2.2.2.2 The Deposit shall be held in accordance with Section 8.1. At Closing, the Deposit shall be paid to or at the direction of Seller and credited against the Purchase Price. 2.2.2.3 At Closing, Purchaser shall pay the balance of the Purchase Price (net of the Deposit) to or at the direction of Seller by wire transfer of immediately available funds, and Seller and Purchaser shall cause the Title Company to release the Deposit to Seller. 2.3 [Reserved] 2.4 CONDITION OF PROPERTY. 2.4.1 Purchaser acknowledges that (i) Purchaser has been given a reasonable opportunity to inspect and investigate the Property, all improvements thereon and all aspects relating thereto, including all of the physical, environmental and operational aspects of the Property, either independently or through agents and experts of Purchaser's choosing, and (ii) Purchaser will acquire the Property based solely upon Purchaser's own investigation and inspection thereof and the representations, warranties and covenants of Seller expressly set forth in this Agreement. SELLER AND PURCHASER AGREE THAT, EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED FOR IN THIS AGREEMENT, (I) THE PROPERTY SHALL BE SOLD AND PURCHASER SHALL ACCEPT POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY ON THE CLOSING DATE "AS IS," "WHERE IS," AND "WITH ALL FAULTS," AND (II) SUCH SALE SHALL BE WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED, STATUTORY OR OTHERWISE, INCLUDING ANY WARRANTY OF INCOME POTENTIAL, OPERATING EXPENSES, USES, MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND SELLER HEREBY DISCLAIMS AND RENOUNCES ANY SUCH REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY. PURCHASER FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT, EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THIS AGREEMENT, SELLER SHALL BE UNDER NO DUTY TO MAKE ANY AFFIRMATIVE DISCLOSURE REGARDING ANY MATTER WHICH MAY BE KNOWN TO SELLER, OR ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, CONTRACTORS, AGENTS OR EMPLOYEES, AND THAT IT IS RELYING SOLELY UPON ITS OWN INSPECTION OF THE PROPERTY AND NOT UPON ANY REPRESENTATIONS MADE TO IT BY ANY PERSON WHOMSOEVER ON SELLER'S BEHALF. 2.4.2 Except with respect to any Damages arising out of any breach of any express representation, warranty or covenant set forth in this Agreement, Purchaser hereby waives, releases and forever discharges Seller, and its officers, directors and employees, from any and all Damages, whether known or unknown, which Purchaser has or may have in the future, arising out of or in connection with the Property, including the physical, environmental, governmental, economic or legal condition of the Property. For the foregoing purposes, Purchaser hereby specifically waives the provisions of any law the import of which is that a general release does not extend to claims which the creditor does not know or suspect to exist in the creditor's favor at the time of executing the 5
release, which if known by the creditor must have materially affected a settlement with the debtor. 2.4.3 The provisions of this Section 2.4 shall be applicable to (and each reference herein to "Purchaser" shall be deemed to be an explicit reference to) Purchaser, each Purchaser's Designee, and each of their respective successors, heirs and assignees. The provisions of this Section 2.4 shall survive the Closing without limitation as to time. 2.5 SELLER'S LEASE. On the Closing Date, Seller shall assign Seller's Lease to Purchaser. ARTICLE 3. SELLER'S REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES Seller hereby represents and warrants to Purchaser as follows: 3.1 GOOD STANDING. Seller is a limited liability company, duly formed, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, and qualified to transact business and in good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. Seller has full power and authority to execute this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 3.2 DUE AUTHORIZATION. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by Seller and the consummation by Seller of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement have been duly and validly authorized by all requisite actions of Seller. Assuming the due execution and delivery of this Agreement by Purchaser, this Agreement constitutes the valid and binding obligation of Seller, enforceable against Seller in accordance with its terms. 3.3 NO VIOLATIONS. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by Seller and the consummation by Seller of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not: (i) violate any Legal Requirement or any order of any court or governmental authority that is binding on Seller or the Property; or (ii) result in a breach of or default under any contract or other agreement to which Seller is a party or by which the Property is bound (including any rights of first offer or first refusal) or any provision of the organizational documents of Seller. 3.4 BANKRUPTCY. Seller is not the subject debtor under any federal, state or local bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or any other proceeding for dissolution, liquidation or winding up of its assets. 3.5 LITIGATION. There are no Actions pending or, to Seller's knowledge, threatened before any court or governmental authority (i) relating to the ownership, operation, development, use or occupancy of the Property or (ii) against Seller, which if adversely determined would affect Seller's ability to enter into or perform its obligations under this Agreement. 3.6 LEASES. Except for the Seller's Lease, there are no leases, subleases or occupancy agreements affecting the Property. Seller has not granted to any third party 6
any rights to purchase the Property or any rights of first refusal with respect to the sale or lease of the Property. 3.7 SERVICE CONTRACTS. There are no Service Contracts that would be binding on Purchaser following the Closing. 3.8 VIOLATIONS OF LAW. Seller has received no written notice from any governmental authority alleging a violation of any Legal Requirement affecting the Property that has not been corrected. 3.9 CONDEMNATION. There are no pending condemnation actions with respect to the Property, and to Seller's Knowledge there are no threatened or contemplated condemnation actions with respect to the Property. Seller shall have the right to update the representation set forth in this Section 3.9 to reflect (i) any condemnation that becomes pending after the Contract Date, or (ii) any threatened or contemplated condemnation that first becomes known to Seller after the Contract Date, in which event the provisions of Article 9 shall control. 3.10 ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS. Seller has received no written notice from any governmental authority of any actual or potential violation of or failure to comply with any Environmental Laws with respect to the Property which remains uncorrected, or of any actual or threatened obligation to undertake or bear the cost of any clean-up, removal, containment, or other remediation under any Environmental Law with respect to the Property which remains unperformed. To Seller's Knowledge, other than (i) Hazardous Substances used in the ordinary course of maintaining and cleaning the Property, (ii) Hazardous Substances used in connection with the research, development, manufacturing and other operations of Seller and (iii) Hazardous Substances used as fuels, lubricants or otherwise in connection with vehicles, machinery and equipment located at the Property in commercially reasonable amounts, no Hazardous Substances are present on or in the Property. 3.11 FOREIGN PERSON. Seller is not a "foreign person" as defined in Section 1445 of the Code. ARTICLE 4. PURCHASER'S REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES Purchaser hereby represents and warrants to Seller as follows: 4.1 GOOD STANDING. Purchaser is a corporation, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Delaware, and has full power and authority to conduct the business in which it is now engaged. 4.2 DUE AUTHORIZATION. This Agreement constitutes the valid and binding obligation of Purchaser, enforceable against Purchaser in accordance with its terms. 4.3 NO VIOLATIONS. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by Purchaser and the consummation by Purchaser of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not: (i) violate any Legal Requirement or any order of any court or 7
governmental authority that is binding on Purchaser; or (ii) result in a breach of or default under (A) any contract or other agreement to which Purchaser is a party or (B) any provision of the organizational documents of Purchaser. 4.4 BANKRUPTCY. Purchaser is not the subject debtor under any federal, state or local bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or any other proceeding for dissolution, liquidation or winding up of its assets. 4.5 LITIGATION. There are no Actions pending or, to Purchaser's knowledge, threatened against Purchaser before any court or governmental authority, an adverse determination of which would materially adversely affect (i) the financial condition of Purchaser, or (ii) Purchaser's ability to enter into or perform this Agreement. 4.6 TERRORIST ORGANIZATIONS LISTS. Purchaser is not acting, directly or indirectly, for or on behalf of any Person named by the United States Treasury Department as a Specifically Designated National and Blocked Person, or for or on behalf of any Person designated in Executive Order 13224 as a Person who commits, threatens to commit, or supports terrorism. Purchaser is not engaged in the transaction contemplated by this Agreement directly or indirectly on behalf of, or facilitating such transaction directly or indirectly on behalf of, any such Person. ARTICLE 5. ACTIONS PENDING CLOSING 5.1 PHYSICAL CONDITION. Seller shall make available to Purchaser for inspection and copying at the Property or at Seller's offices, or at Seller's option deliver to Purchaser, such documents, materials and information concerning the physical condition of the Property, the structural integrity of the Property, title matters and compliance of the Property with Legal Requirements as are in Seller's possession. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Seller shall have no obligation to deliver to Purchaser (i) materials that Seller shall have obtained or developed in connection with the potential sale of the Property, (ii) materials that relate primarily to Seller's financial affairs, business or research and development operations as distinguished from the operation of the Property and (iii) materials that are subject to attorney-client privilege or reveal trade secrets. 5.2 TITLE AND SURVEY. 5.2.1 Purchaser has been provided with the title insurance policy issued to Seller on ___________, 2005 ("Title Policy"), accompanied by a copy of all documents referred to as exceptions in the Title Policy. 5.2.2 Purchaser has been provided with a survey of the Property dated ___________________, ___________ ("Survey"). Promptly following the Contract Date, Purchaser shall order either an update of the Survey or, if required by Purchaser, a new survey of the Property ("New Survey") prepared in accordance with the Minimum Standard Detail Requirements and Classifications for ALTA/ACSM Land Title Surveys published in 1999 ("Survey Standards"). 8
5.2.3 On or before the date that is ten (10) days prior to Closing ("Title Objection Date"), Purchaser shall notify Seller of any items in the Survey that were not disclosed in the Survey or in the Title Policy that are unsatisfactory to Purchaser ("Objections"). Except to the extent that Purchaser so notifies Seller of any Objections, any item reflected in the Title Policy, and any item shown on the Survey, shall be deemed to have been approved by Purchaser and shall be Permitted Exceptions for all purposes under this Agreement. 5.2.4 If Purchaser timely notifies Seller of any Objections, Seller may, but shall not be obligated to, endeavor to cure the Objections to Purchaser's and the Title Company's reasonable satisfaction. Seller shall give notice to Purchaser on or before the date that is five (5) days following the date on which Purchaser notified Seller of its Objections stating whether Seller agrees to cure each such Objection prior to the Closing. If Seller fails timely to give such notice, then Seller shall be conclusively deemed to have elected not to cure any such Objections. Seller shall endeavor to cure at or before the Closing any Objection that it has agreed to cure in accordance with this Section 5.2.4, provided that Seller shall have the right to extend the Closing for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days in the aggregate if necessary to effect such cure. Seller may use a portion of the Purchase Price to effect such cure at Closing, and a title insurance endorsement reasonably acceptable to Purchaser that affirmatively insures over any Objection shall constitute cure of such Objection. 5.2.5 If Seller elects (or is deemed to elect) not to agree to cure any such Objections, then Purchaser may either (i) waive such Objections, without any reduction of the Purchase Price, in which event such waived Objections shall become Permitted Exceptions for all purposes under this Agreement or (ii) terminate this Agreement by written notice to Seller, whereupon the Deposit shall be promptly returned to Purchaser and the parties shall have no further rights or liabilities under this Agreement other than those that expressly survive the termination of this Agreement. Purchaser shall make the election described in the preceding sentence by written notice to Seller on or before the Closing, and in the event Purchaser does not make such election, Purchaser shall be conclusively deemed to have waived all Objections other than those that Seller has agreed to cure in accordance with Section 5.2.4. 5.2.6 Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 5.2, Seller shall cure at or before the Closing (i) any mortgage lien created by, through or under Seller, other than any UCC financing statement filed with respect to a Contract involving a lease of Seller's personal property, (ii) any recorded mechanics' lien or materialmen's lien resulting from work performed for Seller (it being agreed that Seller shall be entitled to cure such liens by bonding over the same in a manner reasonably acceptable to Purchaser), (iii) any judgment lien, tax lien (other than taxes not yet due and payable) or other lien securing a monetary amount, created by, through or under Seller, which may be removed by the payment of a liquidated sum of money and (iv) any encumbrance created by or through Seller after the date of the Title Policy if Purchaser did not expressly consent to the same, provided that Seller shall not be required to expend more than $500,000.00 in the aggregate with respect to Objections described in clauses (ii) and (iii). Seller may use a portion of the Purchase Price to effect such cure at Closing. 9
5.3 OPERATION OF PROPERTY. Prior to Closing: 5.3.1 Seller shall continue to operate the Property in the ordinary course of business consistent with the practices and procedures in effect as of the Contract Date, except to the extent that this Agreement expressly provides otherwise. 5.3.2 Seller shall maintain all Improvements substantially in their present condition, except for reasonable wear and tear and damage by casualty or condemnation. 5.3.3 Seller shall continue to maintain the insurance currently carried by it with respect to the Property. 5.4 CONTRACTS. Prior to Closing, Seller shall not enter into any new Contract that would be binding on Purchaser from and after Closing. 5.5 UPDATES TO REPRESENTATIONS. Prior to Closing, Seller and Purchaser shall each promptly notify the other in writing if it becomes aware of any fact or condition that is inconsistent with any of Seller's representations or warranties under this Agreement. Purchaser shall be bound by any state of facts of which it is aware prior to Closing, notwithstanding any representation or warranty to the contrary made hereunder by Seller. Accordingly, Seller shall not be deemed to have breached any representation or warranty made hereunder to the extent that Purchaser was aware prior to Closing that such representation or warranty was not accurate. 5.6 SATISFACTION OF CONDITIONS. Prior to Closing, Seller and Purchaser shall each use good faith, commercially reasonable efforts to satisfy the conditions to Closing set forth in Article 6. ARTICLE 6. CONDITIONS TO CLOSING 6.1 PURCHASER'S CONDITIONS TO CLOSING. The obligation of Purchaser to consummate the Closing shall be subject to the satisfaction of each of the following conditions, any or all of which may be waived in whole or in part by Purchaser: 6.1.1 Each of Seller's representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement (as modified by all modifications and updates expressly permitted by Section 5.5 or Section 7.6) shall be correct in all material respects as of the Closing Date. 6.1.2 Seller shall have performed all of its material obligations under this Agreement required at or prior to Closing. 6.1.3 Title to the Land and Improvements shall be good and marketable fee simple title, subject only to the Permitted Exceptions, and insurable at standard rates in an amount equal to the Purchase Price. 6.2 FAILURE OF PURCHASER'S CONDITION. In the event of the failure of any condition set forth in Section 6.1, Purchaser, at its sole election, may (i) terminate this 10
Agreement and receive a return of the Deposit, (ii) waive the condition and proceed to Closing, or (iii) extend the Closing Date for such additional period of time (not to exceed thirty (30) days in the aggregate) as may be reasonably required to allow such condition to be satisfied. Nothing set forth in this Section 6.2 shall affect Purchaser's rights or remedies under Section 8.3 with respect to any breach of this Agreement by Seller. 6.3 SELLER'S CONDITIONS TO CLOSING. The obligation of Seller to consummate the Closing shall be subject to the satisfaction of each of the following conditions, any or all of which may be waived in whole or in part by Seller: 6.3.1 Each of Purchaser's representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement shall be correct in all material respects as of the Closing Date. 6.3.2 Each of Purchaser's representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement shall be correct in all material respects as if made by Purchaser's Designee as of the Closing Date. 6.3.3 Purchaser shall have performed all of its material obligations under this Agreement required at or prior to Closing. 6.4 FAILURE OF SELLER'S CONDITION. In the event of the failure of any condition precedent set forth in Section 6.3, Seller, at its sole election, may (i) terminate this Agreement, (ii) waive the condition and proceed to Closing, or (iii) extend the Closing Date for such additional period of time (not to exceed thirty (30) days in the aggregate) as may be reasonably required to allow Purchaser to satisfy such condition. Nothing set forth in this Section 6.4 shall affect Seller's rights or remedies under Section 8.2 with respect to any breach of this Agreement by Purchaser. ARTICLE 7. CLOSING 7.1 CLOSING. 7.1.1 Closing shall be held on the date that is thirty (30) days after the date of this Agreement or on such earlier date as is mutually agreed upon by Seller and Purchaser, subject to extension as expressly provided in this Agreement. Closing shall be conducted through an escrow with the Title Company, and Seller and Purchaser shall execute (or cause their counsel to execute) such additional instructions to the Title Company as may be required in connection therewith. 7.1.2 Pre-closing ("Pre-Closing") shall be held on the business day immediately preceding the scheduled date for Closing. At Pre-Closing, Seller and Purchaser shall execute and deliver to the Title Company all documents and deliveries required under Sections 7.2 and 7.3, other than the Settlement Statement and payment of the Purchase Price. Seller and Purchaser shall complete and execute the Settlement Statement, and Purchaser shall pay the portion of the Purchase Price required pursuant to Section 2.2.2.4 to the Title Company at Closing by wire transfer of immediately available funds, such that the amounts due to or on behalf of Seller pursuant to the Settlement 11
Statement shall be wire transferred into a bank account or accounts designated by Seller no later than 1:00 p.m. local time at the Property on the Closing Date. 7.2 SELLER'S CLOSING DELIVERIES. At or prior to Closing, Seller shall deliver to the Title Company the following: 7.2.1 A deed substantially in the form of Exhibit A conveying the fee estate in the Land and Improvements, with such modifications as are required by local law so that such deed will be in recordable form, duly executed and acknowledged by Seller, and dated as of the Closing Date. 7.2.2 An assignment and assumption in the form of Exhibit B, transferring to Purchaser all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to the Intangible Property, duly executed by Seller, and dated as of the Closing Date. 7.2.3 Subject to the provisions of Section 7.6 hereof, a certificate, duly executed by Seller, confirming that its representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement are correct in all material respects as if made on the Closing Date, modified as Seller may determine to be required to reflect additional or changed facts or circumstances (including additional facts or circumstances which may have become known to Seller after the execution of this Agreement, but prior to Closing). 7.2.4 A title affidavit, in customary form reasonably satisfactory to the Title Company and Seller, with respect to mechanics' liens and parties in possession, duly executed by Seller, provided that such affidavits shall not subject Seller to any material liabilities other than as may be required by Section 5.2. 7.2.5 An affidavit, in the form required by the Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, to the effect that Seller is not a foreign person within the meaning of the Code. 7.2.6 Such evidence of the power and authority of Seller to consummate the transactions described in this Agreement as may be reasonably required by Purchaser or Title Company. 7.2.7 A written direction to the Title Company to disburse the Deposit to Seller in accordance with Section 8.1.2.2. 7.2.8 A Settlement Statement, duly executed by Seller. 7.2.9 To the extent required by any Contract, notice in form approved by Purchaser, informing the parties other than Seller to such contract of the change in ownership of the Property. 7.2.10 Such other documents and instruments as are customary and as may be reasonably requested by Purchaser or the Title Company, to effectuate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 12
7.3 PURCHASER'S CLOSING DELIVERIES. At or prior to Closing, Purchaser shall deliver to the Title Company the following: 7.3.1 An assignment and assumption of the Intangible Property in the form of Exhibit B, duly executed by Purchaser (or by Purchaser's Designee), and dated as of the Closing Date. 7.3.2 A certificate, duly executed by Purchaser, confirming that its representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement are correct in all material respects as if made on the Closing Date (or noting any exceptions). 7.3.3 Such evidence of the power and authority of Purchaser and Purchaser's Designee to consummate the transactions described in this Agreement as may be reasonably required by Seller or Title Company. 7.3.4 A written direction to the Title Company to disburse the Deposit to Seller in accordance with Section 8.1.2.2. 7.3.5 The balance of the Purchase Price. 7.3.6 A Settlement Statement, duly executed by Purchaser or Purchaser's Designee. 7.3.7 Such other documents and instruments as are customary and as may be reasonably requested by Seller or the Title Company to effectuate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 7.4 CLOSING COSTS. All escrow or settlement fees of the Title Company shall be borne by Purchaser. All state, county and local taxes and fees related to the transfer and recordation of the deed transferring title to the Property to Seller shall be borne by Seller. Seller and Purchaser shall each bear its own counsel's fees and expenses in connection with the transactions described in this Agreement. Purchaser shall pay all costs of title insurance premiums and costs, costs of the New Survey, and all costs of Purchaser's financing. 7.5 INDEMNIFICATION. 7.5.1 Subject to any express provisions of this Agreement to the contrary, from and after Closing, Seller hereby agrees to indemnify Purchaser, Purchaser's Designees, and their respective directors, officers, employees, partners, members and affiliates (collectively, "Purchaser Indemnified Parties"), and to hold Purchaser Indemnified Parties harmless from and against, any and all Damages paid or incurred by Purchaser Indemnified Parties due to any breach of any representation or warranty made by Seller in this Agreement. 7.5.2 In connection with any indemnification claim under Section 7.5.1, Purchaser shall afford Seller a full opportunity to defend such claims, using counsel 13
reasonably acceptable to Purchaser, in the name of Purchaser and generally shall cooperate with Purchaser in the defense of such claim. 7.5.3 Seller's indemnification of Purchaser pursuant to Section 7.5.1 shall terminate on the date that is nine (9) months after the Closing Date. From and after Closing, the indemnification provisions in this Section 7.5 shall be the exclusive remedy of Purchaser in connection with any of the matters described in this Section 7.5 and the transaction described in this Agreement, and Purchaser hereby waives and releases any other rights or remedies it may have under applicable law or at equity in connection therewith. 7.5.4 Seller shall only have liability for any individual indemnity claim under this Section 7.5 to the extent the actual damages suffered by Purchaser from such individual claim exceed $50,000. Further, Seller's aggregate liability for any actual damages suffered by Purchaser for all indemnity claims made under this Section 7.5 shall not exceed $500,000. 7.6 SUBSEQUENT CHANGES TO SELLER'S REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES. Seller covenants and agrees to notify Purchaser in writing of any state of facts becoming known to Seller after the date hereof which would render materially inaccurate any of the representations and warranties made by Seller promptly after such facts become known to Seller. In such event, Purchaser may, as its sole remedy, terminate this Agreement upon written notice to Seller given within two (2) days after receipt of Seller's notification and receive a return of the Deposit, whereupon neither Seller nor Purchaser shall have any further liability hereunder except for those matters which either expressly or by their very nature survive termination. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Purchaser shall not have the right to terminate this Agreement, as aforesaid, if Seller commences and diligently pursues the cure of the condition which has rendered the affected representation and warranty to be materially inaccurate and in fact effects such cure not later than sixty (60) days after the originally-scheduled date for Closing. 7.7 SURVIVAL. 7.7.1 Except where this Agreement expressly provides for a longer period, the representations, warranties, covenants and indemnities of Seller and Purchaser set forth in this Agreement shall survive Closing until the date that is nine (9) months after the Closing Date, and any action on any such representation, warranty, covenant or indemnity must be instituted on or before such date. 7.7.2 Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, if at or prior to Closing Purchaser obtains actual knowledge that any representation or warranty of Seller under this Agreement (as the same is modified pursuant to Section 5.6) is inaccurate in any respect, but nonetheless proceeds to Closing, Purchaser shall be deemed to have waived any right to make a claim arising out of such inaccuracy. 14
ARTICLE 8. ESCROW, DEFAULT, REMEDIES 8.1 ESCROW TERMS. 8.1.1 The Title Company shall promptly give notice to Purchaser and Seller upon its receipt of any portion of the Deposit from Purchaser in accordance with this Agreement. The Title Company shall invest the Deposit in an interest bearing money market account at such bank as the Title Company may elect and shall be approved by Purchaser and Seller. The Title Company shall not be liable for any loss of such investment (unless due to the Title Company's gross negligence or willful misconduct). All interest on the Deposit shall be treated by the Title Company for income tax purposes as earned by Purchaser, and Purchaser's tax identification number for this purpose is __________. 8.1.2 The Title Company shall deliver the Deposit to Seller or to Purchaser, as the case may be, under the following conditions: 8.1.2.1 the Deposit shall be delivered to or at the direction of Seller at Closing upon receipt by the Title Company of a statement executed by Seller and Purchaser that the Deposit may be so released; or 8.1.2.2 the Deposit shall be delivered to Seller following receipt by the Title Company of written demand therefor from Seller, stating that Purchaser has defaulted in the performance of its obligations under this Agreement and specifying the Section of this Agreement which entitles Seller to receive the Deposit, if Purchaser shall not have given written notice of objection in accordance with Section 8.1.3; or 8.1.2.3 the Deposit shall be delivered to Purchaser following receipt by the Title Company of written demand therefor from Purchaser stating that Seller has defaulted in the performance of its obligations under this Agreement or that this Agreement was terminated under circumstances entitling Purchaser to the return of the Deposit, and specifying the Section of this Agreement which entitles Purchaser to the return of the Deposit, if Seller shall not have given written notice of objection in accordance with Section 8.1.3; or 8.1.2.4 the Deposit shall be delivered as directed by joint written instructions of Seller and Purchaser. 8.1.3 Upon the filing of a written demand for the Deposit by Seller or Purchaser pursuant to Section 8.1.2.2 or 8.1.2.3, the Title Company shall promptly give notice thereof (including a copy of such demand) to the other party. The other party shall have the right to object to the delivery of the Deposit, by giving notice of such objection to the Title Company at any time within five (5) business days after such party's receipt of notice from the Title Company, but not thereafter. Failure to deliver such objection notice within such period shall be deemed to be a waiver of such party's right to object to the Title Company's compliance with such demand. Such objection notice shall set forth the basis for objecting to the delivery of the Deposit. Upon receipt of such notice of 15
objection, the Title Company shall promptly give a copy of such notice to the party who filed the written demand. The foregoing five (5) business day period does not constitute a cure period in which either Seller or Purchaser, as the case may be, shall be required to accept tender of cure of any default under this Agreement. 8.1.4 If the Title Company shall have received the notice of objection provided for in Section 8.1.3 within the time therein prescribed, the Title Company shall continue to hold the Deposit until (i) the Title Company receives written notice from Seller and Purchaser directing the disbursement of the Deposit, in which case the Title Company shall then disburse the Deposit in accordance with said direction, or (ii) litigation is commenced between Seller and Purchaser, in which case the Title Company shall deposit the Deposit with the clerk of the court in which said litigation is pending, or (iii) the Title Company takes such affirmative steps as the Title Company may elect, at the Title Company's option, in order to terminate the Title Company's duties hereunder (but in no event disbursing the Deposit to either Seller or Purchaser), including depositing the Deposit in court and commencing an action for interpleader, the costs thereof to be borne by whichever of Seller or Purchaser is the losing party. 8.1.5 The Title Company may rely and act upon any instrument or other writing reasonably believed by it to be genuine and purporting to be signed and presented by any person or persons purporting to have authority to act on behalf of Seller or Purchaser, as the case may be, and shall not be liable in connection with the performance of any duties imposed upon the Title Company as escrow agent by the provisions of this Agreement, except for the Title Company's own gross negligence, willful misconduct or default. The Title Company shall have no duties or responsibilities except those set forth herein. The Title Company shall not be bound by any modification or termination of this Agreement unless the same is in writing and signed by Purchaser and Seller, and, if the Title Company's duties hereunder are affected, unless the Title Company shall have given prior written consent thereto. The Title Company shall be reimbursed by Seller and Purchaser for any expenses (including reasonable legal fees and disbursements of outside counsel, including all of the Title Company's fees and expenses with respect to any interpleader action pursuant to Section 8.1.4) incurred in connection with this Agreement, and such liability shall be joint and several; provided that, as between Purchaser and Seller, the prevailing party in any dispute over the Deposit shall be entitled to reimbursement of any such expenses paid to the Title Company. In the event that the Title Company shall be uncertain as to the Title Company's duties or rights hereunder, or shall receive instructions from Purchaser or Seller that, in the Title Company's opinion, are in conflict with any of the provisions hereof, the Title Company shall be entitled to continue to hold the Deposit pursuant to Section 8.1.4, and may decline to take any other action. 8.1.6 The Title Company shall have the right at any time to resign as escrow agent upon ten (10) business days prior notice to Seller and Purchaser. Seller and Purchaser shall jointly select a successor escrow agent and shall notify the Title Company of the name and address of such successor escrow agent within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice from the Title Company of its intent to resign as escrow agent. If the Title Company has not received notice of the name and address of such successor 16
escrow agent within such period, the Title Company shall have the right to select on behalf of Seller and Purchaser a bank or trust company to act as its successor hereunder. At any time after the ten (10) business day period, the Title Company shall have the right to deliver the Deposit to any successor selected hereunder, provided such successor shall execute and deliver to Seller and Purchaser an assumption agreement whereby it assumes all of the Title Company's obligations hereunder as escrow agent. Upon the delivery of all such amounts and such assumption agreement, the successor shall become the escrow agent for all purposes under this Section 8.1 and shall have all of the rights and obligations of the Title Company under this Section 8.1, and the Title Company shall have no further responsibilities or obligations hereunder as escrow agent. 8.2 PURCHASER'S DEFAULT. If Purchaser defaults in its obligation to proceed to Closing in accordance with this Agreement, or if any condition set forth in Section 6.3 is not satisfied and Seller elects not to proceed to Closing, and if such default is not cured and/or such condition is not satisfied within five (5) days after Seller has given Purchaser written notice of the same, then the Title Company shall, subject to Sections 8.1.3 and 8.1.4, pay the Deposit to Seller, as full and complete liquidated damages, and as the exclusive and sole right and remedy of Seller. Upon payment of the Deposit to Seller pursuant to this Section 8.2, this Agreement shall terminate and neither party shall have any further obligations or liabilities to the other party, except for obligations that expressly survive termination of this Agreement. Purchaser acknowledges that Seller's actual damages caused by Purchaser's default in its obligation to proceed to Closing would be difficult to determine precisely and that the Deposit, as liquidated damages, is a fair and reasonable approximation. Seller hereby waives any right to recover damages (whether actual, consequential, punitive or other) as a result of Purchaser's default in its obligation to proceed to Closing in accordance with this Agreement or as a result of any conditions set forth in Section 6.3 not being satisfied, except for the liquidated damages as described in this Section 8.2. 8.3 SELLER'S DEFAULT. If Seller defaults in its obligation to proceed to Closing in accordance with this Agreement, or if any condition set forth in Section 6.1 is not satisfied and Purchaser elects not to proceed to Closing, and if such default is not cured and/or such condition is not satisfied within five (5) days after Purchaser has given Seller written notice of the same, then Purchaser shall be entitled, as its sole remedy, to either (i) specific performance of this Agreement, provided that any action for specific performance must be initiated no later than sixty (60) days after the date that Closing is otherwise required to occur under this Agreement, or (ii) terminate this Agreement and (a) subject to Sections 8.1.2 and 8.1.3, receive a return of the Deposit and (b) solely in the event of Seller's willful default, receive from Seller all actual, consequential, punitive or other damages available at law or in equity. Upon return of the Deposit to Purchaser pursuant to this Section 8.3, this Agreement shall terminate and neither party shall have any further obligations or liabilities to the other party, except for obligations that expressly survive termination of this Agreement. Except in the event of Seller's willful default as set forth above, Purchaser hereby waives any right to recover damages (whether actual, consequential, punitive or other) as a result of Seller's default in its obligation to proceed to Closing in accordance with this Agreement or as a result of any condition set forth in Section 6.1 not being satisfied. 17
ARTICLE 9. CASUALTY AND CONDEMNATION 9.1 NOTICE TO PURCHASER. Seller shall give Purchaser notice of the following promptly upon becoming aware of the same: (i) any pending or threatened condemnation affecting the Property prior to Closing, and (ii) any material fire or other casualty affecting the Property and occurring prior to Closing. 9.2 MINOR CASUALTY OR CONDEMNATION. If prior to Closing, (i) condemnation proceedings are commenced against all or any portion of the Property, and such proceedings do not materially adversely affect the continued operation of the Property in substantially the same manner as the Property is operated on the Contract Date, or (ii) the Property is damaged by fire or other casualty to the extent that the cost of repairing such damage is reasonably estimated by Seller and Purchaser, each acting reasonably and in good faith, to be five percent (5%) of the Purchase Price, or less, then this Agreement shall continue in full force and effect and the Purchase Price shall not be reduced except as hereinafter set forth, but Purchaser shall be entitled to an assignment of all of the proceeds payable to Seller of fire or other casualty insurance (other than those proceeds expended by or on behalf of Seller prior to Closing to restore the Property), all business interruption or rent loss insurance proceeds (if any) payable with respect to the period from and after Closing, and all condemnation awards payable to Seller (other than any portion of the award in respect of income lost prior to Closing or expended by or on behalf of Seller prior to Closing to restore the Property), as the case may be, and Seller shall have no obligation to repair or restore the Property; provided, however, that in the case of any insured casualty, the Purchase Price shall be reduced by the "deductible" applied by the applicable Seller's insurer with respect to such fire or casualty and not paid by Seller prior to Closing. 9.3 MAJOR CASUALTY OR CONDEMNATION. If prior to Closing, (i) condemnation proceedings are commenced against all or any material portion of the Property and such proceedings are not covered by Section 9.2, or (ii) the Property is damaged by fire or other casualty and such damage is not covered by Section 9.2, either Purchaser or Seller shall have the right, upon notice in writing to the other party delivered within ten (10) days after Seller gives Purchaser notice of such matter as described in this Section 9.3, to terminate this Agreement, whereupon this Agreement shall terminate, the Title Company shall return the Deposit to Purchaser and neither party to this Agreement shall thereafter have any further rights or liabilities under this Agreement other than those that expressly survive termination of this Agreement. If neither party timely elects to terminate this Agreement, then this Agreement shall continue in full force and effect and the Purchase Price shall not be reduced except as hereinafter set forth, but Purchaser shall be entitled to an assignment of all of the proceeds payable to Seller of fire or other casualty insurance (other than those proceeds expended by or on behalf of Seller prior to Closing to restore the Property), all business interruption or rent loss insurance proceeds (if any) payable with respect to the period from and after Closing, and all condemnation awards payable to Seller (other than any portion of the award in respect of income lost prior to Closing or expended by or on behalf of Seller prior to Closing to restore the Property), as the case may be, and Seller shall have no obligation to repair or restore the Property; provided, however, that in the case of any insured casualty, the Purchase Price shall be reduced by 18
the "deductible" applied by the applicable Seller's insurer with respect to such fire or casualty and not paid by such Seller prior to Closing. ARTICLE 10. CERTAIN TAX MATTERS 10.1 TAX APPEALS. If any appeal of any taxes or assessments relating to the Property is pending as of the Closing Date, Seller shall be entitled to receive any rebate or credit resulting from such appeal, and shall pay all expenses of prosecuting such appeal. 10.2 TRANSACTION TAXES. Seller shall be responsible for its federal and state income, franchise and similar taxes applicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Purchaser shall be responsible for any bulk sales taxes, personal property sales taxes, and similar taxes applicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 10.3 SURVIVAL. This Article 10 shall survive Closing. ARTICLE 11. MISCELLANEOUS 11.1 ASSIGNMENT. Neither Seller nor Purchaser shall assign this Agreement without the consent of the other. Notwithstanding the foregoing, without Seller's consent, Purchaser shall have the right to assign the right to receive the Property at Closing to another Person ("Purchaser's Designee"), subject to the following conditions: (i) such Purchaser's Designee owns, is wholly owned (directly or indirectly) by Purchaser; (ii) Purchaser shall give notice given to Seller no later than ten (10) days after the Contract Date of the identity of Purchaser's Designee; and (iii) such assignment shall not delay or otherwise adversely affect Closing. Upon any such assignment, Purchaser's Designee shall be deemed to have assumed for the benefit of Seller all obligations of Purchaser under this Agreement, but such assignment shall not relieve Purchaser of its obligations under this Agreement. 11.2 NOTICES. Notices and other communications required or permitted under this Agreement shall be in writing and delivered by hand against receipt or sent by recognized overnight delivery service, by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, with return receipt requested or by facsimile. All notices shall be addressed as follows: If to Purchaser: ArQule, Inc. 19 Presidential Way Woburn, MA 01801 Attention: Chief Financial Officer Fax: 781-994-0587 19
with a copy to: Arnold & Porter LLP 555 Twelfth Street, N.W. Washington, DC 20004 Attention: Kenneth L. Schwartz Fax: 202-942-5999 If to Seller: ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC c/o Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc. 135 North Robles Avenue, Suite 250 Pasadena, CA 91101 Attention: Thomas Andrews Fax: 626-578-7318 with a copy to: Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr 60 State Street Boston, MA 02109 Attention: Katharine Bachman Fax: 617-526-5000 If to Title Company: Chicago Title Insurance Company Maggie G. Watson 700 S. Flower Street, Suite 800 Los Angeles, CA 90017 Fax: 213-488-4380 or to such other addresses as may be designated by a proper notice. Notices shall be deemed to be effective on and as of a particular day upon receipt (or refusal thereof) if delivered on or before 5:00 Pacific Time in the following manner: if personally delivered, sent by recognized overnight delivery service, or sent by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, with return receipt requested, or upon electronically verified transmission, if such delivery is by facsimile. 11.3 WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL; JURISDICTION. SELLER AND PURCHASER EACH HEREBY WAIVES ANY RIGHT TO JURY TRIAL IN THE EVENT ANY PARTY FILES AN ACTION RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR TO THE TRANSACTIONS OR OBLIGATIONS CONTEMPLATED BY THIS AGREEMENT. Any action, suit or proceeding arising out of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated by this Agreement shall be brought exclusively in the federal or state court having jurisdiction over Boston, Massachusetts, and Seller and Purchaser agree that such courts are the most convenient forum for resolution of any such action and further agree to submit to the jurisdiction of such courts and waive any right to object to venue in such courts. 11.4 COUNTERPARTS AND EFFECTIVENESS. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts which, when taken together, shall constitute a single binding 20
instrument. Execution and delivery of this Agreement by facsimile shall be sufficient for all purposes and shall be binding on any Person who so executes. 11.5 BROKERAGE. Each of Purchaser and Seller represents to one another that no broker, finder or similar consultant has acted on its behalf in connection with this Agreement. Purchaser and Seller each shall indemnify and hold the other harmless from claims make by any broker, finder or similar consultant claiming through it for a commission, fee or compensation in connection with this Agreement, and such indemnity shall survive Closing without limitation as to time. The indemnification obligations set forth in this Section 11.5 shall survive Closing or any termination of this Agreement. 11.6 CONFIDENTIALITY. Purchaser and Seller shall each maintain as confidential any and all information and material obtained about the other which is furnished to it by the other in connection with this Agreement, and such obligation shall survive any termination of this Agreement and shall survive Closing. Purchaser and Seller shall each maintain as confidential the terms of this Agreement and such obligation shall survive any termination of this Agreement, but shall terminate at Closing. Purchaser shall maintain as confidential any and all information and material about the Property which is furnished to it by or on behalf of Seller, and such obligation shall survive any termination of this Agreement but shall terminate at Closing. Confidential information shall not include information and material which (i) becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of a disclosure prohibited by this Section 11.6, (ii) is known to Purchaser or Seller, as the case may be, on a non-confidential basis, prior to its receipt of such information and material from the other party, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, or (iii) becomes available to Purchaser or Seller, as the case may be, on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the other party which is not prohibited from disclosing the same. Notwithstanding the foregoing, (a) each of Purchaser and Seller may disclose confidential information to its employees, agents or advisors, and to potential investors or lenders, in each case on a need-to-know basis after the recipients of the information have been informed of the confidential nature of such information and directed not to disclose such information except in accordance with this Section 11.6, (b) each of Purchaser and Seller may disclose confidential information to the extent required by applicable law or the rules of any applicable securities exchange, and (c) Purchaser and Seller, following prior notice to and consultation with the other, may disclose the transaction contemplated by this Agreement to the extent necessary to obtain consents or approvals contemplated by this Agreement. 11.7 BULK SALES COMPLIANCE. Seller and Purchaser acknowledge that they do not intend to comply with and have agreed to waive the provisions of any statutory bulk sale or similar requirements applicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and Seller and Purchaser agree to rely upon the adjustment provisions of this Agreement to address any matters that would otherwise be subject to such bulk sale requirements. 11.8 PUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENTS. Neither Seller nor Purchaser shall make any public statement or issue any press release prior to the date that is one hundred eighty (180) days after the Closing with respect to this Agreement or the transactions 21
contemplated by this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other party (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed) except as otherwise required by law. If either party determines that applicable legal requirements require disclosure of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby prior to Closing, then, not less than twenty-four (24) hours prior to such disclosure, such party shall notify and provide the other party an opportunity to comment on the disclosing party's form of press release, securities filing or other written disclosure. Securities filings of either party that effect a republication of previously issued press releases or public statements shall not require notice to or the consent of the other party. 11.9 RECORDATION. Neither Seller nor Purchaser shall record this Agreement or any notice of this Agreement in the land records of any jurisdiction. 11.10 TIME OF ESSENCE. Time is of the essence with respect to all obligations of Seller and Purchaser under this Agreement. [SIGNATURES ON FOLLOWING PAGE] 22
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Seller and Purchaser have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the Contract Date: PURCHASER: ARQULE, INC. 19 Presidential Way Woburn, MA 01801 By: _________________________________________ Name: _________________________________________ Its: _________________________________________ SELLER: ARE-MA REGION NO. 20, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company By: Alexandria Real Estate Equities, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership By: ARE-QRS Corp., a Maryland corporation By: _________________________________________ Name: _________________________________________ Its: _________________________________________ JOINDER OF THE TITLE COMPANY The undersigned is joining this Agreement to evidence its agreement to receive, hold and disburse the Deposit in accordance with the terms of the Agreement. CHICAGO TITLE INSURANCE COMPANY By: _________________________________________ Name: _________________________________________ Its: _________________________________________ 23
LIST OF EXHIBITS EXHIBITS A Form of Deed B Form of Assignment C Legal Description of Land 1

 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL), today announced that it has sold its headquarters building in Woburn, Massachusetts to an affiliate of Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc., a pre-eminent life science REIT, and simultaneously entered into a 10-year lease of the same premises, with two 5-year options to renew.
Woburn, Mass., May 2, 2005
Under the terms of the deal, Alexandria paid ArQule $40.1 million for two parcels of land and a building. ArQule signed a lease with Alexandria for the building and the land on which the building is situated. The remaining parcel of land was not leased back by ArQule.
"We are very pleased with this transaction, as we had paid off our mortgages on the building at the end of last year and consequently had no debt associated with this asset," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill. "Entering into a long term sale and leaseback with Alexandria more closely aligns our investment strategy with our core business in that it provides additional funding for our oncology research and development efforts. With this additional cash we will comfortably meet our 2005 goal of ending the year with sufficient resources to fund our programs through 2008."
2005 Financial Guidance
As a result of the above transaction, ArQule is updating its 2005 financial guidance. ArQule now expects to end the year with between $111 and $115 million in cash and marketable securities, up from the previous guidance of between $71 and $75 million. ArQule expects net investment income to range between $2.3 and $2.8 million, up from previous guidance of between $1.5 and $2.0 million. ArQule expects the additional rent expense for 2005 to be partially offset by cost savings, and is therefore not updating guidance on cost of revenue, research and development expenses, marketing, general and administrative expenses, net loss or net loss per share. These expenses are expected to fall within the ranges previously disclosed, as follows: cost of revenue is expected to range between $33 and $34 million; research and development expenses are expected to range between $36 and $39 million; marketing, general and administrative expenses are expected to range between $9.5 and $10 million; net loss is expected to range between $24 and $28 million; and net loss per share is expected to range between $0.70 and $0.82.
 
ArQule/2
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer. For more information, please visit .
SM
SM
SM
www.ArQule.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the expected revenues may fall short due to failed collaborations; cost of revenue may exceed the guidance; expenses for research and development and for marketing, general and administration may exceed the guidance; net investment income may fall short of the guidance due to a difficult investment climate; the ACT
platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT
SM
pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 29, 2005, its 10-K filed with the Commission on March 16, 2005, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on November 9, 2004,and its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on August 4, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM

 
Exhibit 99.2
     On April 28, 2005, ArQule, Inc. entered into an Agreement of Purchase and Sale whereby we agreed to sell our corporate headquarters in Woburn, Massachusetts to ARE-MA Region No. 20, LLC, an affiliate of Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc. ("the Purchaser"), and simultaneously leaseback the facility from the Purchaser. On May 2, 2005, we completed the transaction by conveying the real estate in exchange for the purchase price and entering into a lease with the Purchaser as landlord. Pursuant to the Purchase and Sale agreement, the Purchaser acquired two parcels of land and our headquarters building for approximately $40.1 million. Pursuant to the terms of the lease, we leased our existing facility and the land on which it is situated for a period of ten years at an initial annual rate of approximately $2.9 million, subject to annual escalations. We are also responsible for all real property taxes, and specified insurance and maintenance costs (other than repair for structural elements). We have options to extend the lease for up to an additional ten years at market rates. We will account for the leaseback as an operating lease. We did not lease the remaining adjacent parcel of land conveyed to the Purchaser.
     The following unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated balance sheet gives effect on a pro forma basis of the sale and lease transactions as if they had occurred on March 31, 2005, principally by subtracting from our historical property and equipment balance the net book value of the land and building assets sold to the Purchaser, recording a deferred gain on the sale leaseback (to be recognized over the expected lease term) and reflecting the cash proceeds net of security deposits, first month rental payments and broker commission and closing costs. The following unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated income statements for the year ended December 31, 2004 and for the three months ended March 31, 2005 give effect on a pro forma basis of the sale and leaseback transactions as if they occurred on January 1, 2004, principally by eliminating from our historical financial statements the cost of depreciating the assets sold to the purchaser and adding the cost of the lease expense, adjusted for the amortization of the deferred gain on the sale and leaseback.
     This unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated financial information is presented for informational purposes only and is not necessarily indicative of our future results or the results we would have achieved had the sale and lease transactions occurred at the dates presented. It should be read in conjunction with our consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for fiscal year ended December 31, 2004 and our quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2005.
 
 
 
 
     
1. Pro Forma Adjustments
The following adjustments have been made in preparation of the unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated financial information:
 
Pursuant to the terms of the lease, the initial annual rate lease payment is approximately $2.9 million, subject to annual escalations. The "Gross lease expense" above reflects recognition of the total lease payments due on a straight-line basis over the initial ten year term of the lease. "Amortization of deferred gain on sale leaseback" reflects amortizing an approximate $6.1 million gain on the sale of the building and land on a straight-line basis over the initial ten year term of the lease.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050615155338.txt.gz
TIME:20050615155338
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On June 9, 2005, the directors of ArQule, Inc. elected Ronald M. Lindsay, Ph.D. to ArQules Board of Directors. Dr. Lindsay will receive compensation for his services as a director as described in the attached Exhibit 99.1 which is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
(d) Election of Directors. On June 9, 2005, the directors of ArQule, Inc. elected Ronald M. Lindsay, Ph.D. to ArQules Board of Directors. The press release announcing Dr. Lindsays election, including his professional background and qualifications, is filed as Exhibit 99.2 hereto. There was no arrangement or understanding between Dr. Lindsay and any other person associated with ArQule pursuant to which he was selected as a director. The Board of Directors and Dr. Lindsay have made no determination regarding his serving on any committee of the Board of Directors.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

EXHIBIT 99.1
Director Compensation
Currently, each of our non-employee directors who is serving as a director prior to and immediately following any annual meeting of ArQule stockholders receives a $10,000 annual retainer. Each non-employee director also receives $2,000 for each day on which the Board of Directors meets and the director attends.
In addition to the base compensation for directors, the director serving as Chairman of the Board of Directors receives a $15,000 annual retainer and $1,000 for each meeting day of the Board of Directors attended.
In addition to the base compensation for directors, the director serving as Chairman of the Audit Committee receives a $10,000 annual retainer and $1,000 for each meeting day of the Board of Directors attended.
In addition to the base compensation for directors, the director serving as Chairman of the Compensation and Nominating Committee and the director serving as Chairman of the Science Committee each receive a $10,000 annual retainer.
Under our Director Stock Option Plan each non-employee director who is serving as a director prior to and immediately following any annual meeting of ArQule stockholders (whether or not a director is being re-elected) receives an automatic grant of an option to purchase 5,000 shares of our common stock. This option is fully exercisable on the date of grant. In addition, upon initial election to the Board, each non-employee director receives an automatic grant of an option to purchase 10,000 shares of common stock. This option become exercisable as to 3,334 shares on the date of the Company's next annual meeting of stockholders following the date of grant and as to 3,333 shares on the date of each of the next two annual meetings of stockholders, so long as the director remains in office. All options referred to in this paragraph have a term of ten years and an exercise price equal to the closing price of the common stock as reported by the Nasdaq National Market on the last trading day prior to the date of grant.

EXHIBIT 99.2
William B. Boni VP, Investor Relations /
Contact:
Corp. Communications
(781) 994-0300
www.ArQule.com
For Immediate Release:
Woburn, Mass., June 14, 2005
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) is pleased to announce the appointment of Dr. Ronald M. Lindsay to its board of directors, effective June 9, 2005. Dr. Lindsay has held a number of leading positions in the biopharmaceutical industry, directing discovery and preclinical research efforts in cancer, neuroscience and genomics. He currently operates Milestone Consulting, a biotechnology consulting enterprise, and is a director of Sequenom, Inc. (NASDAQ: SQNM) and Neuro3D, a privately held French company. Dr. Lindsay is also a member of the scientific advisory boards of Serono International and Rinat Inc. and serves as a senior advisor to TVM GmbH, a German/U.S. venture capital group.
Dr. Lindsay previously held senior executive positions at Regeneron, Inc., where he was also a founding program director, Millennium Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and diaDexus Inc. Following post-doctoral work at the Friedrich Miescher Institute in Basel, Switzerland, Dr. Lindsay was a staff member at the National Institute for Medical Research, Mill Hill, London. He began his industry career as head of cell biology at the Sandoz Institute for Medical Research, University College, London.
Dr. Lindsay holds a B.Sc (Hons) in chemistry from the University of Glasgow and a Ph.D. in biochemistry from the University of Calgary. He has authored over 150 scientific articles and was recognized by the Institute for Scientific Information as one of the most highly cited neuroscientists of the 1990s.
"Dr. Lindsay brings more than 20 years of leadership experience in industry and scientific research to ArQule's board," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule. "We welcome him and look forward to his contributions as the company continues to move its product candidates from the pre-clinical phase into clinical testing."
"ArQule's capabilities and unique synergies in cancer biology and chemistry technologies, combined with its strong intellectual property position, make it an attractive player in the biotechnology industry, and I look forward to continuing progress at the company," said Dr. Lindsay.
ArQule/2
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including a collaboration with Pfizer. For more information, please visit .
SM
SM
SM
www.ArQule.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT
SM
platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT
SM
pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 29, 2005, its 10-K filed with the Commission on March 16, 2005, its
Form 10-Q
filed with the Commission on November 9, 2004,and its
Form 10-Q
filed with the Commission on August 4, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050728153847.txt.gz
TIME:20050728153847
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 28, 2005, ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2005. The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
William B. Boni VP, Investor Relations/ Corp. Communications (781) 994-0300
Contacts:
www.ArQule.com
For Immediate Release:
 ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today reported its results of operations for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2005.
Woburn, Mass., July 28, 2005
The Company reported total revenues of $13,454,000 for the quarter ended June 30, 2005, compared to revenues of $14,012,000 for the second quarter of 2004. Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2005 were $27,397,000, compared to revenues of $25,773,000 for the same period in 2004.
The Company reported a net loss of $2,427,000, or $0.07 per share, for the quarter ended June 30, 2005, compared to a net loss of $134,000, or $0.00 per share, for the quarter ended June 30, 2004. For the six-month period ended June 30, 2005, the Company reported a net loss of $3,871,000, or $0.11 per share, compared to a net loss of $5,385,000, or $0.19 per share, for the six-month period ended June 30, 2004.
For the quarter ended June 30, 2005, the Company reported total costs and expenses of $16,129,000, compared with $14,392,000 for the second quarter of 2004. Total costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2005 were $32,019,000, compared to $31,573,000 for the same period in 2004.
ArQule ended the second quarter of fiscal 2005 with approximately $130,000,000 in cash and marketable securities. This amount includes $40,100,000 in proceeds received from the completion of a sale and leaseback transaction of the Company's headquarters facility in Woburn, Massachusetts completed in May 2005.
Following the conclusion of the first six months of 2005, the Company is adjusting its guidance for fiscal year 2005 as follows. As a result of significant cost savings due to operational efficiencies and program synergies realized during the first six months of the year, particularly in pre-clinical activities, the Company now projects total research and development expenses for the year to range between $30 million and $34 million. The Company expects net investment income to range between $2.3 million and $2.8 million. Net loss is expected to range between $17 million and $23 million, and net loss per share
 
ArQule/2
between $0.50 and $0.67. As a result of the receipt of proceeds from the sale and leaseback transaction, the Company expects to end fiscal year 2005 with between $116 million and $121 million in cash and cash equivalents. This guidance does not assume any additional collaborations, acquisitions or in-licensings.
"At the mid-way point of the year, ArQule is proceeding on schedule in both its clinical and pre-clinical programs," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule. "We are on track to initiate at least one Phase 2 trial by the end of the year with our lead product, ARQ 501, which is partnered with Roche, and to submit an Investigational New Drug (IND) application for one pre-clinical program before the end of the year. Our cash position is strong, having benefited from the completion of a registered stock offering in January, the sale-leaseback transaction completed in May, and significant cost savings in certain pre-clinical programs.
"We are seeing encouraging signs of anti-tumor activity in our two Phase 1b combination therapy trials and in our Phase 1 monotherapy trial with ARQ 501, and we have recently activated a third site in connection with our expanding combination trial with gemcitabine," said Dr. Hill. "The side effect profile that continues to emerge from these trials is also encouraging, and although we have yet to define a recommended Phase 2 dose for ARQ 501, we believe we are close to this goal.
"In addition, during the past quarter we initiated GLP toxicology studies with ARQ 197, the lead compound of a series of proprietary compounds generated through our ARQ 650 RP cancer survival pathway program, for which we retain ownership of all compounds," said Dr. Hill.
"We are pleased that the body of scientific literature related to checkpoint activation is expanding significantly," said Dr. Hill. "Independent research, particularly two studies published in in April, as well as ArQule's research published earlier this month in , has provided additional scientific validation of our activated checkpoint therapy platform, the central focus of the Company's proprietary approach to oncology drug discovery and the basis for the ongoing clinical testing of ARQ 501."
Nature
Cancer Research
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m. Dr. Hill and Louise A. Mawhinney, vice president and chief financial officer, will lead the call.
 
ArQule/3
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing (888) 286-8010 from the U.S. and Canada, and (617) 801-6888 from outside the U.S. For archived calls, the passcode is 42394473.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. In addition to advancing its own programs, ArQule continues to advance the drug discovery efforts of pharmaceutical collaborators by providing high-quality library design and compound production, including collaborations with Pfizer. For more information, please visit www.ArQule.com.
SM
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 29, 2005, its 10-K filed with the Commission on March 16, 2005, its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on November 9, 2004,and its Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on August 4, 2004. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 
ArQule/4


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050916143329.txt.gz
TIME:20050916143329
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On September 12, 2005, the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. approved an amendment and restatement of the Companys Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Equity Plan"). The changes to the Equity Plan eliminate the provision permitting loans in connection with awards under the Equity Plan and clarify that options granted under the Equity Plan may not be repriced. A copy of the Equity Plan, as amended and restated, is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 ArQule, Inc. Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Exhibit 99.1
Section 1.
Purpose
The purpose of the Plan is to attract and retain key employees and consultants of the Company and its Affiliates, to provide an incentive for them to achieve long-range performance goals, and to enable them to participate in the long-term growth of the Company. Independent contractors and leased employees of the Company shall not be eligible to participate in the Plan notwithstanding that they may be deemed to be "common law" employees of the Company for other purposes.
Section 2.
Definitions
"Affiliate" means any business entity that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with the Company. For purposes hereof, "Control" (and with correlative meanings, the terms "controlled by" and "under common control with") shall mean the possession of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of the Company, whether through the ownership of voting stock, by contract or otherwise. In the case of a corporation "control" shall mean, among other things, the direct or indirect ownership of more than fifty percent (50%) of its outstanding voting stock. In the case of an Incentive Stock Option, the term "Affiliate" shall not include any entity which is not either a "parent corporation" or a "subsidiary corporation," both as defined in Section 424 of the Code, with respect to the Company.
"Award" means any Option, Stock Appreciation Right, Performance Share, Restricted Stock, Stock Unit or Other Stock-Based Award awarded under the Plan or any Award previously granted under the 1994 Equity Incentive Plan of the Company or the Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan of the Company as in effect prior to date this Plan was adopted by the Board of Directors.
"Board" means the Board of Directors of the Company.
"Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and any successor to such Code.
"Committee" means a committee of not fewer than two members of the Board appointed by the Board to administer the Plan. If a Committee is authorized to grant Options to a Reporting Person or a "covered employee" within the meaning of Section 162(m) of the Code, each member shall be a "non-employee director" or the equivalent within the meaning of Rule 16b-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and an "outside director" or the equivalent within the meaning of Section 162(m) of the Code, respectively. Until such committee is appointed, "Committee" means the Board.
"Common Stock" or "Stock" means the Common Stock, $0.01 par value, of the Company.
"Company" means ArQule, Inc.
"Designated Beneficiary" means the beneficiary designated by a Participant, in a manner determined by the Committee, to receive amounts due or exercise rights of the Participant in the event of the Participant's death. In the absence of an effective designation of a beneficiary by a Participant, "Designated Beneficiary" shall mean (i) the Participant's estate, if such amounts or rights are, under applicable law, deemed to be part of the Participant's estate, or (ii) such person who acquired the right to receive amounts due or exercise rights of the Participant by bequest or inheritance.
"Effective Date" means October 28, 1994.
"Fair Market Value" means, with respect to Common Stock or any other property, the fair market value of such property as determined by the Committee in good faith or in the manner established by the Committee from time to time.
"Incentive Stock Option" means an option to purchase shares of Common Stock awarded to a Participant under Section 6 that is intended to meet the requirements of Section 422 of the Code or any successor provision and is designated by the Committee as such.
"Nonstatutory Stock Option" means an option to purchase shares of Common Stock awarded to a Participant under Section 6 that is not intended to be an Incentive Stock Option.
"Option" means an Incentive Stock Option or a Nonstatutory Stock Option.
"Other Stock-Based Award" means an Award, other than an Option, Stock Appreciation Right, Performance Share, Restricted Stock or Stock Unit, having a Common Stock element and awarded to a Participant under            Section 11.
"Participant" means, subject to Section 4 hereof, a person selected by the Committee to receive an Award under the Plan.
"Performance Cycle" or "Cycle" means the period of time selected by the Committee during which performance is measured for the purpose of determining the extent to which an award of Performance Shares has been earned.
"Performance Shares" mean shares of Common Stock, which may be earned by the achievement of performance goals, awarded to a Participant under Section 8.
"Reporting Person" means a person subject to Section 16 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or any successor provision.
"Restricted Period" means the period of time selected by the Committee during which an Award may be forfeited to the Company pursuant to the terms and conditions of such Award.
"Restricted Stock" means shares of Common Stock subject to forfeiture awarded to a Participant under Section 9.
"Stock Appreciation Right" or "SAR" means a right to receive any excess in value of shares of Common Stock over the exercise price awarded to a Participant under Section 7.
"Stock Unit" means an award of Common Stock or units that are valued in whole or in part by reference to, or otherwise based on, the value of Common Stock, awarded to a Participant under Section 10.
"Ten-Percent Stockholder" shall mean a Participant who, at the time of grant of an Incentive Stock Option, owns, applying Section 424(d) of the Code, stock possessing more than ten percent of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock of the Company or a "parent corporation" or "subsidiary corporation" (both as defined in Section 424 of the Code) with respect to the Company.
Section 3.
Administration
The Plan shall be administered by the Committee. The Committee shall have authority and discretion to adopt, alter and repeal such administrative rules, guidelines and practices governing the operation of the Plan as it shall from time to time consider advisable, to interpret the provisions of the Plan, subject to the provisions of the Plan, to grant Awards to Participants and determine the terms of all such Awards, to determine the identity of a Participant's Designated Beneficiary and to determine the identity of a Participant's (or Designated Beneficiary's) legal representative in the event such person becomes legally disabled. The Committee's decisions shall be final and binding. To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Committee may delegate to one or more executive officers of the Company the power to make Awards to Participants who are not Reporting Persons or covered employees and all determinations under the Plan with respect thereto, provided that the Committee shall fix the maximum amount of such Awards for all such Participants and a maximum for any one Participant.
Section 4.
Eligibility
All employees and, in the case of Awards other than Incentive Stock Options, any consultant of the Company or any Affiliate, capable of contributing significantly to the successful performance of the Company, other than a person who has irrevocably elected not to be eligible, are eligible to be Participants in the Plan.
Section 5.
Stock Available for Awards
(a) Subject to adjustment under subsection (b), Awards may be made under the Plan for up to 9,600,000 shares of Common Stock. If any Award in respect of shares of Common Stock expires or is terminated unexercised or is forfeited without the Participant having had the benefits of ownership (other than voting rights), the shares subject to such Award, to the extent of such expiration, termination or forfeiture, shall again be available for award under the Plan. Common Stock issued through the assumption or substitution of outstanding grants from an acquired company shall not reduce the shares available for Awards under the Plan. Shares issued under the Plan may consist in whole or in part of authorized but unissued shares or treasury shares.
(b) In the event that the Committee determines that any stock dividend, extraordinary cash dividend, creation of a class of equity securities, recapitalization, reorganization, merger, consolidation, split-up, spin-off, combination, exchange of shares, warrants or rights offering to purchase Common Stock at a price substantially below fair market value, or other similar transaction affects the Common Stock such that an adjustment is required or desirable in order to preserve the benefits or potential benefits intended to be made available under the Plan, then the Committee (subject, in the case of Incentive Stock Options, to any limitation required under the Code) may in its discretion equitably adjust any or all of, or provide substitution for, (i) the number and kind of shares in respect of which Awards may be made under the Plan, (ii) the number and kind of shares subject to outstanding Awards, and (iii) the award, exercise or conversion price with respect to any of the foregoing, and if considered appropriate, the Committee may make provision for a cash payment with respect to an outstanding Award, provided that the number of shares subject to any Award shall always be a whole number.
Section 6.
Stock Options
(a) Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee may award Incentive Stock Options and Nonstatutory Stock Options and determine the number of shares to be covered by each Option, the option price therefor and the conditions and limitations applicable to the exercise of the Option. The terms and conditions of Incentive Stock Options shall be subject to and comply with Section 422 of the Code or any successor provision and any regulations thereunder, and no Incentive Stock Option may be granted hereunder more than ten years after May 19, 2004.
1
(b) The Committee shall establish the option price at the time each Option is awarded, which price shall not be less than 100% (110% in the case of a Ten-Percent Stockholder) of the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock on the date of award with respect to Incentive Stock Options. Nonstatutory Stock Options may be granted at such prices as the Committee may determine.
(c) Each Option shall be exercisable at such times and subject to such terms and conditions as the Committee may specify in the applicable Award or thereafter, provided, however, that an Incentive Stock Option may not be exercised more than ten years (five years in the case of a Ten-Percent Stockholder) from the date of award. The Committee may impose such conditions with respect to the exercise of Options, including conditions relating to applicable federal or state securities laws, as it considers necessary or advisable.
(d) No shares shall be delivered pursuant to any exercise of an Option until payment in full of the option price therefor is received by the Company. Such payment may be made in whole or in part in cash or, to the extent permitted by the Committee at or after the award of the Option, by delivery of a note or shares of Common Stock owned by the optionee, including Restricted Stock, or by retaining shares otherwise issuable pursuant to the Option, in each case valued at their Fair Market Value on the date of delivery or retention, or such other lawful consideration as the Committee may determine.
(e) The Committee may provide that, subject to such conditions as it considers appropriate, upon the delivery or retention of shares to the Company in payment of an Option, the Participant automatically be awarded an Option for up to the number of shares so delivered.
Section 7.
Stock Appreciation Rights
(a) Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee may award SARs in tandem with an Option (at or after the award of the Option), or alone and unrelated to an Option. SARs in tandem with an Option shall terminate to the extent that the related Option is exercised, and the related Option shall terminate to the extent that the tandem SARs are exercised. SARs granted in tandem with Options shall have an exercise price not less than the exercise price of the related Option. SARs granted alone and unrelated to an Option may be granted at such exercise prices as the Committee may determine.
(b) An SAR related to an Option, which SAR can only be exercised upon or during limited periods following a change in control of the Company, may entitle the Participant to receive an amount based upon the highest price paid or offered for Common Stock in any transaction relating to the change in control or paid during the thirty-day period immediately preceding the occurrence of the change in control in any transaction reported in the stock market in which the Common Stock is normally traded.
Section 8.
Performance Shares
(a) Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee may award Performance Shares and determine the number of such shares for each Performance Cycle and the duration of each Performance Cycle. There may be more than one Performance Cycle in existence at any one time, and the duration of Performance Cycles may differ from each other. The payment value of Performance Shares shall be equal to the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock on the date the Performance Shares are earned or, in the discretion of the Committee, on the date the Committee determines that the Performance Shares have been earned.
(b) The Committee shall establish performance goals for each Cycle, for the purpose of determining the extent to which Performance Shares awarded for such Cycle are earned, on the basis of such criteria and to accomplish such objectives as the Committee may from time to time select. During any Cycle, the Committee may adjust the performance goals for such Cycle as it deems equitable in recognition of unusual or non-recurring events affecting the Company, changes in applicable tax laws or accounting principles, or such other factors as the Committee may determine.
(c) As soon as practicable after the end of a Performance Cycle, the Committee shall determine the number of Performance Shares that have been earned on the basis of performance in relation to the established performance goals. The payment values of earned Performance Shares shall be distributed to the Participant or, if the Participant has died, to the Participant's Designated Beneficiary, as soon as practicable thereafter. The Committee shall determine, at or after the time of award, whether payment values will be settled in whole or in part in cash or other property, including Common Stock or Awards.
Section 9.
Restricted Stock
(a) Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee may award shares of Restricted Stock and determine the duration of the Restricted Period during which, and the conditions under which, the shares may be forfeited to the Company and the other terms and conditions of such Awards. Shares of Restricted Stock may be issued for no cash consideration or such minimum consideration as may be required by applicable law.
(b) Shares of Restricted Stock may not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged or otherwise encumbered, except as permitted by the Committee, during the Restricted Period. Shares of Restricted Stock shall be evidenced in such manner as the Committee may determine. Any certificates issued in respect of shares of Restricted Stock shall be registered in the name of the Participant and unless otherwise determined by the Committee, deposited by the Participant, together with a stock power endorsed in blank, with the Company. At the expiration of the Restricted Period, the Company shall deliver such certificates to the Participant or if the Participant has died, to the Participant's Designated Beneficiary.
Section 10.
Stock Units
(a) Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee may award Stock Units subject to such terms, restrictions, conditions, performance criteria, vesting requirements and payment rules as the Committee shall determine.
(b) Shares of Common Stock awarded in connection with a Stock Unit Award shall be issued for no cash consideration or such minimum consideration as may be required by applicable law.
Section 11.
Other Stock-Based Awards
(a) Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee may make other awards of Common Stock and other awards that are valued in whole or in part by reference to, or are otherwise based on, Common Stock, including without limitation convertible preferred stock, convertible debentures, exchangeable securities and Common Stock awards or options. Other Stock-Based Awards may be granted either alone or in tandem with other Awards granted under the Plan and/or cash awards made outside of the Plan.
(b) The Committee may establish performance goals, which may be based on performance goals related to book value, subsidiary performance or such other criteria as the Committee may determine, Restricted Periods, Performance Cycles, conversion prices, maturities and security, if any, for any Other Stock-Based Award. Other Stock-Based Awards may be sold to Participants at the face value thereof or any discount therefrom or awarded for no consideration or such minimum consideration as may be required by applicable law.
Section 12.
General Provisions Applicable to Awards
(a) Each Award under the Plan shall be evidenced by a writing delivered to the Participant specifying the terms and conditions thereof and containing such other terms and conditions not inconsistent with the provisions of the Plan as the Committee considers necessary or advisable to achieve the purposes of the Plan or to comply with applicable tax and regulatory laws and accounting principles.
Documentation.
(b) Each type of Award may be made alone, in addition to or in relation to any other type of Award. The terms of each type of Award need not be identical, and the Committee need not treat Participants uniformly. Except as otherwise provided by the Plan or a particular Award, any determination with respect to an Award may be made by the Committee at the time of award or at any time thereafter.
Committee Discretion.
(c) The Committee shall determine whether Awards are settled in whole or in part in cash, Common Stock, other securities of the Company, Awards or other property. The Committee may permit a Participant to defer all or any portion of a payment under the Plan, including the crediting of interest on deferred amounts denominated in cash and dividend equivalents on amounts denominated in Common Stock.
Settlement.
(d) In the discretion of the Committee, any Award under the Plan may provide the Participant with (i) dividends or dividend equivalents payable currently or deferred with or without interest, and (ii) cash payments in lieu of or in addition to an Award.
Dividends and Cash Awards.
(e) The Committee shall determine the effect on an Award of the disability, death, retirement or other termination of employment of a Participant and the extent to which, and the period during which, the Participant's legal representative, guardian or Designated Beneficiary may receive payment of an Award or exercise rights thereunder.
Termination of Employment.
(f) In order to preserve a Participant's rights under an Award in the event of a change in control of the Company, the Committee in its discretion may, at the time an Award is made or at any time thereafter, take one or more of the following actions: (i) provide for the acceleration of any time period relating to the exercise or realization of the Award, (ii) provide for the purchase of the Award upon the Participant's request for an amount of cash or other property that could have been received upon the exercise or realization of the Award had the Award been currently exercisable or payable, (iii) adjust the terms of the Award in a manner determined by the Committee to reflect the change in control, (iv) cause the Award to be assumed, or new rights substituted therefor, by another entity, or (v) make such other provision as the Committee may consider equitable and in the best interests of the Company.
Change in Control.
(g) The Participant shall pay to the Company, or make provision satisfactory to the Committee for payment of, any taxes required by law to be withheld in respect of Awards under the Plan no later than the date of the event creating the tax liability. The Company's obligation to issue or deliver shares of Common Stock or pay any amount pursuant to any Award shall be subject to the Participant's satisfaction of his or her obligations under the preceding sentence. In the Committee's discretion, such tax obligations may be paid in whole or in part in shares of Common Stock, including shares retained from the Award creating the tax obligation, valued at their Fair Market Value on the date of delivery. The Company and its Affiliates may, to the extent permitted by law, deduct any such tax obligations from any payment of any kind otherwise due to the Participant.
Withholding Taxes.
(h) Awards may be made to Participants who are foreign nationals or employed outside the United States on such terms and conditions different from those specified in the Plan as the Committee considers necessary or advisable to achieve the purposes of the Plan or to comply with applicable laws.
Foreign Nationals.
(i) The Committee may amend, modify or terminate any outstanding Award, including substituting therefor another Award of the same or a different type, changing the date of exercise or realization and converting an Incentive Stock Option to a Nonstatutory Stock Option, provided that the Participant's consent to such action shall be required unless the Committee determines that the action, taking into account any related action, would not materially and adversely affect the Participant Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, unless such action is approved by the Company's stockholders or is an adjustment resulting from the operation of Section 5 (b) of the Plan: (A) no outstanding Option granted under the Plan may be amended to provide an exercise price per share that is lower than the then-current exercise price per share stated in such outstanding Option, and (B) the Committee may not cancel any outstanding Option and grant in substitution therefor new Awards under the Plan covering the same or a different number of shares of Common Stock and having an exercise price per share lower than the then-current exercise price per share of the cancelled Option.
Amendment of Award.
(j) In the discretion of the Committee, any Award may be made transferable upon such terms and conditions and to such extent as the Committee determines, provided that Incentive Stock Options may be transferable only to the extent permitted by the Code. The Committee may in its discretion waive any restriction on transferability.
Transferability.
Section 13.
Miscellaneous
(a) No person shall have any claim or right to be granted an Award, and the grant of an Award shall not be construed as giving a Participant the right to continued employment. The Company expressly reserves the right at any time to dismiss a Participant free from any liability or claim under the Plan, except as expressly provided in the applicable Award.
No Right To Employment.
(b) Subject to the provisions of the applicable Award, no Participant or Designated Beneficiary shall have any rights as a stockholder with respect to any shares of Common Stock to be distributed under the Plan until he or she becomes the holder thereof. A Participant to whom Common Stock is awarded shall be considered the holder of the Stock at the time of the Award except as otherwise provided in the applicable Award.
No Rights As Stockholder.
(c) Subject to the approval of the stockholders of the Company, the Plan shall be effective on the Effective Date. Before such approval, Awards may be made under the Plan expressly subject to such approval.
Effective Date.
(d) The Board may amend, suspend or terminate the Plan or any portion thereof at any time, subject to any stockholder approval that the Board determines to be necessary or advisable.
Amendment of Plan.
(e) The provisions of the Plan shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of Delaware.
Governing Law.
     
This Plan was approved by the Board of Directors on October 17, 1994.
This Plan was approved by the stockholders on October 17, 1994.
The Board of Directors amended and restated this Plan on April 8, 1998.
The amendment and restatement was approved by the stockholders at the Annual Meeting of Stockholders on May 14, 1998.
The Board of Directors amended and restated this Plan on March 16, 2000.
The amendment and restatement was approved by the stockholders at the Annual Meeting of Stockholders on May 18, 2000.
The Board of Directors amended and restated this Plan on March 23, 2001.
The amendment and restatement was approved by the stockholders at the Annual Meeting of Stockholders on May 17, 2001.
The Board of Directors amended and restated this Plan on March 21, 2002.
The amendment and restatement was approved by the stockholders at the Annual Meeting of Stockholders on May 16, 2002.
The Board of Directors amended and restated this Plan on April 7, 2004.
The amendment and restatement was approved by the stockholders at the Annual Meeting of Stockholders on May 19, 2004.
The Board of Directors amended and restated this Plan on April 4, 2005.
The amendment and restatement was approved by the stockholders at the Annual Meeting of Stockholders on May 18, 2005.
The Board of Directors authorized the amendment and restatement of this Plan on May 11, 2005, effective September 12, 2005. Pursuant to Section 13 (d) of the Plan, The Board determined that it was not necessary or advisable to obtain stockholder approval of the amendment and restatement.
This Plan was amended by the Board with subsequent stockholder approval to extend the period during which Incentive Stock Option may be granted to ten years after May 19, 2004, the date of the 2004 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of the Company.
1


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20050930140306.txt.gz
TIME:20050930140306
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On September 27, 2005, ArQule, Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing its intention to focus on oncology discovery and development and exit its chemistry services business. The Company will work with its remaining chemistry customers to ensure their needs are supported. A copy of the press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Press Release dated September 27, 2005
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Contacts:
William B. Boni
VP, Investor Relations/
Corp. Communications
(781) 994-0300
For Immediate Release:
 ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced a strategic update reflecting progress in both its clinical and pre-clinical programs. The Company will focus on a corporate strategy of organic growth founded on a drug discovery capability combining strengths in proprietary biology and validated chemistry and a product portfolio that offers successive internally generated opportunities to develop innovative cancer therapeutics.
Woburn, MA, September 27, 2005
As a result of its successful transition to an integrated research and development company and in order to focus operationally on developing its expanding and exciting oncology portfolio, ArQule has made the decision to exit its chemistry services business. The Company intends to work closely with its remaining chemistry customers to ensure their needs are supported. The Company's chemistry services will have contributed revenues of approximately $46 million and $49 million in 2005 and 2004, respectively.
Based on its strong financial position, ArQule expects to retain ownership of a number of clinical and pre-clinical stage programs and to progress a number of these from discovery into clinical development in the coming years. ArQule will also continue to leverage the broad spectrum of its well-established chemistry capabilities in the discovery of compounds that act on its proprietary ACT targets and other related biological targets with key roles in the onset and spread of cancer. These chemistry capabilities are designed to integrate drug-like qualities into new product candidates at the earliest stages of their development.
SM
ArQule is nearing completion of the first stage of clinical trials with ARQ 501, the lead compound from its E2F checkpoint activation platform. ARQ 501, partnered with Roche, is in a Phase 1 clinical trial as monotherapy and in two Phase 1b trials in combination therapy with docetaxel and gemcitabine. Based on findings presented at the American Society for Clinical Oncology (ASCO) earlier this year, as well as additional evidence of anti-cancer activity observed since then and an encouraging side effect profile, ArQule is planning to advance ARQ 501 into Phase 2 testing within the next three to four months. The Company expects to present final Phase 1 results with ARQ 501 in a peer-reviewed forum.
ArQule/2
ArQule also plans to submit an Investigational New Drug application (IND) by the end of 2005 for ARQ 197, the lead compound of a series of proprietary compounds generated through the Company's ARQ 650RP cancer survival pathway platform. Planning for the initiation of Phase 1 studies for this compound is currently underway. ArQule currently retains full ownership of all compounds in this program.
Over the coming months, the Company expects to update progress on three further pre-clinical stage programs, comprising a second-generation E2F activator, a selective BRAF kinase inhibitor and a novel checkpoint activator, in addition to an extensive portfolio of discovery stage programs.
The targets, mechanisms of action and chemistry related to compounds generated from ArQule's oncology programs differ, offering the potential for multiple therapeutic opportunities in each one. Throughout these programs, the Company's
biology capabilities are enhanced by its strengths in chemistry technology applied to the design and optimization of small molecule compounds.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit .
SM
SM
SM
www.ArQule.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT
SM
platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical
ArQule/3
studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT
SM
pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20051017113644.txt.gz
TIME:20051017113644
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.02 Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
In connection with settlement of the lawsuit referred to below in Item 8.01, on October 11, 2005, ArQule, Inc. (the "Company") and Cummings Properties, LLC ("Cummings") agreed to terminate a lease of approximately 35,500 square feet of laboratory and office space in Medford, Massachusetts. The lease, which was scheduled to expire on July 30, 2006, will terminate on October 31, 2005. The Company will not incur any material lease termination penalties.
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On January 16, 2002, the Company brought a complaint in the Superior Court of Middlesex County in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts for declaratory relief and damages against Cummings arising from a dispute over increased lease rates. On October 11, 2005, the parties agreed to settle the lawsuit and file with the Court a stipulation of dismissal of the lawsuit with prejudice. In exchange for Cummings forgiving a portion of the rental payment obligations for the period from November 1, 2005 through July 30, 2006, the Company assigned its sublease rent payments during that period to Cummings and guaranteed those payments. The total amount of those payments is approximately $0.3 million. As a result of this settlement, the Company will save approximately $0.6 million in rental payments.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 -- Lease Agreement, dated December 20, 1996 between the Company and Cummings Property Management, Inc. Filed as Exhibit 10.22 to the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-1 (File No. 333-22945) and incorporated herein by reference.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20051027132616.txt.gz
TIME:20051027132616
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 27, 2005, ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2005. The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits.
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: October 27, 2005

 
Exhibit 99.1
For Immediate Release:
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today reported its results of operations for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2005.
Woburn, Mass., October 27, 2005
The Company reported total revenues of $13,194,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2005, compared to revenues of $14,594,000 for the third quarter of 2004. Revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2005 were $40,591,000, compared to revenues of $40,367,000 for the same period in 2004.
The Company reported a net loss of $916,000, or $0.03 per share, for the quarter ended September 30, 2005, compared to a net profit of $1,472,000, or $0.05 per share, for the quarter ended September 30, 2004, which included a one-time restructuring credit of $1,496,000 associated with a lease commitment. For the nine-month period ended September 30, 2005, the Company reported a net loss of $4,787,000, or $0.14 per share, compared to a net loss of $3,912,000, or $0.14 per share, for the nine-month period ended September 30, 2004.
For the quarter ended September 30, 2005, the Company reported total costs and expenses of $15,255,000, compared with $13,442,000 for the third quarter of 2004. Total costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2005 were $47,275,000, compared to $45,014,000 for the same period in 2004.
ArQule ended the third quarter of fiscal 2005 with approximately $134,000,000 in cash and marketable securities.
"As we near the end of 2005, ArQule is approaching a number of milestones which will increasingly define us as a product-focused company with an exciting and rapidly expanding portfolio," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule. "Our strong commitment to oncology, which has fueled the expansion of this promising portfolio, also guided our recent decision to exit our chemistry services business in an orderly fashion, as we announced last month. We will work closely with
 
our remaining chemistry customers to ensure their needs are supported. We are retaining our core chemistry expertise, however, which I believe differentiates us from other biotechnology companies and allows us to integrate drug-like qualities into new product candidates from the earliest stages of their development," said Dr. Hill.
"We expect to begin the first of several Phase 2 trials by the end of the year or early next year with ARQ 501, our lead product, which is partnered with Roche," said Dr. Hill. "Phase I clinical trials with ARQ 501 as monotherapy and in combination therapy continue to demonstrate anti-cancer activity with an acceptable side effect profile," said Dr. Hill.
"We have completed GLP toxicity testing with ARQ 197, a proprietary compound discovered through our 650 RP program, and we plan to file an Investigational New Drug (IND) application by year-end," said Dr. Hill. "We are also making exciting progress in pre-clinical programs that target additional critical pathways in the development of cancer, including those involving BRAF kinase and mitotic checkpoints."
"Finally, our financial position allows us the flexibility to retain ownership over a number of our key programs and to add value to these programs through additional clinical development activities planned for initiation in the near future," said Dr. Hill.
Investor Conference Call
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m. Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer, and Louise A. Mawhinney, vice president and chief financial officer, will lead the call.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing 888.286.8010 from the U.S. and Canada, and 617.801.6888 from outside the U.S. For archived calls, the access code is 16419710.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT compounds are intended to improve
SM
SM
SM
 
the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit .
www.arqule.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT
SM
platform may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity and compounds resulting from the platform may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the ACT
SM
pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20051117143903.txt.gz
TIME:20051117143903
EVENTS:	Amendments to the Registrant's Code of Ethics, or Waiver of a Provision of the Code of Ethics
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to the Registrant's Code of Ethics, or Waiver of a Provision of the Code of Ethics
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 5.05 Amendments to the Registrant's Code of Ethics, or Waiver of a Provision of the Code of Ethics.
On November 11, 2005, the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. adopted revisions to the Companys Corporate Code of Conduct (the "Code"). The Code applies to all of our directors, employees and officers, including our President and Chief Executive Officer and our Vice President, Treasurer, Secretary and Chief Financial Officer (our principal executive and principal accounting and financial officers). The revisions to the Code: (i) cross-reference certain Company policies and eliminate references to certain other policies, as appropriate; (ii) clarify certain aspects of the Companys Compliance Enforcement Policy with respect to the investigation of complaints under the Code; (iii) eliminate procedures for waivers of the code for non-executive officer employees as well as the provision requiring that waivers of the Code be in writing; (iv) provide additional information about the Companys policies with respect to potential conflicts of interest, FDA and related matters, and medica l information and confidentiality, including pursuant to the Health Insurance and Portability Accountability Act (HIPAA); and (v) make certain updating changes. The information above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the revised Code, a copy of which is posted on the Companys website at http://www.arqule.com.
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20051201103753.txt.gz
TIME:20051201103753
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On December 1, 2005, the Company announced that it had submitted an Investigational New Drug application to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration for ARQ 197, an orally administered, proprietary small molecule kinase (c-Met) inhibitor to treat cancer. A copy of the Company's press release is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits Press Release dated December 1, 2005
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Exhibit 99.1
William B. Boni VP, Investor Relations/ Corp. Communications (781) 994-0300
Contact:
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that it has submitted an Investigational New Drug (IND) application to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for ARQ 197, an orally administered, proprietary small molecule c-Met inhibitor to treat cancer.
Woburn, MA, December 1, 2005 
"Filing of this IND marks the achievement of a major corporate goal for 2005 as scheduled," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule. "Pending review and clearance by the FDA, we plan to initiate a Phase 1 clinical trial with ARQ 197 in early 2006."
ARQ 197 inhibits and kills cancer cells by selectively targeting c-Met, a receptor tyrosine kinase that plays multiple key roles in human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis. c-Met is inappropriately expressed in almost all types of human cancer, with a definitively established role in tumor development. Activating mutations of c-Met have been increasingly identified in human cancer.
"c-Met is one of the most compelling molecular targets for cancer therapy," said Dr. Chiang J. Li, chief scientific officer and vice president, head of ArQule Biomedical Institute. "In our studies, ARQ 197 selectively and potently inhibits c-Met with broad-spectrum activity against cancer cells, and it has shown potent anti-tumor activity against several types of xenografted human tumors in mice.
"Despite the promise of c-Met as a cancer target, the discovery of a selective c-Met inhibitor has posed a difficult challenge to our industry," said Dr. Li. "The discovery of ARQ 197 and our rapidly expanding pipeline reflect the synergy between our combined strengths in biology and small molecule chemistry."
About c-Met
c-Met is a member of a class of molecular targets known as receptor tyrosine kinases (RTKs) that have emerged with significant potential for anti-cancer therapy. The encouraging results with agents such as Imatinib against cancers with the constitutively active Bcr-Abl mutation, as well as Erlotinib, an inhibitor of mutated and over-expressed EGF receptor kinase, have provided an important proof-of-principle that molecularly targeted RTK inhibitors can have an important and broad impact against various cancers.
c-Met mediates the signals for a variety of physiological processes that have implications for oncogenesis, including migration, invasion, cell proliferation, apoptosis and angiogenesis. A wide variety of human cancers exhibit constitutively dysregulated c-Met activity, either through over-expression of the c-Met kinase, activating mutations in c-Met, or increased autocrine or paracrine secretion of the c-Met ligand, hepatocyte growth factor/scatter factor (HGF/SF). These alterations have been strongly implicated in tumor progression and metastasis in a variety of cancers, and a high constitutive activation of the c-Met RTK has been correlated with poor clinical prognosis.
The inappropriate expression of c-Met in most cancers and its role in controlling multiple signal transduction pathways involved in tumor growth and metastasis render this enzyme a highly compelling therapeutic target for human cancer.
About ARQ 197
ARQ 197 was discovered through proprietary chemical biology research at ArQule and is based on the Company's ARQ-650RP (research program) cancer survival pathway (CSP) platform, one of several major platforms for oncology drug discovery at the company. The Company applies its chemistry capabilities to incorporate drug-like qualities into product candidates from the earliest stages of development after they have been shown to be active against biological targets, such as c-Met, that play pivotal roles in the onset and growth of cancer.
ARQ 197 and its related CSP program are unrelated to ArQule's ongoing E2F program. The latter (E2F) program is partnered with Roche, and Phase 2 testing of its most advanced compound, ARQ 501, is due to begin by the end of 2005 or early 2006. The targets, mechanisms of action and chemistry related to compounds generated from the E2F and CSP programs differ, offering the potential for multiple therapeutic opportunities in each one. In both programs, ArQule's molecular biology capabilities are enhanced by the Company's strengths in chemistry technology leveraged in the design and optimization of small molecule compounds. ArQule currently retains all rights to compounds derived from its CSP program, including ARQ 197.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT and related compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit .
SM
SM
SM
www.arqule.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT
SM
platform or other, proprietary platforms may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity, and compounds resulting from these platforms may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the product pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20051207141347.txt.gz
TIME:20051207141347
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Top of the Form
Item 1.02 Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
On December 2, 2005, the Registrant received notice from Pfizer Inc ("Pfizer") that, pursuant to the terms of the Collaboration Agreement between Pfizer and the Registrant, dated as of December 19, 2001 (the "Agreement") as amended, Pfizer had elected to terminate the Agreement, effective May 22, 2006. The Registrant will continue to provide chemistry services to Pfizer pursuant to the Agreement through the effective date of termination. Under the terms of the Agreement, since December 2001 the Registrant produced for Pfizer annually an average of approximately one hundred and sixty thousand synthetic chemical compounds and received average annual cash payments of approximately $50 million for those compounds and related services. The Agreement provides for six months prior written notice by either party to the other for termination without cause and, in the event of termination by Pfizer, certain payments to the Registrant. In accordance with these provisions, the Registrant expects to r eceive approximately $19.8 million in connection with the termination notification referred to above. Pfizer terminated the Agreement without cause. Management of Registrant believes that such action was taken by Pfizer in response to its changing requirements. The Registrant will not incur any financial penalty as a result of termination. In connection with the Agreement and an earlier technology acquisition agreement between Pfizer and the Registrant, Pfizer purchased 3,273,679 shares of the Registrants common stock, representing beneficial ownership of approximately 9.3% of the Registrant's outstanding common stock. The Registrant issued a press release on December 6, 2005 reporting termination of the Agreement.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits 99.1 Collaboration Agreement between Pfizer Inc and the Company, filed as Exhibit 10.39 to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2001 filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission on March 27, 2002 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference. 99.2 Text of Press Release dated December 6, 2005
Top of the Form
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Top of the Form

Exhibit 99.2
William B. Boni VP, Investor Relations/ Corp. Communications (781) 994-0300
Contacts:
For Immediate Release:
 ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today updated its previously announced plans to exit its Chemical Technologies business, as originally communicated in a press release on September 27, 2005.
Woburn, MA, December 6, 2005
Pursuant to the Company's agreement with Pfizer dating from December, 2001 and amended in January, 2004, ArQule will continue to provide chemistry services to Pfizer until May 22, 2006.
"I would like to thank our Chemical Technologies team for maintaining such a high level of achievement and commitment during our seven-year partnership with Pfizer," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule. "The orderly conclusion of the Chemical Technology service business, and the Pfizer agreement in particular, has allowed us to anticipate the associated reduction in revenues and expenses accordingly and to enable us to focus on our core mission as an oncology company."
ArQule is committed to exit the Chemical Technologies business and has engaged Young and Partners, a New York-based investment bank, to explore a potential sale of its Chemical Technologies operations. The decision to exit this business is consistent with the Company's previously communicated intent to focus exclusively on the development of its oncology portfolio.
As a consequence of this transition and due to increased clarity on the timing of certain research and development payments, ArQule is providing revised financial guidance for 2005 as follows. Year-end cash is expected to range between $135 million and $140 million, up from prior guidance of between $116 million and $121 million. All other financial guidance is unchanged from that provided on the Company's July 28, 2005 earnings conference call.
ArQule also reiterates its previously communicated guidance of having sufficient cash to support its portfolio at least into Q1, 2008. More detailed financial guidance for 2006 will be provided, as usual, on the Company's fiscal year-end conference call.
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in research and development of next-generation small-molecule cancer therapeutics based on its innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform. ACT and related compounds are intended to improve the way cancer patients are treated because they selectively kill cancer cells and spare normal cells by restoring and activating cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead program based on E2F elevation is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit .
About ArQule
SM
SM
SM
www.arqule.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT
SM
platform or other, proprietary platforms may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity, and compounds resulting from these platforms may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the product pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20060125151910.txt.gz
TIME:20060125151910
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                
 
 
 
Section 1Registrant's Business and Operations
 
Item 1.01  Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
On January 19, 2006, the Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee of the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. awarded cash bonuses to the company's named executive officers (as defined in Item 402(a)(3) of Regulation S-K promulgated by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission) in respect of the company's performance for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005.  Bonuses were awarded as follows:
 
 
On January 19, 2006, the Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee of the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. approved base salaries and bonus ranges for the company's named executive officers for fiscal year 2006.  The Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee annually evaluates the performance and determines the total compensation of the company's named executive officers based on the Committee's assessment of each individual's responsibilities and performance, the company's performance and compensation for comparable positions in similar, publicly-traded biotechnology and biopharmaceutical companies located in the northeastern United States.  The base salaries and bonus ranges are as follows:
 
 
Dr. Hill, Dr.Li, and Ms. Mawhinney have employment agreements with the company.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20060216165325.txt.gz
TIME:20060216165325
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On February 9, 2006, ArQule, Inc. issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter and year ended December 31, 2005.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)  Exhibits.
 
99.1   Text of Press Release dated February 9, 2006.
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
Date:  February 16, 2006

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ARQULE REPORTS FISCAL 2005 YEAR END AND
FOURTH QUARTER RESULTS
 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the year and for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2005.
Woburn, MA, February 9, 2006 
 
The Company reported a net loss of $7,520,000, or $0.22 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2005, compared with a net loss of $4,921,000, or $0.17 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2004.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2005, the Company reported a net loss of $2,735,000, or $0.08 per share, compared to a net loss of $1,008,000, or $0.03 per share, for the quarter ended December 31, 2004.
 
At December 31, 2005, the Company had a total of approximately $140,643,000 in cash and marketable securities.
 
"2005 saw our emergence as a fully integrated, oncology-focused research and development company and signaled our exit from our chemical services business, as we announced during the year," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive of ArQule.  "We are now in the clinic with product candidates based on highly innovative scientific platforms related to checkpoint activation and to c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase inhibition that clearly differentiate us from other companies in our sector.
 
"We believe another key point of differentiation for ArQule is a chemistry capability that enables us to incorporate a high degree of specificity and drug-like qualities into our product candidates from their earliest stages of development," said Dr. Hill.  "We look forward to progress in the clinical testing of these products, as well as movement toward the clinic with additional products, that will increasingly define our presence in oncology during 2006 and 2007."
 
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
Revenues for the year ended December 31, 2005 were $52,924,000, compared with revenues of $54,455,000 for the year ended December 31, 2004.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2005,
 
revenues were $12,333,000, compared with revenues of $14,088,000 for the quarter ended December 31, 2004. Revenues for both years were primarily associated with chemistry services provided by the Company to pharmaceutical customers and also included financial support from Roche for the ongoing development of ARQ 501, the Company's lead Activated Checkpoint Therapy product.
SM
 
Cost of compound development revenue for the year ended December 31, 2005 was $30,086,000, compared with $31,617,000 for the year ended December 31, 2004.  Fourth quarter 2005 cost of compound development revenue was $7,851,000, compared with $7,794,000 for the fourth quarter of 2004.  For both years, cost of product revenue related primarily to expenses associated with the Company's provision of chemistry services to its customers.
 
Fiscal 2005 research and development expenses were $24,751,000, compared to $20,287,000 for fiscal 2004.  Fourth quarter 2005 research and development expenses were $6,509,000, compared to $5,606,000 for the fourth quarter of 2004.  Research and development expenses during the 2005 periods consisted primarily of costs related to three Phase 1 clinical trials with ARQ 501 and to the pre-clinical development of ARQ 197, the Company's c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor that entered clinical trials in early 2006.
 
Marketing, general and administrative expenses for fiscal 2005 were $8,688,000, compared to $8,982,000 for fiscal 2004.  In the fourth quarter of 2005, these expenses were $1,892,000, compared with $2,047,000 in the fourth quarter of 2004.
 
2006 Clinical Activities
 
Based on encouraging data from its Phase 1 trials of ARQ 501 in monotherapy and combination therapy, ArQule intends to conduct a well-defined Phase 2 program in the U.S. and abroad.  This program will comprise two monotherapy studies, in leiomyosarcoma and in head and neck cancer, and two combination studies, in pancreatic cancer with gemcitabine and in ovarian cancer with paclitaxel.
 
The leiomyosarcoma study is currently initiated and open for recruitment at Premiere Oncology of Santa Monica, California, with additional centers to be added.  The head and neck cancer study and the pancreatic cancer study are anticipated to begin during the middle of this year, and the ovarian cancer study will follow.  The leiomyosarcoma protocol will study the Objective Response Rate in approximately 30 patients in second-line treatment of persistent, recurrent or metastatic disease, at approximately 15 sites.  Details of the remaining study protocols will be communicated as the protocols are initiated.
During 2006, ArQule is also conducting Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 197, a proprietary, orally administered small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The first patient was enrolled and dosed on February 1, 2006.  This open-label, dose escalation trial will include patients with multiple metastatic tumor types who are refractory to available therapy or for whom no standard therapy exists.  The primary objectives of the trial are to determine the tolerability, safety and a recommended dosing regimen for Phase 2 trials pending the successful completion of Phase 1, as well as to define the pharmacokinetic profile of ARQ 197 and to collect preliminary data on anti-tumor activity.
 
2006 Financial Guidance
 
For 2006, ArQule expects revenues to range between $6.5 and $7 million, primarily related to the ongoing partnership with Roche.  Net use of cash is expected to range between $53 and $59 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $33 and $39 million, and net loss per share to range between $0.93 and $1.10 for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2006 with between $82 and $88 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. eastern time today, February 9, 2006.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer, and Louise A. Mawhinney, chief financial officer, will lead the call.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 888.286.8010, and outside the U.S. 617.801.6888.  The access code is 10129437.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to the development of cancer. ArQule's innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) platform is generating products designed to improve the way cancer patients are treated by selectively killing cancer cells and sparing normal cells through restoration and activation of cellular checkpoints that are defective in cancer. ArQule's lead ACT program, based on E2F elevation, is partnered with Roche.  For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
SM
SM
SM
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT platform or other, proprietary platforms may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity, and compounds resulting from these platforms may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the product pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
SM
 
 
(A)  Basic and diluted net loss per share amounts were equal in all periods presented.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20060418165024.txt.gz
TIME:20060418165024
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
Section 1Registrant's Business and Operations
 
Item 1.01  Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On April 13, 2006, the Registrant entered into an employment agreement with Peter S. Lawrence. The agreement provides that the Registrant will employ Mr. Lawrence as its Executive Vice President, Chief Business and Legal Officer, General Counsel and Secretary. A description of the material terms of his employment agreement is set forth below in Section 5, Item 5.02 (c).
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election.
 
(b)  On April 12, 2006, Dr. Werner Cautreels resigned as a member of the Board of Directors of the Registrant, effective April 13, 2006. On April 12, 2006, Laura Avakian resigned as a member of the Board of Directors of the Registrant, effective May12, 2006. In addition, on April 13, 2006, Louise A. Mawhinney, the Registrant's Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer announced that she will leave the company at a future date when the search for her successor has been completed.
 
On April 13, 2006, the Registrant entered into an employment agreement with Peter S. Lawrence.
 
Mr. Lawrence's qualifications and experience are summarized below:
 
(Age: 43)  Since January 2001, Mr. Lawrence has been a partner in Pod Holding Ltd., a private equity firm he co-founded. Pod Holding is located in Boston and Stockholm and invests in leading information and communication technology (ICT) companies.
Peter S. Lawrence
 
Prior to founding Pod Holding, from 1991-2000, Mr. Lawrence was a business attorney with Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C. in Boston where he was responsible for a legal practice focused on public and private finance, M&A, and the representation of public and private companies. As counsel to both start-ups and major corporations, he gained significant governance expertise from years of working with various Boards.
 
Mr. Lawrence serves as a Director on the Boards of Peppercoin, Inc., Spherics, Inc. and CoreStreet, Ltd. He is also a Board Observer of Paratek Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
 
The agreement provides that the Registrant will employ Mr. Lawrence as its Executive Vice President, Chief Business and Legal Officer, General Counsel and Secretary at an initial annual base salary of $360,000. The base salary is subject to annual review and upward adjustment by
the Registrant. Mr. Lawrence is also eligible to receive a discretionary annual cash bonus based on a target amount established by the Registrant and company and individual performance. In addition, as previously reported, the Registrant granted Mr. Lawrence stock options entitling him to purchase 300,000 shares of the Registrant's common stock pursuant to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan. The options become exercisable at the rate of 25% annually commencing on April 13, 2007.
 
The agreement provides for continued employment until terminated by either party. If Mr. Lawrence is terminated without cause, as defined in the agreement, the Registrant will be required to make a lump sum payment to him equal to twelve months of his base salary in effect at the time of termination, plus the average of his annual bonus for the preceding two years. In addition, the Registrant will, at its expense, continue to provide Mr. Lawrence with all employee benefits in effect for a period of twelve months from the date of termination. For the purposes of the agreement, "termination without cause" includes a reduction in Mr. Lawrence's responsibilities, title or cash compensation, uncured material breach of the agreement by the Registrant, relocation of our operations beyond a radius of fifty miles from our current Woburn, MA location or failure of a successor in interest to the Registrant to assume the obligations of the Registrant under the agreement. In the event the Registrant terminates or is deemed to terminate the agreement without cause (as defined in the agreement), 50% of Mr. Lawrence's unvested stock options will immediately become exercisable without regard to the original vesting schedule. In the event of a "change in control" of the Registrant, as defined in the agreement, 100% of his unvested stock options shall become immediately exercisable without regard to the original vesting schedule. The foregoing summary of the material terms of Mr. Lawrence's employment agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the agreement which is included as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d)  On April 12, 2006, Dr. Nancy A. Simonian was appointed to the Board of Directors of the Registrant, effective May 12, 2006. Dr. Simonian's term will expire at the 2007 annual meeting of the Registrant's stockholders. The Board has not yet determined to which committees Dr. Simonian might be appointed. There was no arrangement or understanding between Dr. Simonian and the
Registrant (or any other person known to the Registrant) pursuant to which the Dr. Simonian was appointed.
 
Mr. Lawrence's employers named above are not affiliates of the Registrant. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Lawrence and the Registrant (or any other person known to the Registrant) pursuant to which Mr. Lawrence was hired.
 
Dr. Simonian's qualifications and experience are summarized below:
 
Nancy A. Simonian, M.D.
(Age: 45)  Dr. Simonian is Senior Vice President of Clinical, Medical and Regulatory Affairs at Millennium Pharmaceuticals, where she has worked since 2001. She has led Millennium's development activities in the areas of oncology and inflammation, built a development organization (including clinical integration and restructuring following Millennium's acquisition of Cor Therapeutics), overseen more than 40 clinical trials for 12 compounds, obtained a variety of regulatory approvals (including accelerated approval of Velcade in the U.S., subsequent label expansion and standard approval), co-chaired the portfolio review committee and served on the corporate development steering committee.
Previously, Dr. Simonian was at Biogen, Inc. from 1995 to 2001, most recently as Vice President, Medical Research. At Biogen, she was responsible for the oversight of Avonex and Tysabri, as well as multiple gene therapy clinical development programs. She successfully filed sNDAS for Avonex and led the in-licensing of Tysabri from Elan Pharmaceuticals. Dr. Simonian is Assistant Professor, Neurology, at Harvard Medical School/Massachusetts General Hospital.
 
Dr. Simonian holds a Bachelor's degree from Princeton University and an M.D. from the University of Pennsylvania Medical School. Dr. Simonian completed her medical training at Harvard Medical School/Massachusetts General Hospital.
 
On April 12, 2006, the Board of Directors of the Registrant fixed the number of its members at 8, effective upon the resignation of Dr. Cautreels.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)  Exhibits.
 
10.1   Employment Agreement dated as of April 13, 2006 between ArQule, Inc. and Peter S. Lawrence.
 
99.1   Text of Press Release announcing the resignations of Dr. Cautreels, Ms. Avakian and Ms. Mawhinney, the hiring of Mr. Lawrence, and the appointment of Dr. Simonian, dated April 13, 2006.
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
This Employment Agreement (the "Agreement") dated as of April 13, 2006 (the "Execution Date") is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Peter Lawrence ("Executive") whose current principal residential address is 29 Fairfield Street, Unit 4-5, Boston, MA 02116.
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to employ Executive in a senior executive capacity and to enter into an agreement embodying the terms of such employment; and
 
WHEREAS, Executive desires to accept such employment and enter into such an agreement;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive (collectively, the "Parties") hereby agree as follows:
 
.  The Company hereby agrees to employ Executive, and Executive hereby accepts such employment with the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, for a period commencing on April 13, 2006 (the "Effective Date") and continuing until terminated in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 (the "Employment Term").
1.
            
Term of Employment
 
.  During the Employment Term, Executive shall serve as Executive Vice President, Chief Business and Legal Officer, General Counsel and Secretary, reporting directly to the CEO of the Company.  Executive hereby agrees to undertake the duties and responsibilities inherent in such position and such other duties and responsibilities consistent with such position as the CEO shall from time to time reasonably assign to Executive.
2.
            
Title; Duties
 
.  During the Employment Term, Executive shall devote substantially all of Executive's business time and efforts to the performance of Executive's duties hereunder and shall not, directly or indirectly, engage in any other business, profession or occupation for compensation or otherwise which would conflict with the rendition of such duties.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, Executive may engage in other activities, such as activities involving charitable, educational, religious, trade association, civic and similar types of organizations, speaking engagements and membership on the Board of Directors or equivalent of other organizations ("Outside Activities"), provided that Executive shall obtain the Company's written consent, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditional, before engaging in any such Outside Activities and provided further that Executive's participation in such Outside Activities shall not be in violation of any of his obligations to the Company, including but not limited to those set forth in the Company's Code of Conduct.  Executive represents and warrants that Exhibit A attached hereto states all current business relationships, including, but not limited to, consulting agreements, confidentiality agreements and non-
3.
            
No Conflict
competition agreements to which Executive is a party as of the Execution Date, to each of which the Company hereby consents.
 
.
4.
            
Compensation and Benefits
 
.  During the Employment Term, the Company shall pay Executive for Executive's services hereunder a base salary at the initial annual rate of $360,000, payable in substantially equal installments in accordance with the Company's usual payment practices and subject to annual review and upward adjustment by the Company in its sole discretion.  Such amount (as it may be increased, but not decreased, from time to time in accordance with this Section 4.1) shall be referred to herein as the "Base Salary."
4.1.
         
Base Salary
 
.  Executive shall be eligible to receive a discretionary annual cash bonus, the target amount of which shall be 35 percent of Executive's Base Salary.  The award of an annual cash bonus, if any, shall be in the Company's sole discretion and shall be based on Company and individual performance.  For calendar year 2006, the annual cash bonus awarded to Executive, if any, shall be prorated based on the number of months Executive works for the Company during that year.  The annual cash bonus typically is paid during the first quarter of the following calendar year, and Executive must be actively employed with the Company as of the payment date in order to receive the annual cash bonus, if any.  Executive shall also be eligible to participate in any and all other bonus plans and packages that are made available to the Company's executives, on a basis consistent with Executive's position and then-current Base Salary and in accordance with the policies and practices of the Company and the Company's Board of Directors (the "Board").
4.2.
         
Bonus Compensation
 
.  As further compensation for Executive's services hereunder, the Company shall grant to Executive, on the Effective Date, a stock option (the "Execution Stock Option") to purchase three hundred thousand (300,000) shares of the Company's Common Stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Common Stock"), pursuant to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan") and in accordance with the terms, and subject to a vesting schedule pursuant to which twenty-five percent of the shares shall vest annually commencing on the first anniversary of the Effective Date, and other conditions, set forth in the form of Option Certificate (attached hereto as Exhibit B).  The method of determining the exercise price of the Execution Stock Option is set forth in the attached Exhibit C.  In its sole discretion, the Company may grant to Executive from time to time other stock options to purchase additional shares of Common Stock, also pursuant to the Plan and such other terms and conditions set forth at the time of such grant (the Execution Stock Option and such other stock options, collectively, the "Stock Options") and may also grant stock awards.
4.3.
         
Stock Option Grant
 
.  During the Employment Term and subject to any contributions therefor generally required of senior executives of the Company,
4.4.
         
Executive Benefits
Executive shall be entitled to receive such employee benefits (including fringe benefits, 401(k) plan participation, and life, health, dental, accident and short and long term disability insurance) which the Company may, in its sole and absolute discretion, make available generally to its senior executives or personnel similarly situated; provided, however, that it is hereby acknowledged and agreed that any such employee benefit plans may be altered, modified or terminated by the Company at any time in its sole discretion without recourse by Executive.
 
.  Executive shall be entitled to four weeks (20 working days) of paid time off ("PTO") per annum during the Employment Term, which will accrue pursuant to the Company's policies and practices and is to be taken at such time or times as shall be mutually convenient for the Company and Executive; provided, however, that the Company may elect to increase the annual time to which Executive shall be entitled to PTO.  Unused PTO shall be allocated pursuant to the Company's policies and practices.
4.5.
         
Paid Time Off
 
.  Upon delivery of adequate documentation of expenses incurred in accordance with the policies and practices of the Company, Executive shall be entitled to reimbursement by the Company for reasonable travel, entertainment and other business expenses incurred by Executive in the performance of Executive's duties hereunder in accordance with such policies as the Company may from time to time have in effect.
4.6.
         
Business Expenses and Perquisites
 
.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, any payments or benefits hereunder shall be subject to the withholding of such amounts, if any, relating to tax and other payroll deductions, as the Company reasonably determines it should withhold pursuant to any applicable law or regulation.
4.7
          
Deductions and Withholdings
 
  Executive shall receive an annual review of his performance by the Chief Executive Officer of the Company, or by a Committee of the Board of Directors, or both.
4.8
          
Annual Review.
 
.
5.
            
Termination
 
.
5.1.
         
Without Cause by the Company
 
.  The Company may terminate Executive's employment hereunder at any time without Cause (as defined in Section 5.2) upon not less than fourteen (14) days prior written notice from the Company to Executive.  The effective date of Executive's termination shall be referred to herein as the "Termination Date."  If Executive's employment is terminated by the Company pursuant to this Section 5.1, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that the Company shall pay Executive all amounts owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash
5.1.1.
      
The Severance Package
value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date.  In addition, provided that Executive first executes a general release in a form and of a scope acceptable to the Company, the Company shall provide the following severance benefits (the "Severance Package"):
 
A lump sum payment (the "Severance Payment") in the following amount:
(a)
          
 
An amount equal to Executive's Base Salary through the end of the twelve (12) month period commencing on the Termination Date; plus
(i)
           
 
An amount equal to the average bonus, if any, paid by the Company to Executive with respect to the two (2) years preceding the year in which the Termination Date occurs, provided that, for purposes of this paragraph only, Executive shall be deemed to have received his 35 percent bonus target for any year within such 2-year period in which Executive was not paid a bonus solely because he was not employed by the Company.  Attached at Exhibit D is a series of examples of the manner in which this portion of the Severance Payment shall be calculated.
(ii)
          
 
Immediate vesting of fifty (50) percent of any unvested portion of the Execution Stock Option granted pursuant to Section 4.3 of this Agreement;  and
(b)
          
 
Payment of the costs associated with continuing the benefits which Executive is entitled to receive pursuant to Section 4.4 of this Agreement at the level in effect as of the Termination Date (subject to any employee contribution requirements applicable to Executive on the Termination Date) through the twelve (12) month period commencing on the Termination Date, to the extent such benefits may continue beyond the Termination Date (for example, among other things, Executive's coverage under the Company's life and disability insurance policies will terminate as of the Termination Date).
(c)
          
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent the Company reasonably determines that any portion of the Severance Package is subject to Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code, payment of any such portion of the Severance Package subject to Section 409A shall (i) to the extent required, be delayed for a period of six months from the Termination Date, or (ii) to the extent permitted under subsequent guidance from the Internal Revenue Service, otherwise made to comply with such Section 409A requirements, provided, however, that any such action under this subsection
(d)
          
(ii) that is more detrimental to Executive than that in subsection (i) shall only be made with Executive's consent.
 
.  For purposes of this Section 5.1, a "termination without cause" shall be deemed to occur in the event any of the following occurs and Executive provides to the Company Notice of Termination (as defined in Section 5.6) within forty-five (45) days thereafter:
5.1.2.
      
Deemed Termination
 
The Company substantially reduces or diminishes Executive's responsibilities or title without Cause;
(a)
          
 
The Company reduces Executive's Base Salary or bonus target (other than in connection with a Company-wide decrease in salary or bonus, respectively);
(b)
          
 
The Company materially breaches any of its obligations to Executive pursuant to this Agreement, and fails to cure such breach within 30 days of receipt of notice thereof;
(c)
          
 
The Company relocates Executive's place of employment without Executive's written consent by a distance of more than fifty (50) miles, excluding any relocation to the Company's existing offices in Woburn, MA; or
(d)
          
 
A successor in interest to the Company fails to assume the obligations of this Agreement.
(e)
          
 
.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, Executive's employment hereunder may be terminated by the Company at any time for Cause.  For purposes of this Agreement, "Cause" shall mean: (i) Executive's arbitrary, unreasonable, or willful failure to follow the reasonable instructions of the CEO or otherwise perform Executive's duties hereunder (other than as a result of a Disability (as defined in Section 5.3)) for thirty (30) days after a written demand for performance is delivered to Executive on behalf of the Company which demand specifically identifies the manner in which the Company alleges that Executive has not substantially followed such instructions or otherwise performed Executive's duties; (ii) Executive's willful misconduct that is materially injurious to the Company (whether from a monetary perspective or otherwise); (iii) Executive's willful commission of an act constituting fraud with respect to the Company; (iv) conviction of Executive for a felony under the laws of the United States or any state thereof; or (v) Executive's material breach of Executive's obligations under Section 7 hereof.  A final determination of whether Cause exists shall be made by the Board of Directors.
5.2.
         
For Cause by the Company
 
If Executive's employment is terminated by the Company for Cause, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that
the Company shall pay Executive all amounts owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date.
 
.  Subject to the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act, Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 151B and any other applicable laws, Executive's employment hereunder may be terminated by the Company at any time in the event of the Disability of Executive.  For purposes of this Agreement, "Disability" shall mean the inability of Executive to perform the essential functions of Executive's position, with or without reasonable accommodation, due to physical or mental disablement which continues for a period of four (4) consecutive months during the Employment Term, as determined by an independent qualified physician mutually acceptable to the Company and Executive (or Executive's personal representative) or, if the Company and Executive (or such representative) are unable to agree on an independent qualified physician, as determined by a panel of three physicians, one designated by the Company, one designated by Executive (or such representative) and one designated by the two physicians so designated.  If Executive's employment is terminated by the Company for Disability, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that (a) the Company shall pay Executive all amounts owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, (b) provided that Executive first executes a general release in a form and of a scope acceptable to the Company, Executive shall be entitled to the Severance Package, except that the lump sum based on Executive's Base salary paid as a part of the Severance Package shall be reduced by the amount of Base Salary, salary continuation (short-term disability), and cash disability benefits (long-term disability) paid to Executive for the corresponding period under the Company's employee benefit plans as then in effect, and any Stock Option held as of the Termination Date shall become immediately exercisable as to all option shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate.
5.3.
         
Disability
 
.  Executive's employment hereunder shall automatically terminate in the event of Executive's death.  If Executive's employment is terminated by the death of Executive, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that (a) the Company shall pay to Executive's estate or legal representative all amounts owed to Executive for work performed through the last day of Executive's actual employment by the Company plus the Severance Package, and (b) any Stock Option held as of the Termination Date shall become immediately exercisable as to all option shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate.
5.4.
         
Death
 
.  Executive's employment hereunder may be terminated by Executive at any time upon not less than thirty (30) days prior written notice from Executive to the Company.  Executive agrees that such notice
5.5.
         
Termination by Executive
period is reasonable and necessary in light of the duties assumed by Executive pursuant to this Agreement and fair in light of the consideration Executive is receiving pursuant to this Agreement.  If Executive terminates Executive's employment with the Company pursuant to this Section 5.5, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that the Company shall pay Executive all amounts owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO as of the Termination Date.
 
.  Any purported termination of employment by the Company or by Executive shall be communicated by written Notice of Termination to the other Party in accordance with Section 9 hereof.  For purposes of this Agreement, a "Notice of Termination" shall mean a notice which shall indicate the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon and shall set forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of employment under the provision so indicated.
5.6.
         
Notice of Termination
 
.  The provisions of Section 7 shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
5.7.
         
Survival
 
.  In the event of a Change of Control, any Stock Option held by Executive shall become immediately exercisable as to all option shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate.  For purposes of this Agreement, any one of the following events shall be considered a "Change of Control" of the Company:
6.
            
Accelerated Vesting in Change of Control
 
Acquisition by any "person" (as such term is defined in Section 3(a)(9) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) of any amount of the Company's Common Stock so that such person holds or controls fifty percent (50%) or more of the Company's Common Stock;
(a)
          
 
Merger or consolidation of the Company with or into any other entity in which the holders of the Company's outstanding shares of capital stock immediately before such merger or consolidation do not, immediately after such merger or consolidation, retain capital stock representing a majority of the voting power of the surviving entity of such merger or consolidation;
(b)
          
 
Sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company to a third party;
(c)
          
 
Within any twenty-four (24) month period, the election by the stockholders of the Company of twenty percent (20%) or more of the directors of the Company other than pursuant to nomination by the Company's management; or
(d)
          
Execution of a legally binding, definitive agreement approved by the Board of Directors providing for any of the events set forth in (a), (b), (c) or (d) above.
(e)
          
 
.
7.
            
Confidentiality
 
.  As used herein, the term "Confidential Information" shall mean any and all ideas, inventions, information, know-how, compounds, materials and other items (whether patentable or not) that are confidential or proprietary to the Company (or to its affiliates, collaborators, consultants, suppliers, or customers) whether disclosed in written, oral, tangible or other form and whether or not labeled or otherwise identified as confidential or proprietary.  Confidential Information shall include, without limitation, the following to the extent proprietary to the Company (or to its affiliates, collaborators, consultants, suppliers or customers) and not publicly available:
7.1.
         
Definitions
 
inventions, trade secrets, discoveries and computer programs, and any improvements or modifications thereto;
(a)
          
 
engineering, research, development and design projects, data, designs, drawings and specifications;
(b)
          
 
manufacturing, development and other technical processes, applications, methods, apparatus and equipment;
(c)
          
 
business information such as lists of approved components and sources, price lists, product costs, production schedules, business plans, sales information, profit and loss information, and customer and collaborator lists;
(d)
          
 
any and all reagents, substances, chemical compounds, subcellular constituents, cells or cell lines, organisms and progeny, and mutants, as well as any and all derivatives or replications derived from or relating to such materials; and
(e)
          
 
any and all information, materials and other items supplied by third parties to the Company (or generated by the Company for third parties) under an obligation of confidentiality.
(f)
           
 
.  Executive shall not at any time (whether during or after Executive's employment with the Company) disclose or use any Confidential Information for Executive's own benefit or purposes or the benefit or purposes of any other person, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation or other organization, entity or enterprise (a "Person") other than the Company.
7.2.
         
Non-Disclosure
 
.  Notwithstanding any other provision in the Agreement, Confidential Information shall not include any information or material which:
7.3.
         
Exceptions
is or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of disclosure thereof by Executive;
(a)
          
 
is lawfully received by Executive on a non-confidential basis from a third party that is not itself under an obligation of confidentiality or non-disclosure to the Company with respect to such information;
(b)
          
 
can be shown by Executive to have been independently developed by Executive;
(c)
          
 
Executive establishes by competent proof was in Executive's possession at the time of disclosure by the Company and was not acquired, directly or indirectly from the Company; or
(d)
          
 
is required to be publicly disclosed by law or by regulation; provided, however, that in such event Executive shall provide the Company with prompt advance notice of such disclosure so that the Company has the opportunity if it so desires to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy.
(e)
          
 
.  Executive agrees that upon termination of Executive's employment hereunder, Executive shall return immediately to the Company any proprietary materials, any materials containing Confidential Information and any other Company property then in Executive's possession or under Executive's control, including, without limitation all notes, drawings, lists, memoranda, magnetic disks or tapes, or other recording media containing such Confidential Information, whether alone or together with non-confidential information, all documents, reports, files, memoranda, records, software, credit cards, door and file keys, telephones, PDAs, computers, computer access codes, disks and instructional manuals, or any other physical property that Executive received, prepared, or helped prepare in connection with Executive's employment under this Agreement.  Upon termination, Executive shall not retain any copies, duplicates, reproductions, or excerpts of Confidential Information, nor shall Executive show or give any of the above to any third party.  Executive further agrees that Executive shall not retain or use for Executive's account at any time any trade name, trademark, service mark, logo or other proprietary business designation used or owned in connection with the business of the Company.
7.4.
         
Return of Company Property
 
.  Executive acknowledges and agrees that the Company's remedies at law for a breach or threatened breach of any of the provisions of Section 7 would be inadequate and, in recognition of this fact, Executive agrees that, in the event of such a breach or threatened breach, in addition to any remedies at law, the Company, without posting any bond, shall be entitled to obtain equitable relief in the form of specific performance, temporary restraining orders, temporary or permanent injunctions or any other equitable remedy which may then be available.
8.
            
Specific Performance
.  Any notice hereunder by either Party to the other shall be given in writing by personal delivery, telex, facsimile, overnight courier or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed, if to the Company, to the attention of the CEO at the Company's executive offices or to such other address as the Company may designate in writing at any time or from time to time to Executive, and if to Executive, to Executive's most recent address on file with the Company.  Notice shall be deemed given, if by personal delivery or by overnight courier, on the date of such delivery or, if by telex or facsimile, on the business day following receipt of answer back or facsimile information or, if by certified mail, on the date shown on the applicable return receipt.
9.
            
Notices
 
.  This Agreement may not be assigned by either Party without the prior written consent of the other Party, provided, however, that the Company may assign this Agreement without Executive's consent in the event of a merger, acquisition, or transfer of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company with or to a third party (a "Merger").  In the event of a Merger, the Company shall require any successor Person to assume and agree to perform this Agreement; failure to so assume and agree shall constitute a deemed termination for purposes of Section 5.1.2(e).
10.
          
Assignment
 
.  This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the Parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and there have been no oral or other agreements of any kind whatsoever as a condition precedent or inducement to the signing of this Agreement or otherwise concerning this Agreement or the subject matter hereof.
11.
          
Entire Agreement
 
.  The Parties shall each pay their own respective expenses incident to the enforcement or interpretation of, or dispute resolution with respect to, this Agreement, including all fees and expenses of their counsel for all activities of such counsel undertaken pursuant to this Agreement, provided, however, that in the event Executive is the prevailing Party in any judicial or arbitral proceeding relating to this Agreement, the Company shall reimburse Executive for all reasonable costs, fees and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) incurred by Executive in connection with such proceeding.
12.
          
Expenses
 
.  In the event any dispute should arise between the Parties with respect to any of the terms and conditions of this Agreement, then, at the initiation of either Party, such dispute shall be submitted and finally settled by arbitration in Boston, Massachusetts under the rules of the Employment Disputes Rules of the American Arbitration Association by an arbitrator selected by the American Arbitration Association.  The dispute shall be determined in accordance with Section 19 of this Agreement, except with respect to issues of arbitrability, which shall be governed by the Federal Arbitration Act, 9 U.S.C. Secs. 1-16, and not state law.  The arbitrator shall allow such discovery as is appropriate to the purposes of arbitration in accomplishing a fair, speedy and cost-effective resolution of the dispute.  If any Party fails to participate in the arbitration proceedings, the arbitrator may proceed to decision based on expedited written submissions by the participating Party.  The award rendered by the arbitrator shall be nonappealable, final and binding upon the Parties, and judgment upon the award rendered may be entered by either Party in any court of competent jurisdiction.  The Parties agree not to institute any litigation or proceedings against each other in connection with this Agreement except as provided in this Section 13, provided, however, that either Party
13.
          
Arbitration
shall have the right to seek injunctive relief or other provisional remedies in any federal or state court of competent jurisdiction in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
 
.  Any waiver of any terms or conditions of this Agreement shall not operate as a waiver of any other breach of such terms or conditions or any other term or condition, nor shall any failure to enforce any provision hereof operate as a waiver of such provision or of any other provision hereof; provided, however, that no such written waiver, unless it, by its own terms, explicitly provides to the contrary, shall be construed to effect a continuing waiver of the provision being waived and no such waiver in any instance shall constitute a waiver in any other instance or for any other purpose or impair the right of the Party against whom such waiver is claimed in all other instances or for all other purposes to require full compliance with such provision.  Each of the Parties agrees to execute all such further instruments and documents and to take all such further action as the other Party may reasonably require in order to effectuate the terms and purposes of this Agreement.
14.
          
Waivers and Further Agreements
 
.  This Agreement may not be amended, nor shall any waiver, change, modification, consent or discharge be effected except by an instrument in writing executed by both Parties.
15.
          
Amendments
 
.  If any provision of this Agreement shall be held or deemed to be, or shall in fact be, invalid, inoperative or unenforceable as applied to any particular case in any jurisdiction or jurisdictions, or in all jurisdictions or in all cases, because of the conflict of any provision with any constitution or statute or rule of public policy or for any other reason, such circumstance shall not have the effect of rendering the provision or provisions in question invalid, inoperative or unenforceable in any other jurisdiction or in any other case or circumstance or of rendering any other provision or provisions herein contained invalid, inoperative or unenforceable to the extent that such other provisions are not themselves actually in conflict with such constitution, statute or rule of public policy, but this Agreement shall be reformed and construed in any such jurisdiction or case as if such invalid, inoperative or unenforceable provision had never been contained herein and such provision reformed so that it would be valid, operative and enforceable to the maximum extent permitted in such jurisdiction or in such case.
16.
          
Severability
 
.  This Agreement maybe executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
17.
          
Counterparts
 
.  The headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not in any way affect the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.
18.
          
Section Headings
 
.  This Agreement shall be governed by and construed and enforced in accordance with the law (other than the law governing conflict of law questions) of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
19.
          
Governing Law
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Agreement as of the Execution Date.
EXHIBIT A
 
Business Relationships
 
Director of Pod Holding, Ltd.
1.
            
 
Director of Spherics, Inc.
2.
            
 
Board Observer of Paratek Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
3.
            
 
Director of Corestreet, Ltd.
4.
            
 
Director of Peppercoin, Inc.
5.
            
 
Vice Chairman and Director, Greater Boston Food Bank
6.
            
EXHIBIT B
 
Option Certificate
EXHIBIT C
 
Determination of Option Price
 
The exercise price of the Execution Stock Option is the Fair Market Value of ArQule's Common Stock (as defined below) as of the Effective Date as defined in Section 1 of the Employment Agreement between the Company and Executive.
 
The Fair Market Value of ArQule's Common Stock shall be the closing price of the Common Stock as reported by the NASDAQ National Market on the trading day immediately prior to the date of the commencement of Executive's employment with the Company.
 
 
Pursuant to Section 5.1.1(a)(ii), the portion of Executive's Severance Payment based on bonuses ("Bonus Severance") awarded to Executive, if any, would be calculated in the following manner:
 
 Executive terminated in year one of employment.
Example #1
 
Bonus Severance = 35% (average of 35% deemed amount for two-year lookback period where Executive did not work for the Company).
 
 Executive awarded a 30% bonus for year one of employment, terminated during year 2.
Example #2
 
Bonus Severance = 32.5% (average of 30% Year 1 award and 35% deemed amount for the year during the two-year lookback period where Executive did not work for the Company).
 
 Executive awarded a 30% bonus for year one of employment, a 0% bonus for year 2 of employment, terminated during year 3.
Example #3
 
Bonus Severance = 15% (average of year 1 and year 2 bonuses actually awarded).

Exhibit 99.1
 
ArQule Announces Management and Board Changes
 
WOBURN, Mass., Apr 13, 2006 (BUSINESS WIRE)  ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced several changes in its management and board of directors that reflect its transition to a sustainable research and development-based company from a chemical services business.
 
"These changes reflect the organic, carefully planned growth of ArQule and the conclusion of tenures that have coincided with the transition of the Company to an oncology-focused research and clinical development entity with products in clinical development and with a commitment to further growth as a therapeutics company," said Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.
 
Management changes
 
Joining ArQule will be Peter S. Lawrence, named to the new position of general counsel and chief business officer. Louise A. Mawhinney, chief financial officer, is planning to depart but will remain with ArQule until the completion of a search for her successor. In addition, the Company has initiated a retained search for the position of chief medical officer.
 
"I would first like to personally recognize and thank Louise Mawhinney for her significant role in our transition from the chemical services business and in attaining our current strong financial position," said Dr. Hill. "Louise will remain with ArQule until a successor is hired, and I look forward to continuing to work closely with her as we conduct the search for a successor.
 
"I would also like to welcome Peter Lawrence to ArQule," said Dr. Hill. "Peter has compiled a distinguished track record in leading transactions for successful public and private companies in the life sciences and technology sectors, both as a venture capitalist and as a business attorney. As chief business officer, he will be an integral part of ArQule as we pursue strategic growth strategies and explore partnership opportunities."
 
Mr. Lawrence is currently a general partner of Pod Holding Ltd., a $100 million international venture capital firm in Boston of which he was a founding partner in 2001. He has helped drive the strategic growth of Pod Holding, including its deal sourcing and structuring, syndication, public relations, hiring and other business expansion activities. Mr. Lawrence has managed transactional work across the firm's entire portfolio, including investments, joint ventures, collaborations, and mergers and acquisitions, and he has worked closely with Pod Holding's portfolio companies on a full range of company-building activities.
 
Mr. Lawrence served as lead partner on investment activities for numerous companies, including the cancer therapeutics company, Pintex Pharmaceuticals. His public financing experiences include the initial public offering and successive financings for America Online Inc. (AOL) and for a number of biotechnology companies, including Biogen, Human
 
Genome Sciences and Hybridon. He has also worked on several notable mergers and acquisitions, including Roche/Compuchem, AOL/Time Warner, Steinway Piano, DEC/Intel, and Mitotix/GPC Biotech.
 
Previously, Mr. Lawrence was a partner at Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., from 1991 to 2001. At Mintz Levin, he served as external corporate counsel to public and private companies, managed a transactional legal practice and provided strategic guidance to numerous clients through periods of rapid growth and transformative corporate events. Mr. Lawrence worked at Gaston & Snow from 1989 to 1991, in the firm's Corporate Law Department. He holds a Bachelor's degree from Amherst College and a J.D. from Boston University School of Law.
 
"I am looking forward to contributing to the development of a successful, sustainable R&D business at ArQule," said Mr. Lawrence. "The Company is poised for significant progress in the clinic, is generating additional multiple opportunities based on innovative and exciting science, and is committed to building upon its successes to add significant value over the long term."
 
Board changes
 
Joining the ArQule board of directors on May 12, 2006 will be Nancy A. Simonian, M.D., senior vice president of clinical, medical and regulatory affairs at Millennium Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Laura Avakian will resign from the board effective May 12, 2006, and Dr. Werner Cautreels will resign effective today. Dr. Cautreels will remain with ArQule as a member of the Company's scientific advisory board.
 
"Laura Avakian and Werner Cautreels have served as ArQule directors for a number of years, and I would like to thank them for their valuable and distinguished service on the Board through the many corporate milestones we have achieved during their tenures," said Dr. Hill.
 
"Dr. Simonian brings to ArQule a significant body of experience in clinical development and medical affairs," said Dr. Hill. "She has built clinical research organizations and has successfully negotiated regulatory pathways for a number of products at Millennium Pharmaceuticals and Biogen. We look forward to her contributions particularly during an important time when our products are advancing into further stages of clinical testing."
 
Dr. Simonian is senior vice president of clinical, medical and regulatory affairs at Millennium Pharmaceuticals, where she has worked since 2001. She has led Millennium's development activities in the areas of oncology and inflammation, built a development organization (including clinical integration and restructuring following Millennium's acquisition of Cor Therapeutics), overseen more than 40 clinical trials for 12 compounds, obtained a variety of regulatory approvals (including accelerated approval of Velcade in the U.S., subsequent label expansion and standard approval), co-chaired the portfolio review
committee and served on the corporate development steering committee.
 
Previously, Dr. Simonian was at Biogen, Inc. from 1995 to 2001, most recently as vice president, medical research. At Biogen, she was responsible for the oversight of Avonex Tysabri, as well as multiple gene therapy clinical development programs. She successfully filed sNDAS for Avonex and led the in-licensing of Tysabri from Elan Pharmaceuticals. Dr. Simonian is assistant professor, neurology, at Harvard Medical School/Massachusetts General Hospital.
 
Dr. Simonian holds a Bachelor's degree from Princeton University and an M.D. from the University of Pennsylvania Medical School. Dr. Simonian completed her medical training at Harvard Medical School/Massachusetts General Hospital.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics. The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's innovative Activated Checkpoint Therapy(SM) (ACT) platform is generating products designed to improve the way cancer patients are treated by selectively killing cancer cells and sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. ArQule's lead ACT program, based on the E2F pathway, is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
 
his press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, development efforts and the business environment, including without limitation: the ACT platform or other, proprietary platforms may not improve efficacy or reduce toxicity, and compounds resulting from these platforms may not operate as intended; the current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and unexpected toxicity; the commencement of the anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the preclinical efforts associated with the product pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; the animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may
fail to satisfy the collaborators' needs or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 
SOURCE: ArQule, Inc.
 
ArQule, Inc. William B. Boni, 781-994-0300 VP, Investor Relations/ Corp. Communications www.ArQule.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20060427153343.txt.gz
TIME:20060427153343
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                                   
 
 
Section 1Registrant's Business and Operations
 
Item 1.01  Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
As earlier reported, Louise A. Mawhinney, the Registrant's Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer, has announced her intention to leave the company.  In order to provide for an orderly transition of duties, on April 21, 2006 the Registrant entered into a separation agreement with Ms. Mawhinney under which she will remain with the Registrant until her successor is hired.  The agreement provides that Ms. Mawhinney will resign from her position with the Registrant no later than October 13, 2006.  Both parties have the right to cause the resignation to occur earlier if certain conditions specified in the contract are met.  Irrespective of whether the effective date of resignation is October 13, 2006 or earlier, Ms. Mawhinney will receive her current salary and benefits through that date. The foregoing summary of the material terms of Ms. Mawhinney's separation agreement is qualified by the full text of the separation agreement which is included as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 1.02  Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003 filed with the Commission on March 12, 2004 (File No. 000-21429) and is incorporated herein by reference.
Registrant
The separation agreement referred to in Item 1.01, above, supersedes the employment agreement between the Registrant and Louise A. Mawhinney, dated December 18, 2003.  The employment agreement was filed as Exhibit 10.47 to the
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)  Exhibits.
 
10.1  Separation Agreement and General Releasedated as of April 21, 2006 between ArQule, Inc. and Louise A. Mawhinney.
 
Employment Agreement filed as Exhibit 10.47 to the Registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003 filed with the Commission on March 12, 2004 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
10.2  
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
April 27, 2006

Exhibit 10.1
 
Separation Agreement and General Release
 
This Agreement is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation, with its principal place of business at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801 (the "Company") and Louise Mawhinney ("Employee"). In consideration of the mutual covenants contained herein, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties agree as follows:
 
Employee hereby resigns her employment with the Company effective as of a date no later than Friday, October 13, 2006 ("Separation Date"), provided, however, that if Employee obtains other employment prior to October 13, 2006, Employee may resign and shorten the Separation Date to such earlier date as Employee shall notify the Company in writing, and provided further that if the Company hires a new Chief Financial Officer prior to October 13, 2006, the Company may shorten the Separation Date to such earlier date as the Company shall notify Employee in writing. However, in no event shall the Separation Date be later than October 13, 2006. In addition, Employee shall resign her position as an officer of the Company effective as of the Separation Date by executing a letter in the form attached as Exhibit A.
1.
                                      
Separation of Employment.
 
Employee acknowledges that, as of the Separation Date, Employee will be paid in full for any and all wages, including accrued but unused vacation time. Provided that Employee first signs this Agreement and returns it to the Company, the Company will continue to pay Employee's then-current base salary (the "Severance Payment") for a period beginning on the Separation Date and ending on October 13, 2006 (the "Severance Period"). For example, if Separation Date is August 1, 2006 (whether by Employee's or Company's election), the Severance Period will run from August 1, 2006 through October 13, 2006. The Severance Payment will be paid out in substantially equal bi-weekly installments and will be subject to legally required and voluntarily authorized deductions. Employee specifically acknowledges that the Severance Payment and the employment period afforded Employee under this Agreement exceed any legal payment obligation of the Company and provide valid consideration for the General Release contained in this Agreement.
2.
                                      
Severance Payment.
 
Unless otherwise provided for expressly in this Agreement, all benefits provided by the Company to Employee will cease as of the Separation Date.
3.
                                      
Insurance and Other Benefits.
 
A COBRA notice will issue on the Separation Date. If Employee is eligible for and elects to continue health and/or dental insurance coverage through COBRA, the Company will pay 80% of the monthly premium for such insurance, as applicable, through the Severance Period. Any continuing coverage after that date will be at Employee's sole expense as provided by federal COBRA law. Eligibility to continue insurance coverage ceases upon the termination of any period allowed by law and is at all times subject to the terms and conditions of the applicable plan(s).
a.
                                      
Group Health, Dental and Vision Coverage.
Upon the Separation Date, Employee may apply to convert the existing group life insurance to an individual policy at Employee'sown expense.
b.
                                     
Life Insurance Coverage.
 
Employee shall be entitled to Employee'svested benefit in the Company's 401(k) plan as of the Separation Date, as determined by the plan provision. Service credit, salary reduction and Company contribution shall cease as of the Separation Date.
c.
                                      
Retirement Plans.
 
Disability insurance coverage will cease as of the Separation Date, and there is no right of individual conversion.
d.
                                     
Disability Insurance.
 
Employee will receive full payment for all accrued but unused vacation as of the Separation Date. Accrual of vacation time shall cease as of the Separation Date.
e.
                                      
Vacation Pay.
 
The Company shall not contest Employee's claim, if any, for unemployment insurance benefits, it being understood and agreed that Employee's entitlement to unemployment insurance benefits shall be determined solely by the Massachusetts Division of Unemployment Assistance.
f.
                                        
Unemployment.
 
Whatever Employee is entitled to, if anything, by way of Company stock, restricted stock, stock options or repayment of salary deductions for fractional shares purchased shall be governed by the terms of those Company stock option plan(s), and for all such purposes Employee will be considered an employee of the Company until the Separation Date.
g.
                                     
Stock, Options, Payments.
 
The Company will provide to Employee outplacement support, as described in the materials distributed by the Company to Employee on the Separation Date.
h.
                                     
Outplacement.
 
On the Separation Date, Employee shall return all property belonging to the Company, including but not limited to papers, files and documents (physical or electronic), computers, telephones, PDAs, reference guides, equipment, keys, identification cards, credit cards, software, computer access codes, disks and institutional manuals. Employee shall not retain any copies, duplicates, reproductions or excerpts thereof. In addition, Employee warrants that Employee has deleted any information belonging to the Company from any personal computer that Employee may have at home or elsewhere (other than the Company's offices) without retaining any copies of any such information, in electronic or other format, and will permit the Company to have access to such computer on reasonable notice to confirm such deletion.
4.
                                      
Return of Property.
 
Employee acknowledges that during the course of Employee'semployment with the Company Employeehas become acquainted with and/or developed confidential information belonging to the Company and its customers. Employee agrees not to use to Employee'sown advantage or to disclose, except as required by law, to any person or entity any confidential information of the Company or of any past or present customer of the Company, including but not limited to
5.
                                            
Nondisclosure of Confidential Information.
financial data or projections, customer lists, projects, economic information, systems, plans, methods, procedures, operations, techniques, know-how, trade secrets or merchandising or marketing strategies. Moreover, Employee acknowledges and affirms that Employee continues to be bound by the terms of the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement which Employeeexecuted at the commencement of Employee's employment with the Company or its subsidiary ("Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement"), a copy of which is attached as Exhibit B, and the terms of which are incorporated herein by reference.
 
Employee agrees and covenants as a material term of this Agreement to provide reasonable cooperation to the Company, including but not limited to, with respect to matters previously within Employee's scope or course of employment with the Company. The Company will reimburse Employee for any time expended on behalf of the Company at the request of the Company after the Severance Period at an agreed-to per diem or per hour rate (or pro-rata share thereof) and reimburse Employee for out-of-pocket expenses related thereto. In the event that the Company determines that such expense reimbursement is or would be prohibited by law, the Company promptly shall notify Employee to such effect, and such reimbursement shall not be made to Employee.
6.
                                            
Cooperation.
 
Except with respect to any rights, obligations or duties arising out of this Agreement, and in consideration of the Severance Payment and other benefits set forth in this Agreement, Employee hereby releases and discharges the Company and its officers, directors, partners, stockholders, trustees, attorneys, insurers, representatives, agents and employees, in both their individual and corporate capacities (collectively, the "Releasees"), of and from any and all complaints, charges, lawsuits or claims for relief of any kind by Employee that Employeenow has or ever had against the Releasees or any one of them, whether known or unknown, arising out of any matter or thing that has happened before the signing of this Agreement, including but not limited to (i) claims for tort or contract, or relating to salary, wages, bonuses, severance, commissions, stock, and stock options, the breach of any oral or written contract or promise, misrepresentation, defamation, and interference with prospective economic advantage, interference with contract, intentional and negligent infliction of emotional distress, negligence, breach of the covenant of good faith and fair dealing, medical, disability or other leave; (ii) claims arising out of, based on, or connected with Employee'semployment, including terms and conditions of employment, by the Company and the termination of that employment, including but not limited to claims arising under Section 806 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, and any other claims alleging retaliation of any nature; (iii) claims under G.L. c. 93A or in any way related to restricted stock, stock options, or vesting or exercise of the same, or for alleged securities violations; and (iv) claims for unlawful employment discrimination of any kind, including discrimination due to age, sex, disability or handicap, including failure to offer reasonable accommodations, race, color, religion, pregnancy, sexual orientation, national origin, or sexual or other unlawful harassment arising under or based on the following, all as amended: Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 ("ADEA"), the Americans with Disabilities Act ("ADA"), the Equal Pay Act of 1963, the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 ("COBRA"), the Family and Medical Leave Act, the
7.
                                            
Current General Release.
Massachusetts Fair Employment Practices Act, the Massachusetts Civil Rights Act, the Massachusetts Equal Rights Law, the Massachusetts or United States Constitution, including any right of privacy thereunder, and any other state or federal equal employment opportunity or anti-discrimination law, policy, order, regulation or guidelines affecting or relating to claims or rights of employees. It is further expressly agreed and understood by Employeethat the release contained herein is a GENERAL RELEASE.
 
Employee represents and warrants that Employee has not filed any complaints, charges, or claims for relief against the Releasees, or any one of them, with any local, state or federal court or administrative agency, any professional or regulatory board, or any other agency or entity. Employeefurther warrants that Employee has not previously assigned or transferred any of the claims that are the subject of the General Release contained herein. Employee agrees and covenants not to sue or bring any claims or charges against the Releasees, or any one of them, with respect to matters subject to the General Release contained herein. Employee further agrees not to institute any claim, charge, complaint or lawsuit to challenge the validity of the General Release or the circumstances surrounding its execution. In the event that Employeeinstitutes any action covered by this Section, that action shall be dismissed upon presentation of this Agreement and Employee shall reimburse the affected Releasees for all legal fees and expenses incurred in defending such claim and obtaining its dismissal.
8.
                                            
Covenant Not to Sue.
 
Nothing in this Agreement shall preclude Employee from filing a charge or complaint, including a challenge to the validity of this Agreement, with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, the Massachusetts Commission Against Discrimination or any other state anti-discrimination agency or from participating or cooperating in any investigation or proceeding conducted by any of governmental agency. In the event that a charge or complaint is filed with any administrative agency by Employee or in the event of an authorized investigation, charge or lawsuit filed by any administrative agency, Employee expressly waives and shall not accept any monetary award or damages, costs or attorneys' fees of any sort therefrom against the Company or any of the Releasees.
9.
                                            
Exclusion.
 
Employee acknowledges that her right to receive the severance payments and benefits specified in this Agreement is explicitly conditioned on her execution and delivery on the Separation Date with no revocation thereafter of a second general release in the form attached hereto as Exhibit C. By execution of this Agreement, Employee acknowledges and agrees that the severance payments and benefits specified herein are and shall be good and sufficient consideration for such second general release.
10.
                                      
Execution of Second General Release.
 
It is understood and agreed that this Agreement does not constitute any admission by the Company that any action taken with respect to Employee was unlawful or wrongful, or that such action constituted a breach of contract or violated any federal or state law, policy, rule or regulation.
11.
                                      
Nonadmissions Clause.
Except as set forth in Section 9, Employee expressly agrees that the nature and terms of this Agreement are confidential, and expressly agrees not to discuss or disclose them, or the facts and contentions contained therein, without the prior written consent of the Company, with or to any person, except to Employee's accountant, tax advisor, attorney, immediate family, therapist or healthcare provider, if any, the Internal Revenue Service, state tax authorities, or as required by law. If Employee makes any disclosure authorized by this Section, Employeeshall apprise the person or entity to whom such disclosure is made of the confidential nature of the terms and conditions of the Agreement and shall use reasonable and good faith efforts to secure the confidentiality of the information so disclosed. In particular, if Employee is compelled to disclose the terms or conditions of this Agreement in response to a subpoena or discovery request issued in litigation, Employeeshall provide the Company with a copy of the subpoena or discovery request immediately following receipt by the Employee in order to provide the Company with the opportunity to seek a protective order from the appropriate court.
12.
                                      
Nondisclosure of this Agreement.
 
Employee agrees not to disparage or make negative statements about the Company or any of the Company's programs or products. The Company agrees to instruct all key members of the Company's executive management team not to disparage or make negative statements about Employee, provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed in any way to restrict or prevent Employee or the Company from providing truthful information to, or truthful responses to requests from, their respective auditors, accountants, investment bankers, insurers, potential purchasers, successors, acquirers, or any other persons or entities as required by business necessity or for a legitimate business reason. Nothing in this Agreement shall bar Employee or the Company from providing truthful testimony in any legal proceeding, or in responding to any request from any governmental agency, or as required by law, or by court order or other legal process.
13.
                                      
Nondisparagement.
 
Any reference request on Employee will be directed to Anthony S. Messina, or his successor as Vice President of Human Development, who will respond in accordance with Company practice with only Employee's dates of employment and job titles and by stating that Company policy precludes the provision of any further information to the inquirer.
14.
                                      
References.
 
Employee agrees that the consideration contained in this Agreement which flows to Employeefrom the Company is subject to termination, reduction, disgorgement or cancellation in the event that Employeetakes any action or engages in any conduct, including failure to perform, deemed by the Company to be in violation of this Agreement. In the event that Employee institutes legal proceedings to enforce this Agreement, Employeeagrees that the sole remedy available to Employeeshall be enforcement of the terms of this Agreement, but that under no circumstances shall Employee be entitled to receive or collect any damages for Claims that Employee has released under this Agreement in accordance with the General Release contained in Section 7 of this Agreement.
15.
                                      
Breach.
This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such jurisdiction and without giving effect to its choice or conflict of laws rules or principles. Each of the parties irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and of any United States federal court sitting in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, and irrevocably agrees that all claims in respect of such action or proceedings shall be heard and determined in any such Massachusetts or United States federal court.
16.
                                      
Governing Law.
 
17.
                                      
Time to Consider Agreement.
 
Employee acknowledges that Employeehas been given the opportunity to consult an attorney of Employee's choice before signing this Agreement.
a.
                                      
 
Employee acknowledges that Employee has been given the opportunity to review and consider this Agreement for at least twenty-one (21) days before signing it and that, if Employee has signed this Agreement in less than that time, Employeehas done so voluntarily in order to obtain sooner the benefits of this Agreement.
b.
                                     
 
Employee further acknowledges that Employeemay revoke this Agreement within seven (7) days of signing it, provided that this Agreement will not become effective until such seven day period has expired. To be effective, any such revocation must be in writing and delivered to the Company's principal place of business (as set forth in the preamble to this Agreement) to the attention of Anthony S. Messina by close of business on the seventh day after signing and must expressly state Employee's intention to revoke the Agreement. The eighth day following Employee's execution hereof shall be deemed the "Effective Date" of this Agreement.
c.
                                      
 
The parties also agree that the release provided by Employee in this Agreement does not include claims under the ADEA arising after the date Employee signs this Agreement.
d.
                                     
 
Employee further acknowledges and agrees that the consideration Employeeis to receive under this Agreement exceeds the consideration to which Employeewould otherwise be entitled to upon her termination from employment with the Company.
e.
                                      
 
Employee acknowledges that in exchange for entering into this Agreement Employeehas received good and valuable consideration in excess of that to which Employeewould otherwise have been entitled in the absence of this Agreement. This consideration includes, but is not limited to, the Severance Payment described in Section 2 and benefits set forth in Section 3. Employee further acknowledges the sufficiency of that consideration. The Company and Employee attest that no other representations were made regarding this Agreement other than those contained herein.
18.
                                
Representations.
If any of the terms of this Agreement shall be held to be invalid and unenforceable, the remaining terms of this Agreement are severable and shall not be affected thereby. However, should the General Release or Covenant Not to Sue provisions of this Agreement be declared or determined by any tribunal, administrative agency or court of competent jurisdiction to be illegal or invalid, and should Employee thereupon seek to institute any claims that would have been within the scope of the General Release or Covenant Not to Sue, the Company shall be entitled to immediate repayment, and Employee shall immediately return, the Severance Payment.
19.
                                
Severability.
 
This Agreement and its Exhibits constitute the entire agreement between the parties about or relating to the Company's obligations to Employee with respect to Employee'sterms and conditions of employment, and termination of employment, and fully supersedes any and all prior agreements or understandings between the parties other than the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement, referenced in Section 5 above. The terms of this Agreement are contractual in nature and not a mere recital, and they shall take effect as a sealed document. This Agreement may not be modified orally, but only by agreement in writing signed by both parties.
20.
                                
Entire Agreement.
 
Each party agrees that in any dispute regarding the interpretation or construction of this Agreement, no presumption shall operate in favor of or against any party by virtue of such party's role in drafting, or not drafting, the terms and conditions set forth herein.
21.
                                
Interpretation.
 
Any notice under this Agreement given to Employee, shall be by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
22.
                                
Notice.
 
Any notice under this Agreement given to Company, shall be to:
 
Anthony S. Messina
Vice President, Human Development
ArQule, Inc.
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA 01801
 
This Agreement may be executed in two or more of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered constitutes an original of this Agreement, but all the counterparts shall together constitute one and the same agreement. No counterpart shall be effective until each party has executed at least one counterpart.
23.
                                
Counterparts.
 
EMPLOYEE REPRESENTS, WARRANTS AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EMPLOYEEHAS CAREFULLY READ ALL OF THIS AGREEMENT, THAT EMPLOYEEHAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO CONSULT WITH LEGAL COUNSEL CONCERNING THE LEGAL EFFECT OF THIS AGREEMENT AND THE ADVISABILITY OF ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND GIVING THE GENERAL RELEASE PROVIDED FOR HEREIN, AND THAT EMPLOYEEFULLY UNDERSTANDS THE SAME. EMPLOYEE FURTHER REPRESENTS, WARRANTS AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT
24.
                                
Access to Legal Counsel.
EMPLOYEEIS EXECUTING THIS AGREEMENT WITH THE INTENT TO GRANT THE GENERAL RELEASE SET FORTH HEREIN, WITHOUT RELIANCE UPON ANY STATEMENT OR REPRESENTATION OF THE COMPANY OR ANY REPRESENTATIVE, EMPLOYEE, DIRECTOR OR ATTORNEY OF THE COMPANY OTHER THAN AS SET FORTH HEREIN, AND THAT EMPLOYEEHAS SIGNED THIS AGREEMENT ON EMPLOYEE'SOWN BEHALF AND OF EMPLOYEE'SOWN FREE WILL.
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Employeehave duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year written below.
 
 
 
 
Louise Mawhinney
 
             , 2006
 
ArQule, Inc.
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA 01801
 
To Whom it May Concern:
 
This letter is to notify you that I, Louise Mawhinney, do hereby resign from all officer positions that I hold with the ArQule, Inc., effective immediately.
 
This General Release and Covenant Not to Sue ("General Release") is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation, with its principal place of business at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801 (the "Company") and Louise Mawhinney ("Employee"). As a condition of the payment of severance benefits identified in the Separation Agreement and General Release between the Company and Employee (the "Agreement"), and in consideration of such severance benefits, the parties agree as follows:
 
Except with respect to any rights, obligations or duties arising out of the Agreement, and in consideration of the Severance Payment and other benefits set forth in the Agreement, Employee hereby releases and discharges the Company and its officers, directors, partners, stockholders, trustees, attorneys, insurers, representatives, agents and employees, in both their individual and corporate capacities (collectively, the "Releasees"), of and from any and all complaints, charges, lawsuits or claims for relief of any kind by Employee that Employeenow has or ever had against the Releasees or any one of them, whether known or unknown, arising out of any matter or thing that has happened before the signing of this General Release, including but not limited to (i) claims for tort or contract, or relating to salary, wages, bonuses, severance, commissions, stock, and stock options, the breach of any oral or written contract or promise, misrepresentation, defamation, and interference with prospective economic advantage, interference with contract, intentional and negligent infliction of emotional distress, negligence, breach of the covenant of good faith and fair dealing, medical, disability or other leave; (ii) claims arising out of, based on, or connected with Employee'semployment, including terms and conditions of employment, by the Company and the termination of that employment, including but not limited to claims arising under Section 806 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, and any other claims alleging retaliation of any nature; (iii) claims under G.L. c. 93A or in any way related to restricted stock, stock options, or vesting or exercise of the same, or for alleged securities violations; and (iv) claims for unlawful employment discrimination of any kind, including discrimination due to age, sex, disability or handicap, including failure to offer reasonable accommodations, race, color, religion, pregnancy, sexual orientation, national origin, or sexual or other unlawful harassment arising under or based on the following, all as amended: Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 ("ADEA"), the Americans with Disabilities Act ("ADA"), the Equal Pay Act of 1963, the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 ("COBRA"), the Family and Medical Leave Act, the Massachusetts Fair Employment Practices Act, the Massachusetts Civil Rights Act, the Massachusetts Equal Rights Law, the Massachusetts or United States Constitution, including any right of privacy thereunder, and any other state or federal equal employment opportunity or anti-discrimination law, policy, order, regulation or guidelines affecting or relating to claims or rights of employees. It is further expressly agreed and understood by Employeethat the release contained herein is a GENERAL RELEASE.
1.
                                      
General Release.
Employee represents and warrants that Employee has not filed any complaints, charges, or claims for relief against the Releasees, or any one of them, with any local, state or federal court or administrative agency, any professional or regulatory board, or any other agency or entity. Employeefurther warrants that Employee has not previously assigned or transferred any of the claims that are the subject of the General Release contained herein. Employee agrees and covenants not to sue or bring any claims or charges against the Releasees, or any one of them, with respect to matters subject to the General Release contained herein. Employee further agrees not to institute any claim, charge, complaint or lawsuit to challenge the validity of the General Release or the circumstances surrounding its execution. In the event that Employeeinstitutes any action covered by this Section, that action shall be dismissed upon presentation of this General Release and Employee shall reimburse the affected Releasees for all legal fees and expenses incurred in defending such claim and obtaining its dismissal.
2.
                                      
Covenant Not to Sue.
 
Nothing in this General Release shall preclude Employee from filing a charge or complaint, including a challenge to the validity of this General Release, with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, the Massachusetts Commission Against Discrimination or any other state anti-discrimination agency or from participating or cooperating in any investigation or proceeding conducted by any of such agencies. In the event that a charge or complaint is filed with any administrative agency by Employee or in the event of an authorized investigation, charge or lawsuit filed by any administrative agency, Employee expressly waives and shall not accept any monetary award or damages, costs or attorneys' fees of any sort therefrom against the Company or any of the Releasees.
3.
                                      
Exclusion.
 
4.
                                      
Time to Consider General Release.
 
Employee acknowledges that Employeehas been given the opportunity to consult an attorney of Employee's choice before signing this General Release.
a.
                                      
 
Employee acknowledges that Employee has been given the opportunity to review and consider this General Release for at least twenty-one (21) days before signing it and that, if Employee has signed this General Release in less than that time, Employeehas done so voluntarily in order to obtain sooner the benefits of this General Release.
b.
                                     
 
Employee further acknowledges that Employeemay revoke this General Release within seven (7) days of signing it, provided that this General Release will not become effective until such seven day period has expired. To be effective, any such revocation must be in writing and delivered to the Company's principal place of business (as set forth in the preamble to this General Release) to the attention of Anthony S. Messina by close of business on the seventh day after signing and must expressly state Employee's intention to revoke the General Release. The eighth day following Employee's execution hereof shall be deemed the "Effective Date" of the General Release.
c.
                                      
The parties also agree that the release provided by Employee in this General Release does not include claims under the ADEA arising after the date Employee signs this General Release.
d.
                                     
 
Employee further acknowledges and agrees that the consideration Employeeis to receive under the Agreement exceeds the consideration to which Employeewould otherwise be entitled to upon her termination from employment with the Company and provides valid consideration for this General Release.
e.
                                      
 
This General Release shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such jurisdiction and without giving effect to its choice or conflict of laws rules or principles. Each of the parties irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and of any United States federal court sitting in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this General Release, and irrevocably agrees that all claims in respect of such action or proceedings shall be heard and determined in any such Massachusetts or United States federal court.
5.
                                      
Governing Law.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Employeehave duly executed this General Release as of the day and year written below.
 
 
ArQule, Inc.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20060516092103.txt.gz
TIME:20060516092103
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): May 12, 2006
 
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
19 Presidential Way Woburn, MA
(Address of principal executive offices)
 
01801
(Zip code)
 
(781) 994-0300
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
             
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
             
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
             
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
             
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election.
(d)  (3) As previously reported, Dr. Nancy A. Simonian was appointed to the Board of Directors of the Registrant, effective May 12, 2006.  On May 12, 2006 she was appointed to the Science Committee of the Board of Directors of the Registrant.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20060524163449.txt.gz
TIME:20060524163449
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
01801
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                                   
 
 
 
Section 8 Other Events
 
Item 8.01   Other Events.
 
On May 18, 2006 at the 2006 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of the Registrant, the stockholders voted:
 
1.
                
To elect Michael J. Astrue, Timothy C. Barabe and Stephen A. Hill as directors to hold office for a term of three years and until their respective successors are elected and qualified;
 
2.
                
To approve an amendment to our Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation to increase the number of authorized shares of our common stock, $0.01 par value per share, from 50,000,000 to 100,000,000 shares;
 
3.
                
To approve amendments to our Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan to (i) increase the number of shares of common stock for which an option to purchase shares is automatically granted (A) to the Chairman of the Board of Directors (1) upon his or her initial election or appointment (from 10,000 shares to 25,000 shares) and (2) upon his or her re-election or continuation on our board immediately after each annual meeting of stockholders (from 5,000 shares to 15,000 shares), and (B) to each other Director (1) upon his or her initial election or appointment (from 10,000 shares to 20,000 shares) and (2) upon his or her re-election or continuation on our board immediately after each  annual meeting of stockholders (from 5,000 shares to 10,000 shares); and (ii) change the date through which stock options may be granted under our Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan from July 9, 2006 to May 18, 2016, ten years from the date of the Annual Meeting;
 
4.
                
To approve an amendment to our Amended and Restated 1996 Employee Stock Purchase Plan to change the date through which rights to purchase our common stock may be granted to our employees under such plan from August 14, 2006 to May 18, 2016, ten years from the date of the Annual Meeting; and
 
5.
                
To ratify the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit our financial statements for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2006.
 
Section 9 Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)  Exhibits
 
99.1  Tabulation of Stockholder Votes
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
The Annual Meeting of Stockholders of the Registrant (the "Annual Meeting") was held at The Museum of Science, Science Park, Boston, Massachusetts, commencing at 9:00 a.m., pursuant to notice properly given.
1.
                                      
 
At the close of business on March 31, 2006, the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the Annual Meeting, the outstanding voting securities of the Registrant consisted of 35,377,881 shares of common stock, $0.01 par value. Each of the outstanding shares was entitled to one vote on the matters to come before the Annual Meeting.
2.
                                      
 
At the Annual Meeting, 30,076,706 shares, or 85.02%, of the Registrant's issued and outstanding common stock were represented, in person or by proxy, constituting a quorum.
3.
                                      
 
At the Annual Meeting, the following nominees for director received the respective number of votes set opposite his name, constituting a plurality of the votes cast, and has been duly elected as a director of the Registrant.
4.
                                      
 
 
The following sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve an amendment to the Registrant's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation to increase the number of authorized shares of its common stock from 50,000,000 to 100,000,000 shares.
5.
                                      
 
 
7.
                                      
The following sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve amendments to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan to (i) increase the number of shares of common stock for which an option to purchase shares is automatically granted (A) to the Chairman of the Board of Directors (1) upon his or her initial election or appointment (from 10,000 shares to 25,000 shares) and (2) upon his or her re-election or continuation on the Registrant's board immediately after each annual meeting of stockholders (from 5,000 shares to 15,000 shares), and (B) to each other Director (1) upon his or her initial
election or appointment (from 10,000 shares to 20,000 shares) and (2) upon his or her re-election or continuation on the Registrant's board immediately after each  annual meeting of stockholders (from 5,000 shares to 10,000 shares); and (ii) change the date through  which stock options may be granted under the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan from July 9, 2006 to May 18, 2016, ten years from the date of the Annual Meeting.
 
 
The following sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve an amendment to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Employee Stock Purchase Plan to change the date through which rights to purchase the Registrant's common stock may be granted to its employees under such plan from August 14, 2006 to May 18, 2016, ten years from the date of the Annual Meeting.
8.
                                      
 
 
The following sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to ratify the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit the Registrant's financial statements for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2006.
9.
                                      
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20060728151350.txt.gz
TIME:20060728151350
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
July 27, 2006
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
(Address of principal executive offices)
01801
(Zip code)
(781) 994-0300
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02.
            
Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 27, 2006, the Registrant issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2006.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
.
Item 9.01.
            
Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits.
99.1   Text of Press Release dated July 27, 2006.
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date:  July 27, 2006

 
Exhibit 99.1
Contact:
William B. Boni VP, Investor Relations/ Corp. Communications (781) 994-0300 www.ArQule.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2006.
Woburn, MA, July 27, 2006 
For the quarter ended June 30, 2006, the Company reported a net loss of $7,575,000 or $0.21 per share, compared with a net loss of $2,427,000, or $0.07 per share, for the second quarter of 2005.  For the six-month period ended June 30, 2006, the Company reported a net loss of $3,288,000, or $0.09 per share, compared to a net loss of $3,871,000, or $0.11 per share, for the six-month period ended June 30, 2005.
The Company reported total revenues of $6,570,000 for the quarter ended June 30, 2006, compared to revenues of $13,454,000 for the second quarter of 2005.  Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2006 were $30,022,000, compared to revenues of $27,397,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2005.
Compound development revenues for both the 2006 and 2005 periods related primarily to chemistry services provided by the Company to Pfizer Inc. The decreased revenues in the second quarter of 2006 followed the Company's previously announced decision to exit the chemistry services business upon conclusion of the Pfizer agreement in May 2006.  Research and development revenue in the 2006 and 2005 quarters related primarily to financial support from Hoffmann-La Roche related to the Company's ongoing development of products in its E2F cancer therapy program.
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended June 30, 2006 were $15,410,000, compared to $16,129,000 for the second quarter of 2005.  Total costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2006 were $35,917,000, compared to $32,019,000 for the same period in 2005.
Cost of compound development revenue for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2006, relating to the production of compounds for Pfizer, totaled $2,526,000 and $8,345,000, respectively, compared with $7,674,000 and $15,027,000 for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2005.  Research and development costs for the three and six-month periods
ArQule/2
ended June 30, 2006 were $9,567,000 and $20,093,000, respectively, compared with $6,217,000 and $12,070,000 for the 2005 three and six-month periods.  Marketing, general and administrative costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2006 were $2,781,000 and $4,981,000, respectively, compared with $2,238,000 and $4,922,000 for the 2005 three and six-month periods.
For the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2006, the Company recorded restructuring charges of $536,000 and $2,498,000 related to employee severance associated with the termination of its chemistry services business.  As of June 30, 2006 all affected employees have been separated from the Company, and the termination benefits are expected to be fully paid by December 31, 2006.
On January 1, 2006, the Company adopted the provisions of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 123(R) related to share-based awards.  As a result, the Company recorded charges of $896,000 and $1,775,000 in the quarter and six months ended June 30, 2006, respectively, to reflect share-based compensation expense, which is reflected in compound development cost of revenue, research and development expenses and marketing, general and administrative expenses.
At June 30, 2006, the Company had a total of approximately $119,919,000 in cash and marketable securities.
Operational Review
"We are pleased with the patient enrollment in our clinical programs based upon our two lead scientific platforms, checkpoint pathway activation and c-Met inhibition," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.  "With regard to our checkpoint pathway activation program, patients are being actively enrolled in Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501 as monotherapy in leiomyosarcoma and as combination therapy with gemcitabine in pancreatic cancer.
"We expect to initiate patient enrollment in a second Phase 2 monotherapy trial with ARQ 501 in head and neck cancer in the near future," said Dr. Hill. "We also plan to begin a Phase 2 combination therapy trial with ARQ 501 and paclitaxel in ovarian cancer later in the year.  With regard to our c-Met inhibition program, patient enrollment continues on schedule in a Phase 1 clinical trial with ARQ 197, an orally administered small molecule, at three centers in the U.S.
"During the quarter, we also reported updated data from Phase 1 combination therapy trials with ARQ 501 and chemotherapeutic agents," said Dr. Hill.  "These studies demonstrate clinical tolerability, favorable pharmacokinetics and promising signs of anti-tumor activity in patients with a range of advanced solid tumors."
ArQule/3
Conference Call and Webcast
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. eastern time today, July 27, 2006.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer, and Louise A. Mawhinney, chief financial officer, will lead the call.
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 888.286.8010, and outside the U.S. 617.801.6888.  The access code is 85879182.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms.  The first of these, Activated Checkpoint Therapy
SM
 (ACT), is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. ArQule's second cancer platform, Cancer Survival Protein modulation, has generated a clinical-stage product designed to inhibit a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results, including results of ongoing and anticipated clinical trials, may differ materially from those projected in
ArQule/4
the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, research and development efforts and the general business environment, including without limitation: compounds in clinical trials based on the ACT platform or other, proprietary platforms may not prove to be safe or efficacious; current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and the commencement of anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the results of clinical trials may be disappointing and not lead to commercial products; preclinical efforts associated with the product pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the prescribed terms of the collaboration or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 
ArQule/5
ArQule, Inc. Condensed Statement of Operations (In Thousands, Except Per Share Amounts) (Unaudited)
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20060801172304.txt.gz
TIME:20060801172304
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported
August 1, 2006
 
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
(Zip code)
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Section 1Registrant's Business and Operations
Item 1.01  Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On August 1, 2006, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") entered into an employment agreement with Nigel John Rulewski, M.B., B.S., D.R.C.O.G., D.C.H. 
 The agreement provides that the Registrant will employ Dr. Rulewski as its Chief Medical Officer at an initial annual base salary of $325,000. The base salary is subject to annual review and upward adjustment by the Registrant.  Dr. Rulewski is also eligible to receive a discretionary annual cash bonus with a target amount of 35% of base salary in accordance with the Registrant's policies.  His actual bonus will be based on company and individual performance.
In addition, the Registrant granted Dr. Rulewski stock options entitling him to purchase 200,000 shares of the Registrant's common stock pursuant to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan.  The options become exercisable at the rate of 25% annually commencing on August 1, 2007. The exercise price of the options is $5.16 per share, the closing price of a share of the Registrant's common stock on July 31, 2006.
The agreement provides for continued employment until terminated by either party.  If Dr. Rulewski is terminated without cause (as defined in the agreement) the Registrant will be required to make a lump sum payment to him equal to twelve months of his base salary in effect at the time of termination, plus the average of his annual bonus for the preceding two years.  In addition, the Registrant will, at its expense, continue to provide Dr. Rulewski with all employee benefits in effect for a period of twelve months from the date of termination or pay the costs of continuation.  In the event the Registrant terminates or is deemed to terminate the agreement without cause, 50% of Dr. Rulewski's unvested stock options will immediately become exercisable without regard to the original vesting schedule.
In the event of a "change in control" of the Registrant (as defined in the agreement) 100% of Dr. Rulewski's unvested stock options shall become immediately exercisable without regard to the original vesting schedule.
The foregoing summary of the material terms of Dr. Rulewski's employment agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the agreement which is included as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
On August 1, 2006, the Registrant issued a press release announcing Dr. Rulewski's employment, a copy of which is included as an exhibit to this report and incorporated herein by reference.
2
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c)  Exhibits.
Employment Agreement between ArQule, Inc. and Dr. Rulewski dated as of August 1, 2006.
10.1  
                 
99.1         Text of Press Release announcing the hiring of Dr. Rulewski dated August 1, 2006.
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date:  August 1, 2006
3

 
Exhibit 10.1
This Employment Agreement (the "Agreement") dated as of August 1, 2006 (the "Execution Date") is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Nigel John Rulewski ("Executive") whose current principal residential address is 25 Bird Hill Avenue, Wellesley, MA 02481.
WHEREAS, the Company desires to employ Executive in a senior executive capacity and to enter into an agreement embodying the terms of such employment; and
WHEREAS, Executive desires to accept such employment and enter into such an agreement;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive (collectively, the "Parties") hereby agree as follows:
.  The Company hereby agrees to employ Executive, and Executive hereby accepts such employment with the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, for a period commencing on August 1, 2006 (the "Effective Date") and continuing until terminated in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 (the "Employment Term").
1.
                                      
Term of Employment
.  During the Employment Term, Executive shall serve as Chief Medical Officer, reporting directly to the Chief Executive Officer ("CEO") of the Company.  Executive hereby agrees to undertake the duties and responsibilities inherent in such position and such other duties and responsibilities consistent with such position as the CEO shall from time to time reasonably assign to Executive.
2.
                                      
Title; Duties
.  During the Employment Term, Executive shall devote substantially all of Executive's business time and efforts to the performance of Executive's duties hereunder and shall not, directly or indirectly, engage in any other business, profession or occupation for compensation or otherwise which would conflict with the rendition of such duties.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, Executive may engage in other activities, such as activities involving charitable, educational, religious, trade association, civic and similar types of organizations, speaking engagements and membership on the Board of Directors or equivalent of other organizations ("Outside Activities"), provided that Executive shall obtain the prior written consent of the CEO before engaging in any such Outside Activities and provided further that Executive's participation in such Outside Activities shall not be in violation of any of his obligations to the Company, including but not limited to those set forth in the Company's Code of Conduct.  Executive represents and warrants that Exhibit A attached hereto states all current business relationships,
3.
                                      
No Conflict
including, but not limited to, consulting agreements, confidentiality agreements and non-competition agreements to which Executive is a party as of the Execution Date.
                                               
4.             .
Compensation and Benefits
.  During the Employment Term, the Company shall pay Executive for Executive's services hereunder a base salary at the initial annual rate of $325,000, payable in substantially equal installments in accordance with the Company's usual payment practices and subject to annual review and upward adjustment by the Company in its sole discretion.  Such amount (as it may be increased, but not decreased, from time to time in accordance with this Section 4.1) shall be referred to herein as the "Base Salary."
4.1.
                             
Base Salary
.  Executive shall be eligible to receive a discretionary annual cash bonus, the target amount of which shall be 35 percent of Executive's Base Salary.  The award of an annual cash bonus, if any, shall be in the Company's sole discretion and shall be based on Company and individual performance.  For calendar year 2006, the annual cash bonus awarded to Executive, if any, shall be prorated based on the number of months Executive works for the Company during that year.  The annual cash bonus typically is paid during the first quarter of the following calendar year, and Executive must be actively employed with the Company as of the payment date in order to receive the annual cash bonus, if any.  Executive shall also be eligible to participate in any and all other bonus plans and packages that are made available to the Company's executives, on a basis consistent with Executive's position and then-current Base Salary and in accordance with the policies and practices of the Company and the Company's Board of Directors (the "Board").
4.2.
                             
Bonus Compensation
.  As further compensation for Executive's services hereunder, the Company shall grant to Executive, on the Effective Date, a stock option (the "Execution Stock Option") to purchase two hundred thousand (200,000) shares of the Company's Common Stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Common Stock"), pursuant to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan") and in accordance with the terms, and subject to a vesting schedule pursuant to which twenty-five percent of the shares shall vest annually commencing on the first anniversary of the Effective Date, and other conditions, set forth in the form of Option Certificate (attached hereto as Exhibit B).  The method of determining the exercise price of the Execution Stock Option is set forth in the attached Exhibit C.  In its sole discretion, the Company may grant to Executive from time to time other stock options to purchase additional shares of Common Stock, also pursuant to the Plan and such other terms and conditions set forth at the time of such grant (the Execution Stock Option and such other stock options, collectively, the "Stock Options") and may also grant stock awards.
4.3.
                             
Stock Option Grant
.  During the Employment Term and subject to any contributions therefor generally required of senior executives of the Company,
4.4.
                             
Executive Benefits
Executive shall be entitled to receive such employee benefits (including fringe benefits, 401(k) plan participation, and life, health, dental, accident and short and long term disability insurance) which the Company may, in its sole and absolute discretion, make available generally to its senior executives or personnel similarly situated; provided, however, that it is hereby acknowledged and agreed that any such employee benefit plans may be altered, modified or terminated by the Company at any time in its sole discretion without recourse by Executive.
                                               
.  Executive shall be entitled to four weeks (20 working days) of paid time off ("PTO") per annum during the Employment Term, which will accrue pursuant to the Company's policies and practices and is to be taken at such time or times as shall be mutually convenient for the Company and Executive; provided, however, that the Company may elect to increase the annual time to which Executive shall be entitled to PTO.  Unused PTO shall be allocated pursuant to the Company's policies and practices.
4.5.
                             
Paid Time Off
.  Upon delivery of adequate documentation of expenses incurred in accordance with the policies and practices of the Company, Executive shall be entitled to reimbursement by the Company for reasonable travel, entertainment and other business expenses incurred by Executive in the performance of Executive's duties hereunder in accordance with such policies as the Company may from time to time have in effect.
4.6.
                             
Business Expenses and Perquisites
.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, any payments or benefits hereunder shall be subject to the withholding of such amounts, if any, relating to tax and other payroll deductions, as the Company reasonably determines it should withhold pursuant to any applicable law or regulation.
4.7
                                
Deductions and Withholdings
  Executive shall receive an annual review of his performance by the CEO of the Company, or by a Committee of the Board of Directors, or both.
4.8
                                
Annual Review.
5.             .
Termination
5.1.         .
Without Cause by the Company
.  The Company may terminate Executive's employment hereunder at any time without Cause (as defined in Section 5.2) upon not less than fourteen (14) days prior written notice from the Company to Executive.  The effective date of Executive's termination shall be referred to herein as the "Termination Date."  If Executive's employment is terminated by the Company pursuant to this Section 5.1, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that the Company shall pay Executive all amounts owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash
5.1.1.
                    
The Severance Package
value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date.  In addition, provided that Executive first executes a general release in a form and of a scope acceptable to the Company, the Company shall provide the following severance benefits (the "Severance Package"):
                                               
A lump sum payment (the "Severance Payment") in the following amount:
(a)
                                 
An amount equal to Executive's Base Salary through the end of the twelve (12) month period commencing on the Termination Date; plus
(i)
                                    
An amount equal to the average bonus, if any, paid by the Company to Executive with respect to the two (2) years preceding the year in which the Termination Date occurs, provided that, for purposes of this paragraph only, Executive shall be deemed to have received his 35 percent bonus target for any year within such 2-year period in which Executive was not paid a bonus solely because he was not employed by the Company.  Attached at Exhibit D is a series of examples of the manner in which this portion of the Severance Payment shall be calculated.
(ii)
                                 
Immediate vesting of fifty (50) percent of any unvested portion of the Execution Stock Option granted pursuant to Section 4.3 of this Agreement.
(b)
                                
Payment of the costs associated with continuing the benefits which Executive is entitled to receive pursuant to Section 4.4 of this Agreement at the level in effect as of the Termination Date (subject to any employee contribution requirements applicable to Executive on the Termination Date) through the twelve (12) month period commencing on the Termination Date, to the extent such benefits may continue beyond the Termination Date (for example, among other things, Executive's coverage under the Company's life and disability insurance policies will terminate as of the Termination Date).
(c)
                                 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent the Company reasonably determines that any portion of the Severance Package is subject to Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code, payment of any such portion of the Severance Package subject to Section 409A shall (i) to the extent required, be delayed for a period of six months from the Termination Date or (ii) to the extent permitted under subsequent guidance from the Internal Revenue Service, be otherwise made to comply with such Section 409A requirements.
(d)
                                
 
.  For purposes of this Section 5.1, a "termination without Cause" shall be deemed to occur in the event any of the following occurs and Executive provides to the Company Notice of Termination (as defined in Section 5.6) within forty-five (45) days thereafter:
5.1.2.
                    
Deemed Termination
The Company substantially reduces or diminishes Executive's responsibilities or title without Cause;
(a)
                              
The Company reduces Executive's Base Salary or bonus target (other than in connection with a Company-wide decrease in salary or bonus, respectively);
(b)
                             
The Company materially breaches any of its obligations to Executive pursuant to this Agreement, and fails to cure such breach within 30 days of receipt of notice thereof;
(c)
                              
The Company relocates Executive's place of employment without Executive's written consent by a distance of more than fifty (50) miles, excluding any relocation to the Company's existing offices in Woburn, MA; or
(d)
                             
A successor in interest to the Company fails to assume the obligations of this Agreement.
(e)
                        
. In the event that Executive's employment is terminated or is deemed to terminate pursuant to this Section 5.1 within one year of the latest possible date of a Change of Control, in addition to the Severance Package, any Stock Option held as of the Termination Date shall become immediately exercisable as to all option shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate. For purposes of this Agreement, any one of the following events shall be considered a "Change of Control" of the Company:
5.1.3
                       
Accelerated Vesting in Change of Control
The acquisition by any "person" (as such term is defined in Section 3(a)(9) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) of any amount of the Company's Common Stock so that such person holds or controls fifty percent (50%) or more of the Company's Common Stock;
(a)
                        
the merger or consolidation of the Company with or into any other entity in which the holders of the Company's outstanding shares of capital stock immediately before such merger or consolidation do not, immediately after such merger or consolidation, retain capital stock representing a majority of the voting power of the surviving entity of such merger or consolidation;
(b)
                       
 
a sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company to a third party;
(c)
                        
within any twenty-four (24) month period, the election by the stockholders of the Company of twenty percent (50%) or more of the directors of the Company other than pursuant to nomination by the Company's management; or
(d)
                       
the execution of a legally binding, definitive agreement approved by the Board of Directors providing for any of the events set forth in (a), (b), (c) or (d) above.
(e)
                        
.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, Executive's employment hereunder may be terminated by the Company at any time for Cause.  For purposes of this Agreement, "Cause" shall mean: (i) Executive's arbitrary, unreasonable, or willful failure to follow the reasonable instructions of the CEO or otherwise perform Executive's duties hereunder (other than as a result of a Disability (as defined in Section 5.3)) for thirty (30) days after a written demand for performance is delivered to Executive on behalf of the Company which demand specifically identifies the manner in which the Company alleges that Executive has not substantially followed such instructions or otherwise performed Executive's duties; (ii) Executive's willful misconduct that is materially injurious to the Company (whether from a monetary perspective or otherwise); (iii) Executive's willful commission of an act constituting fraud with respect to the Company; (iv) conviction of Executive for a felony under the laws of the United States or any state thereof; or (v) Executive's material breach of Executive's obligations under Section 6 hereof or under the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement in the form attached hereto as Exhibit E, to be executed by Executive as of the Execution Date (the "NDA").
5.2.
                             
For Cause by the Company
If Executive's employment is terminated by the Company for Cause, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that the Company shall pay Executive all amounts owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date.
.  Subject to the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act, Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 151B and any other applicable laws, Executive's employment hereunder may be terminated by the Company at any time in the event of the Disability of Executive.  For purposes of this Agreement, "Disability" shall mean the inability of Executive to perform the essential functions of Executive's position, with or without reasonable accommodation, due to physical or mental disablement which continues for a period of four (4) consecutive months during the Employment Term, as determined by an
5.3.
                             
Disability
independent qualified physician mutually acceptable to the Company and Executive (or Executive's personal representative) or, if the Company and Executive (or such representative) are unable to agree on an independent qualified physician, as determined by a panel of three physicians, one designated by the Company, one designated by Executive (or such representative) and one designated by the two physicians so designated.  If Executive's employment is terminated by the Company for Disability, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that (a) the Company shall pay Executive all amounts owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, (b) provided that Executive first executes a general release in a form and of a scope acceptable to the Company, Executive shall be entitled to the Severance Package, except that the lump sum based on Executive's Base salary paid as a part of the Severance Package shall be reduced by the amount of Base Salary, salary continuation (short-term disability), and cash disability benefits (long-term disability) paid to Executive for the corresponding period under the Company's employee benefit plans as then in effect, and any Stock Option held as of the Termination Date shall become immediately exercisable as to all option shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate.
                                               
.  Executive's employment hereunder shall automatically terminate in the event of Executive's death.  If Executive's employment is terminated by the death of Executive, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that (a) the Company shall pay to Executive's estate or legal representative all amounts owed to Executive for work performed through the last day of Executive's actual employment by the Company plus the Severance Package, and (b) any Stock Option held as of the Termination Date shall become immediately exercisable as to all option shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate.
5.4.
                             
Death
.  Executive's employment hereunder may be terminated by Executive at any time upon not less than Sixty (60) days prior written notice from Executive to the Company.  Executive agrees that such notice period is reasonable and necessary in light of the duties assumed by Executive pursuant to this Agreement and fair in light of the consideration Executive is receiving pursuant to this Agreement.  If Executive terminates Executive's employment with the Company pursuant to this Section 5.5, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that the Company shall pay Executive all amounts owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO as of the Termination Date.
5.5.
                             
Termination by Executive
 
.  Any purported termination of employment by the Company or by Executive shall be communicated by written Notice of Termination to the other Party in accordance with Section 8 hereof.  For purposes of this Agreement, a "Notice of Termination" shall mean a notice which shall indicate the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon and shall set forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of employment under the provision so indicated.
5.6.
                             
Notice of Termination
.  The provisions of Section 6 shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
5.7.
                             
Survival
6.             .
Confidentiality
.  As used herein, the term "Confidential Information" shall mean any and all ideas, inventions, information, know-how, compounds, materials and other items (whether patentable or not) that are confidential or proprietary to the Company (or to its affiliates, collaborators, consultants, suppliers, or customers) whether disclosed in written, oral, tangible or other form and whether or not labeled or otherwise identified as confidential or proprietary.  Confidential Information shall include, without limitation, the following to the extent proprietary to the Company (or to its affiliates, collaborators, consultants, suppliers or customers) and not publicly available:
6.1.
                             
Definitions
inventions, trade secrets, discoveries and computer programs, and any improvements or modifications thereto;
(a)
                                 
engineering, research, development and design projects, data, designs, drawings and specifications;
(b)
                                
manufacturing, development and other technical processes, applications, methods, apparatus and equipment;
(c)
                                 
business information such as lists of approved components and sources, price lists, product costs, production schedules, business plans, sales information, profit and loss information, and customer and collaborator lists;
(d)
                                
any and all reagents, substances, chemical compounds, subcellular constituents, cells or cell lines, organisms and progeny, and mutants, as well as any and all derivatives or replications derived from or relating to such materials; and
(e)
                                 
any and all information, materials and other items supplied by third parties to the Company (or generated by the Company for third parties) under an obligation of confidentiality.
(f)
                                   
 
.  Executive shall not at any time (whether during or after Executive's employment with the Company) disclose or use any Confidential Information for Executive's own benefit or purposes or the benefit or purposes of any other person, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation or other organization, entity or enterprise (a "Person") other than the Company.
6.2.
                             
Non-Disclosure
.  Notwithstanding any other provision in the Agreement, Confidential Information shall not include any information or material which:
6.3.
                             
Exceptions
is or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of disclosure thereof by Executive;
(a)
                                 
is lawfully received by Executive on a non-confidential basis from a third party that is not itself under an obligation of confidentiality or non-disclosure to the Company with respect to such information;
(b)
                                
can be shown by Executive to have been independently developed by Executive;
(c)
                                 
Executive establishes by competent proof was in Executive's possession at the time of disclosure by the Company and was not acquired, directly or indirectly from the Company; or
(d)
                                
is required to be publicly disclosed by law or by regulation; provided, however, that in such event Executive shall provide the Company with prompt advance notice of such disclosure so that the Company has the opportunity if it so desires to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy.
(e)
                                 
.  Executive agrees that upon termination of Executive's employment hereunder, Executive shall return immediately to the Company any proprietary materials, any materials containing Confidential Information and any other Company property then in Executive's possession or under Executive's control, including, without limitation all notes, drawings, lists, memoranda, magnetic disks or tapes, or other recording media containing such Confidential Information, whether alone or together with non-confidential information, all documents, reports, files, memoranda, records, software, credit cards, door and file keys, telephones, PDAs, computers, computer access codes, disks and instructional manuals, or any other physical property that Executive received, prepared, or helped prepare in connection with Executive's employment under this Agreement.  Upon termination, Executive shall not retain any copies, duplicates, reproductions, or excerpts of Confidential Information, nor shall Executive show or give any of the above to any third party.  Executive further agrees that Executive shall not retain or use for Executive's account at any time any trade name, trademark, service mark, logo or other proprietary business designation used or owned in connection with the business of the Company.
6.4.
                             
Return of Company Property
 
.  Executive acknowledges and agrees that the Company's remedies at law for a breach or threatened breach of any of the provisions of Section 6 would be inadequate and, in recognition of this fact, Executive agrees that, in the event of such a breach or threatened breach, in addition to any remedies at law, the Company, without posting any bond, shall be entitled to obtain equitable relief in the form of specific performance, temporary restraining orders, temporary or permanent injunctions or any other equitable remedy which may then be available.
7.
                                      
Specific Performance
.  Any notice hereunder by either Party to the other shall be given in writing by personal delivery, telex, facsimile, overnight courier or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed, if to the Company, to the attention of the CEO with a copy to the General Counsel at the Company's executive offices or to such other address as the Company may designate in writing at any time or from time to time to Executive, and if to Executive, to Executive's most recent address on file with the Company.  Notice shall be deemed given, if by personal delivery or by overnight courier, on the date of such delivery or, if by telex or facsimile, on the business day following receipt of answer back or facsimile information or, if by certified mail, on the date shown on the applicable return receipt.
8.
                                      
Notices
.  This Agreement may not be assigned by either Party without the prior written consent of the other Party, provided, however, that the Company may assign this Agreement without Executive's consent in the event of a merger, acquisition, or transfer of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company with or to a third party (a "Merger").  In the event of a Merger, the Company shall require any successor Person to assume and agree to perform this Agreement; failure to so assume and agree shall constitute a deemed termination for purposes of Section 5.1.2(e).
9.
                                      
Assignment
.  The NDA and this Agreement constitute the entire agreement between the Parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and there have been no oral or other agreements of any kind whatsoever as a condition precedent or inducement to the signing of this Agreement or otherwise concerning this Agreement or the subject matter hereof.  In the event there is any conflict between this Agreement and the NDA, this Agreement shall prevail.
10.
                                
Entire Agreement
.  The Parties shall each pay their own respective expenses incident to the enforcement or interpretation of, or dispute resolution with respect to, this Agreement, including all fees and expenses of their counsel for all activities of such counsel undertaken pursuant to this Agreement, provided, however, that in the event Executive is the prevailing Party in any judicial or arbitral proceeding relating to this Agreement, the Company shall reimburse Executive for all reasonable costs, fees and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) incurred by Executive in connection with such proceeding.
11.
                                
Expenses
.  In the event any dispute should arise between the Parties with respect to any of the terms and conditions of this Agreement, then, at the initiation of either Party, such dispute shall be submitted and finally settled by arbitration in Boston, Massachusetts under the rules of the Employment Disputes Rules of the American Arbitration
12.
                                
Arbitration
Association by an arbitrator selected by the American Arbitration Association.  The dispute shall be determined in accordance with Section 18 of this Agreement, except with respect to issues of arbitrability, which shall be governed by the Federal Arbitration Act, 9 U.S.C. Secs. 1-16, and not state law.  The arbitrator shall allow such discovery as is appropriate to the purposes of arbitration in accomplishing a fair, speedy and cost-effective resolution of the dispute.  If any Party fails to participate in the arbitration proceedings, the arbitrator may proceed to decision based on expedited written submissions by the participating Party.  The award rendered by the arbitrator shall be nonappealable, final and binding upon the Parties, and judgment upon the award rendered may be entered by either Party in any court of competent jurisdiction.  The Parties agree not to institute any litigation or proceedings against each other in connection with this Agreement except as provided in this Section 12, provided, however, that either Party shall have the right to seek injunctive relief or other provisional remedies in any federal or state court of competent jurisdiction in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
                                               
.  Any waiver of any terms or conditions of this Agreement shall not operate as a waiver of any other breach of such terms or conditions or any other term or condition, nor shall any failure to enforce any provision hereof operate as a waiver of such provision or of any other provision hereof; provided, however, that no such written waiver, unless it, by its own terms, explicitly provides to the contrary, shall be construed to effect a continuing waiver of the provision being waived and no such waiver in any instance shall constitute a waiver in any other instance or for any other purpose or impair the right of the Party against whom such waiver is claimed in all other instances or for all other purposes to require full compliance with such provision.  Each of the Parties agrees to execute all such further instruments and documents and to take all such further action as the other Party may reasonably require in order to effectuate the terms and purposes of this Agreement.
13.
                                
Waivers and Further Agreements
.  This Agreement may not be amended, nor shall any waiver, change, modification, consent or discharge be effected except by an instrument in writing executed by both Parties.
14.
                                
Amendments
.  If any provision of this Agreement shall be held or deemed to be, or shall in fact be, invalid, inoperative or unenforceable as applied to any particular case in any jurisdiction or jurisdictions, or in all jurisdictions or in all cases, because of the conflict of any provision with any constitution or statute or rule of public policy or for any other reason, such circumstance shall not have the effect of rendering the provision or provisions in question invalid, inoperative or unenforceable in any other jurisdiction or in any other case or circumstance or of rendering any other provision or provisions herein contained invalid, inoperative or unenforceable to the extent that such other provisions are not themselves actually in conflict with such constitution, statute or rule of public policy, but this Agreement shall be reformed and construed in any such jurisdiction or case as if such invalid, inoperative or unenforceable provision had never been contained herein and such provision reformed so that it would be valid, operative and enforceable to the maximum extent permitted in such jurisdiction or in such case.
15.
                                
Severability
 
.  This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
16.
                                
Counterparts
.  The headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not in any way affect the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.
17.
                                
Section Headings
.  This Agreement shall be governed by and construed and enforced in accordance with the law (other than the law governing conflict of law questions) of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
18.
                                
Governing Law
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Agreement as of the Execution Date.
 
 
 
The exercise price of the Execution Stock Option is the Fair Market Value of ArQule's Common Stock (as defined below) as of the Effective Date as defined in Section 1 of the Employment Agreement between the Company and Executive.
The Fair Market Value of ArQule's Common Stock shall be the closing price of the Common Stock as reported by the NASDAQ National Market on the trading day immediately prior to the date of the commencement of Executive's employment with the Company.
 
Pursuant to Section 5.1.1(a)(ii), the portion of the Executive's Severance Payment based on bonuses ("Bonus Severance") awarded to Executive, if any, would be calculated in the following manner:
 Executive terminated in year one of employment.
Example #1
Bonus Severance = 35% (average of 35% deemed amount for two-year lookback period where Executive did not work for the Company).
 Executive awarded a 30% bonus for year one of employment, terminated during year 2.
Example #2
Bonus Severance = 32.5% (average 30% Year 1 award and 35% deemed amount for the year during the two-year lookback period where Executive did not work for the Company).
 Executive awarded a 30% bonus for year one of employment, a 0% for year 2 of employment, terminated during year 3.
Example #3
Bonus Severance = 15% (average of year 1 and year 2 bonuses actually awarded).
In consideration of my employment or continued employment by ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation, and its successors, subsidiaries, and affiliates (collectively, the "Company"), and for other valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, I agree as follows:
1.
              
Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials
I understand that the Company continually obtains and develops valuable proprietary and confidential information concerning its business, business relationships, and financial affairs (as further defined below, the "Confidential Information") and valuable Proprietary Materials (as defined below) which may become known to me in connection with my employment.
I acknowledge that all Proprietary Materials and all Confidential Information are and shall remain the exclusive property of the Company or of the third party providing such Proprietary Materials or Confidential Information to me or the Company.  By way of illustration, but not limitation, Confidential Information may include Inventions (as defined below), trade secrets, technical information, know-how, research and development activities of the Company, product and marketing plans, customer and supplier information, and information disclosed to the Company or to me by third parties of a proprietary or confidential nature or under an obligation of confidence.  Confidential Information is contained in various media, including without limitation, patent applications, computer programs in object and/or source code, flow charts and other program documentation, manuals, plans, drawings, designs, technical specifications, laboratory notebooks, supplier and customer information, internal financial data, and other documents and records of the Company, whether or not in writing and whether or not labeled or identified as confidential or proprietary.  As used in this Agreement "Proprietary Materials" shall include, without limitation: any and all reagents, substances, chemical compounds, subcellular constituents, cells or cell lines, organisms and progeny, and mutants, as well as any and all derivatives or replications derived from or relating to such materials.
I agree that I shall not, during the term of my employment and thereafter, publish, disclose, or otherwise make available to any third party, other than employees of the Company, any Confidential Information or Proprietary Materials except as expressly authorized in writing by the Company.  I agree that I shall use such Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials only in the performance of my duties for the Company and in accordance with any Company policies regarding the protection of Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials.  I agree not to use such Confidential Information or Proprietary Materials for my own benefit or for the benefit of any person or business entity other than the Company.
I agree to exercise all reasonable precautions to protect the integrity and confidentiality of Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials in my possession.  I further agree not to remove any Proprietary Materials or materials containing Confidential Information from the Company's premises except to the extent necessary to my employment. Upon the termination of
 
my employment, or at any time upon the Company's request, I shall return immediately to the Company any and all Proprietary Materials and any materials containing any Confidential Information then in my possession or under my control.
Confidential Information shall not include information that (a) is or becomes generally known within the Company's industry through no fault of mine; (b) was known to me at the time it was disclosed as evidenced by my written records at the time of disclosure; or (c) is lawfully and in good faith made available to me by a third party who did not derive it from the Company and who imposes no obligation of confidence on me.
2.
              
Assignment of Inventions
I agree promptly to disclose to the Company any and all ideas, concepts, discoveries, inventions, developments, original works of authorship, software programs, software and systems documentation, trade secrets, technical data, know-how, and Proprietary Materials that relate, directly or indirectly, to the business of the Company or that arise out of my employment with the Company and that are conceived, devised, invented, developed, or reduced to practice or tangible medium by me, under my direction, or jointly by me and others during any period that I am employed or engaged by the Company, whether or not during normal working hours or on the premises of the Company ("Inventions").
I hereby assign to the Company all of my right, title, and interest to the Inventions and any and all related patent rights, copyrights, and applications and registrations for such patent rights and copyrights.  During and after my employment, I shall cooperate with the Company, at the Company's expense, in obtaining proprietary protection for the Inventions and I shall execute all documents that the Company shall reasonably request in order to perfect the Company's rights in the Inventions.  I hereby appoint the Company my attorney to execute and deliver any such documents on my behalf in the event I should fail or refuse to do so within a reasonable period of time following the Company's request.  I understand that, to the extent this Agreement shall be construed in accordance with the laws of any state that limits the assignability to the Company of certain employee inventions, this Agreement shall be interpreted not to apply to any such invention that a court rules or the Company agrees is subject to such state limitation.
I further represent that the attached contains a complete list of all inventions made, conceived, or first reduced to practice by me, under my direction, or jointly by me and others prior to my employment with the Company ("Prior Inventions") and that are not assigned to the Company under the terms of this Agreement. If there are no Prior Inventions listed in , I represent that there are no such Prior Inventions.
Schedule A
Schedule A
3.
              
Other Business Relationships
I hereby represent to the Company that, except as identified on , I am not bound by any agreement or any other previous or existing business relationship that conflicts with or prevents the full performance of my duties and obligations to the Company (including my duties and obligations under this or any other agreement with the Company) during my employment, such as confidentiality agreements or covenants restricting future employment.
Schedule B
2
 
I understand that the Company does not desire to acquire from me any trade secrets, know-how, or confidential business information that I may have acquired from others. Therefore, I agree that during my employment with the Company, I will not improperly use or disclose any proprietary information or trade secrets of any former or concurrent employer, or any other person or entity with whom I have an agreement or to whom I owe a duty to keep such information in confidence.  Those persons or entities with whom I have such agreements or to whom I owe such a duty are identified on .
Schedule B
4.
              
Non-Solicitation of Employees; Non-Competition
I acknowledge the highly competitive nature of the business of the Company and its affiliates, and accordingly agree as follows:
During my employment with the Company or any of its affiliates and for a period of one (1) year thereafter, I will not directly or indirectly, alone or through any other organization or entity, including without limitation becoming an employee, investor (except as provided below), officer, agent, partner or director of any such organization or entity, engage in any activity that competes with the business of the Company and its affiliates ("Competitive Activity").  For purposes of this Agreement, Competitive Activity means all business activities of the Company and its affiliates worldwide.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, I will not be deemed to be engaged directly or indirectly in any Competitive Activity if I participate in any such business solely (a) as a passive investor in up to one percent (1%) of the equity securities of a company or partnership, or (b) in connection with full time academic duties with an academic institution.
A.
                                  
During my employment with the Company or any of its affiliates and for a period of one (1) year thereafter, I will not directly or indirectly: (a) solicit, divert or take away, or attempt to divert or take away, the business or patronage of any of the clients, customers or accounts, or prospective clients, customers or accounts of the Company or its affiliates with whom the Company or its affiliates has or is actively negotiating a written agreement as of the date as of which my employment with the Company or any of its affiliates terminates (the "Separation Date"); (b) recruit, solicit or hire any person who is, or within the six (6) month period preceding the Separation Date was, an officer, director or employee of the Company or any of its affiliates or was a scientific consultant with an exclusive arrangement with the Company or any of its affiliates; or (c) induce or attempt to induce any officer, director, employee consultant, agent or representative of the Company or any of its affiliates to discontinue his or her relationship with the Company or any of its affiliates or to commence an employment or other business relationship with another entity.
B.
                                    
Your failure to comply with the requirements in this paragraph may result in termination for cause.
3
 
5.
              
No Obligation of Continued Employment
I understand that this Agreement does not constitute a contract of employment or create an obligation on the part of the Company to continue my employment with the Company.  I understand that my employment is "at will" and that my obligations under this Agreement shall not be diminished by any change in my position, title, or function with, or compensation by, the Company.
6.
              
Miscellaneous
This Agreement may be assigned by the Company to (a) any entity controlled by, controlling or under common control with the Company or (b) to any successor of its business to which this Agreement relates (whether by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise).  I may not assign or transfer any of my rights or obligations under this Agreement.  This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the parties and their respective successors and other legal representatives, including, to the extent permitted by the terms of this Agreement, their assignees.
This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter of this Agreement.  This Agreement may be changed only by a written instrument signed by both parties.
In the event that any one or more of the provisions contained in this Agreement shall, for any reason, be held to be invalid, illegal, or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability shall not affect any other provisions of this Agreement, and all other provisions shall remain in full force and effect.  If any of the provisions of this Agreement is held to be excessively broad, it shall be reformed and construed by limiting and reducing it so as to be enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by law.  I agree that should I violate any obligation imposed on me in this Agreement, I shall continue to be bound by the obligation until a period equal to the term of such obligation has expired without violation of such obligation.
No delay or omission by the Company in exercising any right under this Agreement will operate as a waiver of that or any other right.  A waiver or consent given by the Company on any occasion is effective only in that instance and will not be construed as a bar to or waiver of any right on any other occasion.
I acknowledge that the restrictions contained in this Agreement are necessary for the protection of the business and goodwill of the Company and are reasonable for such purpose. I agree that any breach of this Agreement by me will cause irreparable damage to the Company and that in the event of such breach, the Company shall be entitled, in addition to monetary damages and to any other remedies available to the Company under this Agreement and at law, to equitable relief, including injunctive relief, and to payment by myself of all costs incurred by the Company in enforcing the provisions of this Agreement, including reasonable attorneys fees.
This Agreement shall be construed as a sealed instrument and shall in all events and for all purposes be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts without regard to any choice of law principle that would dictate the application of the laws of another jurisdiction.  Any action, suit, or other legal proceeding I may commence
4
 
in order to resolve any matter arising under or relating to any provision of this Agreement shall be commenced only in a court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts (or, if appropriate, a federal court located within Massachusetts), and I hereby consent to the jurisdiction of such court with respect to any action, suit, or proceeding commenced in such court by the Company.
I HAVE READ ALL OF THE PROVISIONS OF THIS AGREEMENT AND I UNDERSTAND, AND AGREE TO, EACH OF SUCH PROVISIONS.
 
Acknowledged and agreed to by:
 
5
 
The following is a complete list of all Prior Inventions:
 
If I am claiming any Prior Inventions above, I agree that, if in the course of my employment with the Company, I incorporate into a Company product, process, or machine a Prior Invention owned by me or in which I have an interest, the Company shall automatically be granted and shall have a nonexclusive, royalty-free, irrevocable, transferable, perpetual worldwide license, with the right to grant sublicenses, to make, have made, modify, use, and sell such Prior Invention as part of, or in connection with, such product, process, or machine.
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced the appointment of Dr. Nigel J. Rulewski as chief medical officer.  Dr. Rulewski was previously senior vice president of BioAccelerate Holding Inc., a pharmaceutical development organization.  He brings to ArQule more than two decades of experience in clinical research, product development, regulatory affairs, commercialization, corporate planning and licensing activities.
Woburn, MA, August 1, 2006 
"Dr. Rulewski has held leadership roles in developing, registering and managing new products for a number of internationally recognized companies," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule. "His extensive experience and expertise, particularly in the field of oncology, will serve ArQule well as we advance our current clinical development programs along clinical and regulatory pathways and as we evaluate pre-clinical candidates for introduction into clinical testing."
At BioAccelerate Holding, Dr. Rulewski was responsible for all aspects of licensing and product development in the oncology area.  As vice president, medical affairs and chief medical officer at Astra USA, Dr. Rulewski negotiated the approval of eight New Drug Applications (NDAs) and had responsibility for all issues pertaining to drug development in the U.S., including interactions with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA).  He previously served as medical director at Serono Laboratories, where he managed three research groups, medical information and drug safety.  He was also associate medical director and medical director, international operations, at Fisons Corporation.
Dr. Rulewski practiced medicine in the United Kingdom following his graduation from St. Bartholomew's Hospital Medical School, University of London.  He has lived in the United States since 1987 and is a permanent resident in the U.S.
ArQule/2
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms.  The first of these, Activated Checkpoint Therapy
SM
 (ACT), is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. ArQule's second cancer platform, Cancer Survival Protein modulation, has generated a clinical-stage product designed to inhibit a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results, including results of ongoing and anticipated clinical trials, may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, research and development efforts and the general business environment, including without limitation: compounds in clinical trials based on the ACT platform or other, proprietary platforms may not prove to be safe or efficacious; current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and the commencement of anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the results of clinical trials may be disappointing and not lead to commercial products; preclinical efforts associated with the product pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the prescribed terms of the collaboration or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20060906152055.txt.gz
TIME:20060906152055
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported  
September 1, 2006
 
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
 
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
(Address of principal executive offices)
 
01801
(781) 994-0300
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
             
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
             
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
             
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
             
 
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
On September 1, 2006, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") engaged Richard H. Woodrich to serve as its Acting Chief Financial Officer on an interim basis.  The Registrant has put in place an executive search process to identify a permanent Chief Financial Officer.
Mr. Woodrich is President and CEO of Woodrich & Associates, Inc., a management consulting firm providing strategic consulting to the biotechnology industry.  Mr. Woodrich has more than twenty-five years of business experience in technology-based life science companies.  Prior to founding Woodrich & Associates, Mr. Woodrich held several senior management positions with emerging growth biotechnology companies. Mr. Woodrich served from 1999 to 2004 as the Senior Vice President, Business Development for Therion Biologics Corporation, a privately held biopharmaceutical company.  Previously, Mr. Woodrich served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of CytoMed, Inc. from 1995 until its acquisition in 1999.  From 1991 until its acquisition in 1995, Mr. Woodrich served as Senior Vice President, Finance and Administration, CFO and later as President and Director of Oculon Corporation.  Mr. Woodrich has served in financial management positions at Infinet, Inc., Applied bioTechnology, and Millipore Corporation. While serving as a Senior Accountant at Arthur Andersen & Co., Mr. Woodrich became a Certified Public Accountant.  Mr. Woodrich has a Bachelor of Science degree from Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute and a Masters in Business Administration from the Harvard University Graduate School of Business Administration.
In accordance with a previously disclosed plan, Louise A. Mawhinney, the Registrant's Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer, resigned effective September 1, 2006.
2
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20061018151350.txt.gz
TIME:20061018151350
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
(Zip code)
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
(b)  On October 12, 2006, Michael J. Astrue resigned as a member of the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant").  Mr. Astrue resigned from this and other corporate positions in order to return to public service.  He has been nominated by President George W. Bush to serve as Commissioner of Social Security for a six-year term beginning January 20, 2007.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date:  October 17, 2006


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20061027103229.txt.gz
TIME:20061027103229
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): October 26, 2006
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
19 Presidential Way Woburn, MA
(Address of principal executive offices)
01801
(Zip code)
(781) 994-0300
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 26, 2006, the Registrant issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2006.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
99.1   Text of Press Release dated October 26, 2006.
SIGNATURES
         Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date:  October 27, 2006
2

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
For Immediate Release:
ARQULE ANNOUNCES THIRD QUARTER FISCAL 2006 RESULTS
Conference call scheduled today at 9:00 a.m. eastern time
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today reported its results of operations for the fiscal quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2006.
Woburn, Mass., October 26, 2006
The Company reported a net loss of $15,322,000, or $0.43 per share, for the quarter ended September 30, 2006, compared to a net loss of $916,000, or $0.03 per share, for the quarter ended September 30, 2005.  For the nine-month period ended September 30, 2006, the Company reported a net loss of $18,610,000, or $0.52 per share, compared to a net loss of $4,787,000, or $0.14 per share, for the same period in 2005.
These results reflect discontinued operations related to the Company's termination of its chemistry services business on May 26, 2006.  As previously announced, ArQule exited this business upon the conclusion of its agreement with Pfizer in May 2006.  All line items discussed below, including prior period amounts, exclude the results of these discontinued operations.
The Company reported total revenues of $1,652,000 for both the quarter ended September 30, 2006 and the quarter ended September 30, 2005.  Revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2006 and September 30, 2005 were $4,956,000.
Research and development revenues in both the 2006 and 2005 periods related primarily to financial support from Hoffmann-La Roche for the Company's ongoing development of products in its E2F1 Activated Checkpoint Therapy
SM
 (ACT) program.
For the quarter ended September 30, 2006, the Company reported total costs and expenses of $18,298,000, compared to total costs and expenses of $8,020,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2005.  Total costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2006 were $43,343,000, compared to $24,961,000 for the same period in 2005.
1
 
The increase in costs and expenses in the 2006 periods compared to the 2005 periods relates primarily to costs incurred in connection with Phase 2 clinical trials with ARQ 501, the Company's lead E2F1 product, and a Phase 1 clinical trial with ARQ 197, the Company's small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.
ArQule ended the third quarter of fiscal 2006 with approximately $109,000,000 in cash and marketable securities.
ArQule Updates Financial Guidance
For 2006, as previously announced, ArQule expects total revenues from ongoing operations for the year to range between $6.5 and $7 million, primarily related to the partnership with Roche.  Net use of cash is now expected to range between $50 and $56 million, a decrease from the previous range of between $53 and $59 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $33 and $39 million, and net loss per share is expected to range between $0.93 and $1.10 for the year.  ArQule therefore expects to end 2006 with between $85 and $90 million in cash and marketable securities, an increase from the previous range of between $82 and $88 million.
Clinical Update
"Year to date, we have achieved measurable progress in our clinical development programs," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.  "We have now initiated patient enrollment in three Phase 2 clinical trials with ARQ 501 and in a Phase 1 clinical trial with ARQ 197.
"Our clinical centers have enrolled 32 patients in the first of the Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501, as monotherapy in leiomyosarcoma," said Dr. Hill.  "Twenty-two patients have been enrolled in the second Phase 2 trial, with ARQ 501 in combination with gemcitabine, to treat pancreatic cancer," said Dr. Hill.  "Patient recruitment in the third Phase 2 trial with this compound, as monotherapy in head and neck cancer, was initiated recently, and ten patients have been enrolled.
"With respect to ARQ 197, patient recruitment is continuing in a Phase 1 dose escalation trial," said Dr. Hill.  "Thirty-five patients have been treated with ARQ 197 at doses ranging from 20 to 300 milligrams per day.  Dose escalation will continue until we identify a recommended Phase 2 dose for this compound.
"Additionally, we have submitted an IND (Investigational New Drug application) for a second-generation E2F1 compound, ARQ 171," said Dr. Hill.  "Pending its acceptance by the FDA, we would be in a position to initiate a Phase 1 trial with this compound by the end of 2006.
2
 EORTC-NCI-AACR International Conference on Molecular Targets and Cancer Therapeutics, to be held in Prague from November 7  10.  At this conference, we will be presenting data from our Phase 1B trial with ARQ 501 in combination with docetaxel, as well as initial data from our ongoing Phase 1 trial with ARQ 197."
"Finally, we are continuing to present clinical data from our programs in peer-reviewed forums," said Dr. Hill. "The next of these will be the 18
th
Board of Directors Update
Michael J. Astrue has resigned as a member of the board of directors of ArQule. Mr. Astrue resigned from this and other corporate positions in order to return to public service.  He has been nominated by President George W. Bush to serve as Commissioner of Social Security for a six-year term beginning January 20, 2007.
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer, and Richard H. Woodrich, interim chief financial officer, will lead the call.
 
Conference Call Numbers
 
39147520.
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing 888.286.8010 from the U.S. and Canada, and 617.801.6888 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms.  The first of these, Activated Checkpoint Therapy
SM
 (ACT), is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based
3
on the E2F1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. ArQule's second cancer platform, Cancer Survival Protein modulation, has generated a clinical-stage product designed to inhibit a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ArQule. ArQule and its representatives may from time to time make written or oral forward-looking statements, including statements contained in this press release. Generally, the words "believe," "expect," "intend," "estimate," "anticipate," "will" and similar expressions identify forward-looking statements. All statements which address operating performance, events or developments that ArQule expects or anticipates will occur in the future, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, research, development and commercialization of its products and anticipated trends in its business are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Reform Act. Actual results, including results of ongoing and anticipated clinical trials, may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements or historical performance due to numerous risks and uncertainties that exist in ArQule's operations, research and development efforts and the general business environment, including without limitation: compounds in clinical trials based on the ACT platform or other, proprietary platforms may not prove to be safe or efficacious; current and future clinical studies may encounter enrollment difficulties and the commencement of anticipated clinical trials may be delayed or the trials may never commence; the results of clinical trials may be disappointing and not lead to commercial products; preclinical efforts associated with the product pipeline may fail or prove disappointing; animal xenograft preclinical studies may be unpredictive of human response; collaborators may terminate their agreements with ArQule because ArQule may fail to satisfy the prescribed terms of the collaboration or for other reasons; and, the risks and uncertainties described in ArQule's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  The forward-looking statements contained herein represent the judgment of ArQule as of the date of this report. ArQule disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
4
 
 
 
 
5


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20061121171416.txt.gz
TIME:20061121171416
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(Zip code)
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
(b)  On November 17, 2006, Tuan Ha-Ngoc resigned as a member of the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant").  Mr. Ha-Ngoc is President and Chief Executive Officer of AVEO Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a biopharmaceutical company engaged in the discovery and development of novel cancer therapeutics.
A press release dated November 21, 2006 announcing Mr. Ha Ngoc's departure is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Section 9 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
99.1   Text of Press Release dated November 21, 2006.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date:  November 21, 2006

 
Exhibit 99.1
William B. Boni VP, Investor Relations/ Corp. Communications (781) 994-0300 www.ArQule.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced the resignation of Tuan Ha-Ngoc, a director of the company, effective November 17, 2006.  Mr. Ha-Ngoc is president and chief executive officer of AVEO Pharmaceuticals Inc. Because both ArQule and AVEO are engaged in oncology-focused drug discovery and development, Mr. Ha-Ngoc decided that it was an appropriate time for him to step down from the board of ArQule.
Woburn, MA, November 21, 2006 
"Tuan Ha-Ngoc's distinguished tenure on the board of ArQule has coincided with the company's transition to a clinical-stage research and development-based company from a chemical services business," said Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.  "He leaves the board of ArQule with my sincere thanks and with the best wishes of the entire board and management of our company."
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms.  The first of these, Activated Checkpoint Therapy
SM
 (ACT), is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. ArQule's second cancer platform, Cancer Survival Protein modulation, has generated a clinical-stage product designed to inhibit a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070119172203.txt.gz
TIME:20070119172203
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): January 16, 2007
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
19 Presidential Way Woburn, MA
(Address of principal executive offices)
01801
(Zip code)
(781) 994-0300
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
            Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
            Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
            Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(d)   On January 16, 2007, Michael D. Loberg, Ph.D. was appointed to the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant").  Dr. Loberg will serve on the Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee of the Board of Directors.  There was no arrangement or understanding between Dr. Loberg and the Registrant (or any other person known to the Registrant) pursuant to which Dr. Loberg was appointed.  Dr. Loberg will serve on the Registrant's Board of Directors until its 2007 Annual Meeting of Stockholders, at which time the Registrant anticipates that Dr. Loberg will be nominated to serve for an additional term.
Under the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan upon election as a director Dr. Loberg was automatically granted an option to purchase 20,000 shares of the Registrant's common stock. This option becomes exercisable as to 6,668 shares on the date of the Registrant's next annual meeting of stockholders following the date of grant and as to 6,666 shares on the date of each of the next two annual meetings of stockholders, so long as the director remains in office.  Should he continue to serve on the Registrant's board immediately after each annual meeting of stockholders he will receive an automatic grant of an option to purchase 10,000 shares of common stock.  This option is fully exercisable on the date of grant. All options referred to in this paragraph have a term of ten years and an exercise price equal to the closing price of the Registrant's common stock as reported by the NASDAQ Stock Market on the date of grant.
As a non-employee director, if Dr. Loberg is serving as a director prior to and immediately following any annual meeting of the Registrant's stockholders, he will receive a $10,000 annual retainer. He will also receive $2,000 for each day he attends a meeting of directors. Under the Registrant's 2005 Director Stock Compensation Plan, Dr. Loberg, as a non-employee director, may elect to receive all or part of his compensation for service as a director in the form of common stock in lieu of such cash fees.
Dr. Loberg served as president and chief executive officer of Nitromed from 2003 to 2006, and as chief executive officer from 1997 to 2003.  Previously, he served in a number of senior management positions at Bristol-Myers Squibb from 1979 to 1997, including president of the Oncology and Immunology, U.S. Primary Care, Northern Europe, Specialty Pharmaceuticals and Squibb Diagnostics divisions.
Dr. Loberg is also a director of Advanced Magnetics, Inc., Kereos and Inotek.  He holds a B.S. in chemistry from Trinity College and a Ph.D. in chemistry from Washington University.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
99.1         Text of Press Release announcing the appointment of Dr. Loberg dated January 17, 2007.
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
January 19, 2007
3

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced that Michael D. Loberg, Ph.D., has been named to its board of directors.  Dr. Loberg brings 27 years of senior management and drug development experience to ArQule, including leadership positions at NitroMed, Inc. and Bristol Myers Squibb Company.
Woburn, MA, January 17, 2007 
"Michael Loberg offers a strong combination of expertise in product development and commercialization in international markets," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.  "He is both a scientist and an entrepreneur who understands the field of oncology and the challenges faced by emerging biotechnology companies as therapeutic products move from research into clinical development and toward commercialization."
Dr. Loberg served as president and chief executive officer of Nitromed from 2003 to 2006, and as chief executive officer of that company from 1997 to 2003.  Previously, he served in a number of senior management positions at Bristol-Myers Squibb (BMS) from 1979 to 1997, including president of the Oncology and Immunology, U.S. Primary Care, Northern Europe, Specialty Pharmaceuticals and Squibb Diagnostics divisions.
Dr. Loberg is also a director of Advanced Magnetics, Inc., Kereos and Inotek.  He holds a B.S. in chemistry from Trinity College and a Ph.D. in chemistry from Washington University.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy
SM
 (ACT).  The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product designed to inhibit a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit
www.arqule.com
.
# # #


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070201164637.txt.gz
TIME:20070201164637
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Section 1  Registrant's Business and Operations
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On January 26, 2007, ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule" or the "Registrant") entered into a sponsored research agreement (the "Research Agreement") with Boston Biomedical, Inc. ("BBI").  Pursuant to the Research Agreement, BBI will render research services relating to the Registrant's drug development programs.  BBI has committed to provide specified levels of scientific personnel in support of the research program through September 30, 2007.
ArQule will pay BBI on a month-to-month basis up to $4.96 million over the course of the eight-month program, with approximately $700,000 of that amount contingent upon receipt of specific deliverables.  ArQule will also provide research support in the form of loaned equipment and licensed intellectual property. The Registrant will own all intellectual property derived from the research program during the term of the Research Agreement and related intellectual property created or reduced to practice for a period of three (3) years thereafter.  In addition, as part of the transaction, the Registrant and BBI will enter into a sublease for the Registrant's facility in Norwood, Massachusetts through September 30, 2007.
A copy of the Research Agreement will be filed as an exhibit to the Company's Form 10-K on or about March 16, 2007.  A copy of the Registrant's January 26, 2007 Press Release announcing the transaction is filed hereto as exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b)  On January 26, 2007, in connection with the above-mentioned transactions, Dr. Chiang J. Li resigned his position as Executive Vice President and Chief Scientific Officer of the Registrant.  He is the Chief Executive Officer of BBI and will function as principal investigator under the Research Agreement.  Also, on January 26, 2007, the Registrant and Dr. Li entered into the Scientific Advisory Board Chairman Agreement, pursuant to which the Registrant appointed Dr. Li as the Chairman of its Scientific Advisory Board.
A copy of the Scientific Advisory Board Chairman Agreement is filed hereto as exhibit 10.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
(e) In connection with the foregoing events, on January 26, 2007, Dr. Li entered into a separation agreement and general release (the "Separation Agreement") with the Registrant pursuant to which he was paid a lump sum severance payment in accordance with the terms of his employment agreement with the Registrant.  The payment was comprised of (i) one year's salary in the amount of $321,048; (ii) the average of his cash bonuses over the last two years in
2
the amount of $109,803; and (iii) the amount of $112,500, to which he was entitled under the Registrant's Annual Incentive Program for fiscal year 2006.  The Registrant, at its cost, will also maintain for a period of twelve (12) months Dr. Li's participation in its group medical, dental, life and disability insurance programs under the same terms and conditions as those available to employees of the Registrant.
In addition, Dr. Li was granted an option to purchase 64,375 shares of the Registrant's common stock, which is fully vested and exercisable on the date of grant and expires on December 31, 2008.  Dr. Li's previously vested option grants covering 216,250 shares were amended to extend the exercise period through December 31, 2007.  In connection with his appointment as Chairman of the Registrant's Scientific Advisory Board, he was granted an option to purchase 12,500 shares, which are fully vested and exercisable on the date of grant and will expire ten years after the date of grant.  As a result of Dr. Li's separation of service from the Registrant, all his unvested options have lapsed.
Approximately 26 former employees of ArQule joined Dr. Li at BBI.  Each employee of BBI who transitioned from ArQule to BBI as of January 29, 2007 executed and delivered a Separation Agreement and General Release.  In consideration for entering into such agreement, each employee received a fully-vested option to purchase shares of the Registrant's common stock with an exercise period terminating December 31, 2008, as well as an amendment to their previously vested options to extend the exercise period through December 31, 2007.  As a result of separation of service from the Registrant, all unvested options of such employees have lapsed.
A copy of the Separation Agreement with Dr. Li is filed hereto as exhibit 10.2 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
Scientific Advisory Board Chairman Agreement, by and between the Registrant and Chiang J. Li, M.D., dated January 26, 2007.
10.1
                          
Separation Agreement and General Release, by and between the Registrant and Chiang J. Li, M.D., dated January 26, 2007.
10.2
                          
Text of press release announcing the research agreement and related changes in the Registrant's management, dated January 26, 2007.
99.1
                          
3
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
February 1, 2007
4

 
Exhibit 10.1
SCIENTIFIC ADVISORY BOARD CHAIRMAN AGREEMENT
This Scientific Advisory Board Chairman Agreement (this "Agreement") dated as of January 26, 2007 (the "Effective Date") is by and between ArQule, Inc. (the "Company") located at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801 and Chiang J. Li, M.D. (the "Consultant").
, the Company is engaged in scientific research, development and production of pharmaceutical products, specifically anticancer compounds which are designed to target specific cell control pathways (the "Field");
WHEREAS
, the Consultant has extensive expertise in the Field, and the Company seeks to benefit from the Consultant's expertise; and
WHEREAS
, the Company desires to have the Consultant serve as the chairman of the Company's Scientific Advisory Board (the "SAB") and the Consultant wishes to perform advisory services in the Field for the Company;
WHEREAS
, in consideration of the promises and mutual agreements hereinafter set forth, effective as of the Effective Date, the Company and the Consultant agree as follows:
NOW, THEREFORE
1.             .  The Consultant shall serve on the Company's SAB as its chairman, advising the Company with respect to matters related to the Field, upon the terms and conditions hereinafter set forth.  The Consultant shall be engaged by the Company for the exchange of ideas only and shall not direct or conduct research for or on behalf of the Company.
Scientific Advisory Board
.
2.
                                      
Services
2.1.          .  The Consultant's duties shall include:  (i) attending and serving as chair of  SAB meetings; (ii) providing scientific advice regarding the Company's product lines, the general direction of its research programs, recruitment of personnel, and techniques used in research in the Field; and (iii) generally advising the Company in its efforts to produce, develop, and market products in the Field.
SAB Duties
2.2.          .  Upon request by the Company, and at times mutually agreed upon by the Company and the Consultant, the Consultant shall devote additional consulting time annually to provide services to the Company pursuant to this Agreement.
Consulting Duties
2.3.          .  The services set forth in Articles 1 and 2 shall be referred to as the "Services."
Services
1
3.             .
Term and Termination
3.1.         .  The Consultant shall commence rendering the Services on the Effective Date and, unless earlier terminated as provided in Section 3.2 hereof, shall continue for a term of one year (the "Period of Service").  This Agreement may be extended for additional one year periods upon the written agreement of both parties.
Term
3.2.         .  Either the Company or the Consultant may, without prejudice to any right or remedy it may have due to any failure of the other party to perform obligations under this Agreement, terminate the Period of Service upon 30 days prior written notice to the other party for any or no reason.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company may terminate the Period of Service, effective immediately upon receipt of written notice, if the Consultant breaches or threatens to breach any provision of Sections 5, 6, 7 or 8 of this Agreement.
Termination
3.3          .  In the event of a termination of this Agreement pursuant to this section, the parties shall not enter into any new agreements or financial arrangements with respect to the subject matter hereof from the date of termination until the next anniversary date of the Effective Date.  Upon termination all accrued payments as of the date of the notice of termination will be paid by the Company.
Effect of Termination
3.4.           The following provisions shall survive the expiration or termination of this Agreement:  Sections 3.3, 5, 6, 7, 8, 11.1, 11.3 and, 11.5.
Survival.
4.            
Compensation.
4.1.         .  As compensation for the Services rendered by Consultant during the Period of Service, the Company shall grant to the Consultant an option (the "Option") to purchase 12,500 shares of the Company's Common Stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Common Stock"), pursuant to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan") and in accordance with the terms set forth in the form of Option Certificate, attached hereto as .The exercise price of the Option will be set at the closing price of ArQule stock on the date of grant.  The Option will be fully vested and exercisable as of the date of grant, and Consultant shall have until the expiration of the term of the Option to exercise the Option.  In the event that the Period of Service is extended by mutual agreement of the parties, Consultant may be granted additional stock options.
Stock Options
Exhibit A
4.2.         The Company shall reimburse the Consultant for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in connection with or related to the performance of Services under this Agreement.  Within 30 days following the end of each month, Consultant shall submit to Company his expense reports, and the Company shall issue a check for the applicable amount within 30 days following receipt of such reports or otherwise in accordance with the Company's standard payment cycle.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company shall not reimburse expenses in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) without its prior written approval.
Reimbursement of Expenses.
2
4.3.          . The Consultant shall be responsible for all tax obligations associated with the receipt of fees and other consideration from the Company, including the grant of options referred to in Section 4.1, and shall not be entitled to any benefits, coverages or privileges made available to employees of the Company, including without limitation, unemployment, worker's compensation, or medical insurance benefits or social security or pension payments.  The Consultant shall be an independent contractor and not an employee of the Company.
Taxes, Benefits and Independent Contractor
4.4           .  The Company and Consultant acknowledge and agree that the consideration set forth in this Section 4 represents the fair market value for the Services to be rendered under this Agreement, and no amount payable hereunder is intended to constitute a payment for the inducement of patient referrals, the purchase, lease or order of any item or service, or the recommending or arranging for the purchase, lease or order of any item or service.
Fair Market Value
5.             .
Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials
5.1.          .
Confidential Information
5.1.1.       .  "Confidential Information" shall mean any technical or business information furnished by the Company to the Consultant in connection with this Agreement or developed by the Consultant in the course of performing the Services.  Such Confidential Information may include, without limitation:
Definition of Confidential Information
(a)           inventions, trade secrets, discoveries and computer programs, including any improvements or modifications thereto;
(b)           engineering, research, development and design projects, data, designs, drawings and specifications;
(c)           manufacturing, development and other technical processes, applications, methods, apparatus and equipment;
(d)           business information such as lists of approved components and sources, price lists, product costs, production schedules, business plans, sales information, profit and loss information, and customer and collaborator lists; and
(e)           any and all information, materials and other items supplied by third parties to the Company (or generated by the Company for third parties) under an obligation of confidentiality).
Confidential Information is contained in various media, including without limitation patent applications, computer programs in object and/or source code, flow charts and other program documentation, manuals, plans, drawings, designs, technical specifications, laboratory notebooks, supplier and customer information, internal financial data, and other documents and records of the Company, whether or not in writing and whether or not labeled or identified as confidential or proprietary.
3
5.1.2.       .  During the Period of Service and thereafter, the Consultant shall:
Obligations
                                                (a)           maintain all Confidential Information in strict confidence and not publish, disclose or otherwise make available to any third party, other than employees of the Company, any Confidential Information, except as expressly authorized in writing by the Company;
                                                (b)           use all Confidential Information solely for the purpose of providing the Services as requested by the Company, in accordance with any Company policies regarding the protection of Confidential Information, and not use any Confidential Information for Consultant's own benefit or for the benefit of any person or business entity other than the Company; and
                                                (c)           reproduce the Confidential Information only to the extent necessary for providing the Services as requested by the Company, with all such reproductions being considered Confidential Information.
5.1.3.     .  The obligations of the Consultant under Section 5.1.2. above shall not apply to the extent that the Consultant can demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the Confidential Information in question:
Exceptions
                                                (a)           is or has become generally known within the Company's industry through no fault of Consultant;
                                                (b)           was known to Consultant at the time it was disclosed by the Company, as evidenced by Consultant's written records at the time of disclosure; or
                                                (c)           was developed independently by Consultant and not under the auspices of the Company or any other employer of Consultant;
                                                (d)           was lawfully and in good faith made available to Consultant by a third party who did not derive it from the Company and who imposes no obligation of confidence on Consultant; or
                                                (e)           is required to be disclosed to comply with applicable laws or regulations, or with a court or administrative order, provided that the Company receives prior written notice of such disclosure and that the Consultant takes all reasonable and lawful actions to obtain confidential treatment for such disclosure and, if possible, to minimize the extent of such disclosure.
5.2.          .
Proprietary Materials
5.2.1.       .  "Proprietary Materials" shall mean any tangible chemical, biological, or physical research materials furnished by the Company to the Consultant in connection with this Agreement or developed by the Consultant in the
Definition of Proprietary Materials
4
course of performing the Services, including without limitation any and all reagents, substances, chemical compounds, subcellular constituents, cells or cell lines, organisms and progeny, and mutants, as well as any and all derivatives or replications derived from or relating to such materials.  In the case of biological materials, Proprietary Materials shall also include other materials ordinarily engendered by the original materials, including without limitation any progeny derived from a cell line (including naturally occurring mutants), monoclonal antibodies produced by hybridoma cells, DNA or RNA replicated from isolated DNA or RNA, recombinant proteins produced by a cell line, recombinant proteins produced through use of isolated DNA or RNA, and substances routinely purified from any source material included in the original materials.
5.2.2.       .  The Consultant shall use Proprietary Materials solely for the purpose of providing the Services as requested by the Company, or as expressly authorized in writing by the Company.  The Consultant shall use the Proprietary Materials only in compliance with all applicable governmental laws and regulations, and not for any experiments on human subjects.
Limited Use
in vivo
5.2.3.       .  The Consultant shall not transfer or distribute any Proprietary Materials to any third party without the prior written consent of the Company.
Limited Disposition
5.3.          .  Upon the termination or expiration of this Agreement, or earlier at the request of the Company, the Consultant at the instruction of the Company shall either return to the Company or destroy all originals, copies, and summaries of documents, materials, and other tangible manifestations of Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials in the possession or control of the Consultant, and shall not retain any copies of the same.
Return of Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials
5.4.          . The obligations set forth in this Article 5 shall remain in effect for a period of ten (10) years after termination of this Agreement, except that the obligations of the Consultant to return or destroy Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials shall survive until fulfilled.
Survival of Obligations
6.             .
Intellectual Property
6.1.          . "Intellectual Property" shall mean any and all Confidential Information, Proprietary Materials, inventions, developments, data, discoveries, improvements, ideas, concepts, computer programs, algorithms, work product, protocols, systems and related documentation, and any other works of invention or authorship (whether or not patentable, copyrightable, or entitled to or eligible for other forms of legal protection) including any and all related patents, copyrights, trademarks, trade names, and other industrial and intellectual property rights and applications therefor, in the United States and elsewhere, that the Consultant during the Period of Service or thereafter, either solely or jointly with others, and whether during normal business hours or otherwise, has conceived, devised, written, invented, discovered, developed, or reduced to practice or tangible medium (whether alone, jointly with others, or under the Consultant's direction) in the course of providing the Services, or which arise out of the Services or from Confidential Information or Proprietary
Definition of Intellectual Property
5
Materials including but not limited to those which (i) result from tasks assigned to the Consultant by the Company, or (ii) are funded by the Company, or (iii) result from use of the premises owned, leased or contracted for by the Company.
6.2.          .  The Consultant shall promptly disclose to the Company any and all Intellectual Property.  The Consultant shall maintain adequate records (whether written, electronic, or otherwise) to document the Intellectual Property, including without limitation the conception and reduction to practice of all inventions, and shall make such records available to the Company upon request.  The Company shall have sole ownership of all such records.
Disclosure and Records
6.3.          .  The Consultant acknowledges and agrees that all Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials that are provided by the Company to the Consultant under this Agreement are and shall remain the exclusive property of the Company or the third party entrusting such Confidential Information or Proprietary Materials to the Company.  The Consultant acknowledges and agrees that any Intellectual Property is and shall be the exclusive property of the Company.  The Consultant hereby assigns, conveys, and grants to the Company all of the Consultant's right, title, and interest in and to the Intellectual Property and any and all patents, patent applications, and copyrights relating to the Intellectual Property.  Upon request, the Consultant shall cooperate with the Company, at the expense of the Company, in obtaining legal protection for the Intellectual Property including confirmation of ownership.  The Consultant agrees to execute all documents that the Company may reasonably request in order to perfect its rights in the Intellectual Property; in the event that the Consultant should fail or refuse to execute such documents within a reasonable time, the Consultant hereby appoints the Company attorney-in-fact to execute and deliver any such documents on the Consultant's behalf.
Ownership
6.4.          .  The Consultant acknowledges that the Company does not desire to acquire any trade secrets, know-how, confidential information, or other intellectual property that the Consultant may have acquired from or developed for any third party unrelated to Company or Consultant. ("Third-Party IP").  The Consultant agrees that in the course of providing the Services, the Consultant shall not improperly use or disclose any Third-Party IP, including without limitation any intellectual property of (i) any former or current employer, (ii) any person for whom the Consultant has performed or currently performs consulting services, or (iii) any other person to whom the Consultant has a legal obligation regarding the use or disclosure of such intellectual property.
Third-Party Intellectual Property
6.5.          .  Consultant acknowledges that the Company from time to time may have agreements with other persons or with the United States Government, or agencies thereof, that impose obligations or restrictions on the Company regarding inventions made during the course of work under such agreements or regarding the confidential nature of such work.  The Consultant agrees to be bound by all such obligations and restrictions that are known to Consultant and to take all action necessary to discharge the obligations of the Company under such agreements.
Compliance with the Company's Third-Party Obligations
6
6.6.          .  Except as otherwise provided herein, the Company shall have no rights by reason of this Agreement in any publication, invention, discovery, improvement, or other intellectual property, which is developed as a result of a program of research not financed, in whole or in part, by funds provided by or under the control of the Company.  The Company also acknowledges and agrees that it will not obtain any right, priority or advantage as a result of the consultancy created by this Agreement in gaining access, whether by license or otherwise, to any proprietary information or intellectual property that arises from any research undertaken by the Consultant in Consultant's capacity as an employee any unrelated third party.
Unfunded Publications and Intellectual Property
7.            
Noncompetition.
7.1.         .  The Consultant represents and warrants that, as of the Effective Date, Consultant is not party to any agreement that (a) would constitute a conflict of interest with this Agreement, (b) would prevent Consultant from carrying out Consultant's obligations to the Company under this Agreement or (c) would be breached by Consultant as a result of carrying out Consultant's obligations hereunder (such agreement as described under subsections (a) (b) or (c) is hereinafter termed a "Conflicting Agreement").  During the Period of Service, the Consultant agrees not to enter into any Conflicting Agreement.  If the Consultant should enter into any Conflicting Agreement in breach of the foregoing sentence, the Company shall have the right to immediately terminate this Agreement.
No Third Party Conflict of Interest
7.2.          .  The Consultant agrees that during the Period of Service the Consultant shall not become employed by, serve as a member of a scientific advisory board (or comparable organization) of, render services to, or act on behalf of, directly or indirectly, own, manage, operate, join, control, finance, consult to, advise or participate in ownership, management, operation, control or financing of, or be connected as an officer, director, employee, partner, principal, agent, representative, consultant or otherwise with, or allow Consultant's name to be used in any annual report, quarterly report, private placement memorandum or advertisement of, or solicit or attempt to solicit business on behalf of any person or other enterprise other than the Company on matters relating to the Field, except to the extent permitted under that certain Separation Agreement and General Release by and between the parties of even date herewith.
Non-Compete in Field
7.3           .  Consultant has disclosed on the attached Schedule 7.3 all present (and during the Period of Service Consultant shall promptly disclose to the Ethics Officer of the Company any subsequent) actual or potential conflicts between this Agreement and any other agreements under which Consultant owes any duties or obligations, including any agreements or understandings that Consultant has with any person or firm relating to the Field of Interest.
Disclosure of Potential Conflicts
7.4           .  The parties contemplate that Consultant is or will be employed by Boston Biomedical, Inc., and in conjunction with the foregoing, Consultant agrees to promptly inform Boston Biomedical, Inc (or any subsequent employers) of the existence and terms of this Agreement and Consultant's responsibilities hereunder.
Disclosure of Agreement
7
The Company reserves the right to inform Boston Biomedical, Inc (or any subsequent employers) of the existence and terms of this Agreement and Consultant's representations, responsibilities and obligation hereunder.
8.             .  The Consultant agrees that during the Period of Service of this Agreement and thereafter for a period of one (1) year, the Consultant shall not, directly or indirectly, (i) solicit, divert, or take away, or attempt to take away, the business or patronage of any actual or prospective clients, customers, or accounts of the Company, or (ii) recruit, solicit, or hire any employee or consultant of the Company, or induce or attempt to induce any employee or consultant of the Company, to discontinue his or her relationship with the Company, except to the extent permitted under that certain Separation Agreement and General Release by and between the parties of even date herewith.
Non-Solicitation
9.             .  Regardless of any other provision of this Agreement, it shall not be a violation of any provision of this Agreement for Consultant to take any action authorized or allowed pursuant to either the Research Agreement between the Company and Boston Biomedical, Inc. dated January 26, 2007 or the Separation Agreement and General Release Agreement between the Company and Consultant dated January 26, 2007.
Research Agreement, Separation Agreement and General Release
10            .   The Consultant consents to the use by the Company of his name and likeness in written materials or oral presentations to current or prospective customers, investors or others, provided that such materials or presentations accurately describe the nature of the Consultant's relationship with or contribution to the Company.  The Company will submit to Consultant for his approval prior to use, which approval will not be unreasonably withheld, all materials which use Consultant's name or likeness or which imply his approval.
Publicity
11.           .   This Agreement shall be construed to the fullest extent possible to be in compliance with and permitted by all U.S., non-U.S., state or other local laws, statutes, rules and regulations.  If a Triggering Event (as defined below) occurs after the date hereof, the parties agree that they shall amend this Agreement solely to the extent necessary to comply with the item giving rise to the Triggering Event and in a manner that shall preserve the underlying economic and financial arrangements between the parties with the least changes to the parties' expectations hereunder.  For purposes of this Section 10, a "Triggering Event" shall mean any U.S., state or local governmental agency, or any other non-U.S. local governmental agency, or any court or administrative tribunal, passing, issuing or promulgating any law, final rule, final regulation, or rendering from an evidentiary proceeding any order, decision or judgment (including but not limited to those relating to any final regulations promulgated under applicable anti-kickback or self-referral statutes) which in the good faith and reasonable judgment of a party hereto materially and adversely affects such party's licensure or certification, ability to obtain any material benefit hereunder or under any payment program to which it is a party or ability to perform a material obligation hereunder.  If the parties in good faith cannot agree on a necessary amendment under this Section 11 within thirty (30) days of the Triggering Event, then this Agreement shall terminate without further action on the 30th day.
Compliance with Law
8
12.           .
Miscellaneous
11.1.        .  All notices, requests, demands and other communications required or permitted to be given pursuant to this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given upon the date of receipt if delivery by hand, recognized national overnight courier, or confirmed facsimile transmission, or upon the date sent if mailed by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, to the following addresses or facsimile numbers:
Notices
If to Company:
 
If to Consultant:  to the address set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
Each party may change its designated address and facsimile number by notice to the other party in the manner provided in this Section.
12.2.   .  This Agreement may be modified, amended, or supplemented only by means of a written instrument signed by both parties.  Any waiver of any rights or failure to act in a specific instance shall relate only to such instance and shall not be construed as an agreement to waive any rights or fail to act in any other instance, whether or not similar.
Amendment and Waiver
12.3.   .  This Agreement and all disputes and causes of action between the parties (in contract, warranty, tort, strict liability, by statute or otherwise) shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts applicable to contacts made and to be performed entirely within such jurisdiction and without giving effect to its choice or conflict of laws rules or principles.
Governing Law
12.4.   .  In the event that any provision of this Agreement shall, for any reason, be held to be invalid or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity or unenforceability shall not affect any other provision hereof, and this Agreement shall be construed as if such invalid or unenforceable provision had not been included herein.  To the extent this Agreement may be construed in accordance with the laws of any state that limits the assignability to the Company of certain inventions, this Agreement shall be interpreted not to apply to any such invention that a court rules or the Company agrees is subject to such state limitation.
Severability
12.5.   .  The Consultant acknowledges that the restrictions contained in this Agreement are necessary for the protection of the business and goodwill of the
Equitable Relief
9
Company and are reasonable for such purpose.  The Consultant agrees that any breach of the Consultant's obligations under this Agreement will cause irreparable harm to the Company.  Therefore, in addition to any other remedies that may be available to the Company, the Company may apply for and obtain immediate injunctive relief if any court of competent jurisdiction to restrain the breach or threatened breach of, or otherwise to specifically enforce, any obligations of the Consultant under this Agreement.
12.6.   .  This Agreement, which includes all of the terms and conditions hereunder, and all appendices, schedules, exhibits, or riders attached hereto, is intended to be the exclusive and final statement of the terms and understandings relative to the subject matter hereof, merging herein and superseding all negotiations and prior written or oral agreements between the parties as to the subject matter hereto.  There are no promises, representations or understandings made in connection with this Agreement or contemporaneous with the execution hereof, except as set forth in this Agreement.
Entire Agreement
12.7.   .  This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, and all of which together shall be deemed to be one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
12.8   .  All headings in this Agreement are for convenience only and shall not affect the meaning of any provision hereof.
Headings
12.9.   .  This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties and their respective lawful successors, assigns, heirs, and personal representatives.
Binding Effect
12.10.   .  This Agreement may not be assigned by either party without the prior written consent of the other party, except that the Company may assign this Agreement to an affiliate or in connection with the merger, consolidation, or sale of all or substantially all of its business or assets relating to this Agreement.
Assignment
10
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement as of the day and year set forth above.
11
Any actual or potential conflicts between this Agreement and any other agreements under which Consultant owes any duties or obligations, including any agreements or understandings that Consultant has with any person or firm relating to the Field:
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                                                 
                                                                                                                                                      &nbs p;                            
 
12
EXHIBIT A
1

 
Exhibit 10.2
This agreement ("Agreement") is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation, with its principal place of business at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801 (the "Company") and Chiang J. Li, M.D. ("Employee").  In consideration of the mutual covenants contained herein, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties agree as follows:
  In order to pursue other employment opportunities with Boston Biomedical, Inc. ("BBI"), Employee shall resign his employment with the Company effective as of January 28, 2007 ("Separation Date").  The Company hereby waives the three month prior notice requirement under Employee's Employment Agreement with the Company dated as of September 5, 2003 (the "Employment Agreement").  The Company agrees, and Employee further acknowledges that, no later than the Separation Date, Employee shall receive a cash payment in the gross amount of $112,500, which represents the full amount Employee is entitled to under the Company's Annual Incentive Program.
1.
                                      
Separation of Employment.
Regardless of whether Employee signs this Agreement, Employee acknowledges that, as of the Separation Date, Employee will receive any and all wages, including accrued but unused vacation time.  In the event that Employee signs this Agreement, returns it to the Company and does not revoke as provided in Section 18, Employee will receive the following separation package (the "Separation Package"):
2.
                                      
Separation Package. 
  The Company shall pay Employee a lump sum separation payment (the "Separation Payment") in the following gross amount, which shall be subject to legally required and voluntarily authorized deductions and withholdings:
a.
                                      
Lump Sum Separation Payment.
$321,048, which amount represents Employee's current base salary through the end of the twelve (12) month period commencing on the Separation Date; plus
i.
                                         
$109,802.50, which amount represents the average bonus paid by the Company to Executive with respect to calendar years 2005 and 2006.
ii.
                                      
The Separation Payment shall be paid to Employee on the date of his separation from service as defined under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any regulations promulgated thereunder, as determined in good faith by Employee and his tax counsel, subject to the Company's consent, which shall not be unreasonably withheld; provided, however, if Employee is a specified employee as of such date, the Separation Date shall be made on the date that is six months after such date of separation from service.
1
Pursuant to Section 4.2.1 of Employee's Employment Agreement, Employee was granted a stock option (the "Stock Option") to purchase 115,000 shares of the Company's common stock, $0.01 par value per share ("Common Stock"), pursuant to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan.  Notwithstanding any vesting schedule to the contrary, the Stock Option shall be fully vested and shall be fully and immediately exercisable as of the Separation Date.
b.
                                     
Full Vesting of the Stock Option. 
Subject to approval by the Board of Directors, on January 26, 2007, Employee will be granted a stock option (the "New Option") to purchase 64,375 shares of the Company's Common Stock, pursuant to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan") and in accordance with the terms set forth in the form of Option Certificate attached hereto as Exhibit A.  The exercise price of the New Option will be set at the closing price of Common Stock of the Company on the date of grant.  The New Option shall become fully vested and fully and immediately exercisable once Employee signs this Agreement and does not (and may no longer) revoke it as provided in Section 18, provided that if Employee does not sign this Agreement by January 26, 2007, or signs this Agreement by January 26, 2007 and later revokes it in accordance with its terms, the New Option shall be forfeited in its entirety.  If Employee signs this Agreement by January 26, 2007 and does not (any may no longer) revoke it as provided in Section 18, Employee shall have until December 31, 2008 to exercise the New Option.
c.
                                      
Grant of New Option. 
  Exclusive of the New Option, Employee has been granted certain stock options, as set forth in the attached Exhibit B, to purchase shares of the Company's Common Stock pursuant to the Plan (the "Current Options").  As set forth in Exhibit B, as of the Separation Date, 216,250 shares subject to the Current Options will be vested and exercisable.  The time in which Employee may exercise the Current Options that have vested as of the Separation Date shall be extended to December 31, 2007, and any agreement or terms and conditions with respect to such Current Options shall be amended accordingly.  It is expressly agreed that, in the absence of this extension, Employee would have had three months from the Separation Date to exercise the Current Options.
d.
                                     
Extension of Time to Exercise Current Options.
  For a period of twelve (12) months following the Separation Date, the Company shall continue to provide coverage for Employee under its group medical, dental, life and disability insurance policies under the same terms and conditions as other Company employees, including any employee contribution, subject to the applicable plan documents.
e.
                                      
Continuation of Benefits.
Employee specifically acknowledges that the Separation Package described above exceeds any legal payment obligation of the Company and provides valid consideration for the General Release contained in this Agreement.
2
Unless otherwise provided for expressly in this Agreement, all benefits provided by the Company to Employee will cease as of the Separation Date.
3.
                                      
Insurance and Other Benefits.
  A COBRA notice will issue twelve (12) months following the Separation Date.  Except as expressly set forth in this Agreement, any continuing coverage after the Separation Date will be at Employee's sole expense as provided by federal COBRA law.  Eligibility to continue insurance coverage ceases upon the termination of any period allowed by law and is at all times subject to the terms and conditions of the applicable plan(s).
a.
                                      
Group Health, Dental and Vision Coverage.
  The Company shall not contest Employee's claim, if any, for unemployment insurance benefits, it being understood and agreed that Employee's entitlement to unemployment insurance benefits shall be determined solely by the Massachusetts Division of Unemployment Assistance.
b.
                                     
Unemployment.
  Except as expressly authorized by the Company with respect to general categories or specific items of Company property to be used by Employee as "Principal Investigator" under that certain Research Agreement between the Company and BBI of even date herewith ("Research Agreement"), no later than the Separation Date, Employee shall return all property belonging to the Company, including but not limited to papers, files and documents (physical or electronic), computers, telephones, PDAs, reference guides, equipment, keys, identification cards, credit cards, software, computer access codes, disks and institutional manuals.  Employee shall not retain any copies, duplicates, reproductions or excerpts thereof.  In addition, Employee warrants that Employee has deleted any information belonging to the Company from any personal computer that Employee may have at home or elsewhere (other than the Company's offices) without retaining any copies of any such information, in electronic or other format, and will permit the Company to have access to such computer at times reasonably agreed to by Employee an upon reasonable notice to confirm such deletion. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this Section shall not apply to any "Loaned Equipment" as that term is defined in the Research Agreement.
4.
                                      
Return of Property.
  In the event that the Company executes a binding agreement (including a non-binding letter of intent, provided that such letter of intent results in a binding agreement) related to the partnering of its C-MET Program by or before December 31, 2007, the Company shall pay Employee a lump sum of $50,000 within ten (10) business days of the entering into of such agreement.  If the Company does not execute a binding agreement (including letter of intent) related to the partnering of its C-MET Program by or before December 31, 2007, no payment shall be made to Employee.
5.
                                      
C-MET Program Bonus.
  Employee agrees to serve as the Chair of the Company's Scientific Advisory Board ("SAB") for a period of one year from the Separation Date, unless such period of service is sooner terminated by the Company, pursuant to the terms and conditions of the consulting agreement attached as Exhibit C to this Agreement.  As set forth more fully in the consulting agreement, on the date of execution of such consulting
6.
                                      
SAB Chair.
3
agreement, and for each year that Employee serves as Chair of the SAB, Employee shall receive a stock option to purchase 12,500 shares of the Company's Common Stock, which options shall be fully vested and fully and immediately exercisable on the date of grant, pursuant to the terms of such consulting agreement and in accordance with the Company's then-standard form of Option Certificate for SAB members, which currently is substantially in the form attached hereto as Exhibit D.
  Employee acknowledges that during the course of Employee's employment with the Company Employee has had access to and/or developed confidential information belonging to the Company and its customers.  Employee agrees not to use to Employee's own advantage or to disclose, except as required by law, to any person or entity any confidential information of the Company or of any past or present customer of the Company, including but not limited to financial data or projections, customer lists, projects, economic information, systems, plans, methods, procedures, operations, techniques, know-how, trade secrets or merchandising or marketing strategies.  Moreover, Employee agrees that, as a condition of receipt of the benefits described in this Agreement, Employee shall continue to be bound by the terms of the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement previously executed by Employee which is attached as Exhibit E, the terms of which are incorporated herein by reference. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this Section and nothing in the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement shall prohibit Employee from obtaining employment with BBI or from using Confidential Information in connection with Employee's performance under the Research Agreement and to disclose Confidential Information to the extent permitted thereby.
7.
                                      
Nondisclosure of Confidential Information.
  Employee agrees and covenants as a material term of this Agreement to provide reasonable cooperation to the Company for a period of twelve months following the end of Employee's engagement with BBI, including but not limited to, with respect to matters previously within Employee's scope or course of employment with the Company.  The Company will reimburse Employee for any time expended on behalf of the Company at the request of the Company at an agreed-to per diem or per hour rate (or pro-rata share thereof) and reimburse Employee for out-of-pocket expenses related thereto.  In the event that the Company determines that such expense reimbursement is or would be prohibited by law, the Company promptly shall notify Employee to such effect, and such reimbursement shall not be made to Employee.  For the avoidance of doubt, this Section shall not apply to any interaction between Employee and the Company in which Employee is acting in any capacity on behalf of BBI or in his role as a member of the Company's SAB.
8.
                                      
Cooperation.
  Except with respect to any rights, obligations or duties arising out of this Agreement, and in consideration of the Separation Package and other benefits set forth in this Agreement, Employee hereby unconditionally and irrevocably releases and discharges the Company and its officers, directors, partners, stockholders, trustees, attorneys, insurers, representatives, agents and employees, in both their individual and corporate capacities (collectively, the "Releasees"), of and from any and all complaints, charges, lawsuits, costs (including attorney fees and costs actually incurred), debts liabilities or claims for relief of any kind by Employee that Employee now has or ever
9.
                                      
General Release.
4
had against the Releasees or any one of them, whether known or unknown, arising out of any matter or thing that has happened before the signing of this Agreement (collectively, "Claims"), including but not limited to (i) claims for tort or contract, or relating to salary, wages, bonuses, severance, commissions, stock, and stock options, the breach of any oral or written contract or promise, misrepresentation, defamation, and interference with prospective economic advantage, interference with contract, intentional and negligent infliction of emotional distress, negligence, breach of the covenant of good faith and fair dealing, medical, disability or other leave; (ii) claims arising out of, based on, or connected with Employee's employment, including terms and conditions of employment, by the Company and the termination of that employment, including but not limited to claims arising under Section 806 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, and any other claims alleging retaliation of any nature; (iii) claims under G.L. c. 93A or in any way related to restricted stock, stock options, or vesting or exercise of the same, or for alleged securities violations; and (iv) claims for unlawful employment discrimination of any kind, including discrimination due to age, sex, disability or handicap, including failure to offer reasonable accommodations, race, color, religion, pregnancy, sexual orientation, national origin, or sexual or other unlawful harassment arising under or based on the following, all as amended: Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 ("ADEA"), the Americans with Disabilities Act ("ADA"), the Equal Pay Act of 1963, the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 ("COBRA"), the Family and Medical Leave Act, the Massachusetts Fair Employment Practices Act, the Massachusetts Civil Rights Act, the Massachusetts Equal Rights Law, the Massachusetts or United States Constitution, including any right of privacy thereunder, and any other state or federal equal employment opportunity or anti-discrimination law, policy, order, regulation or guidelines affecting or relating to claims or rights of employees.  It is further expressly agreed and understood by Employee that the release contained herein is a GENERAL RELEASE.
  Employee represents and warrants that Employee has not filed any complaints, charges, or claims for relief against the Releasees, or any one of them, with any local, state or federal court or administrative agency, any professional or regulatory board, or any other agency or entity.  Employee further warrants that Employee has not previously assigned or transferred any of the claims that are the subject of the General Release contained herein.  Employee agrees and covenants not to sue or bring any claims or charges against the Releasees, or any one of them, with respect to matters subject to the General Release contained herein.  Employee further agrees not to institute any claim, charge, complaint or lawsuit to challenge the validity of the General Release or the circumstances surrounding its execution.  In the event that Employee institutes any action covered by this Section, that action shall be dismissed upon presentation of this Agreement and Employee shall reimburse the affected Releasees for all legal fees and expenses incurred in defending such claim and obtaining its dismissal.
10.
                                
Covenant Not to Sue.
  Nothing in this Agreement shall preclude Employee from filing a charge or complaint, including a challenge to the validity of this Agreement, with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, the Massachusetts Commission Against Discrimination or any other state anti-discrimination agency or from participating or
11.
                                
Exclusion.
5
cooperating in any investigation or proceeding conducted by any of such agencies.  In the event that a charge or complaint is filed with any administrative agency by Employee or in the event of an authorized investigation, charge or lawsuit filed by any administrative agency, Employee expressly waives and shall not accept any monetary award or damages, costs or attorneys' fees of any sort therefrom against the Company or any of the Releasees.
  It is understood and agreed that this Agreement does not constitute any admission by the Company that any action taken with respect to Employee was unlawful or wrongful, or that such action constituted a breach of contract or violated any federal or state law, policy, rule or regulation.
12.
                                
Nonadmissions Clause.
  Except as set forth in Section 11 and except to the extent publicly disclosed by the Company, Employee expressly agrees that the nature and terms of this Agreement are confidential, and expressly agrees not to discuss or disclose them, or the facts and contentions contained therein, without the prior written consent of the Company, with or to any person, except to Employee's accountant, tax advisor, attorney, immediate family, therapist or healthcare provider, if any, the Internal Revenue Service, state tax authorities, or as required by law.  If Employee makes any disclosure authorized by this Section, Employee shall apprise the person or entity to whom such disclosure is made of the confidential nature of the terms and conditions of the Agreement and shall use reasonable and good faith efforts to secure the confidentiality of the information so disclosed.  In particular, if Employee is compelled to disclose the terms or conditions of this Agreement in response to a subpoena or discovery request issued in litigation, Employee shall provide the Company with a copy of the subpoena or discovery request as promptly as practicable following receipt by the Employee in order to provide the Company with the opportunity to seek a protective order from the appropriate court.
13.
                                
Nondisclosure of this Agreement.
  Employee agrees not to disparage or make negative statements about the Company or any of the Company's programs or products.  The Company agrees to instruct all members of the Company's executive management team not to disparage or make negative statements about Employee, provided that nothing in this Section shall be construed in any way to restrict or prevent Employee or the Company from providing truthful information to, or truthful responses to requests from, their respective auditors, accountants, investment bankers, insurers, potential purchasers, successors, acquirers, or any other persons or entities as required by business necessity or for a legitimate business reason.  Nothing in this Agreement shall bar Employee or the Company from providing truthful testimony in any legal proceeding, or in responding to any request from any governmental agency, or as required by law, or by court order or other legal process.
14.
                                
Nondisparagement.
  Any reference request on Employee will be directed to Anthony S. Messina, or his successor as Vice President of Human Development, who will respond in accordance with Company practice with only Employee's dates of employment and job titles and by stating that Company policy precludes the provision of any further information to the inquirer.  However, if Employee completes and return to the Company
15.
                                
References.
6
a Reference Release form, the Company will answer questions about Employee's employment based on Employee's employment records.
  Employee agrees that the consideration contained in this Agreement which flows to Employee from the Company is subject to termination, reduction, disgorgement or cancellation in the event that Employee takes any action or engages in any conduct, including failure to perform, deemed by the Company to be in violation of this Agreement.  In the event that Employee institutes legal proceedings to enforce this Agreement, Employee agrees that the sole remedy available to Employee shall be enforcement of the terms of this Agreement, but that under no circumstances shall Employee be entitled to receive or collect any damages for Claims that Employee has released under this Agreement in accordance with the General Release contained in Section 9 of this Agreement.
16.
                                
Breach.
  This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such jurisdiction and without giving effect to its choice or conflict of laws rules or principles.  Each of the parties irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and of any United States federal court sitting in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, and irrevocably agrees that all claims in respect of such action or proceedings shall be heard and determined in any such Massachusetts or United States federal court.
17.
                                
Governing Law.
18.
                                
Time to Consider Agreement.
Employee acknowledges that Employee has been given the opportunity to consult an attorney of Employee's choice before signing this Agreement.
a.
                                      
Employee acknowledges that Employee has been given the opportunity to review and consider this Agreement for at least forty-five (45) days before signing it and that, if Employee has signed this Agreement in less than that time, Employeehas done so voluntarily in order to obtain sooner the benefits of this Agreement.
b.
                                     
Employee further acknowledges that Employee may revoke this Agreement within seven (7) days of signing it, provided that this Agreement will not become effective until such seven-day period has expired.  To be effective, any such revocation must be in writing and delivered to the Company's principal place of business (as set forth in the preamble to this Agreement) to the attention of Anthony S. Messina by close of business on the seventh day after signing and must expressly state Employee's intention to revoke the Agreement.  The eighth day following Employee's execution hereof shall be deemed the "Effective Date" of this Agreement.
c.
                                      
The parties also agree that the release provided by Employee in this Agreement does not include claims under the ADEA arising after the date Employee signs this Agreement.
d.
                                     
7
Employee further acknowledges and agrees that the consideration Employeeis to receive under this Agreement exceeds the consideration to which Employeewould otherwise be entitled to upon his termination from employment with the Company.
e.
                                      
 Employee acknowledges that Employee has received from the Company on the attached Exhibit F, which is made a part of this Agreement, information concerning who is eligible for and who was offered the Separation Package (or portion thereof).  Employee has also been informed in Exhibit F as to the organizational unit which is being offered the Separation Package, the job titles and ages of all employees selected to be offered the Separation Package and the job titles and ages of all employees in the same organizational unit not selected to be offered the Separation Package.
19.
                                
Information As To Separation.
  Employee acknowledges that in exchange for entering into this Agreement Employee has received good and valuable consideration in excess of that to which Employee would otherwise have been entitled in the absence of this Agreement.  This consideration includes, but is not limited to, the Separation Package described in Section 2.  Employee further acknowledges the sufficiency of that consideration.  The Company and Employee attest that no other representations were made regarding this Agreement other than those contained herein.
20.
                                
Representations.
  If any of the terms of this Agreement shall be held to be invalid and unenforceable, the remaining terms of this Agreement are severable and shall not be affected thereby.  However, should the General Release or Covenant Not to Sue provisions of this Agreement be declared or determined by any tribunal, administrative agency or court of competent jurisdiction to be illegal or invalid, and should Employee thereupon seek to institute any claims that would have been within the scope of the General Release or Covenant Not to Sue, the Company shall be entitled to immediate repayment, and Employee shall immediately return, the Separation Payment.
21.
                                
Severability.
  This Agreement and its Exhibits constitute the entire agreement between the parties about or relating to the Company's obligations to Employee with respect to Employee's terms and conditions of employment, and termination of employment, and fully supersedes any and all prior agreements or understandings between the parties other than the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement, referenced in Section 7 above.  The terms of this Agreement are contractual in nature and not a mere recital, and they shall take effect as a sealed document.  This Agreement may not be modified orally, but only by agreement in writing signed by both parties.
22.
                                
Entire Agreement.
Each party agrees that in any dispute regarding the interpretation or construction of this Agreement, no presumption shall operate in favor of or against any party by virtue of such party's role in drafting, or not drafting, the terms and conditions set forth herein.
23.
                                
Interpretation. 
8
Any notice under this Agreement given to Employee, shall be by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address set forth in the Employee's personnel file at the Company.
24.
                                
Notice. 
Any notice under this Agreement given to Company, shall be to:
 
  This Agreement may be executed in two or more of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered constitutes an original of this Agreement, but all the counterparts shall together constitute one and the same agreement.  No counterpart shall be effective until each party has executed at least one counterpart.
25.
                                
Counterparts.
EMPLOYEE REPRESENTS, WARRANTS AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EMPLOYEEHAS CAREFULLY READ ALL OF THIS AGREEMENT, THAT EMPLOYEEHAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO CONSULT WITH LEGAL COUNSEL CONCERNING THE LEGAL EFFECT OF THIS AGREEMENT AND THE ADVISABILITY OF ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND GIVING THE GENERAL RELEASE PROVIDED FOR HEREIN, AND THAT EMPLOYEEFULLY UNDERSTANDS THE SAME.  EMPLOYEE FURTHER REPRESENTS, WARRANTS AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EMPLOYEEIS EXECUTING THIS AGREEMENT WITH THE INTENT TO GRANT THE GENERAL RELEASE SET FORTH HEREIN, WITHOUT RELIANCE UPON ANY STATEMENT OR REPRESENTATION OF THE COMPANY OR ANY REPRESENTATIVE, EMPLOYEE, DIRECTOR OR ATTORNEY OF THE COMPANY OTHER THAN AS SET FORTH HEREIN, AND THAT EMPLOYEEHAS SIGNED THIS AGREEMENT ON EMPLOYEE'SOWN BEHALF AND OF EMPLOYEE'SOWN FREE WILL.
26.
                                
Access to Legal Counsel. 
9
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Employee have duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year written below.
ArQule, Inc.
By: 
/s/ Anthony S. Messina
Name:     Anthony S. Messina
Title:       Vice President, Human Development
Date: January 26, 2007
Employee
/s/ Chiang J. Li                                                                     
Name: Chiang J. Li, M.D.
Date: January 26, 2007
/s/ Peter S. Lawrence                                                          
Witness to Employee's signature
Date: January 26, 2007
10
Exhibit E
Exhibit F
 
11

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ARQULE ANNOUNCES $5.0 MILLION SPONSORED RESEARCH AGREEMENT WITH BOSTON BIOMEDICAL, INC. Dr. Chiang Li, ArQule's Former Chief Scientific Officer, To Lead New Company
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) and the chairman of its scientific advisory board, Dr. Chiang J. Li, today announced a $5.0 million sponsored research agreement with the newly established Boston Biomedical, Inc. (BBI), an independent corporation. ArQule and Dr. Li have agreed that he will transition to the position of chief executive officer of BBI from his role as chief scientific officer of ArQule.  Dr. Li will serve as the chairman of ArQule's scientific advisory board but will not be an officer or employee of ArQule. Approximately 26 former employees of ArQule will join Dr. Li at BBI.
Woburn, MA, January 29, 2006 
BBI will conduct scientific research under an eight-month contract with ArQule that will include a number of and studies, reports and publications related to mechanisms of action and biomarkers for ArQule's lead products, which are in human clinical trials.  These products include ARQ 197, a small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, and ARQ 501 and ARQ 171, products generated from the Company's Activated Checkpoint Therapy program.  ArQule will retain all intellectual property and technology rights related to research conducted by BBI employees under their contract. ArQule is not taking an equity position in BBI.
in vivo
in vitro
"The establishment of BBI is a natural consequence of ArQule's growth into a clinical-stage company," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.   "We are pleased to retain access to the expertise of Dr. Li and the staff at BBI while recognizing that their capabilities can be best applied within a structure that is focused on the scientific aspects of biological pathways. Longer term, this decision will also result in cost savings to ArQule.
"Our internal discovery and pre-clinical groups will continue to optimize and advance our existing and new product candidates toward IND (Investigational New Drug) filing and clinical testing," said Dr. Hill.  "These candidates are directed toward a number of significant molecular targets that we believe play critical roles in the development of human cancers."
ArQule/2
"It has been an exciting experience to work with Dr. Hill in leading the transformation of ArQule from a service-oriented business into an R&D-focused company," said Dr. Li.  "This is a great pre-emptive growth strategy as ArQule matures into a development-focused company.  I look forward to continuing my scientific leadership role at ArQule as chairman of the scientific advisory board and through the research collaboration, and I am excited by the opportunity to create a future for drug discovery scientists at Boston Biomedical."
1
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms.  The first of these, Activated Checkpoint Therapy
 (ACT), is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. ArQule's second cancer platform, Cancer Survival Protein modulation, has generated a clinical-stage product designed to inhibit a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding ArQule's drug discovery and development activities, the company's organic growth and future relations with BBI. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. Drug discovery and development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  There can be no assurance that ArQule's drug discovery efforts will lead to viable pre-clinical drug candidates for development.  ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, signs of toxicity, failure to show efficacy in the laboratory or in animals, costs associated with development, or competition, among other things, could cause a pre-clinical drug program to be discontinued. ArQule's contract with BBI is limited in duration and BBI is an independent company.  There can be no assurance that BBI will successfully complete activities under the agreement with ArQule or that the relationship between BBI and ArQule will continue beyond the duration of the contract.    For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
2


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070209152142.txt.gz
TIME:20070209152142
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Section 2   Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 8, 2007, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2006.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
Text of press release announcing results of operations dated February 8, 2007.
99.1
                          
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the year and for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2006.
Woburn, MA, February 8, 2007 
The Company reported a net loss of $31,440,000 or $0.88 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2006, compared with a net loss of $7,520,000, or $0.22 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2005.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2006, the Company reported a net loss of $12,830,000, or $0.36 per share, compared to a net loss of $2,733,000, or $0.08 per share, for the quarter ended December 31, 2005.
These results reflect discontinued operations related to the Company's termination of its chemistry services operations on May 22, 2006.  As previously announced, ArQule ceased these operations upon the conclusion of its agreement with Pfizer in May 2006.  All line items discussed below, including prior period amounts, also exclude the results of these discontinued operations.
At December 31, 2006, the Company had a total of approximately $95,832,000 in cash and marketable securities.
Operational Review
"Clinical progress was achieved on a timely and rapid basis during 2006, enabling us to meet our operational goals for the year," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive of ArQule.
"One of the most exciting developments during the year was the emergence of ARQ 197, a proprietary small-molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase with which we initiated a Phase 1, dose escalation trial in early 2006," said Dr. Hill.  "We presented promising interim data from this trial at the November EORTC-NCI-AACR conference. We have now completed dose escalation, and pending the development of a continuous dosing regimen and completion of a biomarker study, we expect to initiate Phase 2 testing with ARQ 197 in the second quarter of 2007.  Patients are currently being enrolled into a continuous dosing regimen at 240 milligrams daily as part of the Phase 1 trial.
4
 
 (ACT) program, we presented data from Phase 1 monotherapy and combination therapy trials with ARQ 501 in a number of peer-reviewed forums throughout the year," said Dr. Hill.  "Combined, these data demonstrated clinical tolerability, favorable pharmacokinetics and promising signs of anti-tumor activity.  Based on these findings, we selected dose levels of 450 milligrams per meter squared (mg/m) for Phase 2 monotherapy trials in leiomyosarcoma and head and neck cancer, and 400 mg/m for the Phase 2 combination therapy trial with gemcitabine. I am pleased to report that we have completed patient recruitment in all of these trials
"In our Activated Checkpoint Therapy
2
2
"Toward the end of the year, we also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 171, a second generation ACT compound that, like ARQ 501, activates DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways regulated by the E2F-1 regulatory protein," said Dr. Hill.  "We are pursuing the development of these compounds under an alliance with Hoffmann-La Roche (Roche), which has an option to license compounds from our E2F program based on a Phase 2 clinical data package with ARQ 501 and Phase 1 data with ARQ 171.
 and 48 mg/m, and we anticipate dosing the third cohort at 96 mg/m imminently.
"Our Phase 2 program with ARQ 501 is expected to reach completion in 2007, and we anticipate reporting data from these trials in appropriate peer-reviewed forums beginning mid-year," said Dr. Hill.  "We also plan to fully recruit our Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171 by the end of the year, depending upon the identification of a recommended Phase 2 dose.  The first two cohorts in this trial have been dosed successfully at 24 mg/m
2
2
2
"In May 2006, we formally concluded our chemistry services business and our agreement with Pfizer to focus operationally on developing our oncology portfolio," said Dr. Hill.  "We strongly believe that our clinical-stage programs represent highly innovative approaches to treating cancer and considerable shareholder value going forward.  We look to add to that value by advancing our clinical-stage products, by moving internally defined product candidates toward the clinic and by exploring business development opportunities that will help expand and accelerate the development of our pipeline."
Revenues and Expenses
Revenues for the year ended December 31, 2006 were $6,626,000 compared with revenues of $6,628,000 for the year ended December 31, 2005.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2006, revenues were $1,670,000 compared with revenues of $1,672,000 for the quarter ended December 31, 2005.  Revenues for both years related primarily to financial support from Roche for the Company's ongoing development of products in its E2F cancer therapy program.
Fiscal 2006 research and development expenses were $47,428,000 compared to $24,646,000 for fiscal 2005.  Fourth quarter 2006 research and development expenses were $12,421,000 compared to $6,481,000 for the fourth quarter of 2005.  Increased research and development expenses during 2006 consisted primarily of costs related to the Phase 1 clinical trial with ARQ 197, Phase 1 and Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501 and the Phase 1 clinical trial with ARQ 171.
5
 
General and administrative expenses for fiscal 2006 were $11,560,000 compared to $8,688,000 for fiscal 2005.  In the fourth quarter of 2006, these expenses were $3,224,000, compared with $1,892,000 in the fourth quarter of 2005.  The increased expenses in fiscal 2006 were due primarily to the recognition of stock-based compensation expense as required by Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 123(R) and to facility costs previously absorbed by our chemical services operations that were discontinued in 2006.
2007 Financial Guidance
For 2007, ArQule expects revenues to range between $6.5 and $7.0 million, primarily related to the ongoing partnership with Roche.  Net use of cash is expected to range between $59 and $64 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $60 and $65 million, and net loss per share to range between $1.68 and $1.82 for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2007 with between $32 and $37 million in cash and marketable securities.
Conference Call and Webcast
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. eastern time today, February 8, 2007.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer, and Richard H. Woodrich, acting chief financial officer, will lead the call.
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 888.286.8010, and outside the U.S. 617.801.6888.  The access code is 18107940.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy
 (ACT).  The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product designed to inhibit a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation
6
 
of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, as well as the progress of its clinical trials, including the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171, Phase 1 and 2 trials with ARQ 197 and Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 171, ARQ 501 and ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 171, ARQ 501 and ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
7
 
 
 
Basic and diluted net loss per share amounts were equal in all periods presented.
(A)
        
 
 
8


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070307162027.txt.gz
TIME:20070307162027
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                                   
 
This Current Report on Form 8-K/A amends Item 1.01 of the Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 1, 2007 by ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule" or the "Registrant") to include a copy of the Research Agreement.
Section 1   Registrant's Business and Operations
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On January 26, 2007, ArQule entered into a sponsored research agreement (the "Research Agreement") with Boston Biomedical, Inc. ("BBI").  Pursuant to the Research Agreement, BBI will render research services relating to the Registrant's drug development programs.  BBI has committed to provide specified levels of scientific personnel in support of the research program through September 30, 2007.
ArQule will pay BBI on a month-to-month basis up to $4.96 million over the course of the eight-month program, with approximately $700,000 of that amount contingent upon receipt of specific deliverables.  ArQule will also provide research support in the form of loaned equipment and licensed intellectual property. The Registrant will own all intellectual property derived from the research program during the term of the Research Agreement and related intellectual property created or reduced to practice for a period of three (3) years thereafter.  In addition, as part of the transaction, the Registrant and BBI will enter into a sublease for the Registrant's facility in Norwood, Massachusetts through September 30, 2007.
A copy of the Research Agreement is filed hereto as exhibit 10.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.  A copy of the Registrant's January 26, 2007 Press Release announcing the transaction is filed hereto as exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b)  On January 26, 2007, in connection with the above-mentioned transactions, Dr. Chiang J. Li resigned his position as Executive Vice President and Chief Scientific Officer of the Registrant.  He is the Chief Executive Officer of BBI and will function as principal investigator under the Research Agreement.  Also, on January 26, 2007, the Registrant and Dr. Li entered into the Scientific Advisory Board Chairman Agreement, pursuant to which the Registrant appointed Dr. Li as the Chairman of its Scientific Advisory Board.
A copy of the Scientific Advisory Board Chairman Agreement is filed hereto as exhibit 10.2 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
2
(e)  In connection with the foregoing events, on January 26, 2007, Dr. Li entered into a separation agreement and general release (the "Separation Agreement") with the Registrant pursuant to which he was paid a lump sum severance payment in accordance with the terms of his employment agreement with the Registrant.  The payment was comprised of  (i) one year's salary in the amount of $321,048; (ii) the average of his cash bonuses over the last two years in the amount of $109,803; and (iii) the amount of $112,500, to which he was entitled under the Registrant's Annual Incentive Program for fiscal year 2006.  The Registrant, at its cost, will also maintain for a period of twelve (12) months Dr. Li's participation in its group medical, dental, life and disability insurance programs under the same terms and conditions as those available to employees of the Registrant.
In addition, Dr. Li was granted an option to purchase 64,375 shares of the Registrant's common stock, which is fully vested and exercisable on the date of grant and expires on December 31, 2008.  Dr. Li's previously vested option grants covering 216,250 shares were amended to extend the exercise period through December 31, 2007.  In connection with his appointment as Chairman of the Registrant's Scientific Advisory Board, he was granted an option to purchase 12,500 shares, which are fully vested and exercisable on the date of grant and will expire ten years after the date of grant.  As a result of Dr. Li's separation of service from the Registrant, all his unvested options have lapsed.
Approximately 26 former employees of ArQule joined Dr. Li at BBI.  Each employee of BBI who transitioned from ArQule to BBI as of January 29, 2007 executed and delivered a Separation Agreement and General Release.  In consideration for entering into such agreement, each employee received a fully-vested option to purchase shares of the Registrant's common stock with an exercise period terminating December 31, 2008, as well as an amendment to their previously vested options to extend the exercise period through December 31, 2007.  As a result of separation of service from the Registrant, all of unvested options of such employees have lapsed.
A copy of the Separation Agreement is filed hereto as exhibit 10.3 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
 
3
 
 
Certain confidential material contained in the document has been omitted and filed separately with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Rule 406 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended or Rule 24b-2 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
+
4
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
5

Exhibit 10.1
RESEARCH AGREEMENT
This RESEARCH AGREEMENT (this "Agreement") is made effective as of January 29, 2007 (the "Effective Date") by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware Corporation, with its principal place of business at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801 ("ArQule") and Boston Biomedical, Inc., a Delaware corporation, with its principal place of business at 333 Providence Highway, Norwood, MA 02062("BBI").
WHEREAS, ArQule desires that BBI perform certain research on its behalf related to ArQule's biopharmaceutical drug development programs and BBI is willing to perform such research;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing, the mutual covenants and undertakings contained herein and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Parties, intending to be legally bound, hereby agree as follows:
In addition to other terms defined elsewhere in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the following meanings when used herein (any term defined in the singular shall have the same meaning when used in the plural and vice versa, unless stated otherwise):
"" means federal, state and local laws and regulations to the extent the same are applicable to (i) performance of this Agreement, and (ii) the facilities and operations of the Parties.
1.1
                                
Applicable Laws and Regulations
"" shall have the meaning stated in Section 4.1 hereof.
1.2
                                
ArQule Intellectual Property
"" means Stephen A. Hill, the employee of ArQule designated as ArQule's scientific and technical representative for consultation and communication with BBI and the Principal Investigator regarding the Research Program, and any successor thereto, as indicated by written notice from ArQule to BBI.
1.3
                                
ArQule Representative
"" means any and all Intellectual Property conceived or reduced to practice in whole or in part, by ArQule, its employees, agents, contractors and/or consultants or otherwise owned, licensed or controlled by ArQule as of the Effective Date, including the patents and patent applications listed on Appendix C.
1.4
                             
Background Technology
"" means any and all Intellectual Property conceived or reduced to practice, in whole or in part, by BBI, its employees, agents, contractors and/or consultants
1.5
                                
BBI Technology
[*] = CERTAIN INFORMATION IN THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN OMITTED AND FILED SEPARATELY WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION.  CONFIDENTIAL TREATMENT HAS BEEN REQUESTED WITH RESPECT TO THE OMITTED PORTIONS.  OMITTED TEXT IS INDICATED BY A "*".
other than in performance of the Research Program, but excluding any ArQule Intellectual Property.
"" means, collectively, all inventions, discoveries, materials (including Proprietary Materials), data, formulae, databases, information, know-how, processes, methods, specifications, works of authorship, and designations of origin that now exist or later come into being.
1.6
                                
Intellectual Property
"" means all manner of U.S. and foreign legal protection of rights in and to Intellectual property including patents and patent applications and all reissues, reexaminations, renewals, extensions, divisions, continuations and continuations-in-part of patents and patent applications, trade secrets, property rights, copyrights, trademarks and servicemarks.
1.7
                                
Intellectual Property Rights
"" means any tangible biological, chemical, or physical materials.
1.8
                                
Materials
"" means ArQule or BBI, and "" means ArQule and BBI.
1.9
                                
Party
Parties
"" means a natural person, corporation, partnership, trust, joint venture, governmental authority or other entity or organization.
1.10
                          
Person
"" means Chiang J. Li, an employee of BBI, who shall have primary responsibility for the performance of the Research Program, and any successor thereto selected in accordance with Section 2.9.
1.11
                          
Principal Investigator
"" means all Intellectual Property (including Program Materials, Program Records and enhancements of and improvements to Background Technology) conceived, identified or reduced to practice in whole or in part by either Party individually or by the Parties jointly in the performance of the Research Program, but excluding any BBI Technology.
1.12
                          
Program Intellectual Property
"" means Materials that are discovered or developed in whole or in part in the performance of the Research Program.
1.13
                          
Program Materials
"" means scientific notes, notebooks and data arising from or directly pertaining to the Research Program.
1.14
                          
Program Records
"" means confidential or proprietary Materials of ArQule which are furnished by ArQule to BBI in connection with the performance of the Research Program.
1.15
                          
Proprietary Materials
"" means the research described in Appendix A to this Agreement relating to ArQule's drug development programs including work relating to ARQ 171/ARQ 501 mechanistic equivalence; SiRNA rescue for E2F and E2F isoform elevation specificity; mice study reports for studies that are relevant to E2F method of action; and other drug combination studies both and for ARQ 197.
1.16
                          
Research Program
in vitro
in vivo
2
"" means Dr. David Leggett, andany successor thereto designated by the Principal Investigator upon written notice to ArQule.
1.17
                          
Senior Director
"" shall have the meaning stated in Section 6.1 hereof.
1.18
                          
Term
"" means any Person that is not a Party to this Agreement.
1.19
                          
Third Party
.  Commencing on the Effective Date, BBI shall conduct the Research Program.  BBI shall carry out the Research Program under the direction of the Principal Investigator in consultation with the ArQule Representative with respect to the deliverables set forth in Appendix A and in accordance with the terms set forth in Appendix A to this Agreement, provided that the Principal Investigator shall have final authority with respect to the scientific methodology utilized by BBI in performance of the Research Program in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
2.1
                                
Conduct of Research Program
. BBI shall commit a total oftwenty-eight (28) full-time equivalents ("FTEs") dedicated solely to the performance of the Research Program pursuant to this Agreement for the period from the Effective Date through May 31, 2007 and twenty-three (23) such FTEs for the period from June 1, 2007 to September 30, 2007.  For purposes of this Agreement, an FTE is the equivalent of the full-time effort (approximately 1700 work hours) of one qualified Person for a period of one year.  The amount payable by ArQule for an FTE on an annualized basis including associated overhead and support costs is approximately *.
2.2
                                
Dedicated Personnel
2.3
                                
Funding and Resources
.  Subject to Sections 2.9 and 2.10 hereof, ArQule shall pay BBI for performance of the Research Program during the term of this Agreement in accordance with the payment schedule set forth in Appendix B (the "Payment Schedule").  ArQule shall also provide research support as the Parties may mutually deem necessary in the form of loaned equipment (the "Loaned Equipment"), Background Technology, Proprietary Materials, and Confidential Information (as defined in Section 5.1).  Loaned Equipment shall include bench-top laboratory and office equipment located at 333 Providence Highway, Norwood, MA 02062 on the Effective Date, other equipment listed in Appendix C and any additional laboratory or office equipment provided to BBI by ArQule during the Term.  At the expiration or earlier termination of this Agreement, and provided BBI shall not be in breach hereof, the ArQule Representative and the Principal Investigator shall negotiate in good faith an agreement on mutually acceptable terms for disposition of Loaned Equipment, if any, that the ArQule Representative decides is surplus to ArQule's internal requirements (the "Disposition Agreement"), including disposition by sale or lease to BBI of all or a portion thereof on terms which reflect fair market value of the Loaned Equipment.  All Loaned Equipment which is not subject to the Disposition Agreement shall be returned to ArQule upon the expiration or
3
earlier termination of this Agreement.  Indicated on Appendix C are items of equipment which the Parties currently expect will be surplus to ArQule's internal requirements at the expiration or earlier termination of this Agreement; provided, however, that such indication shall not be binding upon the Parties. For purposes of clarity, any equipment which is purchased by BBI during the Term shall remain BBI's property following termination or expiration of this Agreement.
2.4
                                
Limited Use License
.  Except as otherwise prohibited by the terms of any agreement by virtue of which ArQule acquired rights in Background Technology, ArQule hereby grants to BBI a non-exclusive, worldwide, royalty-free license, coterminous with this Agreement, under ArQule's rights to Background Technology and/or Program Intellectual Property solely to perform BBI's obligations under this Agreement.
                        
ArQule and BBI will cooperate to obtain the consent of any third party necessary to permit BBI to use the Background Technology includingthe licenses listed in Appendix D.
2.5
                                
Transitional Services
.  ArQule will provide transitional services, including administrative, electronic security and information technology services to BBI for up to thirty (30) days (or less if requested by BBI and more if mutually agreed by the Parties) after the Effective Date.  Such services will be provided at a cost equal to the direct out-of-pocket cost to ArQule and the amount thereof will be deducted from the next occurring Fixed Payment.
.  If deemed necessary or advisable by mutual agreement of the Parties in connection with the Research Program, ArQule shall continue to permit BBI to utilize during the Term the services of commercial and institutional research facilities with which it has service contracts prior to the Effective Date, and any new service contracts entered into by ArQule during the Term, provided that, such utilization shall be coordinated by, and undertaken only with the prior approval of, the ArQule Representative and any incremental cost of such use shall be borne by BBI.
2.6
                                
Third-party Support; Research Support
.  Subject to Sections 2.9 and 2.10 hereof, ArQule shall make periodic payments in advance to BBI as set forth in the Payment Schedule (each, a "Fixed Payment") and contingent payments as set forth in the Payment Schedule upon successful accomplishment of research goals and production of deliverables as specified in the Research Plan (each, a "Performance Payment").  All payments shall be paid in U.S. Dollars by check or electronic transfer, as set forth in the Payment Scheduleor by such other method mutually agreed upon by the Parties.
2.7
                                
Payments
,
.  The Principal Investigator shall devote such of his time and attention to his duties under the Research Program as shall be reasonably necessary to the performance of the Research Program; provided, however, that upon designation by Principal Investigator, the Senior Director shall have full authority to communicate with ArQule and to manage the day-to-day performance of the Research Program.  If the Principal Investigator terminates his service with BBI or otherwise becomes unavailable to work on the Research Program for any reason for a period of time which would, in the reasonable judgment of ArQule, materially and adversely affect the performance of the Research Agreement, BBI may conduct the Research Program through a replacement Principal Investigator with comparable training and experience, provided that:  (i) BBI shall promptly notify ArQule of the termination or unavailability of the Principal Investigator; and (ii) ArQule shall have the right to approve any
2.8
                                
Principal Investigator
4
replacement Principal Investigator proposed by BBI.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, based on the work remaining to be completed in connection with the Research Program and the expertise required to complete such work, ArQule shall have the right to reject any proposed replacement Principal Investigator and cause this Agreement to be terminated in accordance with Section 6.3.
.  In the event ArQule makes or becomes obligated to make any payment on behalf of BBI, whether as a result of BBI's failure to pay or due to contractual or employment relationships existing as of the Effective Date, ArQule shall be entitled to a credit for any such payment and may deduct the amount of such payment from any subsequent Fixed or Performance Payment due from ArQule to BBI hereunder.  In the event BBI is unable for any reason to provide the number of FTEs specified in Section 2.2, ArQule shall continue to make the Fixed Payments; provided, however, that a portion of each such Fixed Payment (the "Earmarked Amount") shall be used solely for the acquisition of third-party products and services in furtherance of the Research Program so as to compensate for the reduction in the number of FTE's working on the Research Program or, if not so used, shall be refunded to ArQule.  The Earmarked Amount shall be equal to the actual direct labor costs, fringe benefits and consumable expenses of BBI personnel whose termination of employment or other unavailability cause the number of FTEs engaged in the Research Program to fall below the number specified in Section 2.2.   At the end of each month during the Term, BBI will advise ArQule of unscheduled changes in the number of FTEs involved in the Research Program so as to permit calculation of Earmarked Amounts to be included in future Fixed Payments.  If ArQule is entitled to credits, deductions or refunds under this Section which exceed the amounts payable by ArQule hereunder, BBI shall be liable for and ArQule shall be entitled to collect the amount of such excess from BBI.
2.9
                                
Offset; Liability for Overpayment
.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement if, at any time during the Term, the number of FTEs engaged in performance of the Research Agreement is fewer than sixteen (16), the ArQule Representative and the Principal Investigator shall meet to discuss the effect of such reduction in staffing on performance of this Agreement.  If the ArQule Representative concludes, or the Principal Investigator informs him, that the Research Program cannot be carried out in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, the Parties shall attempt to agree upon amendments to the performance and payment terms hereof.  If the Parties are unable to agree, either Party, in addition to any other remedies available to it at law or in equity, may terminate this Agreement.
2.10
                          
Reduction in FTEs
3.1
                                
Agreement Records
. BBI shall keep and maintain during the Term and for a period of three (3) years thereafter complete, accurate and authentic (i) financial and business records, (ii) Program Records in accordance with ArQule notebook policy and in a manner suitable for establishing appropriate Intellectual Property Rights, and (iii) other records regarding Intellectual Property suitable for establishing the respective Intellectual Property Rights of the Parties therein.  The records referred to in clauses (i)-(iii) directly pertaining to funding, staffing, performance or outsourcing of the Research Program including laboratory notebooks of BBI (collectively, the "Agreement Records") shall, upon reasonable prior notice from the ArQule
5
Representative, be available for inspection, auditing, and copying during regular business hours by ArQule personnel designated by the ArQule Representative, subject to the confidentiality provisions of Article 5 below.
.
3.2
                                
Reports
(a)  BBI shall produce the reports specified as deliverables in Appendix A in a timely manner.  All reports and supporting data shall be delivered in electronic format to the "E-Room" established by ArQule for that purpose to which BBI shall be granted access.
(b)  In addition to such specified reports, BBI shall, within thirty (30) days after the end of each calendar quarter during the Research Program, provide the ArQule Representative with a written research progress report containing a description, in summary format, of the research and development work performed under this Agreement through the date of the report and the results thereof if not otherwise covered under the specified reports.  Such reports shall indicate the specific duties and projects to which FTEs were assigned.
.  If ArQule identifies any reasonable scientific concerns with respect to BBI's conduct of the Research Program, the ArQule Representative and/or other ArQule employees or representatives identified by the ArQule Representative may, as soon as mutually convenient during regular business hours (but in no event more than four (4) business days after notice to BBI) visit and inspect BBI's facilities utilized in the performance of the Research Program and examine, audit, and copy the Agreement Records to determine compliance by BBI with the stated objectives of the Research Program, BBI's achievement of deliverables thereunder, and relevant staffing and outsourcing issues, subject to the confidentiality provisions of Article 5 below.  The Principal Investigator or Senior Director and the ArQule Representative shall communicate regarding performance of the Research Program informally by telephone or electronic mail on a weekly basis or less frequently upon mutual agreement.
3.3
                                
Access and Communication
. ArQule shall solely and exclusively own all: (i) Intellectual Property conceived or reduced to practice solely by or for ArQule by ArQule's employees, agents, contractors and/or consultants, excluding BBI, whether in connection with the Research Program or otherwise; (ii) Proprietary Materials; (iii) Background Technology; (iv) Program Intellectual Property; and (v) Intellectual Property which constitutes an enhancement of or improvement to the Background Technology or the Program Intellectual Property and which is conceived or reduced to practice by BBI's employees, agents, contractors and/or consultants during the three (3) years following expiration or earlier termination of this Agreement (clause (i) through (v), collectively, the "ArQule Intellectual Property").  BBI shall solely and exclusively own all BBI Technology.
4.1
                                
Ownership
6
.  Any potentially significant ArQule Intellectual Property shall be promptly disclosed by BBI in writing to the ArQule Representative for ArQule's evaluation.  Such written disclosure shall contain sufficient scientific and technical detail to convey a reasonable understanding of the nature, purpose and characteristics of such Intellectual Property and form a basis, if appropriate, for applying for, obtaining and perfecting Intellectual Property Rights.
4.2
                                
Disclosure
.
4.3
                                
Assignments
BBI shall cause its employees, agents, contractors and consultants to assign to BBI their rights to any and all ArQule Intellectual Property.
(a) 
 
(b)  BBI shall assign, transfer and convey, and hereby assigns, transfers and conveys to ArQule, all of its rights, title, and interests in and to ArQule Intellectual Property.  Whenever requested to do so by ArQule, BBI will execute any and all applications, assignments, or other instruments and give testimony which ArQule shall deem necessary to apply for, obtain and perfect its Intellectual Property Rights in and to such ArQule Intellectual Property.  ArQule may utilize such ArQule Intellectual Property to make, have made, use, sell, have sold, offer to sell, and/or import any products or otherwise to practice any process for any lawful purpose.  ArQule shall have no obligation to account for or make any payments of any nature to BBI for its utilization of such ArQule Intellectual Property and such enhancements and improvements other than the Fixed and Performance Payments set forth in the Payment Schedule.
.  Except to the extent specifically and expressly provided, nothing in this Agreement is intended to or shall be interpreted as granting to a Party any license to or any rights, title or interest in or under any Intellectual Property that is or that comes to be owned by or licensed to the other Party, whether subordinate or dominant to any other Intellectual Property.
(e) 
No Implied Licenses
.  Each Party (the "Receiving Party") shall keep, and cause its directors, officers, employees, advisers, agents, contractors and sources of capital ("Representatives") to keep strictly confidential any information disclosed by the other Party (the "Disclosing Party") or otherwise made available to the Receiving Party concerning the Research Program or otherwise concerning the business, operations, or Intellectual Property of the Disclosing Party (whether in written media or otherwise) ("Confidential Information").  "Confidential Information" shall not include information which the Receiving Party can demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence:  (a) subsequently to the Effective Date becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of disclosure thereof by the Receiving Party; (b) subsequently to the Effective Date is lawfully received by the Receiving Party on a nonconfidential basis from a Third Party that is not itself under any obligation of confidentiality or nondisclosure to the Disclosing Party or any other Person with respect to such information; or (c) subsequently to the Effective Date is independently developed by the Receiving Party
5.1
                                
Confidential Information
7
without use of or reference to the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party.  For avoidance of doubt and notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, all information concerning the ArQule's research and development programs or otherwise concerning its business, operations, or Intellectual Property in the possession of, or otherwise know to, BBI's employees, agents, consultants or representatives as a result of any employment or other relationship with ArQule on or prior to the Effective Date and which is not exempted confidential treatment under the terms of their agreements, if any, with ArQule shall be and remain Confidential Information of ArQule and its exclusive property.
.  The Receiving Party shall use Confidential Information solely for the purposes of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby and may only disclose Confidential Information to those of its Representatives whose duties reasonably require them to have access to such Confidential Information, provided that such Representatives are bound by agreements containing obligations of confidentiality and restrictions on use at least as stringent as those contained in this Agreement.  Upon the expiration or termination of this Agreement, or earlier at the request of the Disclosing Party, the Receiving Party shall return to the Disclosing Party all originals, copies and summaries of documents, materials and other tangible manifestations of Confidential Information in the possession or control of the Receiving Party, except that the Receiving Party may retain one copy of the Confidential Information in the possession of its legal counsel solely for the purpose of monitoring its obligations under this Agreement.  Each Party shall be liable to the other for any disclosure of Confidential Information by it or its Representatives not permitted by this Agreement.
5.2
                                
Nondisclosure
.  Except as otherwise set forth in this Agreement, each Party shall maintain the confidentiality of all terms and conditions contained in this Agreement as well as the existence of the Agreement itself and, without the prior consent of the other Party which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned, neither Party shall make any press release or other public announcement disclosing this Agreement, any of its terms and conditions or the identity of the other Party or otherwise disclose the same to any Third Party (other than to its Representatives whose duties require familiarity with this Agreement), except for such disclosures (a) as may be required by Applicable Laws and Regulations, in which case the Party making disclosure shall provide the other Party with prompt advance notice of such disclosure so that the other Party has the opportunity if it so desires to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy; (b) as are included in any registration statement, prospectus, offering memorandum, periodic report or other document or filing required to comply with relevant securities laws; or (c) which are restatements of previously approved disclosures.
5.3
                                
Confidentiality of Agreement
.
5.4
                                
Proprietary Materials
(a)  BBI shall use the Proprietary Materials only in compliance with all applicable Laws and Regulations.  BBI shall not use the Proprietary Materials in any in vivo experiments on human subjects.  BBI shall not transfer any Proprietary Materials to any Third Party without the prior written consent of the BBI.
8
(b)  Any Proprietary Materials that are furnished to BBI pursuant to this Agreement are provided for experimental purposes and may have hazardous properties.  ARQULE MAKES NO WARRANTY, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR THAT THE USE OF THE BACKGROUND TECHNOLOGY AND THE PROPRIETARY MATERIALS WILL NOT INFRINGE ANY INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS OF A THIRD PARTY, OR ANY OTHER WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, WITH RESPECT TO THE PROPRIETARY MATERIALS AND THE BACKGROUND TECHNOLOGY.
(c)  .  Upon the expiration or earlier termination of this Agreement, the Recipient shall, as directed by ArQule, either destroy or return to ArQule any unused Proprietary Materials.
Return
.  The confidentiality and nondisclosure obligations of this Article 5 shall survive the expiration or earlier termination of this Agreement and remain in effect for a period of seven (7) years following the expiration or termination of this Agreement.
5.6
                                
Survival
.  This Agreement shall remain in full force and effect from the Effective Date through September 30, 2007 (the "Term"), unless terminated sooner in accordance with Sections 6.2 or 6.3 below.
6.1
                                
Term
.  In the event that either Party commits a material breach of its obligations under this Agreement and fails to cure that breach within thirty (30) days after receiving written notice thereof or if more than thirty (30) days is reasonably required, is not diligently undertaking remedial action, the other Party may terminate this Agreement effective upon expiration of such thirty-day cure period.
6.2
                                
Rights of Termination of Either Party
.  In addition to its right set forth in Section 6.2, ArQule may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice of such termination to BBI if (a) the conditions for termination arise as set forth in Section 2.8, but only upon thirty (30) days' prior notice and then only if within such thirty (30) day period, BBI is unable to identify a candidate with the training and experience reasonably necessary to serve as the Principal Investigator of the Research Program; or (b) (i) BBI shall admit in writing its inability to pay its debts generally or make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors,  (ii) any proceeding shall be instituted by or against BBI (which is not dismissed within sixty (60) days) seeking to adjudicate it bankrupt or insolvent, or seeking liquidation, winding up, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment, protection,  relief,  or composition  of  BBI  or  its  debts under  any  law  relating  to bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization or relief of debtors, or seeking the entry of an order for relief or the appointment of  a receiver, trustee, custodian or other similar official for it or for substantially all of its property; or (iii) BBI shall take any corporate action to  authorize  any  of  the  actions  set  forth  in Section 6.3 (b).
6.3
                                
Special Right of Termination
9
.  Upon expiration or termination of this Agreement:
6.4
                                
Effect of Expiration or Termination
(a)  the Research Program shall terminate effective as of the expiration or termination date; and
(b)  unless the Parties have entered into a separate agreement for disposition of the Loaned Equipment on mutually acceptable terms, it shall be returned to ArQule upon the expiration or earlier termination of this Agreement.
.  Expiration or earlier termination of this Agreement shall not affect the rights and obligations of the Parties accrued prior to expiration or termination (or the remedies of the Parties otherwise available at law or in equity in relation to such rights and obligations).  The following provisions shall survive indefinitely if no shorter period is provided for in such provision: Sections 3.1, 3.2, 4.1, 4.2, 4.3(b), Article 5, Sections 6.4, 6.5 and 6.6, Article 7 and Sections 9.2, 9.5 and 9.12.
6.5
                                
Survival
.  Notwithstanding termination of this Agreement, Research Program, BBI and ArQule shall cooperate to bring the Research Program to an orderly conclusion including completing as much of the work in progress as is reasonably practicable and collecting, summarizing and recording results and conclusions therefrom, and BBI shall be compensated in accordance with Appendix B for work performed in accordance with Appendix A and on a time and materials basis for any work performed in excess of the work contemplated under Appendix A.
6.6
                                
Completion of Work in Progress
. BBI shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law, indemnify, defend and hold harmless ArQule and any parent, subsidiary or sibling entity of ArQule and their respective shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, contractors, successors and assigns ("Indemnified Parties") from and against any and all suits, actions, legal or administrative proceedings, claims, liens, demands, damages, liabilities, losses, costs, fees, penalties, fines and expenses (including attorneys' fees and expenses and costs of investigation, litigation and settlement) ("Damages"), directly or indirectly arising out of or connected with (i) the actual or alleged breach of BBI's representations, warranties or covenants contained herein; (ii) injury to or death of persons (including BBI's employees) and damage to or destruction of property caused by the actions or inaction of BBI's officers, employees, agents, contractors; or (iii) BBI's disclosure to ArQule (except for disclosure which has been approved by ArQule or as is otherwise necessary under Section 4 of this Agreement) or infringement or misappropriation in the conduct of the Research Program, of any Intellectual Property of a third party, whether or intentional, willful, inadvertent or otherwise except to the extent that those Damages have been caused by the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnified Parties as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final and non-appealable decision or in a binding settlement between the Parties.  Indemnification shall not be the exclusive remedy
7.1
                                
General Indemnification
10
of ArQule for Damages but shall, whenever possible, be cumulative, in addition to, and not in lieu of any other remedies available at law or in equity.
.  BBI represents and warrants to ArQule that:
8.1
                                
BBI Representations
(a)  BBI is a duly organized and validly existing corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is organized and has all requisite corporate power and authority for the ownership and operation of its properties and for the carrying on of its business as now conducted and as now proposed to be conducted.  BBI is duly licensed or qualified and in good standing as a foreign corporation authorized to do business in Massachusetts and in each other jurisdiction in which the nature of the business transacted by it or the character of the properties owned or leased by it requires such licensing or qualification, unless the failure to so qualify does not and will not have a material and adverse effect on the business operations or financial condition of BBI.
(b)  BBI has all necessary corporate power and has taken all corporate action required to make this Agreement and any other agreements and instruments executed in connection herewith the valid and enforceable obligations of BBI.
(c)  All authorizations, consents, approvals, licenses, permits, registrations or exemptions from filing with any governmental department, commission, board, bureau, agency or instrumentality necessary for the performance by BBI of its obligations under this Agreement shall have been obtained prior to, and shall be effective as of, the Effective Date, or shall be obtained promptly thereafter but in any event prior to BBI's conduct of the activities necessitating such governmental consents, approvals, licenses, permits and registrations.  BBI shall maintain in all material respects during the Term, all such governmental consents, approvals, licenses, permits and registrations.
(d)  BBI has the full power and right to grant to ArQule the rights granted under this Agreement, and has not granted and shall not grant any rights to any Third Party that are inconsistent with the rights granted to ArQule under this Agreement.
(e)  BBI will not use in connection with the Research Program any funds, equipment, or similar resources received through grants, awards, or contracts from any Third Party without the prior written consent of ArQule.
(f)  The Research Program shall be carried out in accordance with prevailing industry standards in a timely manner by personnel of BBI with the requisite skills, expertise and experience and with Applicable Laws and Regulations.  BBI will not disclose to ArQule (except for disclosure which has been approved by ArQule or as is otherwise necessary under Section 4 of this Agreement), or intentionally or willfully infringe or misappropriate in the conduct of the Research Program, any Intellectual Property of a third party.
11
Upon execution of this Agreement, BBI shall provide ArQule with an opinion of its counsel, Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP, in the form of Appendix E hereto.
.  ArQule represents and warrants to BBI that ArQule has all necessary corporate power and has taken all corporate action required to make this Agreement and any other agreements and instruments executed in connection herewith the valid and enforceable obligations of ArQule.
8.2
                                
ArQule Representations
  Each of the Parties shall be furnishing its services hereunder as an independent contractor.  This Agreement shall not create any association, partnership or joint venture between the Parties or an employer-employee relationship.  No officer, employee, agent, servant, guarantor or fiduciary of either Party shall be, or shall be deemed to be, the officer, employee, agent, servant, guarantor or fiduciary of the other Party by virtue of this Agreement, and each Party shall be solely and entirely responsible for its acts and the acts of its officers, employees, agents, and servants.  Neither Party shall have or represent itself as having authority to create any obligation or duty in the name of or on behalf of the other Party.  This Agreement is not intended to benefit any Person other than the Parties hereto and no Third Party shall have any right to enforce this Agreement or obtain any remedy for its breach.
9.1
                                
Independent Contractors.
.  This Agreement shall be construed and interpreted under and in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts without regard to its conflicts of laws provisions.  All suits, claims or other causes of action arising out of or relating to this Agreement shall be brought in a state or federal court sitting in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and each Party hereby consents to the exclusive jurisdiction and venue of such court in that event.  In any proceeding arising out of or in connection with the terms of this Agreement, the prevailing Party, in addition to any other remedies that may be awarded, shall be entitled to recover from the other Party its reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses and costs of investigation, litigation and settlement.  No action taken or right exercised by a party under this Agreement shall in any manner act as an election or limitation upon its remedies and rights otherwise provided under this Agreement or at law or in equity.
9.2
                                
Governing Law
9.3
                                
Insurance
.  ArQule and BBI shall each obtain and maintain during the Term insurance with coverages and policy amounts commercially reasonable for their respective businesses.  Upon request, each will provide the other with evidence of such insurance.
.  This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which shall constitute one and the same instrument.  This Agreement may be executed by facsimile.
9.4
                                
Counterparts
.  In any case where any notice or other communication is required or permitted to be given hereunder, such notice or communication shall be in writing and sent by
9.5
                                
Notices
12
overnight express or registered or certified mail (with return receipt requested) and shall be sent to the following address (or such other address as either Party may designate from time to time in writing):
If to ArQule:
ArQule, Inc.
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA 01801
Telephone: (781) 994-0300
Telefax: (781) 994-0587
Attention:  President and Chief Executive Officer
Copy to:  General Counsel
If to BBI:
Boston Biomedical, Inc.  333 Providence Highway
Norwood MA
Telephone:  (781) 278-0900
Telefax:  (781) 762-9863 Attention:  President and Chief Executive Officer
Copy to:  Michael D. Bain
Hale and Dorr Venture Group
Bay Colony Corporate Center
1100 Winter Street
Waltham, MA 02451
Telephone:  (781) 966-2027
.  This Agreement shall not be assigned or delegated, in whole or in part, by either Party without the prior written consent of the other Party which shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned and any attempted assignment without such consent shall be null and void.  Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, either party may assign, without the prior written consent of the other party, all (but not less than all) of its rights and delegate all (but not less than all) of its obligations under this Agreement to (i) any entity that is a purchaser or other successor in interest to all or substantially all of the business or assets of such Party or (ii) to an affiliate of such Party; provided, however, that notwithstanding any such assignment and delegation to an affiliate, the assigning and delegating party shall remain primarily, jointly and severally liable for the performance by such affiliate of this Agreement.  This Agreement shall be binding upon the successors and permitted assigns of the Parties.
9.6
                                
Assignment; Binding Effect
13
.  This Agreement and the Appendices hereto and (when executed) the proposed sublease of premises at 333 Providence Highway, Norwood MA by and between the Parties (the "Sublease") constitute related elements of a larger transaction and, as such, the entire and complete understanding between the parties with respect to the covered subject matter.  Such documents replace, supersede and render void any and all predecessor agreements between the parties, whether written or oral regarding such subject matter.  Neither Party has entered into this Agreement in reliance upon any representation, warranty, covenant or undertaking of the other Party that is not set forth or referred to in this Agreement or the Sublease.
9.7
                                
Entire Agreement
.  This Agreement may be varied, amended or extended only by the written agreement of the Parties acting through their respective duly authorized officers or representatives, specifically referring to this Agreement.
9.8
                                
Amendment
.  If any provision of this Agreement or the application thereof is held by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, such invalidity shall not affect the other provisions of this Agreement, the enforceability of this Agreement as a whole or the enforceability of such provision in other jurisdictions to the extent permitted by law.  In such event, the Parties shall promptly negotiate in good faith a lawful, valid and enforceable provision that is as similar to the invalid provision as may be possible.
9.9
                                
Severability
.  No waiver by any party of any obligation under this Agreement, or of any breach thereof, shall constitute a continuing or additional waiver of such obligation or breach or of any other prior, contemporaneous or subsequent obligation or breach, whether of the same, similar or different nature.  No waiver of any obligation hereunder, or of any breach thereof, shall be effective unless in writing and signed by a duly authorized officer or representative for the Party giving the waiver.
9.10
                          
No Waiver of Rights
.  A Party shall be excused from performing its obligations under this Agreement if its performance is delayed or prevented by any event beyond such Party's reasonable control, including, but not limited to, acts of God, fire, explosion, weather, disease, war, insurrection, civil strife, riots, government action, or power failure; provided that such performance shall be excused only to the extent of and during such disability. 
9.11
                          
Force Majeure
.
9.12  
                 
Headings and Interpretations
The descriptive headings contained in this Agreement are included for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.
(a)
      
(b)  Unless otherwise specified, all references to "days" are to calendar rather than business days.
(c)  Wherever any provision of this Agreement uses the term "including" (or "includes"), such term shall be deemed to mean "including without limitation" and "including
14
but not limited to" (or "includes without limitation" and "includes but is not limited to") regardless of whether the words "without limitation" or "but not limited to" actually follow the term "including" (or "includes").
(d)  The Appendices to this Agreement, and the terms and conditions incorporated in the Appendices shall be deemed integral parts of this Agreement and all references herein to this Agreement shall encompass such Appendices and the incorporated terms and conditions.
(e)  Unless otherwise explicitly stated, in the event of any conflict between the terms of the Agreement and the terms and conditions of any of the Appendices hereto, the terms of the Agreement shall prevail.
(g)  This Agreement shall be construed as if both Parties drafted it jointly, and shall not be construed against either Party as principal drafter.
Further Assurances.  On and after the Effective Date, the Parties shall cooperate with respect to the taking of such actions, including execution and delivery of documents, instruments and amendments as the Parties may deem reasonably necessary to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby.
9.13
                          
15
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their duly authorized officers as of the date set forth above.
 
16
Scientific Operational Deliverables
*
Project specific scientific deliverables
ARQ 171/501
*
ARQ 197
*
Manuscripts  Deliverables
ARQ 501 * related studies submit to * (or equivalent) by *
                 
ARQ 171 & 501 (Second * paper) - * paper submitted to * (or equivalent) by  *, pending * approval
                 
197 *, submitted end of * to * (at least one high impact article  others can be lower in impact)  (* or equivalent)
                 
 
 
 
:
Fixed Payments
 
:
Performance Payments
Submission of paper regarding first comprehensive description of ARQ 197 by * to JPET (or equivalent):  $*
                 
Submission of paper on ARQ 501 mechanism of action studies to Cancer Research (or equivalent) by *:  $ *
                 
Delivery of historical study reports to ArQule by *:  $*
                 
ARQ 171 & 501 (second mechanism of action paper) - - Pharmacology and mechanistic comparability paper submitted to Cancer Research (or equivalent) by *, pending * approval:  $*
                 
Delivery of final report for concrete demonstration of ARQ 171, ARQ 501 mechanistic equivalence by *: $*
                 
 
For purposes of clarity, to the extent that any of the timelines set forth above are extended by mutual agreement of the Parties, the Performance Payment payable upon achievement of a particular milestone shall be payable to BBI upon achievement of such milestone within the applicable extended timeline.
:
Wire Instructions
Check Payment Instructions:
:
Loaned Equipment
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
:
Background Technology
 
 
 
:  [TBD]
Proprietary Materials
1. Tet On License from IP Merchandisers  -
Required by BBI
2. InCell Corporation License Agreement for Cell Lines  -
Required by BBI
3. Brookhaven Science Associates, LLC License (March 2006)
 [TBD]


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070328125303.txt.gz
TIME:20070328125303
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
March 22, 2007
ARQULE, INC.
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
. The primary purpose of the amendment was to update the by-laws to reflect changes to the Delaware General Corporation Law ("DGCL") relating to the voting list provisions to provide that the list of all stockholders entitled to vote at an election of directors may be made available either on a reasonably accessible electronic network, or during normal business hours at the Company's principal place of business in accordance with DGCL Section 219.
(a)           On March 22, 2007, the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") approved an amendment and restatement of the Registrant's Amended and Restated By-laws, which became effective immediately upon adoption
Prior to the amendment the by-laws called for the Registrant to provide the voting list either at a place within the city where such meeting was to be held, as specified in the notice of the meeting, or if not so specified, at the place where the meeting was to be held.
The description of the amendment and the provisions of the Amended and Restated By-Laws set forth herein does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Restated By-Laws attached hereto as Exhibit 3.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
3.1           Amended and Restated By-laws of ArQule, Inc.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 3.1
AMENDED AND RESTATED BY-LAWS OF ARQULE, INC.
SECTION 1.                 .  All meetings of stockholders shall be held at the principal office of the corporation or at such other place as may be named in the notice.
Place of Meetings
SECTION 2.                 .  The annual meeting of stockholders for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may properly come before the meeting shall be held on such date and at such hour and place as the directors or an officer designated by the directors may determine.  If the annual meeting is not held on the date designated therefor, the directors shall cause the meeting to be held as soon thereafter as convenient.
Annual Meeting
SECTION 3.                 .  Special meetings of the stockholders may be called at any time by the President or a majority of the Board of Directors.
Special Meetings
SECTION 4.                 .  Except where some other notice is required by law, written notice of each meeting of stockholders, stating the place, date and hour thereof and the purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given by the Secretary under the direction of the Board of Directors or the President, not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date fixed for such meeting, to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting.  Notice shall be given personally to each stockholder or left at his or her residence or usual place of business or mailed postage prepaid and addressed to the stockholder at his or her address as it appears upon the records of the corporation.  In case of the death, absence, incapacity or refusal of the Secretary, such notice may be given by a person designated either by the Secretary or by the person or persons calling the meeting or by the Board of Directors.  A waiver of such notice in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to said notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to such notice.  Attendance of a person at a meeting of stockholders shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.  Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the stockholders need be specified in any written waiver of notice.  Except as required by statute, notice of any adjourned meeting of the stockholders shall not be required.
Notice of Meetings
SECTION 5.                 .  The Board of Directors may fix in advance a record date for the determination of the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of
Record Date
any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action.  Such record date shall not be more than 60 nor less than 10 days before the date of such meeting, nor more than 60 days before any other action to which such record date relates.  If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day before the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day before the day on which the meeting is held, and the record date for determining stockholders for any other purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating to such purpose.  A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
SECTION 6.  .  Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the following procedures shall be eligible for election as directors at any annual or special meeting of stockholders.  Nominations of persons for election as directors may be made only by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or by any stockholder entitled to vote for the election of directors at the meeting in compliance with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 6.  Such nominations, other than those made by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, shall be made pursuant to timely notice in writing to the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President or the Secretary.  To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation by the close of business on the Advance Notice Date.  For the purposes of these by-laws, the "Advance Notice Date" shall be one of the following:
Nomination of Directors
(a) in the case of an annual meeting only, the date 75 days before the anniversary date of the prior year's meeting, if (i) there was an annual meeting in the prior year and (ii) the date of the current year's annual meeting is not more than 30 days before or after the anniversary date of the prior year's annual meeting; or
(b) if clause (a) does not apply, the date 45 days prior to the date of the current year's annual meeting or a special meeting if at least 60 days' notice or prior public disclosure of the date of the current year's annual meeting or the special meeting is given or made; or
(c) if neither clause (a) nor clause (b) applies, the date 15 days after the day on which notice of the date of the current year's annual meeting or the special meeting was mailed or public disclosure was made.
Such stockholder's notice shall set forth (a) as to each person whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a director, (i) the name, age, business address and residence address of the person, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of the person, (iii) the class and number of shares of capital stock of the corporation that are beneficially owned by the person and (iv) any other information relating to the person that is required to be disclosed in solicitations for proxies for election of directors pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or any successor provision thereto; and (b) as to the
stockholder giving the notice, (i) the name and record address of such stockholder and (ii) the class and number of shares of capital stock of the corporation that are beneficially owned by such stockholder.
The chairman of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the foregoing procedure, and if the chairman should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
SECTION 7.  .  At any annual meeting of the stockholders, only such business shall be conducted as shall have been properly brought before the meeting.  To be brought properly before an annual meeting, business must be either (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the President or the Board of Directors, (b) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder.  In addition to any other applicable requirements, for business to be brought properly before an annual meeting by a stockholder, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President or the Secretary.  To be timely, a stockholder's notice must be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation by the close of business on the Advance Notice Date as defined in Section 6 of Article I hereof.  A stockholder's notice shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and record address of the stockholder proposing such business, (c) the class and number of shares of the corporation that are beneficially owned by the stockholder and (d) any material interest of the stockholder in such business.
Advance Notice of Business at Annual Meetings
Notwithstanding anything in these by-laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at the annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 7, , , that nothing in this Section 7 shall be deemed to preclude discussion by any stockholder of any business properly brought before the annual meeting in accordance with said procedure.
provided
however
The chairman of an annual meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the foregoing procedure, and if the chairman should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
SECTION 8.             .  The officer who has charge of the stock ledger of the corporation shall prepare and make or have made, at least 10 days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder.  Nothing contained in this section shall require the corporation to include electronic mail addresses or other electronic contact information on such list. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder for any purpose germane to the meeting for a period of at least 10 days prior to the meeting: (i) on a reasonably accessible
Voting List
electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of the meeting, or (ii), at the principal place of business of the corporation. In the event that the corporation determines to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is available only to stockholders of the corporation. If the meeting is to be held at a place, then the list shall be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present. If solely by means of remote communication, then the list shall also be open to the examination of any stockholder during the whole time of the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access such list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting.  The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled by this section to examine the stock ledger, the list required by this section or the books and records of the corporation or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.(1)
during ordinary business hours
the meeting is to be held
(1) Section 8 was amended by the Board of Directors of the corporation on March 22, 2007.
SECTION 9.                 .  At any meeting of the stockholders, the holders of a majority in interest of all stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote upon a question to be considered at the meeting, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum for the consideration of such question, but in the absence of a quorum a smaller group may adjourn any meeting from time to time.  When a quorum is present at any meeting, a majority of the votes properly cast shall, except where a different vote is required by law, by the Certificate of Incorporation or by these by-laws, decide any question brought before such meeting.  Any election by stockholders shall be determined by a plurality of the vote cast by the stockholders entitled to vote at the election.
Quorum of Stockholders
SECTION 10.  .  Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, each stockholder shall at every meeting of the stockholders be entitled to one vote in person or by proxy for each share of the capital stock held of record by such stockholder, but no proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless said proxy provides for a longer period.  Persons holding stock in a fiduciary capacity shall be entitled to vote the shares so held, and persons whose stock is pledged shall be entitled to vote unless in the transfer by the pledgor on the books of the corporation the pledgee shall have been expressly empowered to vote thereon, in which case only the pledgee or the pledgee's proxy may represent said stock and vote thereon.  Shares of the capital stock of the corporation belonging to the corporation or to another corporation, a majority of whose shares entitled to vote in the election of directors is owned by the corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes.
Proxies and Voting
SECTION 11.  .  Meetings of the stockholders shall be presided over by one of the following officers in the order specified and if present and acting:  the Chairman of the Board, if any, the Vice Chairman of the Board, if any, the President, a Vice-President (and, in the event there be more than one person in any such office, in the order of their seniority), or, if none of the foregoing is in office and present and acting, a chairman designated by the Board of Directors or, in the absence of such designation, a chairman chosen by the stockholders at the meeting.  The Secretary of the corporation, if present, or an Assistant Secretary, shall act as
Conduct of Meeting
secretary of every meeting, but if neither the Secretary nor an Assistant Secretary is present the chairman of the meeting shall appoint a secretary of the meeting.
The Board of Directors may adopt such rules, regulations and procedures for the conduct of the meeting of stockholders as it shall deem appropriate.  Except to the extent inconsistent with such rules and regulations as adopted by the Board of Directors, the chairman of the meeting shall have the right and authority to prescribe such rules, regulations and procedures and to do all such acts as, in the judgment of such chairman, are appropriate for the proper conduct of the meeting.  Such rules, regulations or procedures, whether adopted by the Board of Directors or prescribed by the chairman of the meeting, may include, without limitation, (i) the establishment of an agenda or order of business for the meeting, (ii) rules and procedures for maintaining order at the meeting and the safety of those present, (iii) limitations on attendance at or participation in the meeting to stockholders of record of the corporation, their duly authorized and constituted proxies or such other persons as the chairman of the meeting shall determine, (iv) restrictions on entry to the meeting after the time fixed for the commencement thereof, and (v) limitations on the time allotted to questions or comments by participants.  Unless and to the extent determined by the Board of Directors or the chairman of the meeting, meetings of stockholders shall not be required to be held in accordance with the rules of parliamentary procedure.
SECTION 1.                 .  The business and affairs of the corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of a Board of Directors, who may exercise all of the powers of the corporation that are not by law required to be exercised by the stockholders.  In the event of a vacancy in the Board of Directors, the remaining directors, except as otherwise provided by law, may exercise the powers of the full Board until the vacancy is filled.
General Powers
SECTION 2.                 .  Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the number of directors that shall constitute the whole Board shall be fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors but in no event shall be less than one. The directors shall be elected in the manner provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, by such stockholders as have the right to vote thereon.  The number of directors may be increased or decreased by action of the Board of Directors.  Directors need not be stockholders of the corporation.
Number; Election; Tenure and Qualification
SECTION 3.                 .  Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the number of the Board of Directors may be increased at any time, such increase to be effective immediately unless otherwise specified in the resolution, by vote of a majority of the directors then in office.
Enlargement of the Board
SECTION 4.                 .  Unless and until filled by the stockholders and except as otherwise determined by the Board of Directors in establishing a series of Preferred Stock as to directors elected by the holders of such series, any vacancy in the Board of Directors, however occurring, including a vacancy resulting from an enlargement of the Board and an unfilled
Vacancies
vacancy resulting from the removal of any director, may be filled by vote of a majority of the directors then in office although less than a quorum, or by the sole remaining director.  Each director so chosen to fill a vacancy shall serve for a term determined in the manner provided in the Certificate of Incorporation.  When one or more directors shall resign from the Board, effective at a future date, a majority of the directors then in office, including those who have so resigned, shall have the power to fill such vacancy or vacancies, the vote thereon to take effect when such resignation or resignations shall become effective.  If at any time there are no directors in office, then an election of directors may be held in accordance with the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
SECTION 5.                 .  Any director may resign at any time upon written notice to the corporation.  Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therein, or if no time is specified, at the time of its receipt by the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President or the Secretary.
Resignation
SECTION 6.                 .  Directors may be removed from office only as provided in the Certificate of Incorporation.  The vacancy or vacancies created by the removal of a director may be filled by the stockholders at the meeting held for the purpose of removal or, if not so filled, by the directors in the manner provided in Section 4 of this Article II.
Removal
SECTION 7.                 .  The Board of Directors may, by resolution or resolutions passed by a majority of the whole Board of Directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more directors of the corporation.  The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee to replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee.  In the absence or disqualification of any member of any such committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of such absent or disqualified member.  The Board of Directors shall have the power to change the members of any such committee at any time, to fill vacancies therein and to discharge any such committee, either with or without cause, at any time.
Committees
Any such committee, to the extent permitted by law and to the extent provided in the resolution of the Board of Directors or in these by-laws, shall have and may exercise all the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the corporation, and may authorize the seal of the corporation to be affixed to all papers that may require it.
A majority of all the members of any such committee may fix its rules of procedure, determine its action and fix the time and place, whether within or without the State of Delaware, of its meetings and specify what notice thereof, if any, shall be given, unless the Board of Directors shall otherwise by resolution provide.  Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its meetings and make such reports as the Board of Directors may from time to time request.
SECTION 8.                 . Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without call or formal notice at such places either within or without the
Meetings of the Board of Directors
State of Delaware and at such times as the Board may by vote from time to time determine.  A regular meeting of the Board of Directors may be held without call or formal notice immediately after and at the same place as the annual meeting of the stockholders, or any special meeting of the stockholders at which a Board of Directors is elected.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be held at any place either within or without the State of Delaware at any time when called by the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President, the Secretary or two or more directors.  Reasonable notice of the time and place of a special meeting shall be given to each director unless such notice is waived by attendance or by written waiver in the manner provided in these by-laws for waiver of notice by stockholders.  Notice may be given by, or by a person designated by, the Secretary, the person or persons calling the meeting, or the Board of Directors.  No notice of any adjourned meeting of the Board of Directors shall be required.  In any case it shall be deemed sufficient notice to a director to send notice by mail at least seventy-two hours, or by telegram or fax at least forty-eight hours, before the meeting, addressed to such director at his or her usual or last known business or home address.
Directors or members of any committee may participate in a meeting of the Board of Directors or of such committee by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation by such means shall constitute presence in person at such meeting.
SECTION 9.                 .  A majority of the total number of directors shall constitute a quorum, except that when a vacancy or vacancies exist in the Board, a majority of the directors then in office (but not less than one-third of the total number of the directors) shall constitute a quorum.  A majority of the directors present, whether or not a quorum is present, may adjourn any meeting from time to time.  The vote of a majority of the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors, except where a different vote is required by law, by the Certificate of Incorporation or by these by-laws.
Quorum and Voting
SECTION 10.               .  The Board of Directors may fix fees for their services and for their membership on committees, and expenses of attendance may be allowed for attendance at each meeting.  Nothing herein contained shall be construed to preclude any director from serving the corporation in any other capacity, as an officer, agent or otherwise, and receiving compensation therefor.
Compensation
SECTION 11.               .  Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or of any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting and without notice if a written consent thereto is signed by all members of the Board of Directors or of such committee, as the case may be, and such written consent is filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or of such committee.
Action Without Meeting
SECTION 1.                 .  The officers of the corporation shall consist of a President, a Secretary, a Treasurer and such other officers with such other titles as the Board of Directors shall determine, who may include without limitation a Chairman of the Board, a Vice-Chairman of the Board and one or more Vice-Presidents, Assistant Treasurers or Assistant Secretaries.
Titles
SECTION 2.                 .  The officers of the corporation shall be elected annually by the Board of Directors at its first meeting following the annual meeting of the stockholders. Each officer shall hold office until his or her successor is elected and qualified, unless a different term is specified in the vote electing such officer, or until his or her earlier death, resignation or removal.
Election and Term of Office
SECTION 3.                 .  Unless otherwise provided by resolution of the Board of Directors, no officer, other than the Chairman or Vice-Chairman of the Board, need be a director.  No officer need be a stockholder.  Any number of offices may be held by the same person, as the directors shall determine.
Qualification
SECTION 4.                 .  Any officer may be removed, with or without cause, at any time, by resolution adopted by the Board of Directors.
Removal
SECTION 5.                 .  Any officer may resign by delivering a written resignation to the corporation at its principal office or to the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President or the Secretary.  Such resignation shall be effective upon receipt or at such later time as may be specified therein.
Resignation
SECTION 6.                 .  The Board of Directors may at any time fill any vacancy occurring in any office for the unexpired portion of the term and may leave unfilled for such period as it may determine any office other than those of President, Treasurer and Secretary.
Vacancies
SECTION 7.                 .  The officers of the corporation shall have such powers and perform such duties as are specified herein and as may be conferred upon or assigned to them by the Board of Directors and shall have such additional powers and duties as are incident to their office except to the extent that resolutions of the Board of Directors are inconsistent therewith.
Powers and Duties
SECTION 8.                 .  Except to the extent that such duties are assigned by the Board of Directors to the Chairman of the Board, or in the absence of the Chairman or in the event of his or her inability or refusal to act, the President shall be the chief executive officer of the corporation and shall have general and active management of the business of the corporation and general supervision of its officers, agents and employees, and shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors are carried into effect.  The President shall preside at each meeting of the stockholders and the Board of Directors unless a Chairman or Vice-Chairman of the Board is elected by the Board and is assigned the duty of presiding at such meeting.
President and Vice-Presidents
The Board of Directors may assign to any Vice-President the title of Executive Vice-President, Senior Vice-President or any other title selected by the Board of Directors.  In
the absence of the President or in the event of his or her inability or refusal to act, the duties of the President shall be performed by the Executive Vice-President, if any, Senior Vice President, if any, or Vice President, if any, in that order (and, in the event there be more than one person in any such office, in the order of their seniority), and when so acting, such officer shall have all the powers of and be subject to all the restrictions upon the President.
SECTION 9.                 .  The Secretary shall attend all meetings of the Board of Directors and of the stockholders and record all the proceedings of such meetings in a book to be kept for that purpose, shall give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the stockholders and special meetings of the Board of Directors, shall maintain a stock ledger and prepare lists of stockholders and their addresses as required and shall have custody of the corporate seal, which the Secretary or any Assistant Secretary shall have authority to affix to any instrument requiring it and attest by any of their signatures.  The Board of Directors may give general authority to any other officer to affix and attest the seal of the corporation.
Secretary and Assistant Secretaries
Any Assistant Secretary may, in the absence of the Secretary or in the event of the Secretary's inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Secretary.
SECTION 10.  .  The Treasurer shall have the custody of the corporate funds and securities, shall keep full and accurate accounts of receipts and disbursements in books belonging to the corporation and shall deposit all moneys and other valuable effects in the name and to the credit of the corporation in such depositories as may be designated by or pursuant to resolution of the Board of Directors.  The Treasurer shall disburse the funds of the corporation as may be ordered by the Board of Directors, the Chairman of the Board, if any, or the President, taking proper vouchers for such disbursements, and shall render to the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President and the Board of Directors, at its regular meetings or whenever they may require it, an account of all transactions and of the financial condition of the corporation.
Treasurer and Assistant Treasurers
Any Assistant Treasurer may, in the absence of the Treasurer or in the event of his or her inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Treasurer.
SECTION 11.  .  The Board of Directors may require any officer to give the corporation a bond in such sum and with such surety or sureties as shall be satisfactory to the Board of Directors upon such terms and conditions as the Board of Directors may specify, including without limitation a bond for the faithful performance of the duties of such officer and for the restoration to the corporation of all property in his or her possession or control belonging to the corporation.
Bonded Officers
SECTION 12.  .  Officers of the corporation shall be entitled to such salaries, compensation or reimbursement as shall be fixed or allowed from time to time by the Board of Directors or any committee thereof appointed for the purpose.
Salaries
 
 
SECTION 1.                 .  One or more stock certificates, signed by the Chairman or Vice-Chairman of the Board of Directors or by the President or a Vice-President and by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, shall be issued to each stockholder certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the corporation.  Any or all signatures on any such certificate may be facsimiles.  In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who shall have signed or whose facsimile signature shall have been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
Certificates of Stock
Each certificate for shares of stock that are subject to any restriction on transfer pursuant to the Certificate of Incorporation, the by-laws, applicable securities laws, or any agreement among any number of stockholders or among such holders and the corporation shall have conspicuously noted on the face or back of the certificate either the full text of the restriction or a statement of the existence of such restriction.
SECTION 2.                 .  Subject to the restrictions, if any, stated or noted on the stock certificates, shares of stock may be transferred on the books of the corporation by the surrender to the corporation or its transfer agent of the certificate representing such shares properly endorsed or accompanied by a written assignment or power of attorney properly executed, and with such proof of authority or the authenticity of signature as the corporation or its transfer agent may reasonably require.  The corporation shall be entitled to treat the record holder of stock as shown on its books as the owner of such stock for all purposes, including the payment of dividends and the right to vote with respect to that stock, regardless of any transfer, pledge or other disposition of that stock, until the shares have been transferred on the books of the corporation in accordance with the requirements of these by-laws.
Transfers of Shares of Stock
SECTION 3.                 .  A new stock certificate may be issued in the place of any certificate theretofore issued by the corporation and alleged to have been lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated, upon such terms in conformity with law as the Board of Directors shall prescribe.  The directors may, in their discretion, require the owner of the lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated certificate, or the owner's legal representatives, to give the corporation a bond, in such sum as they may direct, to indemnify the corporation against any claim that may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of any such certificate, or the issuance of any such new certificate.
Lost Certificates
SECTION 4.                 .  The corporation may, but shall not be required to, issue fractions of a share.  If the corporation does not issue fractions of a share, it shall (i) arrange for the disposition of fractional interests by those entitled thereto, (ii) pay in cash the fair value of fractions of a share as of the time when those entitled to receive such fractions are determined, or (iii) issue scrip or warrants in registered or bearer form, which shall entitle the holder to receive a certificate for a full share upon the surrender of such scrip or warrants aggregating a full share.  A certificate for a fractional share shall, but scrip or warrants shall not
Fractional Share Interests
unless otherwise provided therein, entitle the holder to exercise voting rights, to receive dividends thereon, and to participate in any of the assets of the corporation in the event of liquidation.  The Board of Directors may cause scrip or warrants to be issued subject to the conditions that they shall become void if not exchanged for certificates representing full shares before a specified date, or subject to the conditions that the shares for which scrip or warrants are exchangeable may be sold by the corporation and the proceeds thereof distributed to the holders of scrip or warrants, or subject to any other conditions that the Board of Directors may impose.
SECTION 5.                 .  Subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, the Board of Directors may, out of funds legally available therefor, at any regular or special meeting, declare dividends upon the capital stock of the corporation as and when they deem expedient.
Dividends
The corporation shall, to the extent legally permissible, indemnify each person who may serve or who has served at any time as a director or officer of the corporation or of any of its subsidiaries, or who at the request of the corporation may serve or at any time has served as a director, officer or trustee of, or in a similar capacity with, another organization or an employee benefit plan, against all expenses and liabilities (including counsel fees, judgments, fines, excise taxes, penalties and amounts payable in settlements) reasonably incurred by or imposed upon such person in connection with any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or other proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative, in which he may become involved by reason of his serving or having served in such capacity (other than a proceeding voluntarily initiated by such person unless he is successful on the merits, the proceeding was authorized by the corporation or the proceeding seeks a declaratory judgment regarding his own conduct); provided that no indemnification shall be provided for any such person with respect to any matter as to which he shall have been finally adjudicated in any proceeding not to have acted in good faith in the reasonable belief that his action was in the best interests of the corporation or, to the extent such matter relates to service with respect to any employee benefit plan, in the best interests of the participants or beneficiaries of such employee benefit plan; and provided, further, that as to any matter disposed of by a compromise payment by such person, pursuant to a consent decree or otherwise, the payment and indemnification thereof have been approved by the corporation, which approval shall not unreasonably be withheld, or by a court of competent jurisdiction.  Such indemnification shall include payment by the corporation of expenses incurred in defending a civil or criminal action or proceeding in advance of the final disposition of such action or proceeding, upon receipt of an undertaking by the person indemnified to repay such payment if he shall be adjudicated to be not entitled to indemnification under this article, which undertaking may be accepted without regard to the financial ability of such person to make repayment.
A person entitled to indemnification hereunder whose duties include service or responsibilities as a fiduciary with respect to a subsidiary or other organization shall be deemed
to have acted in good faith in the reasonable belief that his action was in the best interests of the corporation if he acted in good faith in the reasonable belief that his action was in the best interests of such subsidiary or organization or of the participants or beneficiaries of, or other persons with interests in, such subsidiary or organization to whom he had a fiduciary duty.
Where indemnification hereunder requires authorization or approval by the corporation, such authorization or approval shall be conclusively deemed to have been obtained, and in any case where a director of the corporation approves the payment of indemnification, such director shall be wholly protected, if:
  the payment has been approved or ratified (l) by a majority vote of a quorum of the directors consisting of persons who are not at that time parties to the proceeding, (2) by a majority vote of a committee of two or more directors who are not at that time parties to the proceeding and are selected for this purpose by the full board (in which selection directors who are parties may participate), or (3) by a majority vote of a quorum of the outstanding shares of stock of all classes entitled to vote for directors, voting as a single class, which quorum shall consist of stockholders who are not at that time parties to the proceeding; or
1.
  the action is taken in reliance upon the opinion of independent legal counsel (who may be counsel to the corporation) appointed for the purpose by vote of the directors or in the manner specified in clauses (l), (2) or (3) of subparagraph (i); or
2.
  the payment is approved by a court of competent jurisdiction; or
3.
  the directors have otherwise acted in accordance with the standard of conduct set forth in the Delaware General Corporation Law.
4.
Any indemnification or advance of expenses under this article shall be paid promptly, and in any event within 30 days, after the receipt by the corporation of a written request therefor from the person to be indemnified, unless with respect to a claim for indemnification the corporation shall have determined that the person is not entitled to indemnification.  If the corporation denies the request or if payment is not made within such 30 day period, the person seeking to be indemnified may at any time thereafter seek to enforce his rights hereunder in a court of competent jurisdiction and, if successful in whole or in part, he shall be entitled also to indemnification for the expenses of prosecuting such action.  Unless otherwise provided by law, the burden of proving that the person is not entitled to indemnification shall be on the corporation.
The right of indemnification under this article shall be a contract right inuring to the benefit of the directors, officers and other persons entitled to be indemnified hereunder and no amendment or repeal of this article shall adversely affect any right of such director, officer or other person existing at the time of such amendment or repeal.
The indemnification provided hereunder shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of a director, officer or other person entitled to indemnification hereunder.  The indemnification provided hereunder may, to the extent authorized by the corporation, apply to the directors, officers and other persons associated with constituent corporations that have
been merged into or consolidated with the corporation who would have been entitled to indemnification hereunder had they served in such capacity with or at the request of the corporation.
The right of indemnification under this article shall be in addition to and not exclusive of all other rights to which such director or officer or other persons may be entitled.  Nothing contained in this article shall affect any rights to indemnification to which corporation employees or agents other than directors and officers and other persons entitled to indemnification hereunder may be entitled by contract or otherwise under law.
The corporation shall have power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, trustee, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, other enterprise or employee benefit plan against any liability asserted against such person and incurred by such person in any such capacity or arising out of such person's status as such, whether or not the corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such liability under the provisions of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
SECTION 1.                 .  Except as otherwise designated from time to time by the Board of Directors, the fiscal year of the corporation shall begin on the first day of January and end on the last day of December.
Fiscal Year
SECTION 2.                 .  The corporate seal shall be in such form as shall be approved by the Board of Directors.  The Secretary shall be the custodian of the seal, and a duplicate seal may be kept and used by each Assistant Secretary and by any other officer the Board of Directors may authorize.
Corporate Seal
SECTION 3.                 .  All references in these by-laws to the Certificate of Incorporation shall be deemed to refer to the Certificate of Incorporation of the corporation, as in effect from time to time.
Certificate of Incorporation
SECTION 4.                 .  The President, the Treasurer and the Secretary shall have power to execute and deliver on behalf and in the name of the corporation any instrument requiring the signature of an officer of the corporation, including deeds, contracts, mortgages, bonds, notes, debentures, checks, drafts and other orders for the payment of money. In addition, the Board of Directors, the President, the Treasurer and the Secretary may expressly delegate such powers to any other officer or agent of the corporation.
Execution of Instruments
SECTION 5.                 .  The President, the Treasurer and the Secretary, and each other person authorized by the Board of Directors, each acting singly, may waive notice of, and act as, or appoint any person or persons to act as, proxy or attorney-in-fact for this
Voting of Securities
corporation (with or without power of substitution) at any meeting of stockholders or owners of other interests of any other corporation or organization the securities of which may be held by this corporation.  In addition, the Board of Directors, the President and the Treasurer may expressly delegate such powers to any other officer or agent of the corporation.
SECTION 6.                 .  A certificate by the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or a temporary secretary as to any action taken by the stockholders, directors, a committee or any officer or representative of the corporation shall, as to all persons who rely on the certificate in good faith, be conclusive evidence of that action.
Evidence of Authority
SECTION 7.                 .  No contract or transaction between the corporation and one or more of the directors or officers, or between the corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association or other organization in which one or more of the directors or officers are directors or officers or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for that reason or solely because the director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the Board of Directors or a committee of the Board of Directors that authorizes the contract or transaction or solely because the vote of any such director is counted for such purpose, if:
Transactions with Interested Parties
(1)  The material facts as to the relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the Board of Directors or such committee, and the Board or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative votes of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors be less than a quorum; or
(2)  The material facts as to the relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the stockholders entitled to vote thereon, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved in good faith by vote of the stockholders; or
(3)           The contract or transaction is fair to the corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved or ratified by the Board of Directors, a committee of the Board of Directors or the stockholders.
Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the Board of Directors or of a committee that authorizes the contract or transaction.
SECTION 8.                 .  The books and records of the corporation shall be kept at such places within or without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine.
Books and Records
SECTION 1.                 .  These by-laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new by-laws may be adopted by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present at any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors at which a quorum is present.
By the Board of Directors
SECTION 2.                 .  These by-laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new by-laws may be adopted by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of votes properly cast at any regular meeting of stockholders, or at any special meeting of stockholders, provided notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new by-laws shall have been stated in the notice of such special meeting.
By the Stockholders
Section 8 of the By-laws was amended by the Board of Directors of the corporation on March 22, 2007.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070427112354.txt.gz
TIME:20070427112354
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
April 27, 2007
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                  
 
 
SECTION 1  Registrant's Business and Operations
Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Item 1.01
           
an exclusive license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd. ("Kyowa") to develop and commercialize in Japan and certain other Asian countries, ARQ 197, a small molecule, selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, which plays multiple roles in human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.
On April 27, 2007, ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule" or the "Registrant") entered into
The agreement includes $123 million in upfront and potential development milestone payments from Kyowa to ArQule, including a $30 million cash upfront licensing payment.  In addition, the agreement includes sales milestone payments.  Upon commercialization, ArQule will receive double-digit royalties from Kyowa on net sales of ARQ 197.  Kyowa will be responsible for clinical development costs and commercialization of the compound in Asian countries, consisting of Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan.
A copy of the license agreement will be filed as an exhibit to the Registrant's Form 10-Q on or about May 10, 2007.  A copy of the Registrant's April 27, 2007 press release announcing the transaction is filed as exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
SECTION 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Item 9.01.
        
(d)  Exhibits.
Text of press release announcing the license agreement, dated April 27, 2007.
99.1
                          
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
April 27, 2007
3

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that it has entered into an exclusive license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd. (Kyowa) to develop and commercialize ARQ 197, a small molecule, selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, in Japan and parts of Asia.
Woburn, MA, April 27, 2007 
The agreement includes $123 million in upfront and potential development milestone payments from Kyowa to ArQule, including a $30 million cash upfront licensing payment.  In addition, the agreement includes undisclosed sales milestone payments.  Upon commercialization, ArQule will receive double-digit royalties from Kyowa on net sales of ARQ 197.  Kyowa will be responsible for clinical development costs and commercialization of the compound in certain Asian countries, consisting of Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan.
 "We are excited to enter into a partnership with a world-class Japanese company whose oncology franchise positions it strongly in Asian markets and whose resources will allow it to develop and commercialize ARQ 197 on a timely basis," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.  "Kyowa is able to leverage an impressive array of clinical development, manufacturing, sales and marketing capabilities that will help realize the full potential of ARQ 197 and deliver its benefits to cancer patients in Asia.  Our agreement with them represents an important validation of this compound.
"In retaining proprietary rights to ARQ 197 in the rest of the world, we preserve a broad range of longer-term strategic options for ArQule that will unlock the full value of this novel compound, including, for example, increased flexibility in pursuing additional partnering agreements and an enhanced ability to continue the further development of ARQ 197 independently should we elect to do so," said Dr. Hill.
ArQule will hold a conference call to discuss this agreement today, April 27, beginning at 9:30 a.m.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule, will lead the call.
 
As a result of this agreement, ArQule will be updating its financial guidance for the 2007 fiscal year during its first quarter conference call on May 3, 2007.
About ARQ 197 and c-Met
ARQ 197 is the lead product from the Company's Cancer Survival Protein modulation program.  Other than the rights licensed under the agreement with Kyowa, ArQule retains all rights to compounds derived from this program, including ARQ 197.
ARQ 197 mediates its effects by inhibiting the activity of c-Met, a receptor tyrosine kinase that plays multiple key roles in human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.  C-Met is abnormally activated in most cancers and is believed to control multiple signal transduction pathways involved in tumor growth and metastasis.  Pre-clinical findings have demonstrated that ARQ 197 inhibits c-Met in a wide range of human tumor cell lines and possesses anti-tumor activity against several types of xenografted human tumors in mice.
 EORTC-NCI-AACR International Conference on Molecular Targets and Cancer Therapeutics, demonstrated clinical tolerability, pharmacokinetics and signs of anti-tumor activity in cancer patients with a broad range of metastatic solid tumor types who had failed prior treatment regimens. The American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) has accepted for oral presentation the Company's abstract for ARQ 197 (A Phase 1 Dose Escalation Study of ARQ 197, a Selective Inhibitor of the c-Met Receptor in Patients with Metastatic Solid Tumors) at the 43 ASCO Annual Meeting, June 1-5, 2007, in Chicago.  This presentation will describe final results from this trial.
Interim Phase I data with ARQ 197, presented at the 18
th
rd
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy
 (ACT).  The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product that inhibits a molecule known as c-Met, which
2
 
plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit
www.arqule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd., including potential future milestone and royalty payments that could result from the Company's and Kyowa's future development of ARQ 197.  Failure to successfully develop ARQ 197 could prevent us from receiving these future payments. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in ongoing or later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development. Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies. In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070504161606.txt.gz
TIME:20070504161606
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
ARQULE, INC.
 
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
01801
(781) 994-0300
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 3, 2007, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2007.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
99.1  Text of press release announcing results of operations dated May 3, 2007.
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
Contact:
William B. Boni
VP, Investor Relations/
Corp. Communications
(781) 994-0300
www.ArQule.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2007.
Woburn, MA, May 3, 2007 
For the quarter ended March 31, 2007, the Company reported a net loss of $14,504,000 or $0.40 per share, compared with net income of $4,286,000, or $0.12 per share, for the first quarter of 2006.  The first quarter of 2006 included income from discontinued operations of $14,005,000, or $0.40 per share.
At March 31, 2007, the Company had a total of approximately $83,727,000 in cash and marketable securities.  Subsequent to the end of the quarter, on April 27, 2007, the Company entered into a license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd. (Kyowa) related to ARQ 197, a small molecule, selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  A $3,000,000 portion of a total $30,000,000 upfront licensing fee was received from Kyowa by ArQule in the first quarter of 2007.  The remaining $27,000,000 of this fee is due shortly after the signing of the agreement.
The results for the quarter ended March 31, 2006 reflect discontinued operations related to the Company's termination of its chemistry services operations on May 22, 2006.  As previously announced, ArQule ceased these operations upon the conclusion of its agreement with Pfizer in May 2006.  All line items discussed below exclude the results of these discontinued operations.
Operational Review
"We have begun 2007 strongly, with the signing of a strategically significant licensing deal related to ARQ 197 and the first in a series of data disclosures related to our anti-cancer platforms and products," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.
"Last week, we announced the signing of an exclusive license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd. to develop and commercialize ARQ 197 in Asia," said Dr. Hill. "The agreement provides for a total of up to $123 million in upfront and potential development milestone payments to ArQule from Kyowa, as well as additional undisclosed commercial milestone payments.  Upon commercialization of ARQ 197, ArQule will receive double-digit royalties on net sales of the compound. Kyowa will be responsible for clinical development costs and commercialization of the compound in certain Asian countries consisting of Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan.
4
ArQule/2
"In retaining proprietary rights to ARQ 197 outside of Asia, we preserve a broad range of longer-term strategic options for ArQule that will unlock the full value of this novel compound, including, for example, increased flexibility in pursuing additional partnering agreements and an enhanced ability to continue the further development of ARQ 197 independently should we elect to do so," said Dr. Hill.
 Annual Meeting in Chicago, June 1-5, 2007.
"Turning toward scientific data, during the recently completed 2007 Annual Meeting of the American Association for Cancer Research (AACR), we presented eleven abstracts based on in vitro (cell line) and in vivo (animal) experiments," said Dr. Hill.  "Cumulatively, these studies provide a strong rationale for our approaches to cancer therapy represented by our c-Met inhibition and DNA damage response/checkpoint activation programs and add significantly to the database of knowledge related to our clinical-stage products.  Looking forward, the American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) has accepted an oral presentation of findings from a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 197 at their 43
rd
"We plan to initiate a Phase 2 program with ARQ 197 around mid-year, at which time we will announce details regarding this program," said Dr. Hill.  "Decisions regarding trial design and specific indications for Phase 2 trials will be based on analyses of pre-clinical data, Phase 1 responses and data from an ongoing continuous dosing biopsy biomarker study at the Royal Marsden Hospital in London.
)," said Dr. Hill.  "Dosing at 384 mg/m is planned to begin shortly, and depending on the therapeutic index for this compound, we believe a recommended Phase 2 dose may be achieved by the end of 2007.  Identification of this dose will allow us to submit a clinical data package consisting of the Phase 2 data with ARQ 501 and Phase 1 data with ARQ 171 that will initiate Roche's scientific review period prior to their option decision regarding this program."
"Patient recruitment is continuing in the Phase 1 dose escalation trial with the second generation ACT product, ARQ 171, and to date, single-patient cohorts have been dosed successfully at doses between 24 and 192 milligrams per square meter (mg/m
2
2
Revenues and Expenses
 (ACT) program, which includes ARQ 501 and ARQ 171.
The Company reported total revenues of $1,652,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2007 and for the first quarter of 2006.  Revenues for both quarters related to Hoffmann-La Roche's financial support for the Company's ongoing development of products in its E2F1 Activated Checkpoint Therapy
SM
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended March 31, 2007 were $17,214,000, compared to $12,711,000 for the first quarter of 2006.   Research and development costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2007 were $13,704,000, compared to $10,511,000 for the first quarter of 2006.  Research and development costs in 2007 related primarily to expenses incurred in connection with the Company's Phase 1 trial with ARQ 197, three Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501 and the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171.  General and administrative costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2007 were $3,510,000, compared to $2,200,000 for the first quarter of 2006.  The increased 2007 general and administrative expenses were primarily due to an increase in personnel-related expenses and facility costs previously absorbed by the Company's chemical services operations that were discontinued in 2006.
5
ArQule/3
Financial Guidance
Primarily as a result of the upfront payment received in connection with its license agreement with Kyowa described above, ArQule is updating guidance for fiscal year 2007 as follows.  The Company expects to end 2007 with between $60 and $65 million in cash and marketable securities, compared with previously announced guidance of between $32 and $37 million.
Revenues are expected to range between $9.0 and $9.5 million, primarily related to the upfront license payment from Kyowa and the partnership with Roche.  Net use of cash is expected to range between $31 and $36 million.   Net loss is expected to range between $60 and $65 million, and net loss per share to range between $1.68 and $1.82 for the year.
Conference Call and Webcast
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. eastern time today, May 3, 2007.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer, and Richard H. Woodrich, acting chief financial officer, will lead the call.
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 888.286.8010, and outside the U.S. 617.801.6888.  The access code is 45209201.
About ArQule
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy
 (ACT).  The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product that mediates its effects by inhibiting the activity of a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
6
ArQule/4
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, as well as its licensing agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd., including potential future milestone and royalty payments that could result from the Company's and Kyowa's future development of ARQ 197.  Failure to successfully develop ARQ 197 could prevent the Company from receiving these future payments.  Additional forward-looking statements relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including Phase 1 and 2 trials with ARQ 197, Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501 and the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197, ARQ 501 and ARQ 171 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197, ARQ 501 and ARQ 171 are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
7
ArQule/5
 
8
 
 
9


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070529172635.txt.gz
TIME:20070529172635
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
May 18, 2007
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
(Address of principal executive offices)
01801
(Zip code)
(781) 994-0300
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Section 8Other Events
Item 8.01   Other Events.
On May 18, 2007 at the 2007 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") the stockholders voted:
1.             To elect Michael D. Loberg and Nancy A. Simonian as directors to hold office for a term of three years and until their respective successors are elected and qualified;
2.             To approve an amendment to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for awards under such plan by 250,000 from 500,500 to 750,500 shares of common stock;
3.             To approve an amendment to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Employee Stock Purchase Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for purchase by participants in such plan by 370,000 from 1,230,000 to 1,600,000 shares of common stock; and
4.             To ratify the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit our financial statements for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2007.
Section 9Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits
99.1  Report of Matters Voted Upon by Stockholders
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
May 29, 2006
 
Exhibit 99.1
1.             The 2007 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of the Registrant (the "Annual Meeting") of ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") was held on May 18, 2007 at The Museum of Science, Science Park, Boston, Massachusetts, commencing at 9:00 a.m., pursuant to notice properly given.
2.             At the close of business on March 30, 2007, the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the Annual Meeting, the outstanding voting securities of the Registrant consisted of 35,831,456 shares of common stock, $0.01 par value.  Each of the outstanding shares was entitled to one vote on the matters to come before the Annual Meeting.
3.             At the Annual Meeting 27,448,746 shares, or 76.6%, of the Registrant's issued and outstanding common stock, were represented in person or by proxy, constituting a quorum.
4.             At the Annual Meeting, each of the following nominees for director received the respective number of votes set forth opposite his name, constituting a plurality of the votes cast, and therefore he has been duly elected as a director of the Company.
 
5.             The following sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve an amendment to our Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for awards under such plan by 250,000 from 500,500 to 750,500 shares of common stock.
 
 
6.             The following sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve an amendment to our Amended and Restated 1996 Employee Stock Purchase Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for purchase by participants in such plan by 370,000 from 1,230,000 to 1,600,000 shares of common stock.
 
7.             The following sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to ratify the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit our financial statements for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2007.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070605143029.txt.gz
TIME:20070605143029
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
                                 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
Section 8  Other Events
Item 8.01   Other Events
Richard H. Woodrich, a consultant to ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") has been serving as the Registrant's Acting Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer since September 1, 2006. Mr. Woodrich also currently serves as the Registrant's principal financial officer and principal accounting officer for financial reporting purposes. Pending formal action by the Board of Directors of the Registrant regarding a realignment of responsibilities of its finance department, Mr. Woodrich will continue in these roles until on or about August 31, 2007. Mr. Woodrich will continue, as needed, to provide consulting services to the Registrant after August 31, 2007.
During this interim period, Mr. Woodrich will report to Peter S. Lawrence, the Registrant's Executive Vice President, Chief Business Officer, General Counsel and Secretary.  Upon the termination of Mr. Woodrich's service as Acting Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer, the Registrant's financial department will report directly to Mr. Lawrence.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
2


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070607153448.txt.gz
TIME:20070607153448
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
Section 8  Other Events
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On June 6, 2007, we issued a press release regarding our plans to publicly offer 7,000,000 shares of our common stock. The press release issued on June 6, 2007 is
attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. In addition, we have updated certain risk factors in our preliminary prospectus supplement dated June 6, 2007 (File No. 333-143162) in connection with the offering. The risk factors included in the preliminary prospectus supplement are set forth herein. This Current Report on Form 8-K updates certain of our disclosures.
CLINICAL TRIALS
ARQ 197
Phase 2 Clinical Program
We plan to initiate a Phase 2 clinical program with ARQ 197 in mid-2007. We expect this program to encompass both standard proof-of-concept studies and accelerated approval (fast-to-market), Phase 2/3 trial designs. We have preliminarily defined the indications for our proof-of-concept Phase 2 studies as prostate, pancreatic and non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). The indications with potential for accelerated approval include MiT tumors (pediatric soft tissue sarcomas), gastric cancer and advanced breast cancer. In addition to the specific indications for these trials, we plan to explore further certain anti-metastatic effects of ARQ 197 that were observed in the Phase 1 trial.
Pending discussions with the FDA, we expect to finalize plans for these trials and to initiate the first of these trials in mid-2007. We also plan to complete a bioequivalence study, in healthy volunteers, related to a revised formulation of ARQ 197 by the end of August 2007, the results of which will be required prior to initiating certain of the fast-to-market studies.
Therefore, we currently expect to conduct our Phase 2 ARQ 197 studies as follows: the pancreatic cancer trial and the MiT tumor study are planned to be initiated in mid-2007; the gastric cancer and advanced breast cancer studies are planned to be initiated in the fourth quarter of 2007; and the prostate and NSCLC studies are planned to be initiated in the first quarter of 2008. If dose modifications are required as a result of the bioequivalence study, then the start of certain of these trials may be delayed.
Phase 1 Results
At the 2007 Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology on June 2, 2007, we announced data from a Phase 1 trial demonstrating that treatment with ARQ 197 was well tolerated over extended dosing periods, with more than 60 percent of patients experiencing partial responses, minor responses or stable disease. As per RECIST criteria (Response Evaluation Criteria in Solid Tumors), a partial response is at least a 30 percent decrease in tumor size, progressive disease is at least a 20 percent increase in tumor size, and stable disease is neither shrinkage sufficient to qualify for partial response nor increase sufficient to qualify for progressive disease. Minor response is not defined by the RECIST criteria, but we define evidence of tumor shrinkage of less than 30 percent as a minor response. The primary objective of the Phase 1 trial was to determine a recommended Phase 2 dose for ARQ 197. Findings from this study resulted in a recommended Phase 2 dose of 240 milligrams (mg) daily. Secondary objectives included determining the pharmacokinetic and pharmacodynamic profiles and assessing the anti-tumor activity of this compound.
2
 
Safety
The trial was a standard Phase 1 sequential dose-escalation design, with 10 dose levels evaluated, from 10 mg twice daily through 180 mg twice daily. The 57 patients enrolled had a broad range of solid tumors, and all had confirmed, active metastatic disease. ARQ 197 was dose-escalated orally in two regimens, the first one administered in cycles consisting of two weeks on treatment followed by one week off drug, and the second consisting of three weeks on treatment with no time off drug.
Treatment with ARQ 197 was well tolerated. Most adverse events were mild and transient, and no grade three or four drug-related adverse events (the most severe types of adverse events) were reported. No dose-limiting toxicity was observed on either dosing regimen. Substantial plasma exposure, at levels several times the predicted efficacious concentration, was maintained with oral dosing. Patient compliance with dosing was high (greater than 98 percent), and there were no treatment interruptions due to adverse events.
Anti-Tumor Activity
Thirty-nine patients were recruited into the intermittent, or two weeks out of three, dosing cohort. Tumors were evaluated using standard RECIST criteria. Of the 35 evaluable patients in this cohort, there were three patients with partial responses and 18 with stable disease, with 11 of these 18 showing some evidence of tumor shrinkage and 10 with stable disease lasting six months or more. The partial responses were observed in patients with prostate, neuroendocrine and testicular tumors. Stable disease lasting more than four months was observed in a range of additional tumor types, including pancreatic, renal cell, non-small cell lung and papillary thyroid.
Eighteen patients were recruited into the continuous, or three weeks out of three, dosing cohort. Of the 10 patients in this cohort who had been on study long enough to reach the first tumor evaluation, which took place six weeks following initiation of treatment, seven were evaluated as having stable disease. The remaining patients have not reached the first tumor evaluation but remain on study.
Preliminary data analysis of new lesions among the intermittent dosing cohort showed that only four of these 35 evaluable patients developed new lesions while on ARQ 197, and three of these were treated at low doses. This data shows that all new lesions developed within the first six weeks on therapy, and no new lesions developed after six weeks of therapy. A detailed review of clinical data and disease progression among both cohorts is ongoing to better understand the potential of this compound to affect both metastatic spread and primary disease.
ARQ 501 and ARQ 171
We initiated a Phase 2 proof-of-principle program with ARQ 501 consisting of three separate clinical trials during 2006. These consist of monotherapy trials in leiomyosarcoma and in head and neck cancer, and a combination therapy trial with gemcitabine in pancreatic cancer. A Phase 1 trial was initiated in late 2006 with ARQ 171, a second-generation E2F-1 compound.
), and the Phase 2 ARQ 501 dose in the pancreatic cancer trial is 400 mg/m.
We have completed patient recruitment in all three Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501. The Phase 2 dose employed in the leiomyosarcoma and head and neck cancer trials is 450 mg per meter squared (mg/m
2
2
3
 
. Dosing at 384 mg/m is ongoing. Based on our current progress in that trial, and pending the outcome of successive future dosing and identification of dose-limiting toxicity levels, we expect to reach a recommended Phase 2 dose for ARQ 171 toward the end of 2007.
ARQ 171 is currently in a Phase I dose escalation study. To date, single patient cohorts have been dosed between 24 and 192 mg/m
2
2
As defined in our Roche collaboration agreement, Roche has an option to license worldwide rights for the development and commercialization of any products resulting from the E2F-1 program. Roche must decide whether to exercise its option within a specified period following delivery of a clinical data package from the initial ARQ 501 Phase 1 trials, the ARQ 501 Phase 2 trials, and the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171. We plan to submit the data package to Roche shortly after we complete the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171. Roche will then initiate a defined scientific review period, after which they will make their decision whether to license the program.
Interim Phase 2 Results With ARQ 501
The primary endpoint for each of the ongoing Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501 is an objective response rate of 15 percent. Objective response rate is defined as the sum of complete responses and partial responses, and in the case of the leiomyosarcoma study, stable disease lasting more than 4 months was considered a partial response. Interim data is available from these trials. We expect to announce further data from these trials in the third quarter of 2007.
Interim data from the pancreatic cancer study show a 14.6 percent objective response rate among patients treated with ARQ 501 and with gemcitabine combination therapy. This percentage reflects 11 partial responses among 75 evaluable patients. One additional partial response from the remaining 17 patients awaiting evaluation is needed to achieve the protocol-defined endpoint of 15 percent, and we believe this endpoint is likely to be achieved based on the number of minor responses pending additional evaluation for partial response.
Interim data from the leiomyosarcoma study show a 17.5 percent objective response rate among patients to monotherapy treatment with ARQ 501. This reflects one patient with a partial response and 6 with stable disease. Consequently, the endpoint for this trial has been achieved upon this interim data analysis.
Interim data from the head and neck cancer study show a 2 percent objective response rate among patients to monotherapy treatment with ARQ 501. This reflects one patient with a partial response. Based on these results to date, we do not believe the endpoint for this trial will be achieved.
Regulatory and Clinical Plans For ARQ 501
Our Phase 2 program for ARQ 501 was designed to provide "proof-of-principle" regarding the risk-benefit profile of the compound in combination and monotherapy
4
 
settings. Proof of principle data is intended to provide sufficient evidence to justify our decision to move a program into pivotal registration studies. Such registration studies, if positive, could subsequently form the basis of a New Drug Application to the FDA and equivalent global health authorities.
Based on the data available to date, we have concluded that we have seen positive proof of principle in both monotherapy in leiomyosarcoma and combination therapy in pancreatic cancer in combination with gemcitabine. We therefore are currently of the opinion that one or more compounds from the E2F-1 platform (currently comprising ARQ 501, ARQ 171 and ARQ 761, the newly modified version of ARQ 501) should be eventually progressed into registration studies, the timing of which will depend on the stage of development of the molecule.
A choice of which compound(s) to progress into such registration studies awaits final data and analysis from the ARQ 501 Phase 2 studies, completion of the ARQ 171 Phase 1 dose escalation study and further pre-clinical and required clinical work on ARQ 761, the modified version of ARQ 501. This choice will be made concurrently with the decision by Roche as to whether it will exercise its license rights to the E2F-1 program, currently anticipated in early 2008. If Roche exercises its licensing right, it will make the decisions on which compound(s) to advance, and on the nature and stage of subsequent clinical studies. If Roche declines the option to license the E2F-1 program, we intend to initiate a registration strategy for one or more compounds shortly after Roche's decision.
5
Risk factors
Investing in our common stock involves a high degree of risk. You should carefully consider the risks described in this prospectus supplement and the accompanying prospectus and the other information in this prospectus supplement and the accompanying prospectus. If any of these risks occur, our business could be materially harmed, and our financial condition and results of operations could be materially and adversely affected. As a result, the price of our common stock could decline, and you could lose all or part of your investment.
RISKS RELATING TO OUR INDUSTRY AND BUSINESS STRATEGY
Development of our products is at an early stage and is based on scientific platforms that are unproven. We may not successfully develop a drug candidate that becomes a commercially viable drug.
We have no commercial products. The discovery and development of drugs is inherently risky and involves a high rate of failure. Discovering and developing commercial drugs are relatively new to us. Our drug candidates and drug research programs are in early stages and require significant, time-consuming and costly research and development, testing and regulatory approvals.
One of our clinical-stage product candidates, ARQ 197, is based on our c-Met/Cancer Survival platform. Two of our other product candidates in clinical trials, ARQ 501 and ARQ 171, are based on our proprietary ACT platform. Although drugs have been approved that inhibit the activity of kinases and other enzymes, to our knowledge no company has received regulatory approval for a drug based on an approach similar to our c-Met/Cancer Survival platform. To our knowledge no company has received regulatory approval for a drug based on an approach similar to our ACT platform. Our approaches may not lead to the development of approvable or marketable drugs.
In addition to our clinical-stage programs, we have a limited number of pre-clinical and research-stage programs in our pipeline. Our viability as a company depends, in part, on our ability to continue to create drug candidates for ourselves and our collaborators. Numerous significant factors will affect the success of our drug research and development efforts, including the biology and chemistry complexity involved, availability of appropriate technologies, the uncertainty of the scientific process and the capabilities and performance of our scientists. Our research and development capabilities may not be adequate to develop additional, viable drug candidates.
We must show the safety and efficacy of our product candidates through expensive, time consuming preclinical and clinical trials, the results of which are uncertain and governed by exacting regulations.
Our product candidates are in clinical or preclinical stages of development and may not prove to be sufficiently safe or effective in more advanced human clinical trials. We will need to conduct extensive further testing of all of our product candidates, expend significant additional resources and possibly partner with another company or companies to realize commercial value from any of our product candidates.
Before obtaining regulatory approvals for the commercial sale of our products, we must demonstrate through preclinical studies (laboratory or animal testing) and clinical trials (human testing) that our proposed products are safe and effective for use in each target indication. This testing is expensive and time-consuming, and failure can occur at any stage. If we terminate a preclinical or clinical program, we will have expended resources in an effort that will not provide a return on our investment and missed the opportunity to have allocated those resources to potentially more productive uses.
6
 
Clinical trials must meet FDA and foreign regulatory requirements. We have limited experience in designing, conducting and managing the preclinical studies and clinical trials necessary to obtain regulatory approval for our product candidates in any country. We or our collaborative partners may encounter problems in clinical trials that may cause us or the FDA or foreign regulatory agencies to delay, suspend or terminate our clinical trials at any phase. These problems could include our inability to manufacture or obtain sufficient quantities of materials produced in accordance with current Good Manufacturing Practice, or cGMP, for use in our clinical trials, conduct clinical trials at our preferred sites, enroll a sufficient number of patients for our clinical trials at one or more sites, or begin or successfully complete clinical trials in a timely fashion, if at all. Furthermore, we, the FDA or foreign regulatory agencies may suspend clinical trials of our product candidates at any time if we or they believe the subjects participating in the trials are being exposed to unacceptable health risks as a result of adverse events occurring in our trials or if we or they find deficiencies in the clinical trial process or conduct of the investigation.
Acceptable results from initial preclinical studies and clinical trials of products under development are not necessarily indicative of results that will be obtained from subsequent or more extensive preclinical studies and clinical testing in humans. Clinical trials may not demonstrate sufficient safety and efficacy to obtain the required regulatory approvals or result in marketable products. The failure to adequately demonstrate the safety and efficacy of a product under development will delay and could prevent its regulatory approval.
A number of companies in the pharmaceutical industry, including biotechnology companies, have suffered significant setbacks in advanced clinical trials, even after generating promising results in earlier trials.
Though it is part of our strategy to pursue clinical development to take advantage of available accelerated regulatory approval processes, there is no guarantee that our product candidates will show the evidence predictive of clinical benefit necessary to qualify for such regulatory treatment.
Delays in clinical testing could result in increased costs to us and delay our ability to obtain regulatory approval and commercialize our product candidates.
Clinical trials typically take several years to complete. The duration and cost of clinical trials will vary greatly depending on the nature, complexity, and intended use of the drug being tested. We may not complete clinical testing within the time frame we have planned, or at all. At any time, a clinical trial can be placed on clinical hold'', or temporarily or permanently stopped for a variety of reasons, principally for safety concerns. We may experience numerous unforeseen events during, or as a result of, the clinical trial process that could delay or prevent us from receiving regulatory approval or commercializing our product candidates, including the following:
7
 
 
Completion and duration of clinical trials depends on, among other things, our ability to enroll a sufficient number of patients, which is a function of many factors, including:
 
We have limited clinical development and commercialization experience.
We have limited experience conducting clinical trials and have never obtained regulatory approvals for any drug. To date, we have filed 3 IND applications and initiated 5 Phase 1 clinical trials, and 3 Phase 2 clinical trials. We have not conducted a Phase 3, or pivotal, clinical trial, filed an NDA or commercialized a drug. We have no experience as a company in the sale, marketing or distribution of pharmaceutical products and do not currently have a sales and marketing organization. Developing commercialization capabilities will be expensive and time-consuming, could delay any product launch, and we may not be able to develop a successful commercial organization. To the extent we are unable or determine not to acquire these resources internally, we would be forced to rely on third-party clinical investigators, clinical research or marketing organizations. If we were unable to establish adequate capabilities independently or with others, our drug development and commercialization efforts could fail and we may be unable to generate product revenues.
If our drug discovery and development programs do not progress as anticipated, our revenue and stock price could be negatively impacted.
We estimate the timing of a variety of preclinical, clinical, regulatory and other milestones for planning purposes, including when a drug candidate is expected to enter clinical trials, when a clinical trial will be completed or when an application for regulatory approval will be filed. We base our estimates on facts that are currently known to us and on a variety of assumptions, many of which are beyond our control. If we or our collaborators do not achieve milestones when anticipated, we will not receive the corresponding revenue, and our stock price could decline. In addition, our research and clinical testing may be delayed or abandoned if we or our competitors subsequently discover other compounds that we believe show significantly improved safety or efficacy compared to our product candidates, which could limit our ability to generate revenues, cause us to incur additional expense and cause the market price of our common stock to decline significantly.
8
 
RISKS RELATED TO OUR FINANCIAL CONDITION
We have incurred significant losses since our inception and anticipate that we will incur significant continued losses for the next several years, and our future profitability is uncertain.
From our inception in 1993 through March 31, 2007, we have incurred cumulative losses of approximately $243 million. These losses have resulted principally from the costs of our research activities, acquisitions, enhancements to our technology and early-stage clinical trials. In the past we derived our revenue primarily from license and technology transfer fees and payments for compound deliveries associated with our discontinued chemistry services operations; research and development funding paid under our agreements with collaboration partners; and to a limited extent, milestone payments.
We expect our expenses to increase significantly as we spend additional amounts to fund research, development, clinical testing and commercialization of our drug candidates. We currently have three product candidates in various stages of clinical development, and we anticipate filing an IND application for an additional product candidate within the next 24 months. As a result, we will need significant capital resources to achieve profitability.
To attain profitability, we will need to develop clinical products successfully and market and sell them effectively, either by ourselves or with collaborators. We have never generated revenue from the commercialization of our product candidates, and there is no guarantee that we will be able to do so. Even if were to generate product revenues and achieve profitability, we may not be able to maintain or increase profitability. Because of the numerous risks and uncertainties associated with developing drugs, we are unable to predict the extent of any future losses or when we will become profitable, if at all. If we fail to become profitable, or if we are unable to fund our continuing losses, we may be unable to continue our business.
We may need substantial additional funding and may be unable to raise capital when needed, or on terms favorable to us, which could force us to delay, reduce or eliminate our drug discovery, product development and commercialization activities.
Developing drugs, conducting clinical trials, and commercializing products is expensive. Our future funding requirements will depend on many factors, including:
9
 
We may seek the capital necessary to fund our operations through public or private equity offerings, debt financings, and collaboration and licensing arrangements. To the extent that we raise additional capital through the sale of equity or convertible debt securities, our stockholders' ownership interests will be diluted and the terms of such securities may include liquidation or other preferences that adversely affect our stockholders' rights. Other debt-financing arrangements may require us to pledge certain assets and enter into covenants that would restrict certain business activities or our ability to incur further indebtedness. If we raise additional funds through collaboration and licensing arrangements with third parties, we may have to relinquish rights to certain product candidates that we might otherwise seek to develop or commercialize independently, or grant licenses on terms that are not favorable to us. There can be no assurance that sufficient funds will be available to us when required, on satisfactory terms, or at all. If we are unable to obtain additional funds when needed, we may have to delay, reduce the scope of or eliminate some of our development and commercialization programs, or obtain funds through other arrangements on unattractive terms, which could prevent us from successfully executing our business strategy.
RISKS RELATED TO REGULATORY APPROVAL
Our product candidates are subject to a lengthy and uncertain regulatory process that may not result in the necessary regulatory approvals, which would adversely affect our ability to commercialize products. We have only limited experience in regulatory affairs.
Our product candidates, as well as the activities associated with their research, development and commercialization, are subject to extensive regulation by the FDA and other regulatory agencies in the United States and by comparable authorities in other countries. Failure to obtain regulatory approval for a product candidate would prevent us from commercializing that product candidate. We have not received regulatory approval to market any of our product candidates in any jurisdiction and have only limited experience in preparing and filing the applications necessary to gain regulatory approvals. The process of obtaining regulatory approvals is expensive, often takes many years, if approval is obtained at all, and can vary substantially based upon the type, complexity and novelty of the product candidates involved.
Before a new drug application can be filed with the FDA, the product candidate must undergo extensive clinical trials. Any clinical trial may fail to produce results satisfactory to the FDA, typically for lack of safety or efficacy. For example, the FDA could determine that the design of a clinical trial is inadequate to produce reliable results. The regulatory approval process also requires preclinical testing. Data obtained from preclinical and clinical activities are susceptible to varying interpretations, which could delay, limit or prevent regulatory approval. Delays or rejections may be encountered based upon changes in regulatory policy for product approval during the period of product development and regulatory agency review. Changes in regulatory approval policy, regulations or statutes or the process for regulatory review during the development or approval periods of our product candidates may cause delays in the approval or rejection of an application. We are currently in Phase 2 clinical testing of ARQ 501 and Phase 1 clinical testing of ARQ 197 and ARQ 171. We have never conducted a Phase 3, or pivotal, clinical trial, nor have we filed or prosecuted the applications necessary to gain regulatory approvals.
Even if our drug candidates obtain regulatory approval, we and our collaborators will be subject to ongoing government regulation.
Even if regulatory authorities approve any of our drug candidates, the manufacture, marketing and sale of these drugs will be subject to strict and ongoing regulation. Compliance with such regulations
10
may consume substantial financial and management resources and expose us and our collaborators to the potential for other adverse circumstances. For example, approval for a drug may be conditioned on costly post-marketing follow-up studies. Based on these studies, if a regulatory authority does not believe that the drug demonstrates a clinical benefit to patients, it could limit the indications for which a drug may be sold or revoke the drug's marketing approval. In addition, identification of certain side effects after a drug is on the market may result in the subsequent withdrawal of approval, reformulation of a drug, additional preclinical and clinical trials and changes in labeling. Any of these events could delay or prevent us from generating revenue from the commercialization of these drugs and cause us to incur significant additional costs.
Even if we or our collaborators bring products to market, we may be unable to effectively price our products or obtain adequate reimbursement for sales of our products, which would have an adverse effect on our revenues.
Third party payors, such as government and private insurance plans, frequently require companies to provide rebates and predetermined discounts from list prices and are increasingly challenging the prices charged for pharmaceuticals and other medical products. Our products may not be considered cost-effective, and reimbursement to the patient may not be available or be sufficient to allow the sale of our products on a competitive basis. We, or our collaborators, may not be able to negotiate favorable reimbursement rates for our products. If we, or our collaborators, fail to obtain an adequate level of reimbursement for our products by third-party payors, sales of the drugs would be adversely affected or there may be no commercially viable market for the products.
We face potential liability related to the privacy of health information we obtain from research institutions.
Most health care providers, including research institutions from which we or our collaborators obtain patient information, are subject to privacy regulations promulgated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, or HIPAA. Although we are not directly regulated by HIPAA, we could face substantial criminal penalties if we knowingly receive individually identifiable health information from a health care provider or research institution that has not satisfied HIPPA's disclosure standards. In addition, certain state privacy laws may apply directly to our operations and/or those of our collaborators and may impose restrictions on our use and dissemination of individuals' health information. Moreover, patients about whom we or our collaborators obtain information, as well as the providers who share this information with us, may have contractual rights that limit our ability to use and disclose the information. Claims that we have violated individuals' privacy rights or breached our contractual obligations, even if we are not found liable, could be expensive and time-consuming to defend and could result in adverse publicity that could harm our business.
RISKS RELATED TO COLLABORATIONS
Part of our business strategy involves collaborative out-licensing of our drug candidates while retaining commercialization or co-promotional rights in parts of the world. We may not be able to find collaborators or successfully form suitable collaborations to further our drug development and commercialization efforts.
We may seek collaborators for our drug development and commercialization efforts. We may enter into these collaborations to obtain external financing for drug development and to obtain access to drug development and commercialization expertise. The availability of partners depends on the willingness of pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies to collaborate in drug discovery activities.
11
 
Only a limited number of pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies would fit our requirements. The number could decline further through consolidation, or the number of collaborators with interest in our drugs could decline. If the number of our potential collaborators were to decline, the remaining collaborators may be able to negotiate terms less favorable to us.
We face significant competition in seeking drug development collaborations, both from other biotechnology companies and from the internal capabilities and compound pipelines of the pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies themselves. This competition is particularly intense in the oncology field. Our ability to interest such companies in forming co-development and commercialization arrangements with us will be influenced by, among other things:
 
Even if we are able to gain the interest of potential drug development partners, the negotiation, documentation and implementation of collaborative arrangements are complex and time-consuming. Collaborations may not be available on commercially acceptable terms and, if formed, may not be commercially successful or, if successful, may not realize sufficient return for us. If we are unable to form collaborations, we may not gain access to the financial resources and industry expertise necessary to develop and commercialize drug products or successfully market any products we develop on our own and, therefore, be unable to generate revenue from our products.
In fiscal year 2006, our collaboration with Roche accounted for all of our research and development revenue (approximately $6.6 million). If Roche were to terminate its collaboration with us, our revenue would significantly decrease.
Our success depends in part on the efforts of our current and possible future collaborators, who will likely have substantial control and discretion over the continued development and commercialization of drug candidates which are the subjects of our collaborations.
If Roche exercises its option to acquire rights to ARQ 501 and ARQ 171 or if we were successful in establishing additional collaborations, our collaborators would have significant discretion in determining the efforts and amount of resources that they dedicate to our collaborations. Our collaborators may determine not to proceed with clinical development or commercialization of a particular drug candidate for a number of reasons that are beyond our control, even under circumstances where we might have continued such a program. In addition, our rights to receive milestone payments and royalties from our collaborators will depend on our collaborators' abilities to establish the safety and efficacy of our drug candidates, obtain regulatory approvals and achieve market acceptance of products developed from our drug candidates. We may also depend on our collaborators to manufacture clinical scale quantities of some of our drug candidates and would depend on them in the future for commercial scale manufacture, distribution and direct sales. Our collaborators may not be successful in manufacturing our drug candidates on a commercial scale or in successfully commercializing them.
12
 
We face additional risks in connection with our existing and future collaborations, including the following:
 
We may not receive any further milestone, royalty or license payments under our current collaboration.
Although we have received license fees, milestone fees and other payments to date under our current drug development collaboration with Roche, we may not receive any royalty payments or additional license and milestone fees under such agreement. Our receipt of any future milestone, royalty or license payments depends on many factors, including whether our collaborator wants or is able to continue to pursue a potential drug candidate, intellectual property issues, unforeseen complications in the development or commercialization process, and the ultimate commercial success of the drug.
RISKS RELATED TO RELATIONSHIPS WITH THIRD PARTY VENDORS
We rely heavily on third parties such as contract research organizations, to conduct clinical trials and perform research and analysis services for us. If third parties upon which we rely do not perform as contractually required or expected, we may not be able to develop further, obtain regulatory approval for or commercialize our product candidates.
We do not have the ability to perform all of the testing or conduct all of the clinical trials that are necessary in connection with the development of our product candidates. We are using third-party clinical research organizations to oversee many of our ongoing clinical trials and expect to use the same or similar organizations for certain of our future clinical trials. We may face delays outside of our control if these parties do not perform their obligations in a timely or competent fashion or if we are forced to change service providers or if the quality or accuracy of the data they obtain is compromised due to the failure to adhere to our clinical protocols or regulatory requirements or for other reasons. These risks are heightened if we conduct clinical trials outside of the United States, where it may be more difficult to ensure that studies are conducted in compliance with FDA requirements. Any third party that we hire to conduct clinical trials may also provide services to our
13
competitors, which could compromise the performance of their obligations to us. If we experience significant delays in the progress of our clinical trials and in our plans to file NDAs, the commercial prospects for product candidates could be harmed and our ability to generate product revenue would be delayed or prevented.
We have limited manufacturing experience. We primarily rely on third parties to provide sufficient quantities of our product candidates to conduct pre-clinical and clinical studies. We have no control over our manufacturers' and suppliers' compliance with manufacturing regulations, and their failure to comply could result in an interruption in the supply of our product candidates.
To date, our product candidates have been manufactured in relatively small quantities for preclinical and clinical trials. We have no experience in manufacturing any of our product candidates on a large scale and have contracted with third party manufacturers to provide material for clinical trials and to assist in the development and optimization of our manufacturing processes and methods. Our ability to conduct clinical trials and commercialize our product candidates will depend on the ability of such third parties to manufacture our products on a large scale at a competitive cost and in accordance with cGMP and other regulatory requirements. Significant scale-up of manufacturing may require additional validation studies, which the FDA must review and approve. If we are not able to obtain contract cGMP manufacturing on commercially reasonable terms, obtain or develop the necessary materials and technologies for manufacturing, or obtain intellectual property rights necessary for manufacturing, we may not be able to conduct or complete clinical trials or commercialize our product candidates. There can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain such requisite terms, materials, technologies and intellectual property necessary to successfully manufacture our product candidates for clinical trials or commercialization. Our product candidates require precise, high-quality manufacturing. The failure to achieve and maintain these high manufacturing standards, including the incidence of manufacturing errors, could result in patient injury or death, product recalls or withdrawals, delays or failures in product testing or delivery, cost overruns or other problems that could seriously hurt our business.
The facilities used by our contract manufacturers must undergo inspections by the FDA for compliance with cGMP regulations before our product candidates produced there can receive marketing approval. If these facilities do not receive a satisfactory cGMP inspection result in connection with the manufacture of our product candidates, we may need to conduct additional validation studies, or find alternative manufacturing facilities, either of which would result in significant cost to us as well as a delay of up to several years in obtaining approval for any affected product candidate. In addition, after approval of a product candidate for commercial use our contract manufacturers, and any alternative contract manufacturer we may utilize, will be subject to ongoing periodic inspection by the FDA and corresponding state and foreign agencies for compliance with cGMP regulations, similar foreign regulations and other regulatory standards. We do not have control over our contract manufacturers' compliance with these regulations and standards. Any failure by our third-party manufacturers or suppliers to comply with applicable regulations could result in sanctions being imposed on them (including fines, injunctions and civil penalties), failure of regulatory authorities to grant marketing approval of our product candidates, delays, suspension or withdrawal of approvals, license revocation, seizures or recalls of product candidates or products, operating restrictions and criminal prosecution.
14
 
Materials necessary to manufacture our product candidates currently under development may not be available on commercially reasonable terms, or at all, which may delay our development and commercialization of these drugs.
Some of the materials necessary for the manufacture of our product candidates currently under development may, from time to time, be available either in limited quantities, or from a limited number of manufacturers, or both. We and/or our collaborators need to obtain these materials for our clinical trials and, potentially, for commercial distribution when and if we obtain marketing approval for these compounds. Suppliers may not sell us these materials at the time we need them or on commercially reasonable terms. If we are unable to obtain the materials needed for the conduct of our clinical trials, product testing and potential regulatory approval could be delayed, adversely impacting our ability to develop the product candidates. If it becomes necessary to change suppliers for any of these materials or if any of our suppliers experience a shutdown or disruption in the facilities used to produce these materials, due to technical, regulatory or other problems, it could significantly hinder or prevent manufacture of our drug candidates and any resulting products.
RISKS RELATING TO COMPETITION
The drug research and development industry is highly competitive, and we compete with some companies that offer a broader range of capabilities and have better access to resources than we do.
The pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries are characterized by rapid and continuous technological innovation. We compete with companies worldwide that are engaged in the research and discovery, licensing, development and commercialization of drug candidates, including, in the area of small molecule anti-cancer therapeutics, Ariad Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; Array BioPharma Inc.; Cell Therapeutics, Inc.; Curis, Inc.; Exelixis, Inc.; Onyx Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; OSI Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; Oxigene, Inc.; Pharmacopeia; SGX Pharmaceuticals; Telik, Inc.; Kosan Biosciences, Inc.; and Vion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. With respect to ARQ 197, we are aware of a number of companies that are pursuing approaches to c-Met inhibition, including Exelixis, Amgen Inc., Pfizer Inc. and Methylgene Inc.
Even if we are successful in bringing products to market, we face substantial competitive challenges in effectively marketing and distributing our products. Companies and research institutions, including large pharmaceutical companies with much greater financial resources, and more experience in developing products, conducting clinical trials, obtaining FDA and foreign regulatory approvals and bringing new drugs to market are developing products within the field of oncology. Some of these entities already have competitive products on the market or product candidates in clinical trials or in more advanced preclinical studies than we do. By virtue of having or introducing competitive products on the market before us, these entities may gain a competitive advantage. In addition, there may be product candidates of which we are not aware at an earlier stage of development that may compete with our product candidates. Some of our competitors have entered into collaborations with leading companies within our target markets.
We are in a rapidly evolving field of research. Consequently, our technology may be rendered non-competitive or obsolete by approaches and methodologies discovered by others, both before and after we have gone to market with our products. We also face competition from existing therapies that are currently accepted in the marketplace, and the impact of adverse events in our field that may affect regulatory approval or public perception.
We anticipate that we will face increased competition in the future as new companies enter the market and advanced technologies become available. If we are unable to successfully compete in our chosen field, we will not become profitable.
15
We may not be able to recruit and retain the scientists and management we need to compete.
Our success depends on our ability to attract, retain and motivate highly skilled scientific personnel and management, and our ability to develop and maintain important relationships with leading academic institutions, clinicians and scientists. We are highly dependent on our senior management and scientific staff, and the loss of the services of one or more of our other key employees could delay or have an impact on the successful completion of our clinical trials or the commercialization of our product candidates.
We compete intensely with pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies, including our collaborators, medicinal chemistry outsourcing companies, contract research companies, and academic and research institutions to recruit scientists and management. The shortage of personnel with experience in drug development could lead to increased recruiting, relocation and compensation costs, which may exceed our expectations and resources. If we cannot hire additional qualified personnel, the workload may increase for both existing and new personnel. If we are unsuccessful in our recruitment efforts, we may be unable to execute our strategy.
RISKS RELATED TO INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
Our patents and other proprietary rights may fail to protect our business. If we are unable to adequately protect our intellectual property, third parties may be able to use our technology, which could adversely affect our ability to compete in the market.
To be successful and compete, we must obtain and protect patents on our products and technology and protect our trade secrets. Where appropriate, we seek patent protection for certain aspects of the technology we are developing, but patent protection may not be available for some of our product candidates, or their use, synthesis, formulations and technologies. The patent position of biotechnology firms is highly uncertain, involves complex legal and factual questions, and has recently been the subject of much litigation. No consistent policy has emerged from the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office or the courts regarding the breadth of claims allowed or the degree of protection afforded under many biotechnology patents. In addition, there is a substantial backlog of biotechnology patent applications at the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office, and the approval or rejection of patent applications may take several years.
We do not know whether our patent applications will result in issued patents. In addition, the receipt of a patent might not provide much practical protection. If we receive a patent with a narrow scope, then it will be easier for competitors to design products that do not infringe our patent. We cannot be certain that we will receive any additional patents, that the claims of our patents will offer significant protection for our technology, or that our patents will not be challenged, narrowed, invalidated or circumvented.
Competitors may interfere with our patent protection in a variety of ways. Competitors may claim that they invented the claimed invention prior to us. Competitors may also claim that we are infringing on their patents and that, therefore, we cannot practice our technology as claimed under our patents. Competitors may also contest our patents by showing the patent examiner that the invention was not original, was not novel or was obvious. In litigation, a competitor could claim that our issued patents are not valid for a number of reasons. If a court agrees, our patents could be narrowed, invalidated or rendered unenforceable, or we may be forced to stop using the technology covered by these patents or to license the technology from third parties. As a company, we have no meaningful experience with competitors interfering with our patents or patent applications and therefore may not have the experience we would need to aggressively protect our patents should such action become necessary.
16
 
The laws of some foreign countries do not protect intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States, and many companies have encountered significant problems in protecting and defending such rights in foreign jurisdictions. Many countries, including certain countries in Europe, have compulsory licensing laws under which a patent owner may be compelled to grant licenses to third parties. In addition, many countries limit the enforceability of patents against government agencies or government contractors. In these countries, the patent owner may have limited remedies, which could materially diminish the value of the patent. Compulsory licensing of life-saving drugs is also becoming increasingly popular in developing countries either through direct legislation or international initiatives. Such compulsory licenses could be extended to include some of our product candidates, which could limit our potential revenue opportunities. Moreover, the legal systems of certain countries, particularly certain developing countries, do not favor the aggressive enforcement of patent and other intellectual property protection, which makes it difficult to stop infringement.
Drug candidates we develop that are approved for commercial marketing by the FDA would be subject to the provisions of the Drug Price Competition and Patent Term Restoration Act of 1984, known as the Hatch-Waxman Act.'' The Hatch-Waxman Act provides companies with marketing exclusivity for varying time periods during which generic versions of a drug may not be marketed and allows companies to apply to extend patent protection for up to five additional years. It also provides a means for approving generic versions of a drug once the marketing exclusivity period has ended and all relevant patents have expired. The period of exclusive marketing, however, may be shortened if a patent is successfully challenged and defeated, which could reduce the amount of revenue we receive for such product.
Agreements we have with our employees, consultants and collaborators may not afford adequate protection for our trade secrets, confidential information and other proprietary information.
In addition to patent protection, we also rely on copyright and trademark protection, trade secrets, and know-how. It is unclear whether our trade secrets and know-how will prove to be adequately protected. To protect our trade secrets and know-how, we require our employees, consultants and advisors to execute agreements regarding the confidentiality and ownership of such proprietary information. We cannot guarantee, however, that these agreements will provide us with adequate protection against improper use or disclosure of confidential information and there may not be adequate remedies in the event of unauthorized use or disclosure. Our employees, consultants or advisors may unintentionally or willfully disclose our information to competitors. In addition, in some situations, these agreements may conflict with, or be subject to, the rights of third parties with whom our employees, consultants or advisors had or have previous employment or consulting relationships. Like patent litigation, enforcing a claim that a third party illegally obtained and is using our trade secrets is expensive and time-consuming, and the outcome is unpredictable. In addition, courts outside the United States are sometimes less willing than our federal and state courts to protect trade secrets. Furthermore, others may independently develop substantially equivalent knowledge, methods and know-how. Our failure or inability to protect our proprietary information and techniques may inhibit or limit our ability to compete effectively, or exclude certain competitors from the market.
Our success will depend partly on our ability to operate without infringing on or misappropriating the proprietary rights of others.
There are many patents in our field of technology and we cannot guarantee that we do not infringe on those patents or that we will not infringe on patents granted in the future. If a patent holder believes a product of ours infringes on its patent, the patent holder may sue us even if we have received patent protection for our technology.
17
 
We have been contacted by third parties who purport to be joint owners of patents and patent applications relating to a combination therapy of a tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a DNA-damaging agent (e.g., a chemotherapy drug). These parties offered to license us these patent rights in connection with ARQ-197, a molecule that inhibits c-Met, a type of tyrosine kinase. We believe that the patent could potentially apply to any company that develops a tyrosine kinase inhibitor that is used in combination with a chemotherapy drug. If the patent is not invalidated, and we successfully develop ARQ-197 as a combination therapy in addition to a monotherapy, we may need to acquire a license if it potentially infringes on a valid claim of an issued patent. We may not be able to acquire a license on commercially reasonable terms.
If we do not prevail in litigation or if other parties have filed or in the future should file, patent applications covering products and technologies that we have developed or intend to develop, we may have to obtain licenses from third parties, which may not be available on commercially reasonable terms, or at all, and may require us to pay substantial royalties, grant a cross-license to some of our patents to another patent holder or change the formulation of a product candidate so that we do not infringe third-party patents, which reformulation may be impossible to achieve or which may require substantial time and expense. If we are unable to cost-effectively redesign our products so they do not infringe a patent, we may be unable to sell some of our products. Any of these occurrences will result in lost revenues and profits for us.
The drug research and development industry has a history of patent and other intellectual property litigation, and we may be involved in costly intellectual property lawsuits.
The drug research and development industry has a history of patent and other intellectual property litigation, and we believe these lawsuits are likely to continue. Legal proceedings relating to intellectual property would be expensive, take significant time and divert management's attention from other business concerns. We face potential patent infringement suits by companies that control patents for drugs or potential drugs similar to our product candidates or other suits alleging infringement of their intellectual property rights. There could be issued patents of which we are not aware that our products infringe or patents that we believe we do not infringe that we are ultimately found to infringe. The publication of discoveries in the scientific or patent literature frequently occurs substantially later than the date on which the underlying discoveries were made and patent applications were filed. Because patent applications can take many years to issue, there may be currently pending applications of which we are unaware that may later result in issued patents that we infringe with our drug candidates or resulting products. In addition, technology created under our research and development collaborations may infringe the intellectual property rights of third parties, in which case we may not receive milestone or royalty revenue from those collaborations.
If we do not prevail in an infringement lawsuit brought against us, we might have to pay substantial damages, including triple damages, and we could be required to stop the infringing activity or obtain a license to use the patented technology or redesign our products so as not to infringe the patent. We may not be able to enter into licensing arrangements at a reasonable cost or effectively redesign our products. Any inability to secure licenses or alternative technology could delay the introduction of our products or prevent us from manufacturing or selling products.
RISKS RELATED TO EMPLOYEES AND FACILITIES
Our operations could be interrupted by damage to our laboratory facilities.
Our operations are dependent upon the continued use of our specialized laboratories and equipment in Woburn, Massachusetts. Catastrophic events, including fires or explosions, could damage our
18
laboratories, equipment, scientific data, work in progress or inventories of chemical compounds and biological materials and may materially interrupt our business. We employ safety precautions in our laboratory activities in order to reduce the likelihood of the occurrence of these catastrophic events; however, we cannot eliminate the chance that such an event will occur. Rebuilding our facilities could be time consuming and result in substantial delays in fulfilling our agreements with our collaborators.
Security breaches may disrupt our operations and harm our operating results.
Our network security and data recovery measures may not be adequate to protect against computer viruses, break-ins, and similar disruptions from unauthorized tampering with our computer systems. The misappropriation, theft, sabotage or any other type of security breach with respect to any of our proprietary and confidential information that is electronically stored, including research or clinical data, could have a material adverse impact on our business, operating results and financial condition. Additionally, any break-in or trespass of our facilities that results in the misappropriation, theft, sabotage or any other type of security breach with respect to our proprietary and confidential information, including research or clinical data, or that results in damage to our research and development equipment and assets could have a material adverse impact on our business, operating results, and financial condition.
RISKS RELATED TO PRODUCT LIABILITY
If our use of chemical and biological materials and hazardous materials violates applicable laws or causes personal injury, we may be liable for damages.
Our drug discovery activities, including the analysis and synthesis of chemical compounds, involve the controlled use of chemicals, including flammable, combustible, toxic and radioactive materials that are potentially hazardous if misused. Federal, state and local laws and regulations govern our use, storage, handling and disposal of these materials. These laws and regulations include the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, the Occupational Safety and Health Act and local fire and building codes, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation, the Drug Enforcement Agency, the Department of Energy, the Department of Health and Human Services, and the laws of Massachusetts, where we conduct our operations. We may incur significant costs to comply with these laws and regulations in the future and current or future environmental laws and regulations may impair our research, development and production efforts. Notwithstanding our extensive safety procedures for handling and disposing of such materials, the risk of accidental contamination or injury from these materials cannot be completely eliminated. In the event of an accident, our business could be disrupted and we could be liable for damages and our liability may exceed our insurance coverage and our total assets, and have a negative impact on our financial condition and results of operations.
We may be exposed to potential liability related to the development, testing or manufacturing of compounds we develop.
We are developing, clinically testing and manufacturing therapeutic products for use in humans. In connection with these activities, we could be liable if persons are injured or die while using these drugs. We may have to pay substantial damages and/or incur legal costs to defend claims resulting from injury or death, and we may not receive expected royalty or milestone payments if commercialization of a drug is limited or ended as a result of such claims. We have product liability and clinical trial insurance that contains customary exclusions and provides coverage per occurrence at levels, in the aggregate, which we believe are customary and commercially reasonable in our industry given our current stage of drug development. Our product liability insurance does not cover every type of product liability claim that we may face or loss we may incur and may not adequately compensate us for the entire amount of covered claims or losses or for the harm to our business reputation. Also,
19
we may be unable to maintain our current insurance policies or obtain and maintain necessary additional coverage at acceptable costs, or at all.
RISKS RELATED TO OUR COMMON STOCK AND THE OFFERING
Because our stock price may be extremely volatile, our stock price could experience substantial decline.
The trading price of our common stock has been highly volatile. We believe the trading price of our common stock will remain highly volatile and may fluctuate substantially due to factors such as:
 
This volatility coupled with market declines in our industry over the past several years have affected the market prices of securities issued by many companies, often for reasons unrelated to their operating performance, and may adversely affect the price of our common stock. In the past, securities class action litigation has often been instituted following periods of volatility in the market price of a company's securities. A securities class action suit against us could result in potential liabilities, substantial costs and the diversion of management's attention and resources, regardless of the outcome of the action.
Some of our existing stockholders can exert control over us, and their interests could conflict with the best interests of our other stockholders.
Due to their combined stock holdings, our officers, directors and principal stockholders (stockholders holding more than 5% of our common stock), acting together, may be able to exert significant influence over all matters requiring stockholder approval, including the election of directors and approval of significant corporate transactions. In addition, this concentration of ownership may delay or prevent a change in control of our company, even when a change may be in the best interests of our stockholders. Furthermore, the interests of these stockholders may not always coincide with our interests as a company or the interests of other stockholders. Accordingly, these stockholders could cause us to enter into transactions or agreements that would not be widely viewed as beneficial.
If our officers, directors or principal stockholders sell substantial amounts of our common stock (including shares issued upon the exercise of options and warrants) in the public market, the market
20
price of our common stock could fall. These sales also might make it more difficult for us to sell equity or equity-related securities in the future at a time and price that we deemed appropriate.
Anti-takeover provisions in our charter documents and under Delaware law could make an acquisition of us, which may be beneficial to our stockholders, more difficult and may prevent or deter attempts by our stockholders to replace or remove our current management.
Provisions in our corporate charter and bylaws and Delaware law may discourage, delay or prevent an acquisition of our company, a change in control, or attempts by our stockholders to replace or remove members of our current Board of Directors. Because our Board of Directors is responsible for appointing the members of our management team, these provisions could in turn affect any attempt by our stockholders to replace current members of our management team. These provisions include:
 
Moreover, because we are incorporated in Delaware, we are governed by the provisions of Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, which prohibits a person who owns in excess of 15% of our outstanding voting stock from merging or combining with us for a period of three years after the date of the transaction in which the person acquired in excess of 15% of our outstanding voting stock, unless the merger or combination is approved in a prescribed manner. As a result, it is difficult for a third party to acquire control of us without the approval of our Board of Directors and, therefore, mergers and acquisitions of us that our stockholders may consider in their best interests may not occur.
Because we do not intend to pay dividends, stockholders will benefit from an investment in our common stock only if it appreciates in value.
We have never declared or paid any cash dividends on our common stock. We currently intend to retain our future earnings, if any, to finance the expansion of our business and do not expect to pay any cash dividends in the foreseeable future. As a result, the success of an investment in our common stock will depend entirely upon any future appreciation. There is no guarantee that our common stock will appreciate in value or even maintain the price at which stockholders have purchased their shares.
Future sales of our common stock may depress our stock price.
The market price of our common stock could decline as a result of sales of substantial amounts of our common stock in the public market after the closing of this offering, or the perception that these sales could occur. In addition, these factors could make it more difficult for us to raise funds through future offerings of common stock. There are 35,831,456 shares of common stock outstanding as of
21
March 31, 2007. All of the shares sold in this offering and not held by our affiliates will be freely transferable without restriction or further registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
We have an aggregate of 2,488,106 shares of common stock remaining as of March 31, 2007 that have been registered or are freely tradable under an exemption from registration and are reserved for issuance upon exercise of options granted or reserved for grant under our stock option plan and our employee stock purchase plan. Stockholders can sell these shares in the public market upon issuance, subject to restrictions under securities laws. The number of shares we have reserved for issuance under our stock option plan may increase based on our issued and outstanding shares of common stock and we may increase the number of shares reserved for issuance under our employee stock purchase plan. We may register such additional shares in the future. In addition, some of our existing stockholders will be entitled to register their shares of common stock after this offering.
We have broad discretion in the use of the net proceeds from this offering, and we may not use these proceeds effectively.
We have not determined the specific allocation of the net proceeds of this offering. Our management will have broad discretion in the application of the net proceeds from this offering and could spend the proceeds in ways that do not necessarily improve our results of operations or enhance the value of our common stock. The failure by our management to apply these funds effectively could result in financial losses that could have a material adverse effect on our business or financial condition, cause the price of our common stock to decline and delay product development.
You will experience immediate dilution in the book value per share of the common stock you purchase.
Since the price per share of our common stock being offered is substantially higher than the book value per share of our common stock, you will suffer substantial dilution in the net tangible book value of the common stock you purchase in this offering. Based on an assumed offering price to the public of $8.38 per share, if you purchase shares of common stock in this offering, you will suffer immediate and substantial dilution of $5.54 per share in the net tangible book value of the common stock. See the section entitled Dilution'' below for a more detailed discussion of the dilution you will incur if you purchase common stock in this offering.
A substantial number of shares of our outstanding common stock may be sold in this offering, which could cause the price of our common stock to decline.
In this offering, assuming the underwriter's option to purchase up to 1,050,000 additional shares from us is exercised in full, we will sell 8,050,000 shares, or approximately 22.5% of our outstanding common stock as of March 31, 2007. This sale and any future sales of a substantial number of shares of our common stock in the public market, or the perception that such sales may occur, could adversely affect the price of our common stock. We cannot predict the effect, if any, that market sales of those shares of common stock or the availability of those shares of common stock for sale will have on the market price of our common stock.
22
 
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This current report includes forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. We have based these forward-looking statements on our current expectations and projections about future events. Our actual results could differ materially from those discussed in, or implied by, these forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are generally identified by words such as "believe," "anticipate," "estimate," "expect," "intend," "plan," "will," "may" and other similar expressions. In addition, any statements that refer to expectations, projections or other characterizations of future events or circumstances are forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements include, but are not necessarily limited to, those relating to:
 
Factors that could cause actual results or conditions to differ from those anticipated by these and other forward-looking statements include those more fully described in the "Risk factors" section of our preliminary prospectus supplement dated June 6, 2007 (File No. 333-143162) and in the reports we file with the SEC. We undertake no obligation to update or revise these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this prospectus supplement except as required by law.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
Text of press release announcing offering of common stock.
99.1
                          
23
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
24

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ARQULE ANNOUNCES OFFERING OF COMMON STOCK
Woburn, MA, June 6, 2007ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule" or the "Company") (NASDAQ: ARQL) announced today that it has filed a preliminary prospectus supplement to an existing shelf registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission relating to a proposed public offering of 7,000,000 shares of its common stock. In connection with the offering, ArQule expects to grant its underwriters a 30-day option to purchase up to 1,050,000 shares at the public offer price to cover over-allotments, if any.
UBS Investment Bank and CIBC World Markets are acting as joint book-running managers for this offering. Leerink Swann & Company and Fortis Securities LLC are co-managers.
This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any state in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction.
Copies of the preliminary prospectus supplement may be obtained from UBS Investment Bank, Attn: Prospectus Department, 299 Park Avenue, New York, NY 10171, Toll Free 888-827-7275, or from CIBC World Markets
Corp., Attn: USE Prospectus Department, 425 Lexington Avenue, 5
th
 Floor, New York, NY 10017, Toll Free 866-895-5637; or via email to useprospectus@us.cibc.com.
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics. The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy
 (ACT). The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product that mediates its effects by inhibiting the activity of a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis. The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Hoffman-La Roche. For more information, please visit
www.arqule.com
.
 
Safe Harbor Statement
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's potential future financing plans, including with respect to the Company's proposed public offering. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could materially impact forward-looking statements, such as market conditions and related risks and the progress of the Company's clinical programs. You should consider the risk factors identified in the preliminary prospectus supplement and accompanying prospectus, and in our Securities and Exchange Commission filings, including the Forms 10-K and 10-Q and in other SEC filings. The Company undertakes no obligation to revise or update any forward-looking statements in order to reflect events or circumstances that may arise after the date of this release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070615144742.txt.gz
TIME:20070615144742
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
June 13, 2007
 
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
(Zip code)
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
 
SECTION 1  REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS
ITEM 1.01.  ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT.
ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule") entered into an underwriting agreement on June 13, 2007 (the "Underwriting Agreement") with UBS Securities LLC, CIBC World Markets Corp., Leerink Swann & Co., Inc., Fortis Securities LLC and Rodman & Renshaw, LLC, as underwriters (the "Underwriters"). The Underwriting Agreement provides for the sale by ArQule of 7,000,000 shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Common Stock"), plus an option granted to the Underwriters to purchase an additional 1,050,000 shares of Common Stock to cover over-allotments, if any. The offering of the Common Stock was made pursuant to a shelf registration statement filed by ArQule on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-143162), including a related prospectus as supplemented by a Preliminary Prospectus Supplement dated June 6, 2007 and Prospectus Supplement dated June 13, 2007.  A copy of the Underwriting Agreement is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report.
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
ITEM 8.01.  OTHER EVENTS.
A copy of the press release announcing the pricing of such offering is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
(d) Exhibits.
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3

Exhibit 1.1
 
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
June 13, 2007
 
June 13, 2007
UBS Securities LLC CIBC World Markets Corp. Leerink Swann & Co., Inc. Fortis Securities LLC Rodman & Renshaw, LLC   
as Managing Underwriters
c/o UBS Securities LLC 299 Park Avenue New York, New York 10171-0026
c/o CIBC World Markets Corp. 300 Madison Avenue New York, New York 10017
Ladies and Gentlemen:
ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), proposes to issue and sell to the underwriters named in annexed hereto (the ""), for whom you are acting as representatives, an aggregate of 7,000,000 shares (the "") of common stock, $0.01 par value per share (the ""), of the Company.  In addition, solely for the purpose of covering over-allotments, the Company proposes to grant to the Underwriters the option to purchase from the Company up to an additional 1,050,000 shares of Common Stock (the "").  The Firm Shares and the Additional Shares are hereinafter collectively sometimes referred to as the "."  The Shares are described in the Prospectus which is referred to below.
Company
Schedule A
Underwriters
Firm Shares
Common Stock
Additional Shares
Shares
The Company has prepared and filed, in accordance with the provisions of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (collectively, the ""), with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-111181) under the Act (the "").  In addition, the Company has prepared and filed with the Commission, in accordance with the provisions of the Act, another registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-143162) (the "" and, collectively with the first registration statement, the "").  The registration statements incorporate by reference documents which the Company has filed, or will file, in accordance with the provisions of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (collectively, the "").  Pursuant to Rule 429 under the Act, the second registration statement contains a combined prospectus to be used in connection with both registration statements.  Each registration statement has become effective under the Act, and, pursuant to Rule 429 under the Act, the second registration statement, upon its effectiveness under the Act, acted as a post-effective amendment to the first registration statement.
Act
Commission
first registration statement
second registration statement
registration statements
Exchange Act
 
Except where the context otherwise requires, "," as used herein, means the registration statements, as amended at the time of such registration statements' effectiveness for purposes of Section 11 of the Act, as such section applies to the Underwriter (the ""), including (i) all documents filed as a part thereof or incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein, (ii) any information contained or incorporated by reference in a prospectus filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act, to the extent such information is deemed, pursuant to Rule 430B or Rule 430C under the Act, to be part of the registration statements at the Effective Time, and (iii) any registration statement filed to register the offer and sale of Shares pursuant to Rule 462(b) under the Act.
Registration Statement
Effective Time
The Company has furnished to you, for use by the Underwriters and by dealers in connection with the offering of the Shares, copies of one or more preliminary prospectus supplements, and, if required by the Underwriters, the documents incorporated by reference therein, relating to the Shares.  Except where the context otherwise requires, "," as used herein, means each such preliminary prospectus supplement, in the form so furnished, including any basic prospectus (whether or not in preliminary form) furnished to you by the Company and attached to or used with such preliminary prospectus supplement.  The parties hereto agree that the only Pre-Pricing Prospectus is the preliminary prospectus supplement relating to the Shares, dated June 6, 2007, together with the basic prospectus attached thereto. Except where the context otherwise requires, "," as used herein, means any such basic prospectus and any basic prospectus furnished to you by the Company and attached to or used with the Prospectus Supplement (as defined below).
Pre-Pricing Prospectus
Basic Prospectus
Except where the context otherwise requires, "," as used herein, means the final prospectus supplement, relating to the Shares, filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act on or before the second business day after the date hereof (or such earlier time as may be required under the Act), in the form furnished by the Company to you for use by the Underwriters and by dealers in connection with the offering of the Shares.
Prospectus Supplement
Except where the context otherwise requires, "," as used herein, means the Prospectus Supplement together with the Basic Prospectus attached to or used with the Prospectus Supplement.
Prospectus
"," as used herein, means the documents listed on attached hereto and each "road show" (as defined in Rule 433 under the Act), if any, related to the offering of the Shares contemplated hereby that is a "written communication" (as defined in Rule 405 under the Act).  The Underwriters have not offered or sold and will not offer or sell, without the Company's consent, any Shares by means of any "free writing prospectus" (as defined in Rule 405 under the Act) that is required to be filed by the Underwriters with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433 under the Act, other than a Permitted Free Writing Prospectus.
Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses
Schedule B
"," as used herein, means any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, together with any combination of one or more of the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any.
Disclosure Package
2
 
Any reference herein to the registration statement, the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents, if any, incorporated by reference, or deemed to be incorporated by reference, therein (the ""), including, unless the context otherwise requires, the documents, if any, filed as exhibits to such Incorporated Documents.  Any reference herein to the terms "," "" or "" with respect to the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the filing of any document under the Exchange Act on or after the initial effective date of the Registration Statement, or the date of such Basic Prospectus, such Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, as the case may be, and deemed to be incorporated therein by reference.
Incorporated Documents
amend
amendment
supplement
As used in this Agreement, "" shall mean a day on which the New York Stock Exchange (the "") is open for trading.  The terms "herein," "hereof," "hereto," "hereinafter" and similar terms, as used in this Agreement, shall in each case refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular section, paragraph, sentence or other subdivision of this Agreement.  The term "or," as used herein, is not exclusive.
business day
NYSE
The Company and the Underwriters agree as follows:
1.             .  Upon the basis of the representations and warranties and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to issue and sell to the respective Underwriters and each of the Underwriters, severally and not jointly, agrees to purchase from the Company the number of Firm Shares set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in attached hereto, subject to adjustment in accordance with Section 8 hereof, in each case at a purchase price of $7.273375 per Share.  The Company is advised by you that the Underwriters intend (i) to make a public offering of their respective portions of the Firm Shares as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in your judgment is advisable and (ii) initially to offer the Firm Shares upon the terms set forth in the Prospectus.  You may from time to time increase or decrease the public offering price after the initial public offering to such extent as you may determine.
Sale and Purchase
Schedule A
In addition, the Company hereby grants to the several Underwriters the option (the "") to purchase, and upon the basis of the representations and warranties and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Underwriters shall have the right to purchase, severally and not jointly, from the Company, ratably in accordance with the number of Firm Shares to be purchased by each of them, all or a portion of the Additional Shares as may be necessary to cover over-allotments made in connection with the offering of the Firm Shares, at the same purchase price per share to be paid by the Underwriters to the Company for the Firm Shares.  The Over-Allotment Option may be exercised by UBS Securities LLC ("") and CIBC World Markets Corp. ("") on behalf of the several Underwriters at any time and from time to time on or before the thirtieth day following the date of the Prospectus Supplement, by written notice to the Company.  Such notice shall set forth the aggregate number
Over-Allotment Option
UBS
CIBC
3
of Additional Shares as to which the Over-Allotment Option is being exercised and the date and time when the Additional Shares are to be delivered (any such date and time being herein referred to as an ""); ,, that no additional time of purchase shall be earlier than the "time of purchase" (as defined below) nor earlier than the second business day after the date on which the Over-Allotment Option shall have been exercised nor later than the tenth business day after the date on which the Over-Allotment Option shall have been exercised.  The number of Additional Shares to be sold to each Underwriter shall be the number which bears the same proportion to the aggregate number of Additional Shares being purchased as the number of Firm Shares set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter on hereto bears to the total number of Firm Shares (subject, in each case, to such adjustment as UBS and CIBC may determine to eliminate fractional shares), subject to adjustment in accordance with Section 8 hereof.
additional time of purchase
provided
however
Schedule A
8 hereof).  The time at which such payment and delivery are to be made is hereinafter sometimes called the "."  Electronic transfer of the Firm Shares shall be made to you at the time of purchase in such names and in such denominations as you shall specify.
Section
2.             .  Payment of the purchase price for the Firm Shares shall be made to the Company by Federal Funds wire transfer against delivery of the certificates for the Firm Shares to you through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company ("") for the respective accounts of the Underwriters.  Such payment and delivery shall be made at 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on June 19, 2007 (unless another time shall be agreed to by you and the Company or unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of
Payment and Delivery
DTC
time of purchase
Payment of the purchase price for the Additional Shares shall be made at the additional time of purchase in the same manner and at the same office and time of day as the payment for the Firm Shares.  Electronic transfer of the Additional Shares shall be made to you at the additional time of purchase in such names and in such denominations as you shall specify.
Deliveries of the documents described in Section 6 hereof with respect to the purchase of the Shares shall be made at the offices of Dewey Ballantine LLP at 1301 Avenue of the Americas, New York, New York, at 9:00 A.M., New York City time, on the date of the closing of the purchase of the Firm Shares or the Additional Shares, as the case may be.
3.             .  The Company represents and warrants to and agrees with each of the Underwriters that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company
the Registration Statement has heretofore become effective under the Act or, with respect to any registration statement to be filed to register the offer and sale of Shares pursuant to Rule 462(b) under the Act, will be filed with the Commission and become effective under the Act no later than 10:00 P.M., New York City time, on the date of determination of the public offering price for the Shares; no stop order of the Commission preventing or suspending the use of any Basic Prospectus, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, or the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, has been issued, and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted or, to the Company's knowledge, are contemplated by the Commission;
(a)          
4
 
the Registration Statement complied when it became effective, complies as of the date hereof and, as amended or supplemented, at the time of purchase, each additional time of purchase, if any, and at all times during which a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered (whether physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule) in connection with any sale of Shares, will comply, in all material respects, with the requirements of the Act; the conditions to the use of Form S-3 in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares as contemplated hereby have been satisfied; the Registration Statement meets, and the offering and sale of the Shares as contemplated hereby complies with, the requirements of Rule 415 under the Act (including, without limitation, Rule 415(a)(5) under the Act); the Registration Statement did not, as of the Effective Time, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; each Pre-Pricing Prospectus complied, at the time it was filed with the Commission, and complies as of the date hereof, in all material respects with the requirements of the Act; at no time during the period that begins on the earlier of the date of such Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the date such Pre-Pricing Prospectus was filed with the Commission and ends at the time of purchase did or will any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, as then amended or supplemented, include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, and at no time during such period did or will any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, as then amended or supplemented, together with any combination of one or more of the then issued Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; each Basic Prospectus complied or will comply, as of its date and the date it was or will be filed with the Commission, complies as of the date hereof (if filed with the Commission on or prior to the date hereof) and, at the time of purchase, each additional time of purchase, if any, and at all times during which a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered (whether physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule) in connection with any sale of Shares, will comply, in all material respects, with the requirements of the Act; at no time during the period that begins on the earlier of the date of such Basic Prospectus and the date such Basic Prospectus was filed with the Commission and ends at the time of purchase did or will any Basic Prospectus, as then amended or supplemented, include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, and at no time during such period did or will any Basic Prospectus, as then amended or supplemented, together with any combination of one or more of the then issued Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; each of the Prospectus Supplement and the Prospectus will comply, as of the date that it is filed with the Commission, the date of the Prospectus Supplement, the time of purchase, each additional time of purchase, if any, and at all times during which a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered (whether
(b)          
5
, in all material respects, with the requirements of the Act (in the case of the Prospectus, including, without limitation, Section 10(a) of the Act); at no time during the period that begins on the earlier of the date of the Prospectus Supplement and the date the Prospectus Supplement is filed with the Commission and ends at the later of the time of purchase, the latest additional time of purchase, if any, and the end of the period during which a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered (whether physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule) in connection with any sale of Shares did or will any Prospectus Supplement or the Prospectus, as then amended or supplemented, include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; at no time during the period that begins on the date of such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus and ends at the time of purchase did or will any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that the Company makes no representation or warranty in this Section 3(b) with respect to any statement contained in the Registration Statement, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information concerning an Underwriter and furnished in writing by or on behalf of such Underwriter through you to the Company expressly for use in the Registration Statement, such Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus; each Incorporated Document, at the time such document was filed, or will be filed, with the Commission or at the time such document became or becomes effective, as applicable, complied or will comply, in all material respects, with the requirements of the Exchange Act and did not or will not, as applicable, include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
in connection with any sale of Shares
physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule)
provided
however
(c)           prior to the execution of this Agreement, the Company has not, directly or indirectly, offered or sold any Shares by means of any "prospectus" (within the meaning of the Act) or used any "prospectus" (within the meaning of the Act) in connection with the offer or sale of the Shares, in each case other than the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any; the Company has not, directly or indirectly, prepared, used or referred to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus except in compliance with Rules 164 and 433 under the Act; assuming that such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus is so sent or given after the Registration Statement was filed with the Commission (and after such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus was, if required pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, filed with the Commission), the sending or giving, by any Underwriter, of any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus will satisfy the provisions of Rule 164 and Rule 433 (without reliance on subsections (b), (c) and (d) of Rule 164); the conditions set forth in one or more of subclauses (i) through (iv), inclusive, of Rule 433(b)(1) under the Act are satisfied, and the registration statement relating to the offering of the Shares contemplated hereby, as initially filed with the Commission, includes a prospectus that, other than by reason of Rule 433 or Rule 431 under the Act,
6
satisfies the requirements of Section 10 of the Act; neither the Company nor the Underwriters are disqualified, by reason of subsection (f) or (g) of Rule 164 under the Act, from using, in connection with the offer and sale of the Shares, "free writing prospectuses" (as defined in Rule 405 under the Act) pursuant to Rules 164 and 433 under the Act; the Company is not an "ineligible issuer" (as defined in Rule 405 under the Act) as of the eligibility determination date for purposes of Rules 164 and 433 under the Act with respect to the offering of the Shares contemplated by the Registration Statement, without taking into account any determination by the Commission pursuant to Rule 405 under the Act that it is not necessary under the circumstances that the Company be considered an "ineligible issuer"; the parties hereto agree and understand that the content of any and all "road shows" (as defined in Rule 433 under the Act) related to the offering of the Shares contemplated hereby is solely the property of the Company;
(d)           in accordance with Rule 2710(b)(7)(C)(i) of the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. (the ""), the Shares have been registered with the Commission on Form S-3 under the Act pursuant to the standards for such Form S-3 in effect prior to October 21, 1992;
NASD
the Shares are duly listed, and admitted and authorized for trading, subject to official notice of issuance, on the Nasdaq Global Market (the "");
(e)           as of the date of this Agreement, the Company has an authorized and outstanding capitalization as set forth in the sections of the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses and the Prospectus entitled "Capitalization" and "Description of common stock" (and any similar sections or information, if any, contained in any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus), and, as of the time of purchase and any additional time of purchase, as the case may be, the Company shall have an authorized and outstanding capitalization as set forth in the sections of the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses and the Prospectus entitled "Capitalization" and "Description of common stock" (and any similar sections or information, if any, contained in any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus) (subject, in each case, to the issuance of shares of Common Stock upon exercise of stock options and warrants disclosed as outstanding in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus and the grant of options under existing stock option plans described in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus); all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock, including the Common Stock, of the Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable, have been issued in compliance with all applicable securities laws and were not issued in violation of any preemptive right, resale right, right of first refusal or similar right;
NASDAQ
, with full corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, to execute and deliver this Agreement and to issue, sell and deliver the Shares as contemplated herein;
Delaware
(f)            the Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of
 
7
(the occurrence of any such effect or any such prevention or interference or any such result described in the foregoing clauses (i), (ii) or (iii) being herein referred to as a "");
NASDAQ
(g)           the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation and is in good standing in each jurisdiction where the ownership or leasing of its properties or the conduct of its business requires such qualification (which jurisdictions are the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and the State of California), except where the failure to be so qualified and in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, either (i) have a material adverse effect on the business, properties, financial condition, results of operations or prospects of the Company, (ii) prevent or materially interfere with consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or (iii) result in the delisting of shares of Common Stock from the
Material Adverse Effect
(h)           the Company has no subsidiaries (as defined under the Act); except as described in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company does not own, directly or indirectly, any shares of stock or any other equity interests or long-term debt securities of any corporation, firm, partnership, joint venture, association or other entity;
the Company's charter or bylaws or any agreement or other instrument to which the Company is a party;
Delaware General Corporation Law or
(i)            the Shares have been duly and validly authorized and, when issued and delivered against payment therefor as provided herein, will be duly and validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable and free of statutory and contractual preemptive rights, resale rights, rights of first refusal and similar rights; the Shares, when issued and delivered against payment therefor as provided herein, will be free of any restriction upon the voting or transfer thereof pursuant to the
in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any; and the certificates for the Shares are in due and proper form;
or incorporated by reference
(j)            the capital stock of the Company, including the Shares, conforms in all material respects to each description thereof, if any, contained
(k)           this Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
(C) any federal, state, local or foreign law, regulation or rule, or (D) any rule or regulation of any
(l)            the Company is not in breach or violation of or in default under (nor has any event occurred which, with notice, lapse of time or both, would result in any breach or violation of, constitute a default under or give the holder of any indebtedness (or a person acting on such holder's behalf) the right to require the repurchase, redemption or repayment of all or a part of such indebtedness under) (A) its charter or bylaws, or (B) any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, bank loan or credit agreement or other evidence of indebtedness, or any license, lease, contract or other agreement or instrument to which it is a party or by which it or any of its properties may be bound or affected, or
8
self-regulatory organization or other non-governmental regulatory authority (including, without limitation, the rules and regulations of the NASDAQ), or (E) any decree, judgment or order applicable to it or any of its properties, except, in the case of clauses (B) and (C), for such breaches, violations or defaults as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
(A) the charter or bylaws of the Company, or (B) any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, bank loan or credit agreement or other evidence of indebtedness, or any license, lease, contract or other agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party or by which the Company or any of its properties may be bound or affected, or (C) any federal, state, local or foreign law, regulation or rule, or (D) any rule or regulation of any self-regulatory organization or other non-governmental regulatory authority (including, without limitation, the rules and regulations of the NASDAQ), or (E) any decree, judgment or order applicable to the Company or any of its properties, except, in the case of clause (B), for such breaches, violations and defaults as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
(or result in the creation or imposition of a lien, charge or encumbrance on any property or assets of the Company pursuant to)
(m)          the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, the issuance and sale of the Shares and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will not conflict with, result in any breach or violation of or constitute a default under (nor constitute any event which, with notice, lapse of time or both, would result in any breach or violation of, constitute a default under or give the holder of any indebtedness (or a person acting on such holder's behalf) the right to require the repurchase, redemption or repayment of all or a part of such indebtedness under)
is required in connection with the issuance and sale of the Shares or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby, other than (i) registration of the Shares under the Act, which has been effected (or, with respect to any registration statement to be filed hereunder pursuant to Rule 462(b) under the Act, will be effected in accordance herewith), (ii) any necessary qualification under the securities or blue sky laws of the various jurisdictions in which the Shares are being offered by the Underwriters or (iii) under the Conduct Rules of the NASD;
or of or with any self-regulatory organization or other non-governmental regulatory authority (including, without limitation, the NASDAQ), or approval of the stockholders of the Company,
(n)           no approval, authorization, consent or order of or filing with any federal, state, local or foreign governmental or regulatory commission, board, body, authority or agency,
except as described in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, (i) no person has the right, contractual or otherwise, to cause the Company to issue or sell to it any shares of Common Stock or shares of any other capital stock or other equity interests of the Company, (ii) no person has any preemptive rights, resale rights, rights of first refusal or other rights to purchase any shares of Common Stock or shares of any other capital stock of or other equity interests in the Company and (iii) no person, other than the Underwriters, has the right to act as an underwriter or as a financial advisor to the Company in connection with the offer and sale of the Shares, in the case of each of the
(o)          
9
foregoing clauses (i), (ii) and (iii), whether as a result of the filing or effectiveness of the Registration Statement, the sale of the Shares as contemplated thereby or otherwise; no person has the right, contractual or otherwise, to cause the Company to register under the Act any shares of Common Stock or shares of any other capital stock of or other equity interests in the Company, or to include any such shares or interests in the Registration Statement or the offering contemplated thereby;
(p)           the Company has all necessary licenses, authorizations, consents and approvals and has made all necessary filings required under any applicable law, regulation or rule, and has obtained all necessary licenses, authorizations, consents and approvals from other persons, in order to conduct its business, except where the failure to have such licenses, authorizations, consents and approvals or to make such filings would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; the Company is not in violation of, or in default under, or has received notice of any proceedings relating to revocation or modification of, any such license, authorization, consent or approval or any federal, state, local or foreign law, regulation or rule or any decree, order or judgment applicable to the Company, except where such violation, default, revocation or modification would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
except any such action, suit, claim, investigation or proceeding which, if resolved adversely to the Company, would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
any self-regulatory organization or other non-governmental regulatory authority (including, without limitation, the NASDAQ),
(q)           except as described in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), the Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, there are no actions, suits, claims, investigations or proceedings pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened or contemplated to which the Company or, to the Company's knowledge, any of its directors or officers is or would be a party or of which any of its properties is or would be subject at law or in equity, before or by any federal, state, local or foreign governmental or regulatory commission, board, body, authority or agency, or before or by
(r)            PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, whose report on the consolidated financial statements of the Company is included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses and the Prospectus, are independent registered public accountants as required by the Act and by the rules of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board;
consolidated financial position of the Company as of the dates indicated and the consolidated results of operations, cash flows and changes in stockholders' equity of the Company for the periods specified and have been prepared in compliance with the requirements of the Act and Exchange Act and in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP") applied on a consistent basis during the periods involved, provided, however, that in accordance with Article X of Regulation S-X
(s)           the financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, together with the related notes and schedules, present fairly the
10
under the Act, the interim financial statements incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus do not contain all footnotes otherwise required by GAAP; all pro forma financial statements or data included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, comply with the requirements of the Act and the Exchange Act, and the assumptions used in the preparation of such pro forma financial statements and data are reasonable, the pro forma adjustments used therein are appropriate to give effect to the transactions or circumstances described therein and the pro forma adjustments have been properly applied to the historical amounts in the compilation of those statements and data; the other financial and statistical data contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, are accurately and fairly presented and prepared on a basis consistent with the financial statements and books and records of the Company; there are no financial statements (historical or pro forma) that are required to be included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus that are not included or incorporated by reference as required; the Company does not have any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent (including any off-balance sheet obligations), not described in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus; and all disclosures contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, regarding "non-GAAP financial measures" (as such term is defined by the rules and regulations of the Commission) comply with Regulation G of the Exchange Act and Item 10 of Regulation S-K under the Act, to the extent applicable;
in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, each stock option granted under any stock option plan of the Company (each, a "") was granted with a per share exercise price no less than the fair market value per share of Common Stock on the grant date of such option, which was determined under the Company's stock option plans to be the closing sales price for the Company's stock on the last market trading day prior to the grant date, and no such grant involved any "back-dating," "forward-dating" or similar practice with respect to the effective date of such grant; except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect, each such option (i) was granted in compliance with applicable law and with the applicable Stock Plan(s), (ii) was duly approved by the board of directors (or a duly authorized committee thereof) of the Company, and (iii) has been properly accounted for in the Company's financial statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles and disclosed in the Company's filings with the Commission;
(t)            except as disclosed
Stock Plan
, in each case excluding any amendments or supplements to the foregoing made after the execution of this Agreement, there has not been (i) any material adverse change, or any development involving a prospective
in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any
(u)           subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given
11
material adverse change, in the business, properties, management, financial condition or results of operations of the Company, (ii) any transaction which is material to the Company, (iii) any obligation or liability, direct or contingent (including any off-balance sheet obligations), incurred by the Company, which is material to the Company, (iv) any change in the capital stock or outstanding indebtedness of the Company or (v) any dividend or distribution of any kind declared, paid or made on the capital stock of the Company;
the Company has obtained for the benefit of the Underwriters the agreement (a "") of each of its directors and "officers" (within the meaning of Rule 16a-1(f) under the Exchange Act), which form of Lock-Up Agreement is set forth as hereto in the case of each director and each officer other than Stephen A. Hill and is set forth as hereto in the case of Stephen A. Hill.
(v)          
Lock-Up Agreement
Exhibit A
Exhibit A-1
(whether physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule) in connection with any sale of Shares will it be, and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Shares and the application of the proceeds thereof, it will not be, an "investment company" or an entity "controlled" by an "investment company, as such terms are defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "");
during which a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered
(w)          the Company is not, and at no time
Investment Company Act
(x)            the Company has good and marketable title to all property (real and personal) described the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, as being owned by it, free and clear of all liens, claims, security interests or other encumbrances, except as described in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), the Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, and except where the failure to have such title would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; all the property described in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, as being held under lease by the Company is held thereby under valid, subsisting and enforceable leases, except where the failure to hold any such lease would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
the Company owns, or has obtained valid and enforceable licenses for, or other rights to use, the inventions, patent applications, patents, trademarks (both registered and unregistered), tradenames, service names, copyrights, trade secrets and other proprietary information described in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus or the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, as being owned or licensed by it or that are necessary for the conduct of its business as currently conducted or as proposed to be conducted (including the commercialization of products described in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus or the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, as under development), except where the failure to own, license or have such rights would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect (collectively, ""); (i) to the
(y)          
Intellectual Property
12
each Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, disclose is licensed to the Company; (ii) to the Company's knowledge, there is no infringement by third parties of any Intellectual Property; (iii) except as disclosed in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, there is no pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened action, suit, proceeding or claim by others challenging the Company's rights in or to any Intellectual Property; (iv) the Company is not aware of facts that have led it to conclude that one or more claims of any patent included in the Intellectual Property is invalid or unenforceable, or that it should be narrowed in scope such that any of the product candidates denominated as ARQ 197, ARQ 501, ARQ 171 or ARQ 761 in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus or the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses (each, a "Product Candidate" and, collectively, the "Product Candidates") would no longer fall in all material respects within the scope of the narrowed claims of one or more patents and patent applications owned by, or exclusively licensed to, the Company, and there is no pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened action, suit, proceeding or claim to such effect; (v) except as disclosed in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, if any, to the Company's knowledge, the Company is not infringing or otherwise violating, nor would it, upon the commercialization of any of the Product Candidates infringe or violate, any patent, trade secret or other proprietary rights of others, and there is no pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened action, suit, proceeding or claim to such effect; (vi) the Company has complied in all material respects with the terms of each agreement pursuant to which Intellectual Property relating to the Product Candidates has been licensed to the Company, and all such agreements are in full force and effect; (vii) to the Company's knowledge, there is no patent or patent application included within the Intellectual Property that is in interference with any third-party patent or patent application; (viii) to the Company's knowledge, it has complied or will comply with the duty of disclosure in the United States Patent and Trademark Office relating to any prior art relating to any patent rights material to any of the Product Candidates; and (ix) each of the Product Candidates falls in all material respects within the scope of the claims of one or more patents and patent applications owned by, or exclusively licensed to, the Company;
Company's knowledge, there are no third parties who have any ownership interest or rights to any Intellectual Property, except for, and to the extent of, the ownership rights of the owners of the Intellectual Property which the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto),
(z)            Except for matters which would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect, the Company is not engaged in any unfair labor practice; except for matters which would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect, (i) there is (A) no unfair labor practice complaint pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened against the Company before the National Labor Relations Board, and no grievance or arbitration proceeding arising out of or under collective bargaining agreements is pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened, (B) no strike, labor dispute, slowdown or stoppage pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened against the Company and (C) no union representation dispute
13
currently existing concerning the employees of the Company, (ii) to the Company's knowledge, no union organizing activities are currently taking place concerning the employees of the Company and (iii) there has been no violation of any federal, state, local or foreign law relating to discrimination in the hiring, promotion or pay of employees, any applicable wage or hour laws or any provision of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 ("") or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder concerning the employees of the Company;
ERISA
(aa)         the Company and its properties, assets and operations are in compliance with, and the Company holds all permits, authorizations and approvals required under, Environmental Laws (as defined below), except to the extent that failure to so comply or to hold such permits, authorizations or approvals would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; there are no past, present or, to the Company's knowledge, reasonably anticipated future events, conditions, circumstances, activities, practices, actions, omissions or plans that could reasonably be expected to give rise to any material costs or liabilities to the Company under, or to interfere with or prevent compliance by the Company with, Environmental Laws; except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect, the Company (i) is not, to the Company's knowledge, the subject of any investigation, (ii) has not received any notice or claim, (iii) is not a party to or affected by any pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened action, suit or proceeding, (iv) is not bound by any judgment, decree or order or (v) has not entered into any agreement, in each case relating to any alleged violation of any Environmental Law or any actual or alleged release or threatened release or cleanup at any location of any Hazardous Materials (as defined below) (as used herein, "" means any federal, state, local or foreign law, statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, order, decree, judgment, injunction, permit, license, authorization or other binding requirement, or common law, relating to health, safety or the protection, cleanup or restoration of the environment or natural resources, including those relating to the distribution, processing, generation, treatment, storage, disposal, transportation, other handling or release or threatened release of Hazardous Materials, and "" means any material (including, without limitation, pollutants, contaminants, hazardous or toxic substances or wastes) that is regulated by or may give rise to liability under any Environmental Law);
Environmental Law
Hazardous Materials
(bb)         all tax returns required to be filed by the Company have been timely filed, and all taxes and other assessments of a similar nature (whether imposed directly or through withholding) including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto due or claimed to be due from such entities have been timely paid, other than those being contested in good faith and for which adequate reserves have been provided;
(cc)         the Company maintains insurance covering its properties, operations, personnel and business as the Company reasonably deems adequate; such insurance insures against such losses and risks to an extent which is adequate in accordance with customary industry practice to protect the Company and its business; all such insurance is fully in force on the date hereof and will be fully in force at the time of purchase and each additional time of purchase, if any; the Company has no reason to believe that it will not
14
be able to renew any such insurance as and when such insurance expires;
, and no such termination or non-renewal has been threatened by the Company or, to the Company's knowledge, any other party to any such contract or agreement;
Incorporated Document
(dd)         the Company has not sent or received any communication regarding termination of, or intent not to renew, any of the contracts or agreements referred to or described in any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, or referred to or described in, or filed as an exhibit to, the Registration Statement or any
the Company maintains a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences;
(ee)        
promulgated thereunder;
NASDAQ
(ff)           the Company has established and maintains and evaluates "disclosure controls and procedures" (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15 and 15d-15 under the Exchange Act) and "internal control over financial reporting" (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15 and 15d-15 under the Exchange Act); such disclosure controls and procedures are designed to ensure that material information relating to the Company is made known to the Company's Chief Executive Officer and its Chief Financial Officer by others within those entities, and such disclosure controls and procedures are effective to perform the functions for which they were established; the Company's independent auditors and the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company have been advised of: (i) all significant deficiencies, if any, in the design or operation of internal controls which could adversely affect the Company's ability to record, process, summarize and report financial data; and (ii) all fraud, if any, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a role in the Company's internal controls; all material weaknesses, if any, in internal controls have been identified to the Company's independent auditors; since the date of the most recent evaluation of such disclosure controls and procedures and internal controls, there have been no changes in internal controls or in other factors that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, internal controls, including any corrective actions with regard to significant deficiencies and material weaknesses; the principal executive officers (or their equivalents) and principal financial officers (or their equivalents) of the Company have made all certifications required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the "") and any related rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission, and the statements contained in each such certification were complete and correct when made; the Company and the Company's directors and officers are each in compliance in all material respects with all applicable effective provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission and the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
 
15
 
or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, has been made or reaffirmed with a reasonable basis and in good faith;
(gg)         each "forward-looking statement" (within the meaning of Section 27A of the Act or Section 21E of the Exchange Act) contained
are based on or derived from sources that the Company reasonably believes to be reliable and accurate, and the Company has obtained the written consent to the use of such data from such sources to the extent required;
(hh)         all statistical or market-related data included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any,
or the Prospectus;
, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus
(ii)           neither the Company nor, to the Company's knowledge, any employee or agent of the Company has made any payment of funds of the Company \or received or retained any funds in violation of any law, rule or regulation (including, without limitation, the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977), which payment, receipt or retention of funds is of a character required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement
the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, were and, if still pending, are being conducted in all material respects in accordance with protocols filed with the appropriate regulatory authorities for each such test or trial, as the case may be, and with research procedures generally accepted by the medical and scientific communities; each description of the results of such tests and trials contained in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, is accurate in all material respects and fairly summarizes the data derived from such tests and trials, and the Company has no knowledge of any other studies or tests the results of which are inconsistent with, or otherwise call into question, the results described or referred to in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any; the Company has not received any notices or other correspondence from the Food and Drug Administration of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services or any committee thereof or from any other U.S. or foreign government or drug or medical device regulatory agency (collectively, the "") requiring the termination, suspension or modification of any clinical trials that are described or referred to in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any; and the Company has operated and currently is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable rules, regulations and policies of the Regulatory Agencies;
(jj)           the preclinical tests and clinical trials that are described in, or the results of which are referred to in,
Regulatory Agencies
(kk)         the issuance and sale of the Shares as contemplated hereby will not cause any holder of any shares of capital stock, securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for capital stock or options, warrants or other rights to purchase capital stock
16
 
or any other securities of the Company to have any right to acquire any shares of preferred stock of the Company, except as have been duly waived;
(ll)           the Company has not received any current or pending notice from the NASDAQ regarding the delisting of the Common Stock from the NASDAQ;
(mm)       except pursuant to this Agreement, the Company has not incurred any liability for any finder's or broker's fee or agent's commission in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or by the Registration Statement;
(nn)         neither the Company nor any of its directors, officers, affiliates or controlling persons has taken, directly or indirectly, any action designed, or which has constituted or might reasonably be expected to cause or result in the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares; and
, except as disclosed in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses and the Prospectus.
or any beneficial owner of the Company's unregistered equity securities that were acquired at any time on or after the 180th day immediately preceding the date the Registration Statement was initially filed with the Commission
(oo)         to the Company's knowledge, there are no affiliations or associations between (i) any member of the NASD and (ii) the Company or any of the Company's officers, directors or 5% or greater security holders
In addition, any certificate signed by any officer of the Company and delivered to any Underwriter or counsel for the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Shares shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty by the Company, as to matters covered thereby, to each Underwriter.
.  The Company hereby agrees:
4.            
Certain Covenants of the Company
(a)           to furnish such information as may be required and otherwise to cooperate in qualifying the Shares for offering and sale under the securities or blue sky laws of such states or other jurisdictions as you may designate and to maintain such qualifications in effect so long as you may request for the distribution of the Shares; , , that the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to consent to the service of process under the laws of any such jurisdiction (except service of process with respect to the offering and sale of the Shares); and to promptly advise you of the receipt by the Company of any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification of the Shares for offer or sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose;
provided
however
(b)           to make available to the Underwriters in New York City, as soon as practicable after this Agreement becomes effective, and thereafter from time to time to furnish to the Underwriters, as many copies of the Prospectus (or of the Prospectus as
17
 
amended or supplemented if the Company shall have made any amendments or supplements thereto after the effective date of the Registration Statement) as the Underwriters may request for the purposes contemplated by the Act; in case any Underwriter is required to deliver (whether physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule), in connection with the sale of the Shares, a prospectus after the nine-month period referred to in Section 10(a)(3) of the Act, or after the time a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement is required pursuant to Item 512(a) of Regulation S-K under the Act, the Company will prepare, at its expense, promptly upon request such amendment or amendments to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus as may be necessary to permit compliance with the requirements of Section 10(a)(3) of the Act or Item 512(a) of Regulation S-K under the Act, as the case may be;
if, at the time this Agreement is executed and delivered, it is necessary or appropriate for a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement, or a Registration Statement under Rule 462(b) under the Act, to be filed with the Commission and become effective before the Shares may be sold, the Company will use its best efforts to cause such post-effective amendment or such Registration Statement to be filed and become effective, and will pay any applicable fees in accordance with the Act, as soon as possible; and the Company will advise you promptly and, if requested by you, will confirm such advice in writing, (i) when such post-effective amendment or such Registration Statement has become effective, and (ii) if Rule 430A under the Act is used, when the Prospectus is filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act (which the Company agrees to file in a timely manner in accordance with such Rules);
(c)          
if, at any time during the period when a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered (whether physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule) in connection with any sale of Shares, the Registration Statement shall cease to comply with the requirements of the Act with respect to eligibility for the use of the form on which the Registration Statement was filed with the Commission, to (i) promptly notify you, (ii) promptly file with the Commission a new registration statement under the Act, relating to the Shares, or a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement, which new registration statement or post-effective amendment shall comply with the requirements of the Act and shall be in a form reasonably satisfactory to you, (iii) use its best efforts to cause such new registration statement or post-effective amendment to become effective under the Act as soon as practicable, (iv) promptly notify you of such effectiveness and (v) take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the public offering and sale of the Shares to continue as contemplated in the Prospectus; all references herein to the Registration Statement shall be deemed to include each such new registration statement or post-effective amendment, if any;
(d)          
(e)           if the third anniversary of the initial effective date of the Registration Statement (within the meaning of Rule 415(a)(5) under the Act) shall occur at any time during the period when a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered (whether physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule) in
18
 
connection with any sale of Shares, to (i) file with the Commission, prior to such third anniversary, a new registration statement under the Act relating to the Shares, which new registration statement shall comply with the requirements of the Act (including, without limitation, Rule 415(a)(6) under the Act) and shall be in a form satisfactory to you; and (ii) use its best efforts to cause such new registration statement to become effective under the Act as soon as practicable, but in any event within 180 days after such third anniversary and promptly notify you of such effectiveness; the Company shall take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the public offering and sale of the Shares to continue as contemplated in the Prospectus; all references herein to the Registration Statement shall be deemed to include each such new registration statement, if any;
(f)            to advise you promptly, confirming such advice in writing, of any request by the Commission for amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus or for additional information with respect thereto, or of notice of institution of proceedings for, or the entry of a stop order, suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement and, if the Commission should enter a stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, to use its best efforts to obtain the lifting or removal of such order as soon as possible; to advise you promptly of any proposal to amend or supplement the Registration Statement, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, and to provide you and Underwriters' counsel copies of any such documents for review and comment a reasonable amount of time prior to any proposed filing and to file no such amendment or supplement to which you shall object in writing;
; and to provide you, for your review and comment, with a copy of such reports and statements and other documents to be filed by the Company pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act during such period a reasonable amount of time prior to any proposed filing, and to file no such report, statement or document to which you shall have reasonably objected in writing; and to promptly notify you of such filing;
a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered (whether physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule) in connection with any sale of Shares
(g)           subject to Section 4(f) hereof, to file promptly all reports and documents and any preliminary or definitive proxy or information statement required to be filed by the Company with the Commission in order to comply with the Exchange Act for so long as
(whether physically or through compliance with Rule 172 under the Act or any similar rule) in connection with any sale of Shares, which event could require the making of any change in the Prospectus then being used so that the Prospectus would not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, and to advise the Underwriters promptly if, during such period, it shall become necessary to amend or supplement the Prospectus to cause the Prospectus to comply with the requirements of the Act, and, in each case, during such time, subject to Section 4(f) hereof, to prepare and furnish, at the Company's expense, to the
a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered
(h)           to advise the Underwriters promptly of the happening of any event within the period during which
19
 
Underwriters promptly such amendments or supplements to such Prospectus as may be necessary to reflect any such change or to effect such compliance;
to make generally available to its security holders, and to deliver to you, an earnings statement of the Company (which will satisfy the provisions of Section 11(a) of the Act) covering a period of twelve months beginning after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Act) as soon as is reasonably practicable after the termination of such twelve-month period but in any case not later than August 11, 2008;
(i)           
to furnish to you 5 copies of the Registration Statement, as initially filed with the Commission, and of all amendments thereto (including all exhibits thereto and documents incorporated by reference therein) and sufficient copies of the foregoing (other than exhibits) for distribution of a copy to each of the other Underwriters;
(j)           
to furnish to you as early as practicable prior to the time of purchase and any additional time of purchase, as the case may be, but not later than two business days prior thereto, a copy of the latest available unaudited interim and monthly consolidated financial statements, if any, of the Company which have been read by the Company's independent registered public accountants, as stated in their letter to be furnished pursuant to Section 6(e) hereof;
(k)          
(l)            to apply the net proceeds from the sale of the Shares in the manner set forth under the caption "Use of proceeds" in the Prospectus Supplement;
and any amendments or supplements thereto, and the printing and furnishing of copies of each thereof to the Underwriters and to dealers (including costs of mailing and shipment), (ii) the registration, issue, sale and delivery of the Shares including any stock or transfer taxes and stamp or similar duties payable upon the sale, issuance or delivery of the Shares to the Underwriters, (iii) the producing, word processing and/or printing of this Agreement, any Agreement Among Underwriters, any dealer agreements, any Powers of Attorney and any closing documents (including compilations thereof) and the reproduction and/or printing and furnishing of copies of each thereof to the Underwriters and (except closing documents) to dealers (including costs of mailing and shipment), (iv) the qualification of the Shares for offering and sale under state or foreign laws and the determination of their eligibility for investment under state or foreign law and the printing and furnishing of copies of any blue sky surveys or legal investment surveys to the Underwriters and to dealers and any filing for review of the public offering of the Shares by the NASD (including the legal fees (not to exceed $10,000 in the aggregate) and filing fees and other disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters), (v) any listing of the Shares on any securities exchange or qualification of the Shares for quotation on the NASDAQ and any registration thereof under the Exchange Act, (vi) the fees and disbursements of any transfer agent or registrar for the
the Registration Statement, each Basic Prospectus, each Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus, each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
(m)          to pay all costs, expenses, fees and taxes in connection with (i) the preparation and filing of
20
 
(viii) the performance of the Company's other obligations hereunder;
Shares, (vii) the costs and expenses of the Company relating to presentations or meetings undertaken in connection with the marketing of the offering and sale of the Shares to prospective investors and the Underwriters' sales forces, including, without limitation, expenses associated with the production of road show slides and graphics, fees and expenses of any consultants engaged in connection with the road show presentations, travel, lodging and other expenses incurred by the officers of the Company and any such consultants, and the cost of any aircraft chartered in connection with the road show,
and
to comply with Rule 433(d) under the Act (without reliance on Rule 164(b) under the Act) and with Rule 433(g) under the Act;
(n)          
(o)           beginning on the date hereof and ending on, and including, the date that is 90 days after the date of the Prospectus Supplement (the ""), without the prior written consent of UBS and CIBC, not to (i) issue, sell, offer to sell, contract or agree to sell, hypothecate, pledge, grant any option to purchase or otherwise dispose of or agree to dispose of, directly or indirectly, or establish or increase a put equivalent position or liquidate or decrease a call equivalent position within the meaning of Section 16 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated thereunder, with respect to, any Common Stock or any other securities of the Company that are substantially similar to Common Stock, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, or any warrants or other rights to purchase, the foregoing, (ii) file or cause to become effective a registration statement under the Act relating to the offer and sale of any Common Stock or any other securities of the Company that are substantially similar to Common Stock, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, or any warrants or other rights to purchase, the foregoing, (iii) enter into any swap or other arrangement that transfers to another, in whole or in part, any of the economic consequences of ownership of Common Stock or any other securities of the Company that are substantially similar to Common Stock, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, or any warrants or other rights to purchase, the foregoing, whether any such transaction is to be settled by delivery of Common Stock or such other securities, in cash or otherwise or (iv) publicly announce an intention to effect any transaction specified in clause (i), (ii) or (iii), except, in each case, for (A) the registration of the offer and sale of the Shares as contemplated by this Agreement, (B) issuances of Common Stock upon the exercise of options or warrants disclosed as outstanding in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, (C) the issuance of employee stock options not exercisable during the Lock-Up Period pursuant to stock option plans described in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, (D) the issuance of Common Stock pursuant to the Company's employee stock purchase plan described in the Registration Statement (excluding the exhibits thereto), each Pre-Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, provided that such Common Stock does not vest during the Lock-Up Period;  and (E) the issuance of Common Stock, not to exceed approximately 10.7 million shares, in connection with any license or strategic alliance, provided that the recipient shall be subject to a similar lock-up provision for the remainder of the Lock-Up Period.
Lock-Up Period
21
 
(p)           prior to the time of purchase or any additional time of purchase, as the case may be, to issue no press release or other communication directly or indirectly and hold no press conferences with respect to the Company, the financial condition, results of operations, business, properties, assets, or liabilities of the Company, or the offering of the Shares, without your prior consent;
(q)           not, at any time at or after the execution of this Agreement, to, directly or indirectly, offer or sell any Shares by means of any "prospectus" (within the meaning of the Act), or use any "prospectus" (within the meaning of the Act) in connection with the offer or sale of the Shares, in each case other than the Prospectus;
any action designed, or which will constitute, or has constituted, or might reasonably be expected to cause or result in the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares;
(r)            not to take, directly or indirectly,
(s)           to use its best efforts to cause the Shares to be listed on the NASDAQ and to maintain the listing of the Common Stock, including the Shares, on the NASDAQ; and
to maintain a transfer agent and, if necessary under the jurisdiction of incorporation of the Company, a registrar for the Common Stock.
(t)           
.  If the Shares are not delivered for any reason other than the termination of this Agreement pursuant to clause (2)(A), (C), (D) or (E) of the second paragraph of Section 7 hereof or pursuant to the fifth paragraph of Section 8 hereof or the default by one or more of the Underwriters in its obligations hereunder, the Company shall, in addition to paying the amounts described in Section 4(m) hereof, reimburse the Underwriters for all of their out-of-pocket expenses, including the fees and disbursements of their counsel.
5.            
Reimbursement of Underwriters' Expenses
6.             .  The several obligations of the Underwriters hereunder are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company on the date hereof, at the time of purchase and, if applicable, at the additional time of purchase, the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions precedent:
Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations
The Company shall furnish to you at the time of purchase and, if applicable, at the additional time of purchase, an opinion and 10b5-1 statement of Arnold & Porter LLP, counsel for the Company, addressed to the Underwriters, and dated the time of purchase or the additional time of purchase, as the case may be, with executed copies for each of the other Underwriters, in the forms set forth in and hereto.
(a)          
Exhibit B
Exhibit B-1
(b)           The Company shall furnish to you at the time of purchase and, if applicable, at the additional time of purchase, an opinion of each of Arnold & Porter LLP
22
 
patents and proprietary rights, addressed to the Underwriters, and dated the time of purchase or the additional time of purchase, as the case may be, with executed copies for each of the other Underwriters, in the forms set forth in and , respectively, hereto.
special counsel for the Company with respect to
and Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo P.C.,
Exhibit C
Exhibit
C-1
, addressed to the Underwriters, and dated the time of purchase or the additional time of purchase, as the case may be, with executed copies for each of the other Underwriters, in the form set forth in hereto.
of the Company
(c)           The Company shall furnish to you at the time of purchase and, if applicable, at the additional time of purchase, an opinion of Peter S. Lawrence, General Counsel
Exhibit D
, addressed to the Underwriters, and dated the time of purchase or the additional time of purchase, as the case may be, with executed copies for each of the other Underwriters, in the form set forth in , respectively, hereto.
internal intellectual property counsel for the Company
(d)           The Company shall furnish to you at the time of purchase and, if applicable, at the additional time of purchase, an opinion of Yang Xu,
Exhibit E
(e)           You shall have received from PricewaterhouseCoopers letters dated, respectively, the date of this Agreement, the date of the Prospectus Supplement, the time of purchase and, if applicable, the additional time of purchase, and addressed to the Underwriters (with executed copies for each of the Underwriters) in the forms satisfactory to UBS and CIBC, which letters shall cover, without limitation, the various financial disclosures contained in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any.
You shall have received at the time of purchase and, if applicable, at the additional time of purchase, the favorable opinion of Dewey Ballantine LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, dated the time of purchase or the additional time of purchase, as the case may be, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to UBS and CIBC.
(f)           
No Prospectus or amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus shall have been filed to which you shall have objected in writing.
(g)          
(h)           The Registration Statement and any registration statement required to be filed, prior to the sale of the Shares, under the Act pursuant to Rule 462(b) shall have been filed and shall have become effective under the Act.  The Prospectus Supplement shall have been filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act at or before 5:30 P.M., New York City time, on the second full business day after the date of this Agreement (or such earlier time as may be required under the Act).
(i)            Prior to and at the time of purchase, and, if applicable, the additional time of purchase, (i) no stop order with respect to the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued under the Act or proceedings initiated under Section 8(d) or 8(e) of the Act; (ii) the Registration Statement and all amendments thereto shall not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required
23
 
to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; (iii) none of the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses or the Prospectus, and no amendment or supplement thereto, shall include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading; (iv) no Disclosure Package, and no amendment or supplement thereto, shall include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading; and (v) none of the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, shall include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading.
(j)            The Company will, at the time of purchase and, if applicable, at the additional time of purchase, deliver to you a certificate of its Chief Executive Officer and its Chief Financial Officer, dated the time of purchase or the additional time of purchase, as the case may be, in the form attached as hereto.
Exhibit F
(k)           The Company will, at the time of purchase and, if applicable, at the additional time of purchase, deliver to you a certificate of its Chief Financial Officer, dated the time of purchase or the additional time of purchase, as the case may be, in the form attached as hereto.
Exhibit G
(l)            You shall have received each of the signed Lock-Up Agreements referred to in Section 3(v) hereof, and each such Lock-Up Agreement shall be in full force and effect at the time of purchase and the additional time of purchase, as the case may be.
(m)          The Company shall have furnished to you such other documents and certificates as to the accuracy and completeness of any statement in the Registration Statement, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as of the time of purchase and, if applicable, the additional time of purchase, as you may reasonably request.
(n)           The Shares shall have been approved for listing on the NASDAQ, subject only to notice of issuance at or prior to the time of purchase or the additional time of purchase, as the case may be.
The NASD shall not have raised any objection with respect to the fairness or reasonableness of the underwriting, or other arrangements of the transactions, contemplated hereby.
(o)          
.  This Agreement shall become effective when the parties hereto have executed and delivered this Agreement.
7.            
Effective Date of Agreement; Termination
The obligations of the several Underwriters hereunder shall be subject to termination in the absolute discretion of UBS and CIBC, if (1) since the time of execution of this Agreement or the earlier respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration
24
 
Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, there has been any change or any development involving a prospective change in the business, properties, management, financial condition or results of operations of the Company, the effect of which change or development is, in the sole judgment of UBS and CIBC, so material and adverse as to make it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Shares on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, or (2) since the time of execution of this Agreement, there shall have occurred: (A) a suspension or material limitation in trading in securities generally on the NYSE, the American Stock Exchange or the NASDAQ; (B) a suspension or material limitation in trading in the Company's securities on the NASDAQ; (C) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities declared by either federal or New York State authorities or a material disruption in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States; (D) an outbreak or escalation of hostilities or acts of terrorism involving the United States or a declaration by the United States of a national emergency or war; or (E) any other calamity or crisis or any change in financial, political or economic conditions in the United States or elsewhere, if the effect of any such event specified in clause (D) or (E), in the sole judgment of UBS and CIBC, makes it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Shares on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Registration Statement, the Pre-Pricing Prospectuses, the Prospectus and the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, or (3) since the time of execution of this Agreement, there shall have occurred any downgrading, or any notice or announcement shall have been given or made of: (A) any intended or potential downgrading or (B) any watch, review or possible change that does not indicate an affirmation or improvement in the rating accorded any securities of or guaranteed by the Company by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization," as that term is defined in Rule 436(g)(2) under the Act.
If UBS and CIBC elect to terminate this Agreement as provided in this Section 7, the Company and each other Underwriter shall be notified promptly in writing.
If the sale to the Underwriters of the Shares, as contemplated by this Agreement, is not carried out by the Underwriters for any reason permitted under this Agreement, or if such sale is not carried out because the Company shall be unable to comply with any of the terms of this Agreement, the Company shall not be under any obligation or liability under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Sections 4(m), 5 and 9 hereof), and the Underwriters shall be under no obligation or liability to the Company under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Section 9 hereof) or to one another hereunder.
.  Subject to Sections 6 and 7 hereof, if any Underwriter shall default in its obligation to take up and pay for the Firm Shares to be purchased by it hereunder (otherwise than for a failure of a condition set forth in Section 6 hereof or a reason sufficient to justify the termination of this Agreement under the provisions of Section 7 hereof) and if the number of Firm Shares which all Underwriters so defaulting shall have agreed but failed to take up and pay for does not exceed 10% of the total number of Firm Shares, the non-defaulting Underwriters (including the Underwriters, if any, substituted in the manner set forth below) shall take up and pay for (in addition to the aggregate number of Firm Shares they
8.            
Increase in Underwriters' Commitments
25
 
are obligated to purchase pursuant to Section 1 hereof) the number of Firm Shares agreed to be purchased by all such defaulting Underwriters, as hereinafter provided.  Such Shares shall be taken up and paid for by such non-defaulting Underwriters in such amount or amounts as you may designate with the consent of each Underwriter so designated or, in the event no such designation is made, such Shares shall be taken up and paid for by all non-defaulting Underwriters pro rata in proportion to the aggregate number of Firm Shares set forth opposite the names of such non-defaulting Underwriters in .
Schedule A
Without relieving any defaulting Underwriter from its obligations hereunder, the Company agrees with the non-defaulting Underwriters that it will not sell any Firm Shares hereunder unless all of the Firm Shares are purchased by the Underwriters (or by substituted Underwriters selected by you with the approval of the Company or selected by the Company with your approval).
If a new Underwriter or Underwriters are substituted by the Underwriters or by the Company for a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters in accordance with the foregoing provision, the Company or you shall have the right to postpone the time of purchase for a period not exceeding five business days in order that any necessary changes in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and other documents may be effected.
The term "Underwriter" as used in this Agreement shall refer to and include any Underwriter substituted under this Section 8 with like effect as if such substituted Underwriter had originally been named in hereto.
Schedule A
If the aggregate number of Firm Shares which the defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed to purchase exceeds 10% of the total number of Firm Shares which all Underwriters agreed to purchase hereunder, and if neither the non-defaulting Underwriters nor the Company shall make arrangements within the five business day period stated above for the purchase of all the Firm Shares which the defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed to purchase hereunder, this Agreement shall terminate without further act or deed and without any liability on the part of the Company to any Underwriter and without any liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter to the Company.  Nothing in this paragraph, and no action taken hereunder, shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of any default of such Underwriter under this Agreement.
9.             .
Indemnity and Contribution
The Company agrees to indemnify, defend and hold harmless each Underwriter, its partners, directors and officers, any person who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act and the successors and assigns of all of the foregoing persons, from and against any loss, damage, expense, liability or claim (including the reasonable cost of investigation) which, jointly or severally, any such Underwriter or any such person may incur under the Act, the Exchange Act, the common law or otherwise, insofar as such loss, damage, expense, liability or claim arises out of or is based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement (or in the Registration
(a)          
26
 
required to be stated in such Registration Statement or was necessary to make such information not misleading or (ii) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact included in any Prospectus (the term Prospectus for the purpose of this Section 9 being deemed to include any Basic Prospectus, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements to the foregoing), in any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, in any "issuer information" (as defined in Rule 433 under the Act) of the Company or in any Prospectus together with any combination of one or more of the Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, or arises out of or is based upon any omission or alleged omission to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except, with respect to such Prospectus or Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, insofar as any such loss, damage, expense, liability or claim arises out of or is based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in, and in conformity with information concerning such Underwriter furnished in writing by or on behalf of such Underwriter through you to the Company expressly for use in, such Prospectus or Permitted Free Writing Prospectus or arises out of or is based upon any omission or alleged omission to state a material fact in such Prospectus or Permitted Free Writing Prospectus in connection with such information, which material fact was not contained in such information and which material fact was necessary in order to make the statements in such information, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
, which material fact was not contained in such information and which material fact was
Statement as amended by any post-effective amendment thereof by the Company) or arises out of or is based upon any omission or alleged omission to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, except insofar as any such loss, damage, expense, liability or claim arises out of or is based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in, and in conformity with information concerning such Underwriter furnished in writing by or on behalf of such Underwriter through you to the Company expressly for use in, the Registration Statement or arises out of or is based upon any omission or alleged omission to state a material fact in the Registration Statement in connection with such information
Each Underwriter severally agrees to indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Company, its directors and officers, and any person who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, and the successors and assigns of all of the foregoing persons, from and against any loss, damage, expense, liability or claim (including the reasonable cost of investigation) which, jointly or severally, the Company or any such person may incur under the Act, the Exchange Act, the common law or otherwise, insofar as such loss, damage, expense, liability or claim arises out of or is based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in, and in conformity with information concerning such Underwriter furnished in writing by or on behalf of such Underwriter through you to the Company expressly for use in, the Registration Statement (or in the Registration Statement as amended by any post-effective amendment thereof by the Company), or arises out of or is based upon any omission or alleged omission to state a material fact in such Registration Statement in connection with such information, which material fact was
(b)          
27
 
required to be stated in such Registration Statement or was necessary to make such information not misleading or (ii) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in, and in conformity with information concerning such Underwriter furnished in writing by or on behalf of such Underwriter through you to the Company expressly for use in, a Prospectus or a Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, or arises out of or is based upon any omission or alleged omission to state a material fact in such Prospectus or Permitted Free Writing Prospectus in connection with such information, which material fact was not contained in such information and which material fact was necessary in order to make the statements in such information, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
not contained in such information and which material fact was
9, such indemnified party shall promptly notify such indemnifying party in writing of the institution of such Proceeding and such indemnifying party shall assume the defense of such Proceeding, including the employment of counsel reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party and payment of all fees and expenses; , , that the omission to so notify such indemnifying party shall not relieve such indemnifying party from any liability which such indemnifying party may have to any indemnified party or otherwise.  The indemnified party or parties shall have the right to employ its or their own counsel in any such case, but the fees and expenses of such counsel shall be at the expense of such indemnified party or parties unless the employment of such counsel shall have been authorized in writing by the indemnifying party in connection with the defense of such Proceeding or the indemnifying party shall not have, within a reasonable period of time in light of the circumstances, employed counsel to defend such Proceeding or such indemnified party or parties shall have reasonably concluded that there may be defenses available to it or them which are different from, additional to or in conflict with those available to such indemnifying party (in which case such indemnifying party shall not have the right to direct the defense of such Proceeding on behalf of the indemnified party or parties), in any of which events such fees and expenses shall be borne by such indemnifying party and paid as incurred (it being understood, however, that such indemnifying party shall not be liable for the expenses of more than one separate counsel (in addition to any local counsel) in any one Proceeding or series of related Proceedings in the same jurisdiction representing the indemnified parties who are parties to such Proceeding).  The indemnifying party shall not be liable for any settlement of any Proceeding effected without its written consent but, if settled with its written consent, such indemnifying party agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the indemnified party or parties from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement.  Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, if at any time an indemnified party shall have requested an indemnifying party to reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel as contemplated by the second sentence of this Section 9(c), then the indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of any Proceeding effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 60
(c)           If any action, suit or proceeding (each, a "") is brought against a person (an "") in respect of which indemnity may be sought against the Company or an Underwriter (as applicable, the "") pursuant to subsection (a) or (b), respectively, of this Section
Proceeding
indemnified party
indemnifying party
provided
however
28
 
business days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the aforesaid request, (ii) such indemnifying party shall not have fully reimbursed the indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement and (iii) such indemnified party shall have given the indemnifying party at least 30 days' prior notice of its intention to settle.  No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened Proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such Proceeding and does not include an admission of fault or culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of such indemnified party.
(d)           If the indemnification provided for in this Section 9 is unavailable to an indemnified party under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section 9 or insufficient to hold an indemnified party harmless in respect of any losses, damages, expenses, liabilities or claims referred to therein, then each applicable indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, damages, expenses, liabilities or claims (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other hand from the offering of the Shares or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and of the Underwriters on the other in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, damages, expenses, liabilities or claims, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations.  The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total proceeds from the offering (net of underwriting discounts and commissions but before deducting expenses) received by the Company, and the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriters, bear to the aggregate public offering price of the Shares.  The relative fault of the Company on the one hand and of the Underwriters on the other shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission relates to information supplied by the Company or by the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.  The amount paid or payable by a party as a result of the losses, damages, expenses, liabilities and claims referred to in this subsection shall be deemed to include any legal or other fees or expenses reasonably incurred by such party in connection with investigating, preparing to defend or defending any Proceeding.
The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 9 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in subsection (d) above.  Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 9, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which
(e)          
29
 
No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.  The Underwriters' obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 9 are several in proportion to their respective underwriting commitments and not joint.
. 
the total price at which the Shares underwritten by such Underwriter and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damage which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission
The indemnity and contribution agreements contained in this Section 9 and the covenants, warranties and representations of the Company contained in this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter, its partners, directors or officers or any person (including each partner, officer or director of such person) who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, or by or on behalf of the Company, its directors or officers or any person who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, and shall survive any termination of this Agreement or the issuance and delivery of the Shares.  The Company and each Underwriter agree promptly to notify each other of the commencement of any Proceeding against it and, in the case of the Company, against any of the Company's officers or directors in connection with the issuance and sale of the Shares, or in connection with the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, any Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus.
(f)           
.  The statements set forth in the sixth, twelfth, thirteenth, fourteenth, fifteenth, sixteenth, seventeenth and eighteenth paragraphs under the caption "Underwriting" in the Prospectus, only insofar as such statements relate to the amount of selling concession and reallowance or to over-allotment and stabilization activities that may be undertaken by the Underwriters, constitute the only information furnished by or on behalf of the Underwriters, as such information is referred to in Sections 3 and 9 hereof.
10.          
Information Furnished by the Underwriters
.  Except as otherwise herein provided, all statements, requests, notices and agreements shall be in writing or by telegram or facsimile and, if to the Underwriters, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered or sent to UBS Securities LLC, 299 Park Avenue, New York, NY 10171-0026, Attention: Syndicate Department and to CIBC World Markets Corp, 300 Madison Avenue, New York, New York 10017 and, if to the Company, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered or sent to the Company at the offices of the Company at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, Attention: Stephen A. Hill President and Chief Executive Officer.
11.          
Notices
.  This Agreement and any claim, counterclaim or dispute of any kind or nature whatsoever arising out of or in any way relating to this Agreement (""), directly or indirectly, shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.  The section headings in this Agreement have been inserted as a matter of convenience of reference and are not a part of this Agreement.
12.          
Governing Law; Construction
Claim
30
 
.  Except as set forth below, no Claim may be commenced, prosecuted or continued in any court other than the courts of the State of New York located in the City and County of New York or in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York, which courts shall have jurisdiction over the adjudication of such matters, and the Company consents to the jurisdiction of such courts and personal service with respect thereto.  The Company hereby consents to personal jurisdiction, service and venue in any court in which any Claim arising out of or in any way relating to this Agreement is brought by any third party against any Underwriter or any indemnified party.  Each Underwriter and the Company (on its behalf and, to the extent permitted by applicable law, on behalf of its stockholders and affiliates) waive all right to trial by jury in any action, proceeding or counterclaim (whether based upon contract, tort or otherwise) in any way arising out of or relating to this Agreement.  The Company agrees that a final judgment in any such action, proceeding or counterclaim brought in any such court shall be conclusive and binding upon the Company and may be enforced in any other courts to the jurisdiction of which the Company is or may be subject, by suit upon such judgment.
13.          
Submission to Jurisdiction
referred to in such Section, and their respective successors, assigns, heirs, personal representatives and executors and administrators.  No other person, partnership, association or corporation (including a purchaser, as such purchaser, from any of the Underwriters) shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement.
the controlling persons, partners, directors, officers and affiliates
14.           .  The Agreement herein set forth has been and is made solely for the benefit of the Underwriters and the Company and to the extent provided in Section 9 hereof
Parties at Interest
15.           .  The Company hereby acknowledges that the Underwriters are acting solely as underwriters in connection with the purchase and sale of the Company's securities.  The Company further acknowledges that the Underwriters are acting pursuant to a contractual relationship created solely by this Agreement entered into on an arm's length basis, and in no event do the parties intend that the Underwriters act or be responsible as a fiduciary to the Company, its management, stockholders or creditors or any other person in connection with any activity that the Underwriters may undertake or have undertaken in furtherance of the purchase and sale of the Company's securities, either before or after the date hereof.  The Underwriters hereby expressly disclaim any fiduciary or similar obligations to the Company, either in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or any matters leading up to such transactions, and the Company hereby confirms its understanding and agreement to that effect.  The Company and the Underwriters agree that they are each responsible for making their own independent judgments with respect to any such transactions and that any opinions or views expressed by the Underwriters to the Company regarding such transactions, including, but not limited to, any opinions or views with respect to the price or market for the Company's securities, do not constitute advice or recommendations to the Company.  The Company and the Underwriters agree that the Underwriters are acting as principal and not the agent or fiduciary of the Company and no Underwriter has assumed, and no Underwriter will assume, any advisory responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether any Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters).  The Company hereby waives and releases, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any claims that the Company
No Fiduciary Relationship
31
 
may have against the Underwriters with respect to any breach or alleged breach of any fiduciary, advisory or similar duty to the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or any matters leading up to such transactions.
.  This Agreement may be signed by the parties in one or more counterparts which together shall constitute one and the same agreement among the parties.
16.          
Counterparts
.  This Agreement shall be binding upon the Underwriters and the Company and their successors and assigns and any successor or assign of any substantial portion of the Company's and any of the Underwriters' respective businesses and/or assets.
17.          
Successors and Assigns
.  UBS, an indirect, wholly owned subsidiary of UBS AG, is not a bank and is separate from any affiliated bank, including any U.S. branch or agency of UBS AG.  Because UBS is a separately incorporated entity, it is solely responsible for its own contractual obligations and commitments, including obligations with respect to sales and purchases of securities.  Securities sold, offered or recommended by UBS are not deposits, are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, are not guaranteed by a branch or agency, and are not otherwise an obligation or responsibility of a branch or agency.
18.          
Miscellaneous
32
 
If the foregoing correctly sets forth the understanding between the Company and the several Underwriters, please so indicate in the space provided below for that purpose, whereupon this Agreement and your acceptance shall constitute a binding agreement between the Company and the Underwriters, severally.
 
Accepted and agreed to as of the date first above written, on behalf of themselves and the other several Underwriters named in Schedule A
UBS SECURITIES LLC CIBC WORLD MARKETS CORP. LEERINK SWANN & CO., INC. FORTIS SECURITIES LLC RODMAN & RENSHAW, LLC
By: UBS SECURITIES LLC
 
 
 
 
None.
___________ ___, 2007
UBS Securities LLC CIBC World Markets Corp. Together with the other Underwriters named in Schedule A to the Underwriting Agreement referred to herein
c/o UBS Securities LLC 299 Park Avenue New York, New York 10171-0026
c/o CIBC World Markets Corp. 300 Madison Avenue New York, New York 10017
Ladies and Gentlemen:
This Lock-Up Agreement is being delivered to you in connection with the proposed Underwriting Agreement (the "") to be entered into by ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), and you and the other underwriters named in Schedule A to the Underwriting Agreement, with respect to the public offering (the "") of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company (the "").
Underwriting Agreement
Company
Offering
Common Stock
In order to induce you to enter into the Underwriting Agreement, the undersigned agrees that, for a period (the "") beginning on the date hereof and ending on, and including, the date that is 90 days after the date of the final prospectus supplement relating to the Offering, the undersigned will not, without the prior written consent of UBS Securities LLC and CIBC World Markets Corp., (i) sell, offer to sell, contract or agree to sell, hypothecate, pledge, grant any option to purchase or otherwise dispose of or agree to dispose of, directly or indirectly, or file (or participate in the filing of) a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") in respect of, or establish or increase a put equivalent position or liquidate or decrease a call equivalent position within the meaning of Section 16 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated thereunder (the "") with respect to, any Common Stock or any other securities of the Company that are substantially similar to Common Stock, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, or any warrants or other rights to purchase, the foregoing, (ii) enter into any swap or other arrangement that transfers to another, in whole or in part, any of the economic consequences of ownership of Common Stock or any other securities of the Company that are substantially similar to Common Stock, or any securities
Lock-Up Period
Commission
Exchange Act
A-1
 
convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, or any warrants or other rights to purchase, the foregoing, whether any such transaction is to be settled by delivery of Common Stock or such other securities, in cash or otherwise or (iii) publicly announce an intention to effect any transaction specified in clause (i) or (ii).  The foregoing sentence shall not apply to (a) the registration of the offer and sale of Common Stock as contemplated by the Underwriting Agreement and the sale of the Common Stock to the Underwriters (as defined in the Underwriting Agreement) in the Offering, (b) bona fide gifts, provided the recipient thereof agrees in writing with the Underwriters to be bound by the terms of this Lock-Up Agreement or (c) dispositions to any trust for the direct or indirect benefit of the undersigned and/or the immediate family of the undersigned, provided that such trust agrees in writing with the Underwriters to be bound by the terms of this Lock-Up Agreement.  For purposes of this paragraph, "immediate family" shall mean the undersigned and the spouse, any lineal descendent, father, mother, brother or sister of the undersigned.
In addition, the undersigned hereby waives any rights the undersigned may have to require registration of Common Stock in connection with the filing of a registration statement relating to the Offering.  The undersigned further agrees that, for the Lock-Up Period, the undersigned will not, without the prior written consent of UBS Securities LLC and CIBC World Markets Corp., make any demand for, or exercise any right with respect to, the registration of Common Stock or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock, or warrants or other rights to purchase Common Stock or any such securities.
The undersigned hereby confirms that the undersigned has not, directly or indirectly, taken, and hereby covenants that the undersigned will not, directly or indirectly, take, any action designed, or which has constituted or will constitute or might reasonably be expected to cause or result in the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of shares of Common Stock.
A-2
 
If (i) the Company notifies you in writing that it does not intend to proceed with the Offering, (ii) the registration statement filed with the Commission with respect to the Offering is withdrawn or (iii) for any reason the Underwriting Agreement shall be terminated prior to the "time of purchase" (as defined in the Underwriting Agreement), this Lock-Up Agreement shall be terminated and the undersigned shall be released from its obligations hereunder.
 
A-3
June ___, 2007
UBS Securities LLC CIBC World Markets Corp. Together with the other Underwriters named in Schedule A to the Underwriting Agreement referred to herein
c/o UBS Securities LLC 299 Park Avenue New York, New York 10171-0026
c/o CIBC World Markets Corp. 300 Madison Avenue New York, New York 10017
Ladies and Gentlemen:
This Lock-Up Agreement is being delivered to you in connection with the proposed Underwriting Agreement (the "") to be entered into by ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), and you and the other underwriters named in Schedule A to the Underwriting Agreement, with respect to the public offering (the "") of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company (the "").
Underwriting Agreement
Company
Offering
Common Stock
In order to induce you to enter into the Underwriting Agreement, the undersigned agrees that, for a period (the "") beginning on the date hereof and ending on, and including, the date that is 90 days after the date of the final prospectus supplement relating to the Offering, the undersigned will not, without the prior written consent of UBS Securities LLC and CIBC World Markets Corp., (i) sell, offer to sell, contract or agree to sell, hypothecate, pledge, grant any option to purchase or otherwise dispose of or agree to dispose of, directly or indirectly, or file (or participate in the filing of) a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") in respect of, or establish or increase a put equivalent position or liquidate or decrease a call equivalent position within the meaning of Section 16 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated thereunder (the "") with respect to, any Common Stock or any other securities of the Company that are substantially similar to Common Stock, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, or any warrants or other rights to purchase, the foregoing, (ii) enter into any swap or other arrangement that transfers to another, in whole or in part, any of the economic consequences of ownership of Common Stock or any other securities of the Company that are substantially similar to Common Stock, or any securities
Lock-Up Period
Commission
Exchange Act
A-1-1
 
convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, or any warrants or other rights to purchase, the foregoing, whether any such transaction is to be settled by delivery of Common Stock or such other securities, in cash or otherwise or (iii) publicly announce an intention to effect any transaction specified in clause (i) or (ii).  The foregoing sentence shall not apply to (a) the registration of the offer and sale of Common Stock as contemplated by the Underwriting Agreement and the sale of the Common Stock to the Underwriters (as defined in the Underwriting Agreement) in the Offering, (b) bona fide gifts, provided the recipient thereof agrees in writing with the Underwriters to be bound by the terms of this Lock-Up Agreement, (c) dispositions to any trust for the direct or indirect benefit of the undersigned and/or the immediate family of the undersigned, provided that such trust agrees in writing with the Underwriters to be bound by the terms of this Lock-Up Agreement or (d) the entry by the undersigned into a plan adopted pursuant to Rule 10b5-1 under the Exchange Act, provided that such plan does not provide for the disposition, for the first 45 days of the Lock-Up Period, of shares of any Common Stock or any other securities of the Company that are substantially similar to Common Stock, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, or any warrants or other rights to purchase, the foregoing.  For purposes of this paragraph, "immediate family" shall mean the undersigned and the spouse, any lineal descendent, father, mother, brother or sister of the undersigned.
In addition, the undersigned hereby waives any rights the undersigned may have to require registration of Common Stock in connection with the filing of a registration statement relating to the Offering.  The undersigned further agrees that, for the Lock-Up Period, the undersigned will not, without the prior written consent of UBS Securities LLC and CIBC World Markets Corp., make any demand for, or exercise any right with respect to, the registration of Common Stock or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock, or warrants or other rights to purchase Common Stock or any such securities.
The undersigned hereby confirms that the undersigned has not, directly or indirectly, taken, and hereby covenants that the undersigned will not, directly or indirectly, take, any action designed, or which has constituted or will constitute or might reasonably be expected to cause or result in the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of shares of Common Stock.
A-1-2
 
If (i) the Company notifies you in writing that it does not intend to proceed with the Offering, (ii) the registration statement filed with the Commission with respect to the Offering is withdrawn or (iii) for any reason the Underwriting Agreement shall be terminated prior to the "time of purchase" (as defined in the Underwriting Agreement), this Lock-Up Agreement shall be terminated and the undersigned shall be released from its obligations hereunder.
 
A-1-3
B-1
B-1-1
C-1
 
C-1-1
D-1
E-1
Each of the undersigned, Stephen A. Hill, President and Chief Executive Officer of ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), and Richard H. Woodrich, Acting Chief Financial Officer of the Company, on behalf of the Company, does hereby certify pursuant to Section 6(j) of that certain Underwriting Agreement dated June 13, 2007 (the "") between the Company and, on behalf of the several Underwriters named therein, UBS Securities LLC, CIBC World Markets Corp, Leerink Swann & Co., Inc., Fortis Securities LLC and Rodman & Renshaw, LLC, that as of [date]:
Company
Underwriting Agreement
He has reviewed the Registration Statement, each Pre-Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus and each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus.
1.
              
The representations and warranties of the Company as set forth in the Underwriting Agreement are true and correct as of the date hereof and as if made on the date hereof.
2.
              
The Company has performed all of its obligations under the Underwriting Agreement as are to be performed at or before the date hereof.
3.
              
The conditions set forth in paragraph (i) of Section 6 of the Underwriting Agreement have been met.
4.
              
The shares of capital stock issued by the Company, in connection with investments made by Pfizer Inc. and the acquisitions of Camitro Corporation and Cyclis Pharmaceuticals, Inc. were duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable, and have been issued in compliance with all applicable securities laws and were not issued in violation of any preemptive right, resale right, right of first refusal or similar right.
5.
              
Capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the respective meanings ascribed to them in the Underwriting Agreement.
the undersigned have hereunto set their hands on this [date].
IN WITNESS WHEREOF,
 
 
F-1
The undersigned, Richard H. Woodrich, Acting Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer of ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), do hereby certify, in my capacity as Acting Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer, pursuant to Section 6(k) of that certain Underwriting Agreement dated June 13, 2007 (the "Underwriting Agreement") among the Company and the underwriters named in Schedule A thereto, that:
Company
1.             I am familiar with the accounting, operations and record systems of the Company.
2.             As of May 31, 2007, the last date for which internal monthly financial statements are available (no such monthly financial statements are in a form that is considered complete and reviewable by the auditors and therefore have not been provided to the auditors), there have not been (i) any decreases in consolidated net current assets of the Company as compared with amounts shown on the Company's March 31, 2007 unaudited consolidated balance sheet, (ii) any decreases in stockholders' equity of the Company as compared with the amounts shown on the Company's March 31, 2007 unaudited consolidated balance sheet except, in each case for (i) and (ii), for decreases consistent with the Company's expected annual loss for 2007 (iii) any changes in consolidated revenues from continuing operations for the period April 1, 2007 to May 31, 2007 or (iv) changes in the total or per-share amounts of consolidated net income from continuing operations for the period April 1, 2007 to May 31, 2007, as compared with the corresponding period in the preceding year except for the aforementioned losses consistent with the Company's expected annual loss.
3.             I have supervised the compilation and reviewed the circled numbers contained in the pages attached as included in the Registration Statement, Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus.  Such information has been derived from the books and records of the Company and to the best of my knowledge and belief are accurate as of the dates set forth in the Registration Statement, Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus.  I make no comment as to whether the foregoing information complies with the requirements of Regulation S-K.
Schedule A
Capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the respective meanings ascribed to them in the Underwriting Agreement.
I have hereunto set my hand on this June __, 2007.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF,
 
 
G-1

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ARQULE ANNOUNCES OFFERING OF COMMON STOCK
Woburn, MA, June 14, 2007  ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule" or the "Company") (NASDAQ: ARQL) announced today the pricing of an underwritten public offering of 7,000,000 shares of its common stock at a public offering price of $7.75 per share.  All of the shares are being offered by ArQule pursuant to an effective shelf registration statement previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC").  In connection with this offering, ArQule has granted a 30-day option to the underwriters to purchase up to 1,050,000 additional shares of common stock at the public offering price to cover over-allotments, if any.
UBS Investment Bank and CIBC World Markets are acting as joint book-running managers for this offering.  Leerink Swann & Company, Fortis Securities LLC and Rodman & Renshaw, LLC are co-managers.
Corp., Attn: USE Prospectus Department, 425 Lexington Avenue, 5 Floor, New York, NY 10017, Toll Free 866-895-5637; or via email to useprospectus@us.cibc.com
Copies of the prospectus supplement may be obtained from UBS Investment Bank, Attn: Prospectus Department, 299 Park Avenue, New York, NY 10171, Toll Free 888-827-7275, or from CIBC World Markets
th
This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any state in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction.
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy
 (ACT).  The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product that mediates its effects by inhibiting the activity of a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Hoffman-La Roche. For more information, please visit
www.arqule.com
.
 
Safe Harbor Statement
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's potential future financing plans, including with respect to the Company's public offering.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could materially impact forward-looking statements, such as market conditions and related risks and the progress of the Company's clinical programs. You should consider the risk factors identified in the preliminary prospectus supplement and accompanying prospectus, and in our SEC filings, including the Forms 10-K and 10-Q and in other SEC filings.  The Company undertakes no obligation to revise or update any forward-looking statements in order to reflect events or circumstances that may arise after the date of this release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070717170715.txt.gz
TIME:20070717170715
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): 
July 12, 2007
 
ARQULE, INC.
(Exact Name of Issuer as Specified in Charter)
 
 
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
(Address of principal executive offices)
 
01801
(Zip code)
 
(781) 994-0300
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
            Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
            Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
            Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b)  On July 12, 2007, the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant"), in accordance with a previously announced transition plan, authorized termination of the consulting arrangement by which Richard H. Woodrich serves as the Registrant's Acting Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer.  The arrangement will terminate August 31, 2007.
(c)  On July 12, 2007, the Board of Directors of the Registrant also designated Peter S. Lawrence, the Registrant's Executive Vice President, Chief Business Officer, General Counsel and Secretary,  as its "principal financial officer"; and Robert J. Weiskopf, the Registrant's Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller, as its "principal accounting officer" for purposes of signing periodic reports and other filings with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, effective September 1, 2007.  Mr. Weiskopf will also serve as the Registrant's Treasurer commencing September 1, 2007.
Mr. Weiskopf (Age: 56) is the Registrant's Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller.  Prior to joining the Registrant in February 2007, he served as a financial consultant to the Registrant for three months.  Before that, Mr. Weiskopf was Chief Financial Officer of Aware Inc. from 2004 until 2006.  Prior to that, Mr. Weiskopf was Director of Finance at Lightbridge, Inc. from 2000 to 2004.  Mr. Weiskopf is a Certified Public Accountant and holds a B.S.B.A. and M.S.B.A. in accounting from the University of Massachusetts at Amherst.
2
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20070806165256.txt.gz
TIME:20070806165256
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 2, 2007, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2007.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
99.1  Text of press release announcing results of operations dated August 2, 2007.
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
August 6, 2007
3

Exhibit 99.1
Contact:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ARQULE REPORTS SECOND QUARTER 2007 FINANCIAL RESULTS
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2007.
Woburn, MA, August 2, 2007 
For the quarter ended June 30, 2007, the Company reported a net loss of $13,361,000 or $0.36 per share, compared with a net loss of $7,574,000, or $0.21 per share, for the second quarter of 2006.  For the six-month period ended June 30, 2007, the Company reported a net loss of $27,865,000, or $0.77 per share, compared to a net loss of $3,288,000, or $0.09 per share, for the six-month period ended June 30, 2006.  Increased losses in the 2007 periods relate primarily to increased research and development costs incurred in connection with clinical trials.
At June 30, 2007, the Company had a total of approximately $151,497,000 in cash and marketable securities.  The Company increased its cash and marketable securities balances during the second quarter through its June, 2007 follow-on offering of 7,000,000 shares of common stock at $7.75 per share that generated net proceeds of $50,489,000 and through the receipt of the second installment of upfront licensing fees amounting to $27,000,000 from Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd. (Kyowa) in connection with a licensing agreement for ARQ 197 in Japan and other Asian territories.  An additional $3,651,000 was received in July, 2007 when the underwriters of the offering exercised their over-allotment option to purchase an additional 502,000 shares of common stock.
The results for the quarter and six-month period ended June 30, 2006 reflect discontinued operations related to the Company's termination of its chemistry services operations on May 22, 2006.  As previously announced, ArQule ceased these operations upon the conclusion of its agreement with Pfizer in May 2006.  All line items discussed below exclude the results of these discontinued operations.
 
Operational Review
"Highlights of a productive second quarter include data presentations at the Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) and the Annual Meeting of the American Association for Cancer Research (AACR), the signing of a strategically significant licensing deal with Kyowa to develop and commercialize ARQ 197 in Asia, and the successful completion of an equity offering that positions us strongly well into 2009," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.
"The ASCO findings were based on Phase 1 data with ARQ 197, a selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, which demonstrated that treatment with ARQ 197 was very well tolerated over extended dosing periods, with 60 percent of patients experiencing partial responses, minor responses or stable disease," said Dr. Hill.  These findings resulted in a recommended Phase 2 dose of 240 milligrams (mg) daily.
"As previously announced, we have preliminarily defined a clinical program that will encompass traditional Phase 2 proof-of-concept studies and Phase 2/3 trial designs that could support accelerated approval," said Dr. Hill.  "The first two studies planned for initiation are a traditional Phase 2 study in pancreatic cancer and a potential accelerated approval study in pediatric soft tissue sarcoma, also known as MiT (microphthalmia transcription factor) tumor.  In both cases we have elected to take advantage of emerging pre-clinical data before finalizing protocols for these studies.
"With regard to the pancreatic protocol, recent xenograft data suggests that ARQ 197 monotherapy may be at least as efficacious as gemcitabine in terms of tumor mass reduction," said Dr. Hill.  "We have therefore decided to refocus our planned pancreatic study into a head-to-head comparison of ARQ 197 versus gemcitabine.  While this has entailed a later submission of the final protocol to regulatory authorities, the overall timelines of the study are likely to be unchanged due to a requirement for lower patient recruitment.  Pending regulatory review in Europe, we anticipate initiation of this study by late October.
"With respect to our planned study in MiT tumors, we have recently acquired a tumor cell line derived directly from patients with this rare form of cancer," said Dr. Hill. "We are currently conducting an in vitro study to determine the inhibitory impact of ARQ 197 on c-Met expression and cell-kill in these tumor cells.  The outcome of this study will allow us to determine the most appropriate clinical endpoint for our planned Phase 2/3 protocol.  In the event of a positive outcome from this in vitro study, we anticipate rapid finalization of the protocol and first patient dosing by the end of October. While this represents a decision to defer the initial patient dosing in this trial, it also allows a more careful determination of study design which may translate into a shorter overall program timeline.
2
 
"Additional indications for both our traditional and potential accelerated approval approaches are currently under development and we expect to announce further details regarding timelines and protocols for the ARQ 197 program in due course," said Dr. Hill.
"As previously announced, we signed an exclusive license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo to develop and commercialize ARQ 197 in Japan and parts of Asia," said Dr. Hill.  "We received the remaining $27,000,000 of a $30,000,000 upfront payment from Kyowa in the second quarter, and we are pleased with Kyowa's commitment to develop this compound in those territories.
"In connection with our follow-on offering in June, we disclosed interim Phase 2 data with ARQ 501, the first-generation product in our E2F-1 Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) program," said Dr. Hill. "These data confirmed the achievement of protocol-defined endpoints in pancreatic cancer and leiomyosarcoma but not in head and neck cancer.  We expect to announce expanded data from these trials later this month.
), and have begun dosing at 760 mg/m. We will continue to report on progress in dose exploration with ARQ 171 in the coming months.
"Under our agreement with Hoffmann-La Roche (Roche), the ARQ 501 Phase 2 data will be included in a package for submission to Roche, along with data from the ongoing Phase 1 dose escalation trial with ARQ 171, our second-generation ACT compound," said Dr. Hill.  "Submission of this data will be predicated upon the completion of the ARQ 171 trial, in which we have successfully completed dosing at 380 milligrams per meter squared (mg/m
2
2
"Finally, our successful follow-on offering, which netted the Company approximately $54,140,000 was made possible by investor interest in our proprietary and highly differentiated product candidates," said Dr. Hill.  "Proceeds from the offering put us in a strong financial position as we move our product candidates forward toward further clinical development milestones."
Revenues and Expenses
The Company reported total revenues of $2,235,000 for the quarter ended June 30, 2007, compared to revenues of $1,652,000 for the second quarter of 2006.  Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2007 were $3,887,000, compared to revenues of $3,304,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2006.Research and development revenue in the 2006 and 2007 quarters related primarily to financial support from Roche related to the Company's ongoing development of products in its E2F cancer therapy program.  The second quarter of 2007 also included revenue from the Kyowa licensing agreement.
 
3
 
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended June 30, 2007 were $16,873,000, compared to $12,333,000 for the second quarter of 2006.  Total costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2007 were $34,087,000, compared to $25,044,000 for the same period in 2006.  Research and development costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2007 were $13,077,000 and $26,781,000, respectively, compared with $9,552,000 and $20,063,000 for the 2006 three and six-month periods.  Increased costs and expenses in 2007 were primarily the result of clinical development and related costs for ARQ 501 and ARQ 197, including three Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501 and a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 197.
General and administrative costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2007 were $3,796,000 and $7,306,000, respectively, compared with $2,781,000 and $4,981,000 for the 2006 three and six-month periods.  The increased 2007 general and administrative expenses were primarily due to an increase in personnel-related expenses, professional fees and facility costs previously absorbed by the Company's chemical services operations that were discontinued in 2006.
Financial Guidance
Primarily as a result of the public offering completed in June, 2007, ArQule is updating guidance for fiscal year 2007 as follows.  The Company expects to end 2007 with between $115 and $120 million in cash and marketable securities, compared with previously announced guidance of between $60 and $65 million.
Revenues are expected to range between $9.0 and $9.5 million as previously announced.  The revenue relates primarily to the partnership with Roche and to revenue from the Kyowa licensing agreement.  Net use of cash from operations is expected to range between $30 and $35 million.   Net loss is still expected to range between $60 and $65 million, and net loss per share to range between $1.50 and $1.62 for the year.
Conference Call and Webcast
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. eastern time today, August 2, 2007.  Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer, and Richard H. Woodrich, acting chief financial officer, will lead the call.
 
4
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for five days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 888-286-8010, and outside the U.S. 617-801-6888.  The access code is 85433704.
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT).  The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product that mediates its effects by inhibiting the activity of a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Hoffman-La Roche. For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, as well as its licensing agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd.  Failure to successfully develop ARQ 197 could prevent the Company from receiving potential future milestone and royalty  payments that could result from the Company's and Kyowa's future development of ARQ 197  Additional forward-looking statements relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including Phase 1 and 2 trials with ARQ 197, Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501 and the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197, ARQ 501 and ARQ 171 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from
5
 
 additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197, ARQ 501 and ARQ 171 are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
6
ArQule, Inc. Condensed Statement of Operations (In Thousands, Except Per Share Amounts)
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20071009205219.txt.gz
TIME:20071009205219
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Section 5 
Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
(c)  On October 4, 2007, ArQule, Inc. ("the Registrant") appointed Peter S. Lawrence (Age: 44) as its Chief Operating Officer. Since April 2006, Mr. Lawrence has served as the Registrant's Executive Vice President, Chief Business and Legal Officer, General Counsel and Secretary ("CBO"). Since September 1, 2007, he has also directed the Registrant's financial and accounting functions and has been responsible for its financial reporting obligations. As Chief Operating Officer, Mr. Lawrence will continue to report to Dr. Stephen A. Hill, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Registrant, and will be principally responsible for the operational aspects of the Registrant's business.
 
Since January 2001, Mr. Lawrence has been a partner in Pod Holding Ltd., a private equity firm he co-founded. Mr. Lawrence serves as a Director on the Board of CoreStreet, Ltd and is also a Board Observer of Paratek Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
 
In connection with his appointment as Chief Operating Officer, the Registrant and Mr. Lawrence amended his employment contract to reflect his new duties and responsibilities and to create certain rights and obligations on the part of the Registrant and Mr. Lawrence if Mr. Lawrence ceases to serve as Chief Operating Officer and is reassigned to his previous position. As part of that amendment, any such reassignment would not be deemed a "termination without Cause," unless the Registrant diminishes or reduces the responsibilities of Mr. Lawrence below his former position as CBO.  In addition, the Registrant granted Mr. Lawrence stock options entitling him to purchase 100,000 shares of the Registrant's common stock pursuant to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan. The options become exercisable at the rate of 25% annually commencing on the anniversary of the date of grant October 4, 2007.  There were no other changes to Mr. Lawrence's employment agreement or his compensation arrangements with the Registrant.
 
The foregoing summary of the material terms of the amendment to Mr. Lawrence's employment agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the amendment which is included as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and to the terms of his employment agreement which was previously filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K dated April 18, 2006 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(e)  On October 4, 2007, the Registrant and Stephen A. Hill, its President and Chief Executive Officer, amended Dr. Hill's employment agreement to provide, in circumstances where Dr. Hill's employment is terminated for any reason other than Cause (as defined in his employment agreement) for continued vesting of existing stock options granted to Dr. Hill pursuant to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Options") and to extend the period for exercise of the Options.
 
If Dr. Hill is terminated for any reason other than Cause (including by his own volition) (i) each of the Options shall continue to vest according to the respective schedules as set forth in the documentation for each separate grant without regard to Dr. Hill's employment status; and (ii)
each Option shall remain exercisable until the earlier of (A) the tenth anniversary of the date of its grant, or (B) June 30, 2011.
 
In addition, the Registrant may terminate Dr. Hill's employment without Cause only upon a minimum of 52 weeks prior written notice. Except as described below, Dr. Hill would not be entitled to the "Severance Package", (as defined in his employment agreement); however, he would continue to receive his base salary during the notice period and shall be eligible, at the discretion of the Registrant's board of directors, to receive an annual cash bonus. He would also receive the employee benefits described in his employment agreement during that notice period.
 
During the notice period, Dr. Hill would not be required to report to work on a regular basis, but would be required to be available for activities on behalf of the Registrant. The payments and benefits to be provided to Dr. Hill during the notice period would cease in the event he obtains other employment or consulting work.
 
If a Change of Control (as defined in the employment agreement) were to occur during the aforementioned notice period and Dr. Hill has not secured new employment or consulting work prior to the date of the Change in Control, then the provisions of his original employment agreement would apply and he would receive his Severance Package.  If the date of a Change of Control occurs during the notice period and he has accepted new employment or consulting work prior to that date, then Dr. Hill would receive only the payments and benefits provided for in the amendment to his employment agreement as described above.
 
The amendment also limits the business activities competitive with those of the Registrant that Dr. Hill may engage in during the calendar year following his termination.
 
The foregoing summary of the material terms of the amendment to Dr. Hill's employment agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the amendment which is included as Exhibit 10.3 hereto and to the terms of his employment agreement filed as Exhibit 10.45 to the Registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
10.1      Amendment to Employment Agreement, dated as of October 4, 2007, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Peter S. Lawrence.  Filed herewith.
 
10.2      Employment Agreement, by and between the Company and Peter S. Lawrence dated April 13, 2006. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K dated April 18, 2006 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
 
10.3      Amendment to Employment Agreement, dated as of October 4, 2007, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Stephen A. Hill.  Filed herewith.
10.4      Employment Agreement by and between the Company and Stephen A Hill, dated January 1, 2004. Filed as Exhibit 10.45 to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003 and incorporated herein by reference.
 
99.1   Text of Press Release announcing the election of Mr. Lawrence October 10, 2007.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
October 9, 2007

Exhibit 10.1
 
This Amendment to Employment Agreement ("Amendment") is entered into by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Peter Lawrence ("Executive") whose current principal residential address is 29 Fairfield Street, Unit 4-5, Boston, MA 02116. The purpose of this Amendment is to amend the Employment Agreement dated as of April 13, 2006 between the Company and Executive (the "Agreement"). This Amendment shall be effective as of
October 4, 2007
.
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to continue to employ and retain Executive in a senior executive capacity and to enter into this Amendment embodying certain changes to the terms of such employment from that which was set forth in the Agreement;
 
WHEREAS, Executive desires to accept such continued employment and enter into such Amendment;
 
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of $1.00, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged by Executive, the Company and Executive hereby agree as follows:
 
All capitalized terms not specifically defined in this Amendment shall have the same meaning herein as in the Agreement (including as in any plans or other documents incorporated by reference into the Agreement).
1.
                                      
Definitions.
 
During the Employment Term, Executive shall serve as Chief Operating Officer, reporting to the Chief Executive Officer ("CEO") of the Company. Executive hereby agrees to undertake the duties and responsibilities inherent in such position and such other duties and responsibilities consistent with such position as the CEO shall from time to time reasonably assign to Executive. Anything in Section 2 of the Agreement which is inconsistent with the terms of this Section shall be of no further effect, subject to the terms of Section 3 below.
2.
                                      
Title; Duties.
 
Notwithstanding anything in the Agreement to the contrary, a "termination without Cause" shall not be deemed to occur pursuant to Section 5.1.2 of the Agreement upon Executive assuming the duties and responsibilities of the Chief Operating Officer ("COO") of the Company. In addition, a "termination without Cause" shall not be deemed to occur pursuant to Section 5.1.2 of the Agreement in the event that the Board, in its sole discretion, reassigns Executive to Executive's former position of Executive Vice President, Chief Business and Legal Officer, General Counsel and Secretary ("CBO"), reporting directly to the Chief Executive Officer, or (ii) the Board, in its sole discretion, without changing Executive's COO title, reduces or diminishes Executive's responsibilities below the level of responsibilities for the Chief Operating Officer position as in existence on the Effective Date of this Amendment, provided that in all cases (including with respect to section (ii) of this paragraph) a "termination without Cause" shall be deemed to occur pursuant to Section 5.1.2 of the Agreement in the event that the Board reduces or diminishes Executive's titles or responsibilities below those of the CBO position that Executive held prior to the Effective Date of this Amendment.  For purposes of clarity, except as expressly provided in this Section, a "termination without Cause" shall be deemed to occur pursuant to Section 5.1.2. of the Agreement in the event that any of the events occur as set forth in Section 5.1.2 (a)  (e) of the Agreement.
3.
                                      
Deemed Termination.
 
Over the course of his employment with the Company, Executive has been granted certain stock options ("Options"), as set forth in the attached Exhibit A, to purchase shares of the Company's Common Stock pursuant to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). It is expressly agreed that Executive has three months from the Termination Date to exercise the Options.
4.
                                      
Existing Stock Options.
 
Subject to approval by the Board of Directors, Executive will be granted a stock option (the "New Option") to purchase 100,000 shares of the Company's Common Stock, pursuant to the Plan and in accordance with the terms, and subject to a vesting schedule pursuant to which twenty-five percent of the shares shall vest annually commencing on the first anniversary of the date of this Amendment, and other conditions, set forth in the form of Option Certificate attached hereto as Exhibit B. The exercise price of the New Option will be set at the closing price of Common Stock of the Company on the date of grant
5.
                                      
New Stock Option Grant.
 
Notwithstanding anything in the Agreement to the contrary, to the extent Executive is a "Specified Employee" as defined in Section 409A(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code on the Termination Date, and in the event that Executive is entitled to payment of the Severance Package upon termination of employment, payment of the Severance Package shall be delayed for six months from the Termination Date or, if earlier, the death of Executive, except that the accelerated vesting of the Execution Stock Option as provided in Section 5.1.1(b) of the Agreement shall not be delayed six months.
6.
                                      
409A Compliance.
 
Any waiver of any terms or conditions of this Amendment shall not operate as a waiver of any other breach of such terms or conditions or any other term or condition, nor shall any failure to enforce any provision hereof operate as a waiver of such provision or of any other provision hereof; provided, however, that no such written waiver, unless it, by its own terms, explicitly provides to the contrary, shall be construed to effect a continuing waiver of the provision being waived and no such waiver in any instance shall constitute a waiver in any other instance or for any other purpose or impair the right of the Party against whom such waiver is claimed in all other instances or for all other purposes to require full compliance with such provision. Each of the Parties agrees to execute all such further instruments and documents and to take all such further action as the other Party may reasonably require in order to effectuate the terms and purposes of this Amendment.
7.
                                      
Waivers and Further Agreements.
 
This Amendment may not be amended, nor shall any waiver, change, modification, consent or discharge be effected except by an instrument in writing executed by both Parties.
8.
                                      
Amendments.
 
In the event that any one or more of the provisions contained herein shall, for any reason, be held to be invalid, illegal, or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability shall not affect any other provision of this Agreement, and all other provisions shall remain in full force and effect. If any provision
9.
                                      
Severability.
 
of this Agreement is held to be excessively broad, it shall be reformed and construed by limiting and reducing it so as to be enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by law.
 
This Amendment maybe executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
10.
                                
Counterparts.
 
The headings contained in this Amendment are for reference purposes only and shall not in any way affect the meaning or interpretation of this Amendment.
11.
                                
Section Headings.
 
This Amendment shall be governed by and construed and enforced in accordance with the law (other than the law governing conflict of law questions) of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
12.
                                
Governing Law.
 
This Amendment constitutes the entire understanding and agreement between the Parties regarding the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter hereof, except that, other than as explicitly modified by the terms of this Amendment, the Agreement shall remain in full force and effect in accordance with its provisions. This Amendment shall be incorporated into the Agreement as an additional provision thereto.
13.
                                
Entire Understanding.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Amendment as of the date set forth above.
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.3
 
This Amendment to Employment Agreement ("Amendment") is entered into by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Stephen A. Hill, M.D. ("Executive") whose current principal residential address is 26 Dole Hill Lane, Boxford, MA 01921. The purpose of this Amendment is to amend the Employment Agreement dated as of January 1, 2004 between the Company and Executive (the "Agreement"). This Amendment shall be effective as of [date].
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to continue to employ and retain Executive in a senior executive capacity and to enter into this Amendment embodying certain changes to the terms of such employment from that which was set forth in the Agreement;
 
WHEREAS, Executive desires to accept such continued employment and enter into such Amendment;
 
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the promises, and the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and in the Agreement, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive hereby agree as follows:
 
All capitalized terms not specifically defined in this Amendment shall have the same meaning herein as in the Agreement (including as in any plans or other documents incorporated by reference into the Agreement).
14.
                                
Definitions.
 
Over the course of his employment with the Company, Executive has been granted certain stock options ("Options"), as set forth in the attached Exhibit A, to purchase shares of the Company's Common Stock pursuant to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Subject to appropriate approvals by the Company's Board of Directors, the terms and conditions of Executive's Options shall be modified as follows:
15.
                                
Stock Options.
 
Notwithstanding anything in the Plan, the Agreement or any other agreement concerning any of the Options to the contrary, in the event that Executive's employment with the Company is terminated (including by Executive) for any reason other than Cause, all of Executive's Options, to the extent unvested as of the Termination Date, shall continue to vest according to the schedule set forth in each separate Option grant, without regard to Executive's employment status, and any agreement or terms and conditions with respect to such Options shall be amended accordingly.
a.
                                      
Continued vesting of Options in the event of a termination other than for Cause.
 
Notwithstanding anything in the Plan, the Agreement or any other agreement concerning any of the Options to the contrary, in the event that
b.
                                     
Extension of period to exercise Options in the event of a termination other than for Cause.
 
Executive's employment with the Company is terminated (including by Executive) for any reason other than Cause, each Option shall remain fully exercisable until the sooner of (i) the tenth anniversary of the date of grant of that Option; or (ii) June 30, 2011. Any agreement or terms and conditions with respect to such Options shall be amended accordingly. The Company and Executive hereby acknowledge and agree that, to the extent any of the Options were granted as incentive stock options ("ISOs") within the meaning of the Internal Revenue Code, the extension of time for Executive to exercise the Options as provided in this Section will be treated as a modification of such Options for ISO purposes. It is expressly agreed that, except as expressly provided in this Amendment, Executive has three months from the Termination Date to exercise the Options.
 
Notwithstanding anything in the Agreement to the contrary, and except as expressly provided below, the Company may terminate Executive's employment at any time without Cause pursuant to Section 5.1.1 of the Agreement only upon not less than 52 weeks prior written notice from the Company to Executive (the "Notice Period"), provided that the Company shall retain its rights to terminate Executive's employment for Cause during the Notice Period. In addition, Executive shall not be entitled to the Severance Package in the event of a termination without Cause. However, during the Notice Period, Executive shall continue to receive his regular Base Salary and shall remain eligible to receive a discretionary annual cash bonus based on a target amount (either as a percentage or a fixed dollar amount) established by the Board and based on Company performance. Bonus compensation awarded to Executive during the Notice Period, if any, shall be at the Board's sole discretion. In addition, Executive shall continue to be eligible to receive benefits as set forth in Section 4.3 of the Agreement, subject to the terms and conditions of the applicable benefit plans and policies, during the Notice Period. Executive shall not be required to report to work on a regular basis during the Notice Period, but shall be required to be available for activities on behalf of the Company upon request from, and at the discretion of, the Board. The payments and benefits to be provided to Executive during the Notice Period pursuant to this Section shall cease in the event Executive obtains other employment or consulting work. Notwithstanding anything in this Section to the contrary, in the event the Company terminates Executive's employment without Cause at any time within one (1) year following the latest possible date of a Change in Control, as that term is defined in the Agreement, the terms of this Section shall not apply, but rather any such termination shall be governed by Sections 5.1.1 and 5.1.3 of the Agreement. For purposes of clarity, in the event that the latest possible date of a Change of Control, as that term is defined in the Agreement, occurs during the Notice Period and Executive has not secured new employment or consulting work prior to the last possible date of the Change in Control, then the provisions of Sections 5.1.1 and 5.1.3 of the Agreement shall apply (Executive's Termination Date shall be deemed to be 14 days after the latest possible date of the Change in Control)  and the provisions of this Section shall not apply; however, in the event that the latest possible date of a Change of Control occurs during the Notice Period and Executive already has accepted new employment or consulting work prior to the last possible date of the Change in Control,
16.
                                
Notice of termination without Cause.
 
then Sections 5.1.1 and 5.1.3 of the Agreement shall not apply, and Executive shall receive only the payments and benefits provided for in this Section.
 
17.
                                
Non-Competition.
 
For purposes of this Section 4, "Competitive Activity" shall mean engaging or planning to engage in any business or enterprise concerning E2F1 Checkpoint Activation, Kinase Inhibitors and/or c-MET Inhibitors, whether as an owner, member, manager, partner, officer, employee, director, investor, lender, consultant, independent contractor or otherwise (except as the holder of not more than 1% percent of the combined voting power of the outstanding stock of a publicly held company), provided that, except as set forth in the last sentence of this Section 4(a), it shall not be a violation of this Section for Executive to accept employment with any entity which engages in a business or enterprise concerning E2F1 Checkpoint Activation, Kinase Inhibitors and/or c-MET Inhibitors if at least one level of executive management exists within such entity between Executive and any E2F1 Checkpoint Activation, Kinase Inhibitors and/or c-MET Inhibitors program and/or line of business. For purposes of this Section, Executive shall be deemed to be engaging in Competitive Activity as of the date that Executive accepts employment or consulting engagement with any other person or entity, regardless of when Executive actually begins providing services under such employment or consulting engagement. Notwithstanding anything in this Amendment to the contrary, Executive shall be deemed to be engaging in Competitive Activity in the event he accepts employment and/or consulting work with any of the following entities:  Exelixis, Aveo, Supergen, Methylgene or SGX.
a.
                                      
 
If at any time within one (1) year following the Termination Date Executive engages or prepares to engage in any Competitive Activity, then Executive acknowledges and agrees that such action would cause irreparable damage to the Company and that, in the event of such action, the Company shall be entitled, in addition to the remedies listed below and any other remedies available to the Company under this Amendment, the Agreement or at law, to equitable relief, including injunctive relief, and to payment by Executive of all costs incurred by the Company in enforcing the provisions of this Amendment, including reasonable attorneys fees.
b.
                                     
 
If at any time Executive engages or prepares to engage in any Competitive Activity, or if Executive materially breaches Section 6 of the Agreement or Section 1 of the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement at any time, then, notwithstanding any provision of this Amendment to the contrary,and in addition any other remedies available to the Company under this Amendment, the Agreement or at law, all unvested Options shall lapse and shall not vest further and Executive shall have the shorter of (i) ninety (90) days from the date of first engaging in Competitive Activity or (ii) the remaining term of the applicable Option, to exercise any vested portion(s) of the Options. Executive shall provide written notice to the Company as provided in Section 8 of the Agreement that he
c.
                                      
 
is engaging in Competitive Activity within one business day of first engaging in Competitive Activity. In the event Executive fails to provide timely notice, Executive shall be required to repay the Company for any and all net, after-tax gains realized from the sale of any Options that either would not have vested or would have not been exercisable as of the date Executive exercises the Options had Executive provided timely notice, and Executive shall pay all costs incurred by the Company in enforcing the provisions of this Amendment, including reasonable attorneys fees.
 
Executive acknowledges that the restrictions contained in this Section are necessary for the protection of the business and goodwill of the Company and are reasonable for such purpose.
d.
                                     
 
The terms of this Section shall not limit, and shall not in any way affect, Executive's obligations concerning the non-use and non-disclosure of the Company's Confidential Information, including those set forth in the Agreement and in the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement.
e.
                                      
 
As an express condition of the benefits to be provided under this Agreement, Executive agrees to execute and be bound by the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement attached hereto as Exhibit B.
18.
                                
Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement.
 
The provisions of Section 2 of this Amendment will be implemented as to comply with Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code regarding deferred compensation, such that the eventual exercise of any Option will not be deemed to represent deferred compensation under Section 409A. Notwithstanding anything in the Agreement to the contrary, to the extent Executive is a "Specified Employee" as defined in Section 409A(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code on the Termination Date, and in the event that Executive is entitled to payment of the Severance Package upon termination of employment, payment of the Severance Package shall be delayed for six months from the Termination Date or, if earlier, the death of Executive.
19.
                                
409A Compliance.
 
Executive acknowledges that a breach of the provisions of Section 4 and/or Section 5 of this Agreement shall constitute Cause to terminate his employment with the Company pursuant to Section 5.2 of the Agreement.
20.
                                
Cause.
 
Executive represents and warrants that the Company has provided him no advice as to this Amendment and/or the Agreement, including but not limited to the tax implications of the Amendment and/or the Agreement. Executive has been advised to consult his own counsel and/or personal tax advisor.
21.
                                
No Advice.
 
Any waiver of any terms or conditions of this Amendment shall not operate as a waiver of any other breach of such terms or conditions or any other term or condition, nor shall any failure to enforce any provision hereof operate as a waiver of such provision or of any other provision hereof; provided, however, that no such written waiver, unless it, by its own terms, explicitly provides to the contrary, shall be construed to effect a continuing waiver of the provision being
22.
                                
Waivers and Further Agreements.
 
waived and no such waiver in any instance shall constitute a waiver in any other instance or for any other purpose or impair the right of the Party against whom such waiver is claimed in all other instances or for all other purposes to require full compliance with such provision. Each of the Parties agrees to execute all such further instruments and documents and to take all such further action as the other Party may reasonably require in order to effectuate the terms and purposes of this Amendment.
 
This Amendment may not be amended, nor shall any waiver, change, modification, consent or discharge be effected except by an instrument in writing executed by both Parties.
23.
                                
Amendments.
 
In the event that any one or more of the provisions contained herein shall, for any reason, be held to be invalid, illegal, or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability shall not affect any other provision of this Agreement, and all other provisions shall remain in full force and effect. If any provision of this Agreement is held to be excessively broad, it shall be reformed and construed by limiting and reducing it so as to be enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by law.
24.
                                
Severability.
 
This Amendment maybe executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
25.
                                
Counterparts.
 
The headings contained in this Amendment are for reference purposes only and shall not in any way affect the meaning or interpretation of this Amendment.
26.
                                
Section Headings.
 
This Amendment shall be governed by and construed and enforced in accordance with the law (other than the law governing conflict of law questions) of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
27.
                                
Governing Law.
 
This Amendment, including its Exhibits, constitutes the entire understanding and agreement between the Parties regarding the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter hereof, except that, other than as explicitly modified by the terms of this Amendment, the Agreement shall remain in full force and effect in accordance with its provisions. This Amendment shall be incorporated into the Agreement as an additional provision thereto.
28.
                                
Entire Understanding.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Amendment as of the date set forth above.
 
 
 
In consideration of the benefits to be provided to me by ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation, and its successors, subsidiaries, and affiliates (collectively, the "Company"), and for other valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, I agree as follows:
 
1.
            
Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials
 
I understand that the Company continually obtains and develops valuable proprietary and confidential information concerning its business, business relationships, and financial affairs (as further defined below, the "Confidential Information") and valuable Proprietary Materials (as defined below) which may become known to me in connection with my employment.
 
I acknowledge that all Proprietary Materials and all Confidential Information are and shall remain the exclusive property of the Company or of the third party providing such Proprietary Materials or Confidential Information to me or the Company. By way of illustration, but not limitation, Confidential Information may include Inventions (as defined below), trade secrets, technical information, know-how, research and development activities of the Company, product and marketing plans, customer and supplier information, and information disclosed to the Company or to me by third parties of a proprietary or confidential nature or under an obligation of confidence. Confidential Information is contained in various media, including without limitation, patent applications, computer programs in object and/or source code, flow charts and other program documentation, manuals, plans, drawings, designs, technical specifications, laboratory notebooks, supplier and customer information, internal financial data, and other documents and records of the Company, whether or not in writing and whether or not labeled or identified as confidential or proprietary. As used in this Agreement "Proprietary Materials" shall include, without limitation: any and all reagents, substances, chemical compounds, subcellular constituents, cells or cell lines, organisms and progeny, and mutants, as well as any and all derivatives or replications derived from or relating to such materials.
 
I agree that I shall not, during the term of my employment and thereafter, publish, disclose, or otherwise make available to any third party, other than employees of the Company, any Confidential Information or Proprietary Materials except as expressly authorized in writing by the Company. I agree that I shall use such Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials only in the performance of my duties for the Company and in accordance with any Company policies regarding the protection of Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials. I agree not to use such Confidential Information or Proprietary Materials for my own benefit or for the benefit of any person or business entity other than the Company.
 
I agree to exercise all reasonable precautions to protect the integrity and confidentiality of Confidential Information and Proprietary Materials in my possession. I further agree not to remove any Proprietary Materials or materials containing Confidential Information from the Company's premises except to the extent necessary to my employment. Upon the termination of
 
my employment, or at any time upon the Company's request, I shall return immediately to the Company any and all Proprietary Materials and any materials containing any Confidential Information then in my possession or under my control.
 
Confidential Information shall not include information that (a) is or becomes generally known within the Company's industry through no fault of mine; (b) was known to me at the time it was disclosed as evidenced by my written records at the time of disclosure; or (c) is lawfully and in good faith made available to me by a third party who did not derive it from the Company and who imposes no obligation of confidence on me.
 
2.
                                    
Assignment of Inventions
 
I agree promptly to disclose to the Company any and all ideas, concepts, discoveries, inventions, developments, original works of authorship, software programs, software and systems documentation, trade secrets, technical data, know-how, and Proprietary Materials that relate, directly or indirectly, to the business of the Company or that arise out of my employment with the Company and that are conceived, devised, invented, developed, or reduced to practice or tangible medium by me, under my direction, or jointly by me and others during any period that I am employed or engaged by the Company, whether or not during normal working hours or on the premises of the Company ("Inventions").
 
I hereby assign to the Company all of my right, title, and interest to the Inventions and any and all related patent rights, copyrights, and applications and registrations for such patent rights and copyrights. During and after my employment, I shall cooperate with the Company, at the Company's expense, in obtaining proprietary protection for the Inventions and I shall execute all documents that the Company shall reasonably request in order to perfect the Company's rights in the Inventions. I hereby appoint the Company my attorney to execute and deliver any such documents on my behalf in the event I should fail or refuse to do so within a reasonable period of time following the Company's request. I understand that, to the extent this Agreement shall be construed in accordance with the laws of any state that limits the assignability to the Company of certain employee inventions, this Agreement shall be interpreted not to apply to any such invention that a court rules or the Company agrees is subject to such state limitation.
 
I further represent that the attached contains a complete list of all inventions made, conceived, or first reduced to practice by me, under my direction, or jointly by me and others prior to my employment with the Company ("Prior Inventions") and that are not assigned to the Company under the terms of this Agreement. If there are no Prior Inventions listed in , I represent that there are no such Prior Inventions.
Schedule A
Schedule A
 
3.
                                      
Miscellaneous
 
This Agreement may be assigned by the Company to (a) any entity controlled by, controlling or under common control with the Company or (b) to any successor of its business to which this Agreement relates (whether by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise). I may not assign or transfer any of my rights or obligations under this Agreement. This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the parties and their respective successors
 
and other legal representatives, including, to the extent permitted by the terms of this Agreement, their assignees.
 
This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter of this Agreement. This Agreement may be changed only by a written instrument signed by both parties.
 
In the event that any one or more of the provisions contained in this Agreement shall, for any reason, be held to be invalid, illegal, or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability shall not affect any other provisions of this Agreement, and all other provisions shall remain in full force and effect. If any of the provisions of this Agreement is held to be excessively broad, it shall be reformed and construed by limiting and reducing it so as to be enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by law. I agree that should I violate any obligation imposed on me in this Agreement, I shall continue to be bound by the obligation until a period equal to the term of such obligation has expired without violation of such obligation.
 
No delay or omission by the Company in exercising any right under this Agreement will operate as a waiver of that or any other right. A waiver or consent given by the Company on any occasion is effective only in that instance and will not be construed as a bar to or waiver of any right on any other occasion.
 
I acknowledge that the restrictions contained in this Agreement are necessary for the protection of the business and goodwill of the Company and are reasonable for such purpose. I agree that any breach of this Agreement by me will cause irreparable damage to the Company and that in the event of such breach, the Company shall be entitled, in addition to monetary damages and to any other remedies available to the Company under this Agreement and at law, to equitable relief, including injunctive relief, and to payment by myself of all costs incurred by the Company in enforcing the provisions of this Agreement, including reasonable attorneys fees.
 
This Agreement shall be construed as a sealed instrument and shall in all events and for all purposes be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts without regard to any choice of law principle that would dictate the application of the laws of another jurisdiction. Any action, suit, or other legal proceeding I may commence in order to resolve any matter arising under or relating to any provision of this Agreement shall be commenced only in a court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts (or, if appropriate, a federal court located within Massachusetts), and I hereby consent to the jurisdiction of such court with respect to any action, suit, or proceeding commenced in such court by the Company.
 
 
I HAVE READ ALL OF THE PROVISIONS OF THIS AGREEMENT AND I UNDERSTAND, AND AGREE TO, EACH OF SUCH PROVISIONS.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Contact:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced that Peter S. Lawrence has been appointed chief operating officer. Mr. Lawrence was previously executive vice president, chief business officer and general counsel of ArQule. He will continue to report to Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of the Company.
Woburn, MA, October 8, 2007 
 
"I am extremely pleased to announce Peter Lawrence's new position at ArQule," said Dr. Hill. "ArQule has successfully evolved into a sustainable, oncology-focused research and development company, and Peter's contributions, including the negotiation of an Asian partnership for ARQ 197 with Kyowa Hakko, have been instrumental in this regard. Our products are continuing to advance in the clinic, and as we have begun to pursue further growth as an oncology therapeutics company, he has been taking on increased operational responsibilities. This appointment therefore recognizes his success and formalizes his focus in this area."
 
Prior to ArQule, Mr. Lawrence was a general partner of Pod Holding Ltd., a $100 million international venture capital firm in Boston of which he was a founding partner in 2001. Previously, Mr. Lawrence was a partner at Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., where he practiced from 1991 to 2001. Mr. Lawrence worked at Gaston & Snow from 1989 to 1991, in the firm's Corporate Law Department. He holds a Bachelor's degree from Amherst College and a J.D. from Boston University School of Law.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics. The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy
 (ACT). The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product that mediates its effects by inhibiting the activity of a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in
 
cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis. The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Hoffman-La Roche. For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20071102162425.txt.gz
TIME:20071102162425
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02.  Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 1, 2007, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2007.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1  Text of press release announcing results of operations dated November 1, 2007.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
November 2, 2007

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
For Immediate Release:
 
ARQULE ANNOUNCES THIRD QUARTER FISCAL 2007 RESULTS
Phase 2 trials underway with ARQ 197, c-Met inhibitor
Conference call scheduled today at 9 a.m. eastern time
 
Woburn, Mass., November 1, 2007
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today reported its results of operations for the fiscal quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2007.
 
The Company reported a net loss of $11,118,000, or $0.26 per share, for the quarter ended September 30, 2007, compared to a net loss of $15,322,000, or $0.43 per share, for the quarter ended September 30, 2006.  For the nine-month period ended September 30, 2007, the Company reported a net loss of $38,983,000, or $1.00 per share, compared to a net loss of $18,610,000, or $0.52 per share, for the same period in 2006.
 
At September 30, 2007, the Company had a total of approximately $143,492,000 in cash and marketable securities.  During July, 2007, the Company received net proceeds of $3,632,000 when the underwriters of the Company's June, 2007 offering of 7,000,000 shares exercised their over-allotment option to purchase an additional 502,000 shares of common stock.
 
The results for the nine-month period ended September 30, 2006 reflect discontinued operations related to the Company's termination of its chemistry services business on May 26, 2006.  As previously announced, ArQule exited this business upon the conclusion of its agreement with Pfizer in May 2006.  All line items discussed below exclude the results of these discontinued operations.
 
ARQ 197 Highlights
 
"I am pleased to report that we have initiated the first Phase 2 trials with ARQ 197, in pancreatic cancer and MiT (micropthalmia transcription factor) tumors," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.  "Pending further regulatory discussions, we plan to initiate trials in additional indications through the first half of 2008.
 
"Our Phase 2 program with ARQ 197 is expected to include a number of trials that represent four basic therapeutic approaches," said Dr. Hill.  "The first approach will be to shrink primary
tumors in which over-expression of c-Met appears to be important.   The second will be to prevent or reduce metastases frequently observed during the course of disease.  The third approach will be to delay or prevent the onset of resistance to anti-cancer therapy.
 
"Finally, we are pursuing a set of tumors driven by the micropthalmia transcription factor," said Dr. Hill.  "In the majority of these patients, a single chromosomal translocation drives the over-expression of c-Met and consequently renders them highly sensitive to c-Met inhibition.  We have demonstrated that ARQ 197 is highly effective in killing cells cultured from these tumors.
 
"In connection with demonstrating c-Met inhibition in humans, we have analyzed data from the first patients in our human tissue biopsy study at the Royal Marsden Hospital in London," said Dr. Hill, "and I am pleased to report that following a single oral dose of 100 milligrams of ARQ 197, we have confirmed the suppression of phospho-c-Met in tissue samples that contained significant over-expression of this phosphoprotein.
 
"Clinical and pre-clinical findings related to the anti-metastatic potential of ARQ 197 were presented last week at the 2007 AACR-NCI-EORTC International Conference," said Dr. Hill.  "Following initial observations by Phase 1 clinical investigators described earlier this year, further analyses have been conducted based on independently read patient scans, showing that 18 of 19 patients treated with ARQ 197 for 12 weeks or longer did not develop detectable new metastatic lesions.  Five of 7 patients treated for 7 to 12 weeks did not develop detectable new metastatic lesions, while in contrast, 11 of 19 patients treated for six weeks or less did develop such lesions.
 
"Pre-clinical findings were presented at the conference from an animal model of human breast cancer in mice, showing that ARQ 197-treated mice experienced a significant reduction in the number of metastatic nodules in bone when compared with a control group," said Dr. Hill.  "We view these anti-metastatic data as preliminary but supportive of a viable hypothesis that requires further exploration in Phase 2 trials.
 
E2F-1 Program
 
"Moving on to our E2F-1 program, survival data available as of late September, 2007 from the Phase 2 pancreatic cancer trial indicate an increase in survival times for patients treated with ARQ 501-gemcitabine combination therapy over historical data with gemcitabine alone," said Dr. Hill.  "This interim analysis will be updated based on final data expected to be available before year-end.
 
"We are still exploring ways to reduce the incidence of hemolytic anemia requiring transfusions, which affects more than 50 percent of patients treated with ARQ 501," said Dr. Hill.  "These efforts include the ongoing clinical development of our second-generation E2F-1 compound, ARQ 171, and the pre-clinical development of ARQ 761, a modification of ARQ 501.
 
 
 
Eg5 Program
 
"As a result of our drug discovery efforts, we have selected ARQ 621, a specific Eg5 inhibitor discovered and characterized by our scientists, as a candidate for the initiation of formal GLP toxicology testing which if positive would lead to the submission of an IND (Investigational New Drug application)," said Dr. Hill.
 
Operational Review
 
The Company reported total revenues of $2,736,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2007, compared to revenues of $1,652,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2006.  Revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2007 were $6,623,000, compared to revenues of $4,956,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2006.
 
Research and development revenues in both the 2007 and 2006 periods related primarily to financial support from Hoffmann-La Roche for the Company's ongoing development of products in its E2F cancer therapy program.  The second and third quarters of 2007 also included revenue from the Kyowa licensing agreement.
 
For the quarter ended September 30, 2007, the Company reported total costs and expenses of $15,885,000, compared to total costs and expenses of $18,299,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2006.  Total costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2007 were $49,972,000, compared to $43,343,000 for the same period in 2006.
 
Research and development costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2007 were $12,529,000 and $39,310,000, respectively, compared with $14,944,000 and $35,007,000 for the 2006 three and nine-month periods.
 
The $2,415,000 decrease in research and development expense in the third quarter of 2007 compared with the prior year's quarter was primarily due to $5,058,000 in lower costs for the Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501.  This decrease was partially offset by a $2,688,000 increase in costs for the Phase 1 trial and preparation for Phase 2 trials with ARQ 197.
 
The $4,303,000 increase in research and development expense in the first nine months of 2007 compared with the prior year's nine month period was primarily due to a $5,953,000 increase in costs for Phase 1 trials and preparation for Phase 2 trials with ARQ 197, and $4,569,000 of costs incurred in conjunction with the Company's sponsored research agreement with Boston Biomedical Institute (BBI). These increases were offset in part by $5,622,000 in lower costs for Phase 1 and 2 trials with ARQ 501.
 
General and administrative costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2007 were $3,356,000 and $10,662,000, respectively, compared with $3,355,000 and $8,336,000 for the 2006 three and nine-month periods.  The increased 2007 general and administrative expenses in the nine-month period were primarily due to an increase in personnel-related expenses, professional fees and facility costs previously absorbed by the Company's chemical services operations that were discontinued in 2006.
 
ArQule Updates Financial Guidance
 
For 2007, as previously announced, ArQule expects total revenues for the year to range between $9,000,000 and $9,500,000, primarily related to the partnership with Roche and to the Kyowa licensing agreement.  Net use of cash from operations is now expected to range between $20,000,000 and $25,000,000, a decrease from the previous range of between $30,000,000 and $35,000,000.  Net loss is expected to range between $50,000,000 and $55,000,000, and net loss per share is expected to range between $1.25 and $1.35 for the year.
 
ArQule therefore expects to end 2007 with between $125,000,000 and $130,000,000 in cash and marketable securities, an increase from the previous range of between $115,000,000 and $120,000,000.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m.
 
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning at 11:00 a.m. today for five days and can be accessed by dialing 1-888-286-8010 from the U.S. and Canada, and 1-617-801-6888 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is 71932777.
 
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT).  The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product that mediates its effects by inhibiting the activity of a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  The lead product from this program, ARQ 197, is licensed in Japan and other select Asian countries to Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd.  The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The
Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Hoffmann-La Roche. For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition.  Additional forward-looking statements relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including Phase 1 and 2 trials with ARQ 197, Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501 and the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171, as well as certain pre-clinical candidates, including ARQ 761 and ARQ 621
.
   These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197, ARQ 501 and ARQ 171 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or pre-clinical development or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197, ARQ 501 and ARQ 171, as well as the planned timing and initiation of pre-clinical activities with ARQ 761 and ARQ 621, are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20071119165353.txt.gz
TIME:20071119165353
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
                          
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
                          
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
                          
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          
 
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
 
On November 13, 2007, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") amended Article IV Section 1 (regarding Certificates of Stock), Section 2 (regarding Transfers of Shares of Stock) and Section 3 (regarding Lost Certificates) of the Registrant's Amended and Restated Bylaws ("Bylaws") in order to enable the Registrant to comply with Nasdaq Stock Market Marketplace Rule 4350(l) (the "Direct Registration Rule"). The Direct Registration Rule requires Nasdaq-listed securities (such as the Registrant's common stock) to be eligible on and after January 1, 2008 for a direct registration program operated by a clearing agency registered under Section 17A of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. A direct registration program is a system for book-entry ownership of stock or other securities, in which shares are owned, recorded and transferred electronically without issuance of a physical share certificate. Because the Registrant's Bylaws previously required that each stockholder was entitled to a physical share certificate, the Registrant's Board determined that, in order for the Registrant to be able to comply with the Direct Registration Rule, it was necessary and appropriate to amended the Registrant's Bylaws to provide stockholders the ability to have uncertified shares.
 
The amendments permit the Board, by vote, to provide that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock may be represented by uncertificated shares. The Bylaws continue to permit shareholders to obtain a physical stock certificate upon request. On November 13, 2007, the Board also voted to authorize the issuance of shares of common stock without certificates.
 
The description of the amended provisions of the Bylaws set forth herein does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the ByLaws attached hereto as Exhibit 3.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
3.1     Amended and Restated Bylaws of ArQule, Inc. Filed  herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
 
AMENDED AND RESTATED
. All meetings of stockholders shall be held at the principal office of the corporation or at such other place as may be named in the notice.
SECTION 1.
                               
Place of Meetings
 
. The annual meeting of stockholders for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may properly come before the meeting shall be held on such date and at such hour and place as the directors or an officer designated by the directors may determine. If the annual meeting is not held on the date designated therefor, the directors shall cause the meeting to be held as soon thereafter as convenient.
SECTION 2.
                               
Annual Meeting
 
. Special meetings of the stockholders may be called at any time by the President or a majority of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 3.
                               
Special Meetings
 
. Except where some other notice is required by law, written notice of each meeting of stockholders, stating the place, date and hour thereof and the purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given by the Secretary under the direction of the Board of Directors or the President, not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date fixed for such meeting, to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting. Notice shall be given personally to each stockholder or left at his or her residence or usual place of business or mailed postage prepaid and addressed to the stockholder at his or her address as it appears upon the records of the corporation. In case of the death, absence, incapacity or refusal of the Secretary, such notice may be given by a person designated either by the Secretary or by the person or persons calling the meeting or by the Board of Directors. A waiver of such notice in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to said notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to such notice. Attendance of a person at a meeting of stockholders shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the stockholders need be specified in any written waiver of notice. Except as required by statute, notice of any adjourned meeting of the stockholders shall not be required.
SECTION 4.
                               
Notice of Meetings
 
. The Board of Directors may fix in advance a record date for the determination of the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of
SECTION 5.
                               
Record Date
any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action. Such record date shall not be more than 60 nor less than 10 days before the date of such meeting, nor more than 60 days before any other action to which such record date relates. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day before the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day before the day on which the meeting is held, and the record date for determining stockholders for any other purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating to such purpose. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
SECTION 6.           . Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the following procedures shall be eligible for election as directors at any annual or special meeting of stockholders. Nominations of persons for election as directors may be made only by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or by any stockholder entitled to vote for the election of directors at the meeting in compliance with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 6. Such nominations, other than those made by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, shall be made pursuant to timely notice in writing to the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President or the Secretary. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation by the close of business on the Advance Notice Date. For the purposes of these by-laws, the "Advance Notice Date" shall be one of the following:
Nomination of Directors
 
(a) in the case of an annual meeting only, the date 75 days before the anniversary date of the prior year's meeting, if (i) there was an annual meeting in the prior year and (ii) the date of the current year's annual meeting is not more than 30 days before or after the anniversary date of the prior year's annual meeting; or
 
(b) if clause (a) does not apply, the date 45 days prior to the date of the current year's annual meeting or a special meeting if at least 60 days' notice or prior public disclosure of the date of the current year's annual meeting or the special meeting is given or made; or
 
(c) if neither clause (a) nor clause (b) applies, the date 15 days after the day on which notice of the date of the current year's annual meeting or the special meeting was mailed or public disclosure was made.
 
Such stockholder's notice shall set forth (a) as to each person whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a director, (i) the name, age, business address and residence address of the person, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of the person, (iii) the class and number of shares of capital stock of the corporation that are beneficially owned by the person and (iv) any other information relating to the person that is required to be disclosed in solicitations for proxies for election of directors pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or any successor provision thereto; and (b) as to the
stockholder giving the notice, (i) the name and record address of such stockholder and (ii) the class and number of shares of capital stock of the corporation that are beneficially owned by such stockholder.
 
The chairman of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the foregoing procedure, and if the chairman should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
 
SECTION 7.           . At any annual meeting of the stockholders, only such business shall be conducted as shall have been properly brought before the meeting. To be brought properly before an annual meeting, business must be either (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the President or the Board of Directors, (b) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder. In addition to any other applicable requirements, for business to be brought properly before an annual meeting by a stockholder, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President or the Secretary. To be timely, a stockholder's notice must be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation by the close of business on the Advance Notice Date as defined in Section 6 of Article I hereof. A stockholder's notice shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and record address of the stockholder proposing such business, (c) the class and number of shares of the corporation that are beneficially owned by the stockholder and (d) any material interest of the stockholder in such business.
Advance Notice of Business at Annual Meetings
 
Notwithstanding anything in these by-laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at the annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 7, , , that nothing in this Section 7 shall be deemed to preclude discussion by any stockholder of any business properly brought before the annual meeting in accordance with said procedure.
provided
however
 
The chairman of an annual meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the foregoing procedure, and if the chairman should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
 
. The officer who has charge of the stock ledger of the corporation shall prepare and make or have made, at least 10 days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Nothing contained in this section shall require the corporation to include electronic mail addresses or other electronic contact information on such list. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder for any purpose germane to the meeting for a period of at least 10 days prior to the meeting: (i) on a reasonably accessible
SECTION 8.
                               
Voting List
 
electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of the meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours, at the principal place of business of the corporation. In the event that the corporation determines to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is available only to stockholders of the corporation. If the meeting is to be held at a place, then the list shall be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present. If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, then the list shall also be open to the examination of any stockholder during the whole time of the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access such list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting. The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled by this section to examine the stock ledger, the list required by this section or the books and records of the corporation or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.(1)
 
. At any meeting of the stockholders, the holders of a majority in interest of all stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote upon a question to be considered at the meeting, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum for the consideration of such question, but in the absence of a quorum a smaller group may adjourn any meeting from time to time. When a quorum is present at any meeting, a majority of the votes properly cast shall, except where a different vote is required by law, by the Certificate of Incorporation or by these by-laws, decide any question brought before such meeting. Any election by stockholders shall be determined by a plurality of the vote cast by the stockholders entitled to vote at the election.
SECTION 9.
                               
Quorum of Stockholders
 
SECTION 10.         . Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, each stockholder shall at every meeting of the stockholders be entitled to one vote in person or by proxy for each share of the capital stock held of record by such stockholder, but no proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless said proxy provides for a longer period. Persons holding stock in a fiduciary capacity shall be entitled to vote the shares so held, and persons whose stock is pledged shall be entitled to vote unless in the transfer by the pledgor on the books of the corporation the pledgee shall have been expressly empowered to vote thereon, in which case only the pledgee or the pledgee's proxy may represent said stock and vote thereon. Shares of the capital stock of the corporation belonging to the corporation or to another corporation, a majority of whose shares entitled to vote in the election of directors is owned by the corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes.
Proxies and Voting
 
SECTION 11.         . Meetings of the stockholders shall be presided over by one of the following officers in the order specified and if present and acting:  the Chairman of the Board, if any, the Vice Chairman of the Board, if any, the President, a Vice-President (and, in the event there be more than one person in any such office, in the order of their seniority), or, if none of the foregoing is in office and present and acting, a chairman designated by the Board of Directors or, in the absence of such designation, a chairman chosen by the stockholders at the meeting. The Secretary of the corporation, if present, or an Assistant Secretary, shall act as
Conduct of Meeting
 
(1) Section 8 of Article I was amended by the Board of Directors of the corporation on March 22, 2007.
 
secretary of every meeting, but if neither the Secretary nor an Assistant Secretary is present the chairman of the meeting shall appoint a secretary of the meeting.
 
The Board of Directors may adopt such rules, regulations and procedures for the conduct of the meeting of stockholders as it shall deem appropriate. Except to the extent inconsistent with such rules and regulations as adopted by the Board of Directors, the chairman of the meeting shall have the right and authority to prescribe such rules, regulations and procedures and to do all such acts as, in the judgment of such chairman, are appropriate for the proper conduct of the meeting. Such rules, regulations or procedures, whether adopted by the Board of Directors or prescribed by the chairman of the meeting, may include, without limitation, (i) the establishment of an agenda or order of business for the meeting, (ii) rules and procedures for maintaining order at the meeting and the safety of those present, (iii) limitations on attendance at or participation in the meeting to stockholders of record of the corporation, their duly authorized and constituted proxies or such other persons as the chairman of the meeting shall determine, (iv) restrictions on entry to the meeting after the time fixed for the commencement thereof, and (v) limitations on the time allotted to questions or comments by participants. Unless and to the extent determined by the Board of Directors or the chairman of the meeting, meetings of stockholders shall not be required to be held in accordance with the rules of parliamentary procedure.
 
. The business and affairs of the corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of a Board of Directors, who may exercise all of the powers of the corporation that are not by law required to be exercised by the stockholders. In the event of a vacancy in the Board of Directors, the remaining directors, except as otherwise provided by law, may exercise the powers of the full Board until the vacancy is filled.
SECTION 1.
                               
General Powers
 
. Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the number of directors that shall constitute the whole Board shall be fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors but in no event shall be less than one. The directors shall be elected in the manner provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, by such stockholders as have the right to vote thereon. The number of directors may be increased or decreased by action of the Board of Directors. Directors need not be stockholders of the corporation.
SECTION 2.
                               
Number; Election; Tenure and Qualification
 
. Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the number of the Board of Directors may be increased at any time, such increase to be effective immediately unless otherwise specified in the resolution, by vote of a majority of the directors then in office.
SECTION 3.
                               
Enlargement of the Board
 
. Unless and until filled by the stockholders and except as otherwise determined by the Board of Directors in establishing a series of Preferred Stock as to directors elected by the holders of such series, any vacancy in the Board of Directors, however occurring, including a vacancy resulting from an enlargement of the Board and an unfilled
SECTION 4.
                               
Vacancies
vacancy resulting from the removal of any director, may be filled by vote of a majority of the directors then in office although less than a quorum, or by the sole remaining director. Each director so chosen to fill a vacancy shall serve for a term determined in the manner provided in the Certificate of Incorporation. When one or more directors shall resign from the Board, effective at a future date, a majority of the directors then in office, including those who have so resigned, shall have the power to fill such vacancy or vacancies, the vote thereon to take effect when such resignation or resignations shall become effective. If at any time there are no directors in office, then an election of directors may be held in accordance with the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
 
. Any director may resign at any time upon written notice to the corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therein, or if no time is specified, at the time of its receipt by the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President or the Secretary.
SECTION 5.
                               
Resignation
 
. Directors may be removed from office only as provided in the Certificate of Incorporation. The vacancy or vacancies created by the removal of a director may be filled by the stockholders at the meeting held for the purpose of removal or, if not so filled, by the directors in the manner provided in Section 4 of this Article II.
SECTION 6.
                               
Removal
 
. The Board of Directors may, by resolution or resolutions passed by a majority of the whole Board of Directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more directors of the corporation. The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee to replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of any member of any such committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of such absent or disqualified member. The Board of Directors shall have the power to change the members of any such committee at any time, to fill vacancies therein and to discharge any such committee, either with or without cause, at any time.
SECTION 7.
                               
Committees
 
Any such committee, to the extent permitted by law and to the extent provided in the resolution of the Board of Directors or in these by-laws, shall have and may exercise all the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the corporation, and may authorize the seal of the corporation to be affixed to all papers that may require it.
 
A majority of all the members of any such committee may fix its rules of procedure, determine its action and fix the time and place, whether within or without the State of Delaware, of its meetings and specify what notice thereof, if any, shall be given, unless the Board of Directors shall otherwise by resolution provide. Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its meetings and make such reports as the Board of Directors may from time to time request.
 
. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without call or formal notice at such places either within or without the
SECTION 8.
                               
Meetings of the Board of Directors
 
State of Delaware and at such times as the Board may by vote from time to time determine. A regular meeting of the Board of Directors may be held without call or formal notice immediately after and at the same place as the annual meeting of the stockholders, or any special meeting of the stockholders at which a Board of Directors is elected.
 
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be held at any place either within or without the State of Delaware at any time when called by the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President, the Secretary or two or more directors. Reasonable notice of the time and place of a special meeting shall be given to each director unless such notice is waived by attendance or by written waiver in the manner provided in these by-laws for waiver of notice by stockholders. Notice may be given by, or by a person designated by, the Secretary, the person or persons calling the meeting, or the Board of Directors. No notice of any adjourned meeting of the Board of Directors shall be required. In any case it shall be deemed sufficient notice to a director to send notice by mail at least seventy-two hours, or by telegram or fax at least forty-eight hours, before the meeting, addressed to such director at his or her usual or last known business or home address.
 
Directors or members of any committee may participate in a meeting of the Board of Directors or of such committee by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation by such means shall constitute presence in person at such meeting.
 
. A majority of the total number of directors shall constitute a quorum, except that when a vacancy or vacancies exist in the Board, a majority of the directors then in office (but not less than one-third of the total number of the directors) shall constitute a quorum. A majority of the directors present, whether or not a quorum is present, may adjourn any meeting from time to time. The vote of a majority of the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors, except where a different vote is required by law, by the Certificate of Incorporation or by these by-laws.
SECTION 9.
                               
Quorum and Voting
 
. The Board of Directors may fix fees for their services and for their membership on committees, and expenses of attendance may be allowed for attendance at each meeting. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to preclude any director from serving the corporation in any other capacity, as an officer, agent or otherwise, and receiving compensation therefor.
SECTION 10.
                         
Compensation
 
. Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or of any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting and without notice if a written consent thereto is signed by all members of the Board of Directors or of such committee, as the case may be, and such written consent is filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or of such committee.
SECTION 11.
                         
Action Without Meeting
 
. The officers of the corporation shall consist of a President, a Secretary, a Treasurer and such other officers with such other titles as the Board of Directors shall determine, who may include without limitation a Chairman of the Board, a Vice-Chairman of the Board and one or more Vice-Presidents, Assistant Treasurers or Assistant Secretaries.
SECTION 1.
                               
Titles
 
. The officers of the corporation shall be elected annually by the Board of Directors at its first meeting following the annual meeting of the stockholders. Each officer shall hold office until his or her successor is elected and qualified, unless a different term is specified in the vote electing such officer, or until his or her earlier death, resignation or removal.
SECTION 2.
                               
Election and Term of Office
 
. Unless otherwise provided by resolution of the Board of Directors, no officer, other than the Chairman or Vice-Chairman of the Board, need be a director. No officer need be a stockholder. Any number of offices may be held by the same person, as the directors shall determine.
SECTION 3.
                               
Qualification
 
. Any officer may be removed, with or without cause, at any time, by resolution adopted by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
                               
Removal
 
. Any officer may resign by delivering a written resignation to the corporation at its principal office or to the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President or the Secretary. Such resignation shall be effective upon receipt or at such later time as may be specified therein.
SECTION 5.
                               
Resignation
 
. The Board of Directors may at any time fill any vacancy occurring in any office for the unexpired portion of the term and may leave unfilled for such period as it may determine any office other than those of President, Treasurer and Secretary.
SECTION 6.
                               
Vacancies
 
. The officers of the corporation shall have such powers and perform such duties as are specified herein and as may be conferred upon or assigned to them by the Board of Directors and shall have such additional powers and duties as are incident to their office except to the extent that resolutions of the Board of Directors are inconsistent therewith.
SECTION 7.
                               
Powers and Duties
 
. Except to the extent that such duties are assigned by the Board of Directors to the Chairman of the Board, or in the absence of the Chairman or in the event of his or her inability or refusal to act, the President shall be the chief executive officer of the corporation and shall have general and active management of the business of the corporation and general supervision of its officers, agents and employees, and shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors are carried into effect. The President shall preside at each meeting of the stockholders and the Board of Directors unless a Chairman or Vice-Chairman of the Board is elected by the Board and is assigned the duty of presiding at such meeting.
SECTION 8.
                               
President and Vice-Presidents
 
The Board of Directors may assign to any Vice-President the title of Executive Vice-President, Senior Vice-President or any other title selected by the Board of Directors. In
 
the absence of the President or in the event of his or her inability or refusal to act, the duties of the President shall be performed by the Executive Vice-President, if any, Senior Vice President, if any, or Vice President, if any, in that order (and, in the event there be more than one person in any such office, in the order of their seniority), and when so acting, such officer shall have all the powers of and be subject to all the restrictions upon the President.
 
. The Secretary shall attend all meetings of the Board of Directors and of the stockholders and record all the proceedings of such meetings in a book to be kept for that purpose, shall give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the stockholders and special meetings of the Board of Directors, shall maintain a stock ledger and prepare lists of stockholders and their addresses as required and shall have custody of the corporate seal, which the Secretary or any Assistant Secretary shall have authority to affix to any instrument requiring it and attest by any of their signatures. The Board of Directors may give general authority to any other officer to affix and attest the seal of the corporation.
SECTION 9.
                               
Secretary and Assistant Secretaries
 
Any Assistant Secretary may, in the absence of the Secretary or in the event of the Secretary's inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Secretary.
 
SECTION 10.         . The Treasurer shall have the custody of the corporate funds and securities, shall keep full and accurate accounts of receipts and disbursements in books belonging to the corporation and shall deposit all moneys and other valuable effects in the name and to the credit of the corporation in such depositories as may be designated by or pursuant to resolution of the Board of Directors. The Treasurer shall disburse the funds of the corporation as may be ordered by the Board of Directors, the Chairman of the Board, if any, or the President, taking proper vouchers for such disbursements, and shall render to the Chairman of the Board, if any, the President and the Board of Directors, at its regular meetings or whenever they may require it, an account of all transactions and of the financial condition of the corporation.
Treasurer and Assistant Treasurers
 
Any Assistant Treasurer may, in the absence of the Treasurer or in the event of his or her inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 11.         . The Board of Directors may require any officer to give the corporation a bond in such sum and with such surety or sureties as shall be satisfactory to the Board of Directors upon such terms and conditions as the Board of Directors may specify, including without limitation a bond for the faithful performance of the duties of such officer and for the restoration to the corporation of all property in his or her possession or control belonging to the corporation.
Bonded Officers
 
SECTION 12          . Officers of the corporation shall be entitled to such salaries, compensation or reimbursement as shall be fixed or allowed from time to time by the Board of Directors or any committee thereof appointed for the purpose.
Salaries
 
. One or more stock certificates, signed by the Chairman or Vice-Chairman of the Board of Directors or by the President or a Vice-President and by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, shall be issued to each stockholder certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the corporation. Any or all signatures on any such certificate may be facsimiles. In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who shall have signed or whose facsimile signature shall have been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 1.
                               
Certificates of Stock; Uncertificated Shares
 
Each certificate for shares of stock that are subject to any restriction on transfer pursuant to the Certificate of Incorporation, the by-laws, applicable securities laws, or any agreement among any number of stockholders or among such holders and the corporation shall have conspicuously noted on the face or back of the certificate either the full text of the restriction or a statement of the existence of such restriction.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions regarding certificates for stock, the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of the corporation's stock be uncertificated. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the corporation (or the transfer agent or registrar, as the case may be).
 
. Subject to the restrictions, if any, stated or noted on the stock certificates, shares of stock may be transferred on the books of the corporation by the surrender to the corporation or its transfer agent of the certificate representing such shares properly endorsed or accompanied by a written assignment or power of attorney properly executed, and with such proof of authority or the authenticity of signature as the corporation or its transfer agent may reasonably require. The corporation shall be entitled to treat the record holder of stock as shown on its books as the owner of such stock for all purposes, including the payment of dividends and the right to vote with respect to that stock, regardless of any transfer, pledge or other disposition of that stock, until the shares have been transferred on the books of the corporation in accordance with the requirements of these by-laws. Uncertificated shares of stock may be transferred in accordance with such rules and regulations as the Chairman of the Board, the President, or any Vice President and the Treasurer or the Secretary of the corporation may deem expedient concerning such transfer.
SECTION 2.
                               
Transfers of Shares of Stock
 
  Sections 1, 2 and 3 of Article IV were amended by the Board of Directors of the corporation on November 13, 2007.
(2)
 
. A new stock certificate (or uncertificated shares) may be issued in the place of any certificate theretofore issued by the corporation and alleged to have been lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated, upon such terms in conformity with law as the Board of Directors shall prescribe. The directors may, in their discretion, require the owner of the lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated certificate, or the owner's legal representatives, to give the corporation a bond, in such sum as they may direct, to indemnify the corporation against any claim that may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of any such certificate, or the issuance of any such new certificate.
SECTION 3.
                               
Lost Certificates
 
. The corporation may, but shall not be required to, issue fractions of a share. If the corporation does not issue fractions of a share, it shall (i) arrange for the disposition of fractional interests by those entitled thereto, (ii) pay in cash the fair value of fractions of a share as of the time when those entitled to receive such fractions are determined, or (iii) issue scrip or warrants in registered or bearer form, which shall entitle the holder to receive a certificate for a full share upon the surrender of such scrip or warrants aggregating a full share. A certificate for a fractional share shall, but scrip or warrants shall not unless otherwise provided therein, entitle the holder to exercise voting rights, to receive dividends thereon, and to participate in any of the assets of the corporation in the event of liquidation. The Board of Directors may cause scrip or warrants to be issued subject to the conditions that they shall become void if not exchanged for certificates representing full shares before a specified date, or subject to the conditions that the shares for which scrip or warrants are exchangeable may be sold by the corporation and the proceeds thereof distributed to the holders of scrip or warrants, or subject to any other conditions that the Board of Directors may impose.
SECTION 4.
                               
Fractional Share Interests
 
. Subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, the Board of Directors may, out of funds legally available therefor, at any regular or special meeting, declare dividends upon the capital stock of the corporation as and when they deem expedient.
SECTION 5.
                               
Dividends
 
The corporation shall, to the extent legally permissible, indemnify each person who may serve or who has served at any time as a director or officer of the corporation or of any of its subsidiaries, or who at the request of the corporation may serve or at any time has served as a director, officer or trustee of, or in a similar capacity with, another organization or an employee benefit plan, against all expenses and liabilities (including counsel fees, judgments, fines, excise taxes, penalties and amounts payable in settlements) reasonably incurred by or imposed upon such person in connection with any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or other proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative, in which he may become involved by reason of his serving or having served in such capacity (other than a proceeding voluntarily initiated by such person unless he is successful on the merits, the proceeding was authorized by the corporation or the proceeding seeks a declaratory judgment regarding his own conduct); provided that no indemnification shall be provided for any such person with respect to
 
any matter as to which he shall have been finally adjudicated in any proceeding not to have acted in good faith in the reasonable belief that his action was in the best interests of the corporation or, to the extent such matter relates to service with respect to any employee benefit plan, in the best interests of the participants or beneficiaries of such employee benefit plan; and provided, further, that as to any matter disposed of by a compromise payment by such person, pursuant to a consent decree or otherwise, the payment and indemnification thereof have been approved by the corporation, which approval shall not unreasonably be withheld, or by a court of competent jurisdiction. Such indemnification shall include payment by the corporation of expenses incurred in defending a civil or criminal action or proceeding in advance of the final disposition of such action or proceeding, upon receipt of an undertaking by the person indemnified to repay such payment if he shall be adjudicated to be not entitled to indemnification under this article, which undertaking may be accepted without regard to the financial ability of such person to make repayment.
 
A person entitled to indemnification hereunder whose duties include service or responsibilities as a fiduciary with respect to a subsidiary or other organization shall be deemed to have acted in good faith in the reasonable belief that his action was in the best interests of the corporation if he acted in good faith in the reasonable belief that his action was in the best interests of such subsidiary or organization or of the participants or beneficiaries of, or other persons with interests in, such subsidiary or organization to whom he had a fiduciary duty.
 
Where indemnification hereunder requires authorization or approval by the corporation, such authorization or approval shall be conclusively deemed to have been obtained, and in any case where a director of the corporation approves the payment of indemnification, such director shall be wholly protected, if:
 
the payment has been approved or ratified (l) by a majority vote of a quorum of the directors consisting of persons who are not at that time parties to the proceeding, (2) by a majority vote of a committee of two or more directors who are not at that time parties to the proceeding and are selected for this purpose by the full board (in which selection directors who are parties may participate), or (3) by a majority vote of a quorum of the outstanding shares of stock of all classes entitled to vote for directors, voting as a single class, which quorum shall consist of stockholders who are not at that time parties to the proceeding; or
1.
 
the action is taken in reliance upon the opinion of independent legal counsel (who may be counsel to the corporation) appointed for the purpose by vote of the directors or in the manner specified in clauses (l), (2) or (3) of subparagraph (i); or
2.
 
the payment is approved by a court of competent jurisdiction; or
3.
 
the directors have otherwise acted in accordance with the standard of conduct set forth in the Delaware General Corporation Law.
4.
 
Any indemnification or advance of expenses under this article shall be paid promptly, and in any event within 30 days, after the receipt by the corporation of a written request therefor from the person to be indemnified, unless with respect to a claim for indemnification the corporation
shall have determined that the person is not entitled to indemnification. If the corporation denies the request or if payment is not made within such 30 day period, the person seeking to be indemnified may at any time thereafter seek to enforce his rights hereunder in a court of competent jurisdiction and, if successful in whole or in part, he shall be entitled also to indemnification for the expenses of prosecuting such action. Unless otherwise provided by law, the burden of proving that the person is not entitled to indemnification shall be on the corporation.
 
The right of indemnification under this article shall be a contract right inuring to the benefit of the directors, officers and other persons entitled to be indemnified hereunder and no amendment or repeal of this article shall adversely affect any right of such director, officer or other person existing at the time of such amendment or repeal.
 
The indemnification provided hereunder shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of a director, officer or other person entitled to indemnification hereunder. The indemnification provided hereunder may, to the extent authorized by the corporation, apply to the directors, officers and other persons associated with constituent corporations that have been merged into or consolidated with the corporation who would have been entitled to indemnification hereunder had they served in such capacity with or at the request of the corporation.
 
The right of indemnification under this article shall be in addition to and not exclusive of all other rights to which such director or officer or other persons may be entitled. Nothing contained in this article shall affect any rights to indemnification to which corporation employees or agents other than directors and officers and other persons entitled to indemnification hereunder may be entitled by contract or otherwise under law.
 
The corporation shall have power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, trustee, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, other enterprise or employee benefit plan against any liability asserted against such person and incurred by such person in any such capacity or arising out of such person's status as such, whether or not the corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such liability under the provisions of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
 
. Except as otherwise designated from time to time by the Board of Directors, the fiscal year of the corporation shall begin on the first day of January and end on the last day of December.
SECTION 1.
                               
Fiscal Year
 
. The corporate seal shall be in such form as shall be approved by the Board of Directors. The Secretary shall be the custodian of the seal, and a
SECTION 2.
                               
Corporate Seal
 
duplicate seal may be kept and used by each Assistant Secretary and by any other officer the Board of Directors may authorize.
 
. All references in these by-laws to the Certificate of Incorporation shall be deemed to refer to the Certificate of Incorporation of the corporation, as in effect from time to time.
SECTION 3.
                               
Certificate of Incorporation
 
. The President, the Treasurer and the Secretary shall have power to execute and deliver on behalf and in the name of the corporation any instrument requiring the signature of an officer of the corporation, including deeds, contracts, mortgages, bonds, notes, debentures, checks, drafts and other orders for the payment of money. In addition, the Board of Directors, the President, the Treasurer and the Secretary may expressly delegate such powers to any other officer or agent of the corporation.
SECTION 4.
                               
Execution of Instruments
 
. The President, the Treasurer and the Secretary, and each other person authorized by the Board of Directors, each acting singly, may waive notice of, and act as, or appoint any person or persons to act as, proxy or attorney-in-fact for this corporation (with or without power of substitution) at any meeting of stockholders or owners of other interests of any other corporation or organization the securities of which may be held by this corporation. In addition, the Board of Directors, the President and the Treasurer may expressly delegate such powers to any other officer or agent of the corporation.
SECTION 5.
                               
Voting of Securities
 
. A certificate by the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or a temporary secretary as to any action taken by the stockholders, directors, a committee or any officer or representative of the corporation shall, as to all persons who rely on the certificate in good faith, be conclusive evidence of that action.
SECTION 6.
                               
Evidence of Authority
 
. No contract or transaction between the corporation and one or more of the directors or officers, or between the corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association or other organization in which one or more of the directors or officers are directors or officers or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for that reason or solely because the director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the Board of Directors or a committee of the Board of Directors that authorizes the contract or transaction or solely because the vote of any such director is counted for such purpose, if:
SECTION 7.
                               
Transactions with Interested Parties
 
(1)  The material facts as to the relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the Board of Directors or such committee, and the Board or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative votes of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors be less than a quorum; or
 
(2)  The material facts as to the relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the stockholders entitled to vote thereon, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved in good faith by vote of the stockholders; or
 
The contract or transaction is fair to the corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved or ratified by the Board of Directors, a committee of the Board of Directors or the stockholders.
(3)
                                 
 
Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the Board of Directors or of a committee that authorizes the contract or transaction.
 
. The books and records of the corporation shall be kept at such places within or without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine.
SECTION 8.
                               
Books and Records
 
. These by-laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new by-laws may be adopted by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present at any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors at which a quorum is present.
SECTION 1.
                               
By the Board of Directors
 
. These by-laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new by-laws may be adopted by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of votes properly cast at any regular meeting of stockholders, or at any special meeting of stockholders, provided notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new by-laws shall have been stated in the notice of such special meeting.
SECTION 2.
                               
By the Stockholders
 
Section 8 of Article I of  the By-laws was amended by the Board of Directors of the corporation on March 22, 2007.
 
Sections 1, 2 and 3 of Article IV were amended by the Board of Directors of the corporation on November 13, 2007.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20071206122920.txt.gz
TIME:20071206122920
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                                   
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On November 29, 2007, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release updating the clinical status of ARQ 171, a second generation product candidate under development in the Registrant's E2F-1 Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT) program. The press release is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
As previously reported, under the terms of the Registrant's drug discovery and development agreement with F. Hoffmann-La Roche Ltd ("Roche"), Roche has an option to license worldwide rights for the development and commercialization of products from the Registrant's E2F-1 program following its review of certain information relating to that program. The Roche agreement requires the Registrant to provide a clinical data package that includes information from one of its ARQ 501 Phase 2 monotherapy trials and its ARQ 501 combination therapy trial, as well as information including a recommended Phase 2 dose for a second generation E2F-1 product candidate, such as ARQ 171.
 
The clinical data from the ARQ 501 trials are available. The ARQ 171 Phase 1 trial has been ongoing since December 2006. The Registrant has previously given guidance that a recommended Phase 2 dose for ARQ 171, based on data from the Phase 1 trial, could be available by the end of 2007.  However, until the evaluation of cardiac function described in the press release is completed, the Registrant cannot predict when or whether a recommended Phase 2 dose will be achieved for ARQ 171.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Text of press release announcing Phase 1 clinical trial status dated November 29, 2007.
99.1
              
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Contacts:
William B. Boni
VP, Investor Relations/
  Corp. Communications
(781) 994-0300
www.ArQule.com
 
For Immediate Release:
 
ARQULE PROVIDES CLINICAL UPDATE ON E2F-1 PROGRAM
 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that symptomatic and asymptomatic QTc prolongation, a measure of cardiac function, has been observed in a Phase 1 dose escalation trial with ARQ 171, a second generation product in its E2F-1 cancer therapy program.
Woburn, Mass., November 29, 2007 
 
These observations were made based on EKGs from patients who received doses of ARQ 171 from 380 to 760 milligrams per meter squared. The Company is currently reviewing EKGs from patients previously treated at lower doses. Upon completion of this review, the Company will make a further decision about continuing this dose escalation trial. The Company expects the analysis of QTc prolongation data to be complete between the end of 2007 and early 2008.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics. The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy(R) (ACT). The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product that mediates its effects by inhibiting the activity of a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis. The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Hoffman-La Roche. For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition. Additional forward-looking statements relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual
results to differ materially. Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 171 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or pre-clinical development or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing this compound that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development. Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies. In addition, the planned timing completion of clinical trials for ARQ 171 is subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product. Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080108141253.txt.gz
TIME:20080108141253
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
As part of its management succession planning and to provide for an orderly transition, on January 7, 2008, the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule" or the "Registrant") amended the employment agreement of Stephen A. Hill, its President and Chief Executive Officer.  Pursuant to the terms of this amendment, Dr. Hill will continue to serve as President and Chief Executive Officer and a director of the Registrant until March 31, 2008, at which time he will resign from those positions, and Dr. Hill will be entitled to receive the payments and benefits provided for in Section 16 of his employment agreement, as amended.  All other terms and conditions of the employment agreement will remain in full force and effect.
 
The foregoing summary of the material terms of the amendment to Dr. Hill's employment agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the amendment, which is included as Exhibit 10.1 hereto, to the terms of his employment agreement filed as Exhibit 10.45 to the Registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003 and the amendment to his employment agreement filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 10, 2007, each of which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
10.1
       
Amendment to Employment Agreement, effective as of January 7, 2008, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Stephen A. Hill.  Filed herewith.
 
10.2
       
Amendment to Employment Agreement, dated as of October 4, 2007, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Stephen A. Hill.  Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K dated October 10, 2007 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
 
10.3
       
Employment Agreement by and between the Company and Stephen A Hill, dated January 1, 2004. Filed as Exhibit 10.45 to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
 
99.1
       
Text of press release announcing changes in management.
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
January 4, 2008
 
Stephen A. Hill
26 Dole Hill Lane
Boxford, MA  01921
 
RE:  Employment Agreement between ArQule, Inc. (the "Company") and Stephen A. Hill dated as of January 1, 2004 and amended as of October 4, 2007 (the "Agreement").
 
Dear Steve,
 
You and the Board of Directors of the Company have been discussing the possibility of your leaving the Company based on your desire to pursue other career interests.  The conclusion of the members of the Board, including yourself, is that it is important for succession planning purposes to set a date certain at which time you will no longer serve as an officer or director of the Company. In order to maintain continuity during this period of transition you will continue to serve as President and Chief Executive Officer and a director of the Company until March 31, 2008, at which time you shall resign those positions.
 
With that understanding, this letter will serve to amend the Agreement solely to provide that, upon your resignation and notwithstanding any other provision of the Agreement, you will receive the payments and benefits provided for in Section 16 of the Agreement to the same extent as if a termination without "Cause" had occurred and the "Notice Period" had commenced, subject to the conditions and limitations contained in that Section, until the first anniversary of this letter.  The other terms of the Agreement shall remain in force and unchanged.
 
If the foregoing is consistent with our mutual understanding, please indicate your agreement by signing one of the enclosed counterparts of this letter in the space indicated below and returning it to my attention
 
Thank you for your continued cooperation in this transition.
 
ArQule, Inc.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
For Immediate Release:
 
ARQULE ANNOUNCES MANAGEMENT CHANGES
 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that it has initiated a search for a successor to Dr. Stephen A. Hill, its current president and chief executive officer, who has communicated to the board of directors his intention to leave ArQule in early 2008.
Woburn, Mass., January 7, 2008 
 
During his nine-year tenure, Dr. Hill has successfully led ArQule's transition from a combinatorial chemistry services company to an integrated, oncology-focused research and development organization.
 
"I am delighted that ArQule is in a strong position, with a truly exciting opportunity in our c-Met inhibitor program, along with other preclinical and clinical programs," said Dr. Hill.  "The company is well capitalized and well positioned to continue its successful growth.  I feel that this is the right time to step aside as CEO, both to pursue my own career interests and to allow a transition in leadership at a time of strength for the company.
 
"After almost a decade of leadership responsibility at ArQule, I am indebted to the Company's employees, past and present, for their support and commitment," said Dr. Hill.  "I believe that now is the optimal time for me to move on to a new opportunity, about which I hope to be able to share more detail in the near future."
 
Peter S. Lawrence, who was recently appointed to the position of chief operating officer, will take operational responsibility for leadership of the Company, with accountability to the chairman of the board, Patrick J. Zenner.  Dr. Hill will remain in his position until his departure and will continue to provide strategic advice and support to Mr. Lawrence and the executive team at ArQule until a new president and chief executive officer is appointed.  A search committee has been appointed by the board and will consider Mr. Lawrence and external candidates for the CEO position.
 
"On behalf of the ArQule board of directors, I would like to thank Steve Hill for his strategic leadership of the Company through a time of efficient and effective transition from one business model to another," said Mr. Zenner.  "The entire board joins me in wishing him success in his future endeavors.
 
"During the past two years, ArQule has established its identity as a promising early-stage oncology company," said Mr. Zenner. "We are excited by our prospects for generating proof-of-principle clinical data this year and beyond in one of the most interesting areas of cancer therapy, c-Met inhibition.  The Company also looks forward to introducing new product candidates discovered through what we believe is a powerful research engine that combines insights into the biology of cancer with a unique chemistry expertise validated in the course of our previous chemistry services collaborations."
 
Investor Conference Call
 
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 8:30 a.m. eastern time.
 
 
Conference Call Numbers
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning at 10:30 a.m. on January 8, 2008 for seven days and can be accessed by dialing 1-888-286-8010 from the U.S. and Canada, and 1-617-801-6888 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is 34903894.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics. The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy(R) (ACT). The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product that mediates its effects by inhibiting the activity of a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis. The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Hoffman-La Roche. For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080211111131.txt.gz
TIME:20080211111131
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On February 7, 2008, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the year ended December 31, 2007.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated February 7, 2008
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ARQULE REPORTS FISCAL 2007 YEAR END AND
FOURTH QUARTER RESULTS
 
Woburn, MA, February 7, 2008 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the year and for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2007.
 
The Company reported a net loss of $53,372,000 or $1.33 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2007, compared with a net loss of $31,440,000, or $0.88 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2006.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2007, the Company reported a net loss of $14,389,000, or $0.33 per share, compared with a net loss of $12,830,000, or $0.36 per share, for the quarter ended December 31, 2006.
 
The results for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2006 reflect discontinued operations related to the Company's termination of its chemistry services business on May 26, 2006.  As previously announced, ArQule exited this business upon the conclusion of its agreement with Pfizer in May 2006.  All line items discussed below exclude the results of these discontinued operations.
 
At December 31, 2007, the Company had a total of approximately $135,082,000 in cash and marketable securities.
 
Operational Review
 
"Progress during 2007 was highlighted by promising clinical and research findings, as well as a significant corporate partnership in Asia related to our lead product, ARQ 197, a proprietary, small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase," said Dr. Stephen A. Hill, president and chief executive officer of ArQule.
 
"With respect to the management transition and my planned departure announced last month, I would like to underscore that ArQule is in a strong position, well capitalized and with a truly exciting opportunity in c-Met inhibition, along with multiple other pre-clinical and clinical programs," said Dr. Hill.  "Peter Lawrence has taken over operational responsibility for ArQule, and the transition is proceeding smoothly."
 
"In the first half of the year, we entered into an exclusive license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd. (Kyowa) to develop and commercialize ARQ 197 in Japan and parts of Asia," said Peter S. Lawrence, chief operating officer of ArQule.  "The agreement includes $123 million in upfront and potential development milestone payments from Kyowa to ArQule, including a $30 million cash licensing payment.  In addition, it includes undisclosed sales milestone payments, and upon commercialization, ArQule will receive double-digit royalties from Kyowa on net sales of ARQ 197.  Kyowa is responsible for clinical development costs and commercialization of the compound in certain Asian countries.
 
"As announced yesterday, Kyowa has initiated a Phase 1, dose escalation trial with ARQ 197, reflecting regulatory approval to begin clinical testing in Japan," said Mr. Lawrence.  "This milestone reflects Kyowa's continued diligence. We remain impressed by their clinical development capabilities and expertise.
 
"At the 2007 Annual Meeting of ASCO, data from a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 197 were presented, demonstrating that treatment with ARQ 197 was well tolerated over extended dosing periods, with approximately 60 percent of evaluable patients experiencing partial responses, minor responses or stable disease," said Mr. Lawrence.  "These exciting data reflect the favorable safety profile and the observed clinical benefit of treatment with ARQ 197.
 
"Later in the year, we initiated a multi-trial, Phase 2 clinical development program with ARQ 197," said Mr. Lawrence.  "Patient enrollment is ongoing in the first two trials within that program, which target MiT (Microphthalmia Transcription Factor) tumors and pancreatic cancer.  We expect to initiate a trial in non-small cell lung cancer in the near future, and we are considering additional indications for initiation this year based on the multiple roles of c-Met in the development of certain cancers.
 
"Research findings this year have also added significantly to our understanding of the binding of ARQ 197 to c-Met through the analysis of crystallographic structural data," said Mr. Lawrence.  "We believe these data explain why this compound is selective for c-Met without competing with ATP, and we believe this binding mechanism may have favorable clinical risk-benefit implications.  Furthermore, this novel mechanism of binding may form the basis of a new kinase inhibitor discovery platform at ArQule.
 
"We have received biopsy data from an ongoing biomarker study at the Royal Marsden Hospital in London," said Mr. Lawrence.  "These data provide compelling visual evidence that ARQ 197 significantly reduced previously highly expressed phospho-c-Met in human tumor tissue.
 
"Analysis of clinical data with ARQ 197 has indicated the potential of this compound to exert an anti-metastatic effect," said Mr. Lawrence.  "We are examining ways to test this hypothesis in future clinical trials.
 
"With respect to expanded collaboration plans for ARQ 197, we continue to pursue expressions of interest from potential pharmaceutical and biotechnology industry partners," said Mr. Lawrence.  "We remain focused on deal structures that would preserve for ArQule our participation in development and commercialization efforts, as well as compelling economics.
 
"We are also determining how best to proceed with the compounds in our E2F-1 program," said Mr. Lawrence.  "Factors under consideration include the anti-cancer activity seen in Phase 1 and Phase 2
 
trials with ARQ 501, the dose-limiting hemolytic anemia associated with this compound, the ongoing analysis of QTc prolongation observed in the Phase 1 dose escalation trial with ARQ 171 and the potential of ARQ 761, a third E2F-1 product in pre-clinical development.  We will be evaluating these factors with Roche in advance of their decision regarding their option to license the program.
 
"Finally, we plan to begin GLP toxicology testing in the first half of 2008 with a product candidate from our Eg5 kinesin motor protein program," said Mr. Lawrence.  "Pending the successful completion of this testing, we plan to file an Investigational New Drug Application (IND) for this compound, designated as ARQ 621, later in the year."
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
Revenues for the year ended December 31, 2007 were $9,165,000 compared with revenues of $6,626,000 for the year ended December 31, 2006.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2007, revenues were $2,542,000, compared with revenues of $1,670,000 for the quarter ended December 31, 2006.  Revenues for both years included financial support from Roche for the Company's ongoing development of products in its E2F cancer therapy program. Revenue for 2007 also included revenue from licensing Asian rights to ARQ 197 to Kyowa.
 
Fiscal 2007 research and development expenses were $53,727,000 compared with $47,428,000 for fiscal 2006.  Fourth quarter 2007 research and development expenses were $14,417,000 compared with $12,421,000 for the fourth quarter of 2006.
 
The $1,996,000 increase in research and development expense in the fourth quarter of 2007 compared with the prior year's quarter was primarily due to $4,065,000 in higher costs related to the Phase 2 trials with ARQ 197.  This increase was partially offset by a $1,834,000 decrease in costs related to the Phase 1 and Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501.
 
The $6,299,000 increase in research and development expense in fiscal 2007 compared with fiscal 2006 was primarily due to a $10,907,000 increase in costs related to Phase 1 and Phase 2 trials with ARQ 197, and $4,669,000 of costs incurred in conjunction with the Company's sponsored research agreement with Boston Biomedical Institute (BBI). These increases were offset in part by $7,455,000 in lower costs related to Phase 1 and Phase 2 trials with ARQ 501.
 
General and administrative expenses for fiscal 2007 were $15,069,000 compared to $11,560,000 for fiscal 2006.  In the fourth quarter of 2007, these expenses were $4,407,000, compared with $3,224,000 in the fourth quarter of 2006. The increased 2007 general and administrative expenses were primarily due to an increase in personnel-related expenses, professional fees and facility costs previously absorbed by the Company's chemical services operations that were discontinued in 2006.
 
2008 Financial Guidance
 
For 2008, ArQule expects revenues to range between $10.0 and $10.5 million, related to the ongoing partnerships with Roche and Kyowa.  Net use of cash is expected to range between $55 and $60 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $69 and $74 million, and net loss per share to range between $1.57 and $1.68 for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2008 with between $75 and $80 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. eastern time today, February 7, 2008.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 1-888-286-8010 and outside the U.S. 1-617-801-6888.  The access code is 81293135.
 
You may use the following link to pre-register and view important information about this conference call.  Pre-registering is not mandatory, but it will provide you immediate entry into the call and will facilitate the timely start of the call.  Pre-registration takes only a few minutes, and you may pre-register at any time, including up to and after the call start time.  To pre-register, please go to:
https://www.theconferencingservice.com/prereg/key.process?key=R6M9KKY6N.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule, Inc. is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are designed to affect key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead clinical-stage products have been generated from two scientific platforms: Cancer Survival Protein modulation and Activated Checkpoint Therapy (ACT).  The Cancer Survival Protein modulation platform has generated a clinical-stage product designed to inhibit a molecule known as c-Met, which plays multiple roles in cancer cell growth, survival, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis.  The ACT platform is designed to kill cancer cells selectively while sparing normal cells through direct activation of DNA damage response/checkpoint pathways. The Company's lead ACT program, based on the E2F-1 pathway, is partnered with Roche. For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, the progress of its clinical trials, including Phase 2 trials with ARQ 197 and  the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 171, its discovery and pre-clinical development of new product candidates, the future of its partnership with Roche related to the E2F-1 program, and an additional corporate partnership related to ARQ 197.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 171, ARQ 501 and ARQ 197 may not
demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Existing and future partnerships are dependent on the successful advancement of pre-clinical and clinical programs.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197, ARQ 501 and ARQ 171 are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, to enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and to resolve other technical hurdles and issues. The Company may also not be able to fund and to successfully advance internal research activities and to progress pre-clinical compounds such as ARQ 761 and ARQ 621 into clinical development. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080414171019.txt.gz
TIME:20080414171019
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On April 14, 2008, ArQule, Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that its Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the "Annual Meeting") will be held on May 15, 2008, instead of May 16, 2008.  The date of the Annual Meeting has been changed to correspond to the Board of Directors meeting scheduled on that day in order to give the directors the opportunity to attend the Annual Meeting.  Additional information regarding the time and location of the Annual Meeting, the record date and the agenda is included in the Company's proxy statement that today was filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission and mailed to stockholders.
 
The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1
                          
Press release of ArQule, Inc., dated April 14, 2008.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
April 14, 2008
 

 
 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
 
Woburn, MA, April 14, 2008 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that its 2008 annual meeting of stockholders will be held on May 15, 2008, instead of May 16, 2008, as previously announced in the company's annual report on form 10-K.
 
The annual meeting date has been changed to correspond to the board of directors meeting scheduled on May 15, 2008 in order to give the directors the opportunity to attend the annual meeting.
 
Additional information regarding the time and location of the annual meeting, the record date and the agenda is included in the Company's proxy statement that was filed today with the Securities and Exchange Commission and mailed to stockholders.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's clinical-stage products consist of ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, and ARQ 501, an activator of the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor.  The Company's most advanced pre-clinical development programs are focused on ARQ 761, a second-generation E2F-1 activator, as well as compounds that inhibit the Eg5 kinesin spindle protein and the B-RAF kinase.  ArQule's discovery efforts are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate), an energy source for cells.  For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080418171413.txt.gz
TIME:20080418171413
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
(c)  & (e) 
On April 14, 2008, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") appointed Peter S. Lawrence as its President.  Since October 4, 2007, Mr. Lawrence has served as the Registrant's Executive Vice President, Chief Operating Officer, General Counsel and Secretary. Since September 1, 2007, he has directed the Registrant's financial and accounting functions and has been responsible for its financial reporting obligations. As President, Mr. Lawrence will report to the Chief Executive Officer of the Registrant, and will be principally responsible for the operational aspects of the Registrant's business.
 
In connection with his appointment as President, the Registrant and Mr. Lawrence amended his employment agreement to reflect his new duties and responsibilities and to modify his base salary and his target bonus for 2008.  Mr. Lawrence's salary was increased to $375,000 per year.  In addition, the target amount for his bonus was increased to forty percent of his salary.
 
The foregoing summary of the material terms of the amendment to Mr. Lawrence's employment agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the amendment which is included as Exhibit 10.1 hereto, the terms of his employment agreement which was previously filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K, dated April 18, 2006 and is incorporated herein by reference and the terms of the first amendment to his employment agreement which was previously filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K, dated October 4, 2007 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On April 15, 2008, the Registrant entered into an employment agreement with Paolo Pucci.  Mr. Pucci's agreement provides that the Registrant will employ Mr. Pucci as its Chief Executive Officer commencing on June 9, 2008 and will nominate him to serve on the Board of Directors during the term of his employment.
 
Mr. Pucci's qualifications and experience are summarized below:
 
Paolo Pucci
(Age: 46)  Since 2004, Mr. Pucci has held various executive positions with Bayer A.G., an international health care, nutrition and high-tech materials company.  Mr. Pucci was responsible for the Global Oncology/U.S. Operations division of Bayer Healthcare. Bayer Healthcare researches, develops, manufactures and markets innovative products for disease prevention, diagnosis and treatment.  From 2001 to 2004, he served as the Managing Director of the Pharma/Biological Division of Bayer SPA in Milan, Italy, overseeing the production of pharmaceuticals.  From 1991 to 2001, Mr. Pucci held various management positions with Eli Lilly Sweden AB in Stockholm, Sweden.
 
Mr. Pucci's agreement provides that the Registrant will employ him as its Chief Executive Officer effective June 9, 2008, at an initial annual base salary of $450,000. The base salary is
 
subject to annual review and upward adjustment by the Registrant. Mr. Pucci is also eligible to receive a discretionary annual cash bonus based on a target amount of 50% of his base salary. The award of a bonus is in the discretion of the Registrant's board of directors based on company and individual performance. For 2008, Mr. Pucci will receive a guaranteed bonus of $225,000.  Upon execution of his employment agreement, Mr. Pucci also became entitled to receive a $200,000 signing bonus to be paid after he commences employment.  Mr. Pucci will also receive reimbursement for up to $100,000 in relocation expenses.
 
In addition, on his date of employment, the Registrant will grant Mr. Pucci stock options entitling him to purchase 500,000 shares of the Registrant's common stock pursuant to the ArQule, Inc. Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan. The options will be exercisable as to 25% of the shares commencing on his date of employment and as to 25% of the shares annually thereafter.  Finally, on his date of employment, Mr. Pucci will receive 125,000 shares of the Registrant's restricted stock, 50% vesting free of restrictions on the date of his employment and the remaining 50% one year later.
 
Mr. Pucci's agreement provides for continued employment for a four year period. If Mr. Pucci is terminated or deemed to be terminated without cause, as defined in the agreement, the Registrant will be required to pay Mr. Pucci an amount equal to twenty-four months of his base salary in effect at the time of termination, plus the average of his annual bonus for the preceding two years. This amount will be paid in substantially equal installments according to the Registrant's normal payroll schedule during the twenty-four month period. In addition, the Registrant will, at its expense, continue to provide Mr. Pucci with certain employee benefits for a period of twenty-four months from the date of termination.  Finally, all of Mr. Pucci's unvested stock options and restricted stock that would have become exercisable or vested within one year from the termination date will immediately become exercisable or vested free of restrictions without regard to the original vesting schedule. For the purposes of Mr. Pucci's agreement, "termination without cause" includes a reduction in Mr. Pucci's salary, authority, responsibilities or title; relocation of our operations beyond a radius of fifty miles from our current Woburn, MA location; failure of the Registrant to grant the awards set forth in his employment agreement; or uncured material breach of the agreement by the Registrant.  Termination of Mr. Pucci's employment by reason of scheduled expiration of his employment agreement will not be considered as termination without cause.  If a change in control of the Registrant, as defined in Mr. Pucci's agreement, occurs, and the Registrant subsequently terminates Mr. Pucci's employment without cause within a specified period, 100% of his unvested stock options and restricted stock will become immediately exercisable or vested free of restrictions without regard to the original vesting schedule. The foregoing summary of the material terms of Mr. Pucci's employment agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the agreement which is included as Exhibit 10.4.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
April 18, 2008

Exhibit 10.1
This Second Amendment to Employment Agreement ("Second Amendment") is entered into by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Peter Lawrence ("Executive") whose current principal residential address is 29 Fairfield Street, Unit 4-5, Boston, MA 02116.  The purpose of this Second Amendment is to amend the Employment Agreement dated as of April 13, 2006 between the Company and Executive (the "Agreement"), as amended by the amendment effective as of October 4, 2007 ("First Amendment").  This Second Amendment shall be effective as of April 14, 2008.
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to continue to employ and retain Executive in a senior executive capacity and to enter into this Second Amendment embodying certain changes to the terms of such employment from that which were set forth in the Agreement;
 
WHEREAS, Executive desires to accept such continued employment and enter into such Second Amendment;
 
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of $1.00, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged by Executive, the Company and Executive hereby agree as follows:
 
1.
                                      
Definitions. 
All capitalized terms not specifically defined in this Second Amendment shall have the same meaning herein as in the Agreement, as amended (including as in any plans or other documents incorporated by reference into the Agreement).
 
2.
                                      
Title; Duties. 
During the Employment Term, Executive shall serve as President, Chief Operating Officer, General Counsel and Secretary, reporting to the Chief Executive Officer ("CEO") of the Company.  Executive hereby agrees to undertake the duties and responsibilities inherent in such positions and such other duties and responsibilities consistent with such position as the CEO shall from time to time reasonably assign to Executive.  Anything in Section 2 of the Agreement or in the First Amendment which is inconsistent with the terms of this Section shall be of no further effect, subject to the terms of Section 4 below.
 
3.
                                      
Base Salary, Target Amount for Bonus.
  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, (i) the Base Salary, as set forth in Section 4.1 of the Agreement, shall be increased to $375,000, and (ii) the target amount of Executive's discretionary annual cash bonus, as set forth in Section 4.2 of the Agreement, shall be 40 percent of Executive's Base Salary.
 
4.
                                      
Deemed Termination.
  Section 3 of the First Amendment shall be null and void.  Any determination of whether a "termination without Cause" has occurred shall be governed by the provisions of Section 5.1.2 of the Agreement.  For avoidance of doubt, the reference to "title" in 5.1.2 (a) shall refer to the title conferred in Section 2 of this Second Amendment.
 
5.
                                      
Waivers and Further Agreements.
  Any waiver of any terms or conditions of this Second Amendment shall not operate as a waiver of any other breach of such terms or conditions or any other term or condition, nor shall any failure to enforce any provision hereof operate as a waiver of such provision or of any other provision hereof; provided, however, that no such written waiver, unless it, by its own terms, explicitly provides to the contrary, shall be construed to effect a continuing waiver of the provision being waived and no such waiver in any instance shall constitute a waiver in any other instance or for any other purpose or impair the right of the Party against whom such waiver is claimed in all other instances or for all other purposes to require full compliance with such provision.  Each of the Parties agrees to execute all such further instruments and documents and to take all such further action as the other Party may reasonably require in order to effectuate the terms and purposes of this Second Amendment.
 
6.
                                      
Counterparts.
  This Second Amendment maybe executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
 
7.
                                      
Governing Law.
  This Second Amendment shall be governed by and construed and enforced in accordance with the law (other than the law governing conflict of law questions) of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
 
8.
                                      
Entire Understanding.
 This Second Amendment constitutes the entire understanding and agreement between the Parties regarding the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter hereof, except that, other than as explicitly modified by the terms of this Second Amendment, the Agreement, including as modified by the First Amendment, shall remain in full force and effect in accordance with its provisions.  This Second Amendment shall be incorporated into the Agreement as an additional provision thereto.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Second Amendment as of the date set forth above.
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.4
 
This Employment Agreement (the "Agreement") dated as of April 15, 2008 (the "Execution Date") is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts  01801, and Paolo Pucci ("Executive") whose current principal residential address is 47 Bonnie Brook Road, Westport, Connecticut 06880.
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to employ Executive as its Chief Executive Officer and to enter into an agreement embodying the terms of such employment; and
 
WHEREAS, Executive desires to accept such employment and enter into such an agreement;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive (collectively, the "Parties") hereby agree as follows:
 
.  The Company hereby agrees to employ Executive, and Executive hereby accepts such employment with the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, for a period commencing on June 9, 2008 (the "Effective Date") and continuing for a period of four (4) years, unless earlier terminated in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 (the "Employment Term"), provided that the Company shall provide Executive with no less than ninety (90) days advance written notice in the event it decides not to extend this Agreement beyond the 4-year Employment Term or negotiate in good faith a new agreement, and in the event the Company does not provide such 90-day advance notice, the Company shall pay Executive up to 90 days of his Base Salary in lieu of such advance notice.
1.
            
Term of Employment
 
.  During the Employment Term, Executive shall serve as the Chief Executive Officer of the Company, reporting directly to the Board of Directors of the Company ("Board").  Executive hereby agrees to undertake the duties and responsibilities inherent in such position and such other duties and responsibilities consistent with such position as the Board shall from time to time reasonably assign to Executive.  In addition, during the Employment Term, the Company shall nominate and renominate Executive to serve as a member of the Board, and Executive understands and agrees that he shall resign the directorship and any other positions that he may hold with the Company upon the termination of his employment with the Company for any reason.
2.
            
Title; Duties
 
.  During the Employment Term, Executive shall devote substantially all of his business time and efforts to the performance of his duties hereunder and shall not, directly or indirectly, engage in any other business, profession or occupation for compensation or otherwise which would conflict with the rendition of such duties.
3.
            
No Conflict
 
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, Executive may engage in other activities, such as activities involving charitable, educational, religious, trade association, civic and similar types of organizations, speaking engagements and membership on the Board of Directors or equivalent of other organizations ("Outside Activities"), provided that Executive shall obtain the Board's written consent, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditional, before engaging in any such Outside Activities and provided further that Executive's participation in such Outside Activities shall not be in violation of any of his obligations to the Company, including but not limited to those set forth in the Company's Code of Conduct.  Executive represents and warrants that Exhibit A attached hereto states all Outside Activities which Executive is participating in as of the Effective Date, and to which the Company hereby consents.
 
.
4.
            
Compensation and Benefits
 
.  During the Employment Term, the Company shall pay Executive for Executive's services hereunder a base salary at the initial annual rate of $450,000, payable in substantially equal installments in accordance with the Company's usual payment practices and subject to annual review and upward adjustment by the Company in its sole discretion.  Such amount (as it may be increased, but not decreased, from time to time in accordance with this Section 4.1) shall be referred to herein as the "Base Salary."
4.1.
         
Base Salary
 
.  For each calendar year during the Employment Term, Executive shall be eligible to receive a discretionary annual cash bonus, the target amount of which shall be 50 percent of Executive's Base Salary.  The award of an annual cash bonus, if any, shall be in the Board's sole discretion and shall be based on Company and individual performance.  For calendar year 2008, Executive shall be guaranteed a bonus of $225,000 which shall not be pro-rated.  The annual cash bonus typically is paid during the first quarter of the following calendar year, and, except as otherwise expressly provided herein, Executive must be actively employed with the Company as of the payment date in order to receive the annual cash bonus, if any.  Executive shall also be eligible to participate in any and all other bonus plans and packages that are made available to the Company's executives, on a basis consistent with Executive's position and then-current Base Salary and in accordance with the policies and practices of the Company and the Board.
4.2.
         
Bonus Compensation
 
.  As further compensation for Executive's services hereunder, the Company shall grant to Executive, on the Effective Date, a stock option (the "Execution Stock Option") to purchase five hundred thousand (500,000) shares of the Company's Common Stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Common Stock"), pursuant to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan") and in accordance with the terms, and subject to a vesting schedule pursuant to which twenty-five percent of the shares shall vest on the Effective Date and twenty-five percent of the shares vesting annually for each of the next three years commencing on the first anniversary of the Effective Date, and other conditions, set forth in substantially the form of Option Certificate attached hereto
4.3.
         
Stock Option Grant
 
 
as Exhibit B-1.  The method of determining the exercise price of the Execution Stock Option is set forth in the attached Exhibit C.  In its sole discretion, the Company may grant to Executive from time to time other stock options to purchase additional shares of Common Stock, also pursuant to the Plan and such other terms and conditions set forth at the time of such grant (the Execution Stock Option and such other stock options, collectively, the "Stock Options") and may also grant stock awards.  The Execution Stock Option is intended to be an "incentive stock option" to the extent permissible under Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (the "Code"), including the $100,000 limitation of Code Section 422(d).
 
.  Upon the approval of the Committee that administers the Plan, and subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan and the Restricted Stock Agreement substantially in the form attached hereto as Exhibit B-2, the Company shall grant to Executive, on the Effective Date, 125,000 shares of the Company's restricted stock, of which 50% shall become vested and free of restrictions as of the Effective Date of this Agreement, and the remaining 50% shall become vested and free of restrictions as of the first anniversary of the Effective Date.
4.4.
         
Restricted Shares
 
.  Upon execution of this Agreement, Executive shall be entitled to a signing bonus of $200,000.00 (the "Signing Bonus").  The Signing Bonus shall be paid to Executive on the Company's next regular payroll date following the Effective Date of this Agreement.
4.5.
         
Signing Bonus
 
.  During the Employment Term and subject to any contributions therefor generally required of senior executives of the Company, Executive shall be entitled to receive such employee benefits (including fringe benefits, 401(k) plan participation, and life, health, dental, accident and short and long term disability insurance) which the Company may, in its sole and absolute discretion, make available generally to its senior executives or personnel similarly situated; provided, however, that it is hereby acknowledged and agreed that any such employee benefit plans may be altered, modified or terminated by the Company at any time in its sole discretion without recourse by Executive.
4.6.
         
Executive Benefits
 
.  Executive shall be entitled to five weeks (25 working days) of paid time off ("PTO") per annum during the Employment Term, which will accrue pursuant to the Company's policies and practices and is to be taken at such time or times as shall be mutually convenient for the Company and Executive; provided, however, that the Company may elect to increase the annual time to which Executive shall be entitled to PTO.  Unused PTO shall be allocated pursuant to the Company's policies and practices.
4.7.
         
Paid Time Off
 
.  Upon delivery of adequate documentation of expenses incurred in accordance with the policies and practices of the Company, Executive shall be entitled to reimbursement by the Company for reasonable travel, entertainment and other business expenses incurred by Executive in the
4.8.
         
Business Expenses and Perquisites
 
 
performance of Executive's duties hereunder in accordance with such policies as the Company may from time to time have in effect.
 
.  During the first six (6) months of the Employment Term, the Company shall provide Executive with a temporary housing allowance in the gross amount of $2,000 per month, payable on the first regularly scheduled payroll date of the Company each month.
4.9.
         
Temporary Housing Allowance
 
.  Upon delivery of adequate documentation of expenses incurred in relocation of Executive's primary residence to Massachusetts, the Company shall reimburse Executive, in an amount not to exceed $100,000, for reasonable expenses incurred by Executive in the course of such relocation.  Reimbursable expenses include, but shall not be limited to, closing costs (excluding points), up to a maximum of three percent of the purchase price, for both the purchase of a new primary residence and the sale of Executive's current primary residence and the reasonable costs of moving Executive's household goods to a new primary residence, provided that the Board's decision on which relocation expenses are reimbursable under this paragraph shall be conclusive.  Executive shall not be entitled to reimbursement under this paragraph if he does not submit a request and provide documentation for such reimbursement within two years of the Effective Date of this Agreement.  The reimbursement provided under this paragraph shall not apply to more than one relocation by Executive.  In the event that Executive resigns his employment with the Company or is terminated for Cause within one year of receiving any reimbursement as provided under this paragraph, Executive shall be required to repay to the Company any and all reimbursement amounts received pursuant to this paragraph.
4.10.
       
Relocation Expenses
 
.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, any payments or benefits hereunder shall be subject to the withholding of such amounts, if any, relating to tax and other payroll deductions, as the Company reasonably determines it should withhold pursuant to any applicable law or regulation.
4.11.
       
Deductions and Withholdings
 
  Executive shall receive an annual review of his performance by the Board, or by a Committee of the Board, or both.
4.12.
       
Annual Review.
 
.
5.
            
Termination
 
. The Company may terminate Executive's employment hereunder at any time without Cause (as defined in Section 5.2) upon not less than fourteen (14) days prior written notice from the Company to Executive.  The effective date of Executive's termination shall be referred to herein as the "Termination Date."  If Executive's employment is terminated by the Company pursuant to this Section 5.1, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that the Company shall pay Executive all Base Salary owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus
5.1.
         
Without Cause by the Company
 
 
the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date, plus the signing bonus pursuant to Section 4.5 of this Agreement, if not previously paid, and shall grant Executive the Execution Stock Option as provided in Section 4.3 and subject to Sections 4.3 and 5.1.1 of this Agreement, and the restricted stock as provided in Section 4.4 and subject to Sections 4.4 and 5.1.1 of this Agreement, both to the extent not previously granted.  In addition, in the event the Company terminates Executive without Cause after a calendar year has been completed but before the annual bonus, if any, relating to that calendar year as provided in Section 4.2 above has been paid, the Company shall pay Executive such annual bonus amount, if awarded.  For purposes of clarity, a termination of Executive's employment by reason of the expiration of the Employment Term as set forth in Section 1 shall not be considered a termination without Cause.
 
.  In the event the Company terminates Executive's employment without Cause, and provided that Executive first executes a general release in a form and of a scope reasonably acceptable to the Company within sixty (60) days of the Termination Date, the Company shall provide the following severance benefits to Executive (the "Severance Package"):
5.1.1.
      
The Severance Package
 
A payment (the "Severance Payment") in the following amount:
(a)
          
 
An amount equal to Executive's Base Salary through the end of the twenty four (24) month period commencing on the Termination Date; plus
(i)
           
 
An amount equal to the total bonus, if any, paid by the Company to Executive with respect to the two (2) years preceding the year in which the Termination Date occurs, provided that, for purposes of this paragraph only, Executive shall be deemed to have received his 50 percent of Base Salary bonus target for any year within such 2-year period in which Executive was not paid a bonus solely because he was not employed by the Company.  Attached at Exhibit D is a series of examples of the manner in which this portion of the Severance Payment shall be calculated.
(ii)
          
 
Payment of the costs associated with continuing the benefits which Executive is entitled to receive pursuant to Section 4.6 of this Agreement at the level in effect as of the Termination Date (subject to any employee contribution requirements applicable to Executive on the Termination Date) through the twenty four (24) month period commencing on the Termination Date, to the extent such benefits may continue beyond the Termination Date (for example, among other things, Executive's coverage under the Company's life and disability insurance policies will terminate as of the Termination Date).
(b)
          
 
 
The Severance Payment shall be paid to Executive in substantially equal installments, according to the Company's regular payroll schedule, beginning on the first regular payroll date following the effective date of the general release executed by Executive as provided above, subject to Section 5.8 below.
(c)
          
 
As of the Termination Date, any Stock Option held by Executive shall become immediately exercisable as to all options shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate, to the extent such Stock Option would have vested within the one-year period following the Termination Date.  Executive shall have one year from the Termination Date to exercise any vested Stock Option, unless the terms of the applicable grant documents for any such Stock Option provide for a longer exercise period.  In addition, on the Termination Date, any shares of Restricted Stock previously granted shall be vested and shall be free and clear of any restrictions to the extent such Restricted Stock would have vested and to the extent any such restrictions would have lapsed during the one year period following the Termination Date.
(d)
          
 
For purposes of clarity, in the event Executive does not become an employee of the Company pursuant to the terms and conditions of this Agreement as of the Effective Date as a result of the Company's actions or inactions (other than as a result of any action or inaction of Executive which would permit the Company to terminate Executive's employment for Cause), the Executive shall be entitled to receive the Severance Package, as well as the signing bonus pursuant to Section 4.5 of this Agreement, and the Execution Stock Option and restricted stock as provided in Sections 4.3 and 4.4 of this Agreement, respectively, which Execution Stock Option and restricted stock shall be subject to the provisions of this Section 5.1.1 as if Executive had received such Execution Stock Option and restricted stock prior to the Termination Date.  However, in lieu of the payment of the costs associated with continuing the benefits which Executive is entitled to receive pursuant to Section 4.6 of this Agreement as part of the Severance Package as provided in Section 5.1.1(b), the Company shall pay the cost of the balance of Executive's COBRA continuation coverage from Executive's prior employer, if elected, for a period of 18 months or such shorter period as Executive's COBRA continuation coverage ceases.
(e)
          
 
.  For purposes of this Section 5.1, a "termination without Cause" by the Company shall be deemed to have occurred where Executive has complied with the "Deemed Termination Process"
5.1.2.
      
Deemed Termination
 
 
(hereinafter defined) following the occurrence of any of the following events (a "Deemed Termination Condition") without the Executive's prior written consent:
 
A diminution of Executive's Base salary (other than in connection with a Company-wide decrease in salary affecting all or substantially all senior management employees of the Company);
(a)
          
 
A diminution in Executive's authority, duties,  responsibilities or CEO titlewithout Cause;
(b)
          
 
A material change in the geographic location of Executive's place of employment (for purposes of this paragraph, a "material change" shall be deemed to occur only if the Company relocates Executive's place of employment by a distance of more then fifty (50) miles, excluding any relocation to the Company's existing offices in Woburn, MA); or
(c)
          
 
The Company fails to grant the Execution Stock Option or the restricted stock as provided in Sections 4.3 and 4.4 of this Agreement, respectively.
(d)
          
 
The Company materially breaches any of its obligations to Executive pursuant to this Agreement, including but not limited to its obligation to nominate and renominate Executive to serve as a member of the Board.
(e)
          
 
"Deemed Termination Process" shall mean that (i) the Executive reasonably determines in good faith that a Deemed Termination Condition has occurred; (ii) the Executive provides written notice to the Board of the occurrence of the Deemed Termination Condition within 45 days of the initial occurrence of such condition; (iii) the Executive cooperates in good faith with the Company's efforts, for a period not less than 30 days following such notice (the "Cure Period"), to remedy the Deemed Termination Condition; (iv) notwithstanding such efforts, the Deemed Termination Condition continues to exist; and (v) the Executive provides the Company with a Notice of Termination, which establishes a Termination Date within 30 days after the end of the Cure Period.  If the Company cures the Deemed Termination Condition during the Cure Period, a "termination without Cause" shall be deemed not to have occurred.
 
.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, Executive's employment hereunder may be terminated by the Company at any time for Cause.  For purposes of this Agreement, "Cause" shall mean: (i) Executive's failure to follow the reasonable instructions of the Board or otherwise perform Executive's duties hereunder (other than as a result of a Disability (as defined in Section 5.3)) for thirty (30) days after a written demand for performance is delivered to Executive on behalf of the Company, which demand specifically identifies the manner in which the Company alleges that
5.2.
         
For Cause by the Company
 
 
Executive has not substantially followed such instructions or otherwise performed Executive's duties; (ii) material violation by Executive of the Company's Code of Conduct; (iii) Executive's willful misconduct that is materially injurious to the Company (whether from a monetary perspective or otherwise); (iv) Executive's willful commission of an act constituting fraud with respect to the Company; (v) conviction of Executive for a felony under the laws of the United States or any state thereof; or (vi) Executive's material breach of Executive's obligations under Sections 7 or 8 hereof, provided that the Company first provides Executive with written notice of such material breach.  A final determination of whether Cause exists under this Agreement, including but not limited to any determination of whether any act or omission of Executive constitutes a "material" violation of the Company's Code of Conduct, a "material" breach of this Agreement, or is "materially injurious" to the Company, shall be made by the Board.
 
If Executive's employment is terminated by the Company for Cause, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that the Company shall pay Executive all Base Salary owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date.
 
.  Subject to the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act, Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 151B and any other applicable laws, Executive's employment hereunder may be terminated by the Company at any time in the event of the Disability of Executive.  For purposes of this Agreement, "Disability" shall mean the inability of Executive to perform the essential functions of Executive's position, with or without reasonable accommodation, due to physical or mental disablement which continues for a period of four (4) consecutive months during the Employment Term, as determined by an independent qualified physician mutually acceptable to the Company and Executive (or Executive's personal representative) or, if the Company and Executive (or such representative) are unable to agree on an independent qualified physician, as determined by a panel of three physicians, one designated by the Company, one designated by Executive (or such representative) and one designated by the two physicians so designated.  If Executive's employment is terminated by the Company for Disability, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that (a) the Company shall pay Executive all Base Salary owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date, plus the signing bonus pursuant to Section 4.5 of this Agreement, if not previously paid, and shall grant Executive the Execution Stock Option as provided in Section 4.3 and subject to Sections 4.3 and 5.3 of this Agreement and the restricted stock as provided in Section 4.4 and subject to Sections 4.4 and 5.3 of this Agreement, both to the extent not previously granted; (b) in the event the Company terminates Executive by reason of Disability after a calendar year has been completed but before the annual bonus, if any, relating to that calendar year
5.3.
         
Disability
 
 
as provided in Section 4.2 above has been paid, the Company shall pay Executive such annual bonus amount, if awarded; and (c) provided that Executive first executes a general release in a form and of a scope reasonably acceptable to the Company within sixty (60) days of the Termination Date, Executive shall be entitled to the Severance Package, except that the portion of the Severance Payment based on Executive's Base Salary paid as a part of the Severance Package shall be reduced by the amount of Base Salary, salary continuation (short-term disability), and cash disability benefits (long-term disability) paid to Executive for the corresponding period under the Company's employee benefit plans as then in effect, and any Stock Option held as of the Termination Date shall become immediately exercisable as to all option shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate and shall have one year from the Termination Date to exercise any vested Stock Option, unless the terms of the applicable grant documents for any such Stock Option provide for a longer exercise period, and any shares of Restricted Stock previously granted shall immediately be free and clear of any restrictions.
 
.  Executive's employment hereunder shall automatically terminate in the event of Executive's death.  If Executive's employment is terminated by the death of Executive, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that (a) the Company shall pay to Executive's estate or legal representative all Base Salary owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date, plus the signing bonus pursuant to Section 4.5 of this Agreement, if not previously paid, and shall grant Executive the Execution Stock Option as provided in Section 4.3 and subject to Sections 4.3 and 5.4 of this Agreement, and the restricted stock as provided in Section 4.4 and subject to Section 4.4 and 5.4 of this Agreement, both to the extent not previously granted, (b) in the event the Company terminates Executive by reason of Death after a calendar year has been completed but before the annual bonus, if any, relating to that calendar year as provided in Section 4.2 above has been paid, the Company shall pay Executive such annual bonus amount, if awarded; and (c) provided that Executive's estate first executes a general release in a form and of a scope reasonably acceptable to the Company within ninety (90) days of the Termination Date, Executive shall be entitled to the Severance Package, and any Stock Option held as of the Termination Date shall become immediately exercisable as to all option shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate and shall have one year from the Termination Date to exercise any vested Stock Option, unless the terms of the applicable grant documents for any such Stock Option provide for a longer exercise period, and any shares of Restricted Stock previously granted shall immediately be free and clear of any restrictions.
5.4.
         
Death
 
.  Executive's employment hereunder may be terminated by Executive at any time upon not less than thirty (30) days prior written notice from Executive to the Board.  Executive agrees that such notice
5.5.
         
Termination by Executive
 
 
period is reasonable and necessary in light of the duties assumed by Executive pursuant to this Agreement and fair in light of the consideration Executive is receiving pursuant to this Agreement.  If Executive terminates Executive's employment with the Company pursuant to this Section 5.5, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that the Company shall pay Executive all amounts owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO as of the Termination Date.
 
.  Any purported termination of employment by the Company or by Executive shall be communicated by written Notice of Termination to the other Party in accordance with Section 9 hereof.  For purposes of this Agreement, a "Notice of Termination" shall mean a notice which shall indicate the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon and shall set forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of employment under the provision so indicated.
5.6.
         
Notice of Termination
 
.  The provisions of Section 7 shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
5.7.
         
Survival
 
.  It is the intention of the parties to this Agreement that, to the extent possible, no payment or entitlement pursuant to this Agreement will give rise to any adverse tax consequences to Executive under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code ("Code") and Department of Treasury regulations and other interpretive guidance issued thereunder, including that issued after the date hereof (collectively, "Section 409A").  The Agreement shall be interpreted to that end and consistent with that objective.  Notwithstanding any other provision herein, if Executive is a "specified employee" as defined in, and pursuant to, Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-1(i) on the Termination Date, no payment of compensation under this Agreement shall be made to Executive during the period lasting six (6) months from the Termination Date.  If any payment to Executive is delayed pursuant to the foregoing sentence, such payment instead shall be made in a lump sum payment on the first business day following the expiration of the six-month period referred to in the prior sentence, and, as of the first business day following the expiration of such six-month period, all such payments shall resume in accordance with the schedule for such payments.
5.8
          
Section 409A of the Code
 
Each payment under this Agreement shall be designated as a "separate payment" within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code.  To the extent any reimbursement or in-kind benefit due to Executive under this Agreement constitutes "deferred compensation" under Section 409A of the Code, any such reimbursement or in-kind benefit shall be paid to Executive in a manner consistent with Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-3(i)(1)(iv).
 
.  In the event that both (i) a Change of Control occurs and (ii) the Company terminates Executive's employment without Cause (or is
6.
            
Accelerated Vesting in Change of Control
 
 
deemed to terminate Executive's employment without Cause) within the period commencing three months prior to the latest possible date of a Change of Control and ending one year after the latest possible date of a Change of Control, any Stock Option held by Executive shall become immediately exercisable as to all option shares without regard to the vesting schedule set forth on the applicable Option Certificate, and any shares of Restricted Stock previously granted shall immediately be free and clear of any restrictions.  For purposes of this Agreement, any one of the following events shall be considered a "Change of Control" of the Company:
 
Acquisition by any "person" (as such term is defined in Section 3(a)(9) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) of any amount of the Company's Common Stock so that such person holds or controls fifty percent (50%) or more of the Company's Common Stock;
(a)
          
 
Merger or consolidation of the Company with or into any other entity in which the holders of the Company's outstanding shares of capital stock immediately before such merger or consolidation do not, immediately after such merger or consolidation, retain capital stock representing a majority of the voting power of the surviving entity of such merger or consolidation;
(b)
          
 
Sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company to a third party;
(c)
          
 
Within any twenty-four (24) month period, the election by the stockholders of the Company of twenty percent (20%) or more of the directors of the Company other than pursuant to nomination by the Board, or its designated committee; or
(d)
          
 
Execution of a legally binding, definitive agreement approved by the Board of Directors providing for any of the events set forth in (a), (b), (c) or (d) above.
(e)
          
 
.
7.
            
Confidentiality
 
.  As used herein, the term "Confidential Information" shall mean any and all ideas, inventions, information, know-how, compounds, materials and other items (whether patentable or not) that are confidential or proprietary to the Company (or to its affiliates, collaborators, consultants, suppliers, or customers) whether disclosed in written, oral, tangible or other form and whether or not labeled or otherwise identified as confidential or proprietary.  Confidential Information shall include, without limitation, the following to the extent proprietary to the Company (or to its affiliates, collaborators, consultants, suppliers or customers) and not publicly available:
7.1.
         
Definitions
 
inventions, trade secrets, discoveries and computer programs, and any improvements or modifications thereto;
(a)
          
 
engineering, research, development and design projects, data, designs, drawings and specifications;
(b)
          
 
 
(c)
                                 
manufacturing, development and other technical processes, applications, methods, apparatus and equipment;
 
(d)
                                
business information such as lists of approved components and sources, price lists, product costs, production schedules, business plans, sales information, profit and loss information, and customer and collaborator lists;
 
(e)
                                 
any and all reagents, substances, chemical compounds, subcellular constituents, cells or cell lines, organisms and progeny, and mutants, as well as any and all derivatives or replications derived from or relating to such materials; and
 
(f)
                                   
any and all information, materials and other items supplied by third parties to the Company (or generated by the Company for third parties) under an obligation of confidentiality.
 
7.2.
                             
Non-Disclosure
.  Executive shall not at any time (whether during or after Executive's employment with the Company) disclose or use any Confidential Information for Executive's own benefit or purposes or the benefit or purposes of any other person, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation or other organization, entity or enterprise (a "Person") other than the Company.
 
7.3.
                             
Exceptions
.  Notwithstanding any other provision in the Agreement, Confidential Information shall not include any information or material which:
 
(a)
                                 
is or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of disclosure thereof by Executive;
 
(b)
                                
is lawfully received by Executive on a non-confidential basis from a third party that is not itself under an obligation of confidentiality or non-disclosure to the Company with respect to such information;
 
(c)
                                 
can be shown by Executive to have been independently developed by Executive;
 
(d)
                                
Executive establishes by competent proof was in Executive's possession at the time of disclosure by the Company and was not acquired, directly or indirectly from the Company; or
 
(e)
                                 
is required to be publicly disclosed by law or by regulation; provided, however, that in such event Executive shall provide the Company with prompt advance notice of such disclosure so that the Company has the opportunity if it so desires to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy.
 
7.4.
                             
Return of Company Property
.  Executive agrees that upon termination of Executive's employment hereunder, Executive shall return immediately to the
 
Company any proprietary materials, any materials containing Confidential Information and any other Company property then in Executive's possession or under Executive's control, including, without limitation all notes, drawings, lists, memoranda, magnetic disks or tapes, or other recording media containing such Confidential Information, whether alone or together with non-confidential information, all documents, reports, files, memoranda, records, software, credit cards, door and file keys, telephones, PDAs, computers, computer access codes, disks and instructional manuals, or any other physical property that Executive received, prepared, or helped prepare in connection with Executive's employment under this Agreement.  Upon termination, Executive shall not retain any copies, duplicates, reproductions, or excerpts of Confidential Information, nor shall Executive show or give any of the above to any third party.  Executive further agrees that Executive shall not retain or use for Executive's account at any time any trade name, trademark, service mark, logo or other proprietary business designation used or owned in connection with the business of the Company.
 
8.
                                      
Non-Competition; Non-Solicitation
.
 
8.1
                                
Non-Competition
.  During Executive's employment with the Company or any of its affiliates and for a period of two (2) years after the termination or cessation of such employment for any reason, Executive shall not directly or indirectly, alone or through any other organization or entity, including without limitation becoming an employee, investor (except as provided below), officer, agent, partner, member or director of any such organization or entity, engage or prepare to engage in any Competitive Activity.  For purposes of this Agreement, the term "Competitive Activity" means any area of business that the Company or any of its affiliates worldwide (which affiliates shall not include any entity that purchases the Company or otherwise acquires all or substantially all of the Company's assets and any of such purchasing or acquiring entity's affiliates) conducted or actively planned to conduct at any time during Executive's employment, including but not limited to oncological drug development and kinase platform drug development.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, Executive shall not be deemed to be engaged directly or indirectly in any Competitive Activity if Executive participates in any such business solely as a passive investor in up to one percent (1%) of the equity securities of a company or partnership, and provided further that it shall not be a violation of this Section for Executive (i) to accept employment with or otherwise perform services for any entity which engages in Competitive Activity, provided that the operations of such entity are not substantially devoted to engaging in Competitive Activity and provided further that at least one level of executive management exists within such entity between Executive and any Competitive Activity; or (ii) to accept employment with or otherwise perform services for any entity which engages in Competitive Activity provided that the business unit within such entity in which Executive is employed or otherwise performing services, is in no way engaged, directly or indirectly, in any Competitive Activity.  For purposes of this Section, Executive shall be deemed to be engaging in Competitive Activity as of the date that Executive accepts employment or consulting engagement with any other person or entity, regardless of when
 
Executive actually begins providing services under such employment or consulting engagement, but only if Executive is preparing to engage in Competitive Activity during such period.  Nothing in this Section shall be construed to affect in any way Executive's confidentiality obligations as set forth in Section 7 of this Agreement.  Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit Executive from seeking permission from the Board to engage in any activity which may otherwise fall within the definition of Competitive Activity as set forth in this Section, provided that a grant of permission from the Board, if any, must be in writing.
 
8.2
                                
Non-Solicitation
.  During Executive's employment with the Company or any of its affiliates and for a period of two (2) years after the termination or cessation of such employment for any reason thereafter, Executive will not directly or indirectly: (a) solicit, divert or take away, or attempt to divert or take away, the business or patronage of any of the clients, customers or accounts, or prospective clients, customers or accounts of the Company or its affiliates with whom the Company or its affiliates has or is actively negotiating a written agreement as of the Termination Date; (b) recruit, solicit or hire any person who is, or within the six (6) month period preceding the Termination Date was, an officer, director or employee of the Company or any of its affiliates or was a scientific consultant with an exclusive arrangement with the Company or any of its affiliates; or (c) induce or attempt to induce any officer, director, employee consultant, agent or representative of the Company or any of its affiliates to discontinue his or her relationship with the Company or any of its affiliates or to commence an employment or other business relationship with another entity.
 
9.
                                      
Other Agreements
.  Executive hereby represent to the Company that Executive is not bound by any agreement or any other previous or existing business relationship which conflicts with or prevents the full performance of Executive's duties and obligations to the Company (including Executive's duties and obligations under this or any other agreement with the Company).  Executive understands that the Company does not desire to acquire from Executive any trade secrets or confidential business information Executive may have acquired from others.  Therefore, Executive agree that during the Employment Term and thereafter, Executive will not improperly use or disclose any proprietary information or trade secrets of any former or concurrent employer, or any other person or entity with whom Executive has an agreement or to whom Executive owes a duty to keep such information in confidence.
 
10.
                                
Injunctive Relief
.  Executive acknowledges and agrees that the Company's remedies at law for a breach or threatened breach of any of the provisions of Sections 7 and 8 would be inadequate and, in recognition of this fact, Executive agrees that, in the event of such a breach or threatened breach, in addition to any remedies at law, the Company, without posting any bond, shall be entitled to obtain equitable relief in the form of specific performance, temporary restraining orders, temporary or permanent injunctions or any other equitable remedy which may then be available.  In addition, in the event that Executive breaches any provision of Sections 7 or 8 of this Agreement, the applicable time periods set forth in such Sections, shall be extended for a period of time equal to the
 
period of time during which Executive was in breach of the Agreement, up to a maximum of twenty-four months, and if the Company is required to seek relief from such breach in any judicial proceedings, then such time limitations shall extend for a period of time equal to the pendency of any such proceedings, including all appeals, up to a maximum of twenty-four months.  In connection with the restrictions in Sections 7 and 8, Executive represents that his economic means are such that those provisions will not prevent him from providing for himself and his family on a basis satisfactory to Executive.
 
11.
                                
Excess Parachute Payments
.  If any payment or benefit Executive would receive under this Agreement, when combined with any other payment or benefit Executive receives pursuant to the termination of Executive's employment with the Company ("Payment") would constitute in whole or in part an "excess parachute payment" within the meaning of Section 280G of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code") subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Code (the "Excise Tax"), then such Payment shall be either (i) the full amount of such Payment or (ii) such lesser amount (with cash payments being reduced before stock option compensation) as would result if the payment were reduced until no portion of the Payment was subject to the Excise Tax, whichever of the foregoing amounts, taking into account the applicable federal state and local employments taxes, income taxes, and the Excise Tax, results in Executive's retention, on an after-tax basis, of the greater net amount.
 
12.
                                
Notices
.  Any notice hereunder by either Party to the other shall be given in writing by personal delivery, telex, facsimile, overnight courier or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed, if to the Company, to the attention of the Chair of the Board at the Company's executive offices or to such other address as the Board may designate in writing at any time or from time to time to Executive, and if to Executive, to Executive's most recent address on file with the Company.  Notice shall be deemed given, if by personal delivery or by overnight courier, on the date of such delivery or, if by telex or facsimile, on the business day following receipt of answer back or facsimile information or, if by certified mail, on the date shown on the applicable return receipt.
 
13.
                                
Assignment
.  This Agreement may not be assigned by either Party without the prior written consent of the other Party, provided, however, that the Company may assign this Agreement without Executive's consent in the event of a merger, acquisition, or transfer of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company with or to a third party (a "Merger").  In the event of a Merger, the Company shall require in writing any successor Person to assume and agree to perform this Agreement; failure to so assume and agree shall constitute a Deemed Termination Condition for purposes of Section 5.1.2(d).
 
14.
                                
Entire Agreement
.  This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the Parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and there have been no oral or other agreements of any kind whatsoever as a condition precedent or inducement to the signing of this Agreement or otherwise concerning this Agreement or the subject matter hereof.
 
15.
                                
Expenses
.  The Parties shall each pay their own respective expenses incident to the enforcement or interpretation of, or dispute resolution with respect to, this Agreement, including all fees and expenses of their counsel for all activities of such counsel
 
undertaken pursuant to this Agreement, provided, however, that in the event Executive is the prevailing Party in any judicial proceeding relating to this Agreement, the Company shall reimburse Executive for all reasonable costs, fees and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) incurred by Executive in connection with such proceeding.
 
16.
                                
Waivers and Further Agreements
.  Any waiver of any terms or conditions of this Agreement shall not operate as a waiver of any other breach of such terms or conditions or any other term or condition, nor shall any failure to enforce any provision hereof operate as a waiver of such provision or of any other provision hereof; provided, however, that no such written waiver, unless it, by its own terms, explicitly provides to the contrary, shall be construed to effect a continuing waiver of the provision being waived and no such waiver in any instance shall constitute a waiver in any other instance or for any other purpose or impair the right of the Party against whom such waiver is claimed in all other instances or for all other purposes to require full compliance with such provision.  Each of the Parties agrees to execute all such further instruments and documents and to take all such further action as the other Party may reasonably require in order to effectuate the terms and purposes of this Agreement.
 
17.
                                
Amendments
.  This Agreement may not be amended, nor shall any waiver, change, modification, consent or discharge be effected except by an instrument in writing executed by both Parties.
 
18.
                                
Severability
.  If any provision of this Agreement shall be held or deemed to be, or shall in fact be, invalid, inoperative or unenforceable as applied to any particular case in any jurisdiction or jurisdictions, or in all jurisdictions or in all cases, because of the conflict of any provision with any constitution or statute or rule of public policy or for any other reason, such circumstance shall not have the effect of rendering the provision or provisions in question invalid, inoperative or unenforceable in any other jurisdiction or in any other case or circumstance or of rendering any other provision or provisions herein contained invalid, inoperative or unenforceable to the extent that such other provisions are not themselves actually in conflict with such constitution, statute or rule of public policy, but this Agreement shall be reformed and construed in any such jurisdiction or case as if such invalid, inoperative or unenforceable provision had never been contained herein and such provision reformed so that it would be valid, operative and enforceable to the maximum extent permitted in such jurisdiction or in such case.
 
19.
                                
Counterparts
.  This Agreement maybe executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
 
20.
                                
Section Headings
.  The headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not in any way affect the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.
 
21.
                                
Governing Law and Forum
.  This Agreement shall in all events and for all purposes be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts without regard to any choice of law principle that would dictate the application of the laws of another jurisdiction.  Any action, suit or other legal proceeding
 
which may be commenced to resolve any matter arising under or relating to any provision of this Agreement shall be commenced only in a court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts (or, if appropriate, a federal court located within Massachusetts), and the parties hereby consent to the jurisdiction of such court with respect to any action, suit or proceeding commenced in such court.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Agreement as of the Execution Date.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT A
 
Outside Activities
 
1.  .  This Option is issued pursuant to the terms of the Plan and may be amended as provided in the Plan.  Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined in this certificate have the meanings given to them in the Plan.  This certificate does not set forth all of the terms and conditions of the Plan, which are incorporated herein by reference, and nothing herein shall be deemed to supercede the terms and conditions of the Plan.  The Committee administers the Plan and its determinations regarding the operation of the Plan are final and binding.  Copies of the Plan may be obtained upon written request without charge from the Company.
Plan Incorporated by Reference
[
This Option is intended to be an "incentive stock option" to the extent permissible under Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (the "Code"), including the $100,000 limitation of Code Section 422(d).]
 
2.  .  The price to be paid for each share of Common Stock issued upon exercise of the whole or any part of this Option is the Option Price set forth on the face of this certificate.
Option Price
 
3.  .  This Option may be exercised at any time and from time to time over the number of shares and in accordance with the vesting schedule set forth on the face of this certificate, but only for the purchase of whole shares, provided that if Option Holder's employment is terminated by the Company pursuant to Section 5.1 (including 5.1.2), 5.3 or 5.4 of the Employment Agreement between the Company and Option Holder dated April 15, 2008 ("Employment Agreement"), then this Option may be exercised at any time and from time to time over the number of shares and in accordance with the vesting schedule set forth in the applicable Section of the Employment Agreement and subject to the terms and conditions of such applicable Section of the Employment Agreement.   Notwithstanding the foregoing, this Option may not be exercised as to any shares after the Expiration Date
Vesting Schedule
.
 
4.  .  To exercise this Option, the Option Holder shall deliver written notice of exercise to the Company specifying the number of shares with respect to which the Option is being exercised accompanied by payment of the Option Price for such shares in cash, by certified check or in such other form, including shares of Common Stock of the Company valued at their Fair Market Value on the date of delivery, as the Committee may approve.  Promptly following such a notice, the Company will deliver to the Option Holder a certificate representing the number of shares with respect to which the Option is being exercised.
Method of Exercise
 
5.  .  The Option Holder shall not have any rights in respect of shares as to which the Option shall not have been exercised and payment made as provided above.  The Option Holder shall not have any rights to continued employment by the Company or any group company by virtue of the grant of this Option.
Rights as a Stockholder or Employee
 
6.  .  As provided in the Plan, in the event of a corporate transaction affecting the Company's outstanding Common Stock, the Committee shall equitably adjust the number and kind of shares subject to this Option and the exercise price hereunder or make provision for a cash payment.  If such transaction involves a consolidation or merger of the Company with another entity, the sale or exchange of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company or a reorganization or liquidation of the Company, then in lieu of the foregoing, the Committee may upon written notice to the Option Holder provide that this
Recapitalization, Mergers, Etc
Option shall terminate on a date not less than 20 days after the date of such notice unless theretofore exercised.  In connection with such notice, the Committee may in its discretion accelerate or waive any deferred exercise period.
 
7.             .  This Option is not transferable by the Option Holder other than upon the death of the Option Holder, in accordance with the Plan.
Option Not Transferable
 
8.  .  Except as expressly set forth in this Paragraph, Paragraph 9 of this Agreement or as expressly set forth in the Employment Agreement (and, in that case, subject to the applicable terms and conditions of the Employment Agreement), if the Option Holder's employment with (a) the Company, or (b) a corporation (or parent or subsidiary corporation of such corporation) issuing or assuming a stock option in a transaction to which section 424(a) of the Code applies, is terminated for any reason, the Option Holder may exercise the rights which were available to the Option Holder at the time of such termination only within three months from the date of termination.  Upon the death of the Option Holder, his or her Designated Beneficiary shall have the right, at any time within twelve months after the date of death, to exercise in whole or in part any rights that were available to the Option Holder at the time of death.  It is understood and agreed, however, that any part of the Option intended to be an "incentive stock option" that is not exercised within three months following the date of termination will lose incentive stock option qualification and automatically convert to a Nonstatutory Stock Option for the remainder of the applicable exercise period.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, no rights under this Option may be exercised after the Expiration Date.
Exercise of Option After Termination of Employment
 
9.  .  Upon Retirement, as defined below, any unvested shares set forth on the face of this certificate shall vest, and this Option may be exercised in whole or part until the earlier of up to two years from the date of Retirement or the Expiration Date.  "Retirement" as to any Option Holder shall mean such person's leaving the employment of the Company or an Affiliate after reaching age 55 with ten (10) years of full-time continuous service with the Company; provided, that the sum of the Option Holder's age plus the number of years of continuous service equals or exceed seventy (70).
Exercise of Option Upon Retirement
 
10.  .  It shall be a condition to the Option Holder's right to purchase shares of Common Stock hereunder that the Company may, in its discretion, require (a) that the shares of Common Stock reserved for issue upon the exercise of this Option shall have been duly listed, upon official notice of issuance, upon any national securities exchange or automated quotation system on which the Company's Common Stock may then be listed or quoted, (b) that either (i) a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933 with respect to the shares shall be in effect, or (ii) in the opinion of counsel for the Company, the proposed purchase shall be exempt from registration under that Act and the Option Holder shall have made such undertakings and agreements with the Company as the Company may reasonably require, and (c) that such other steps, if any, as counsel for the Company shall consider necessary to comply with any law applicable to the issue of such shares by the Company shall have been taken by the Company or the Option Holder, or both.  The certificates representing the shares purchased under this Option may contain such legends as counsel for the Company shall consider necessary to comply with any applicable law.
Compliance with Securities Laws
 
11.  .  To the extent applicable: The Option Holder shall pay to the Company, or make provision satisfactory to the Company for payment of, any taxes required by law to be withheld with respect to the exercise of this Option.  The Committee may, in its discretion, require any other Income taxes imposed on the sale of the shares to be paid by the Option Holder.  In the Committee's discretion, such tax obligations may be paid by entering into some other arrangements to ensure that such amount is available to them or it (whether by authorizing the sale of some or all of the shares and payment to the Company or the member of the Group (as the case may be) of the requisite amount of the proceeds of sale or otherwise). The
Payment of Taxes
 
 
Company and any group company may, to the extent permitted by law, deduct any such tax obligations from any payment of any kind otherwise due to the Option Holder.
 
12.    By acknowledging and accepting this award, you understand that, in order to perform its requirements under the Plan, the Company may transfer and process personal data and/or sensitive personal data about you.  Such data may include but is not limited to personal and financial data about you and sale of shares purchased under the Plan from time to time.  You also hereby give explicit consent to the Company to transfer and process any such personal data and/or sensitive data outside the country in which you work or are employed including countries which may be outside the European Economic Area where there may be no legislation in relation to an individual's rights concerning personal data.  This may also apply to other companies in the Company group, third party advisers and administrators or regulatory authorities.
Transfer of Personal Data.
 
13.  .  The Option Holder acknowledges that, to the extent the aggregate Fair Market Value of stock with respect to which "incentive stock options" (within the meaning of Section 422 of the Code, but without regard to Section 422(d) of the Code), including this Option, are exercisable for the first time by the Option Holder during any calendar year (under the Plan and all other incentive stock option plans of the Company, any Subsidiary and any parent corporation thereof (within the meaning of Section 422 of the Code)) exceeds $100,000, such options shall be treated as Nonstatutory Options to the extent required by Section 422 of the Code.  The Option Holder further acknowledges that the rule set forth in the preceding sentence shall be applied by taking options into account in the order in which they were granted.  For purposes of these rules, the Fair Market Value of stock shall be determined as of the time the option with respect to such stock is granted.
Special Tax Consequences
This Restricted Stock Agreement ("Agreement") between ArQule, Inc. (the "Company") and Paolo Pucci (the "Grantee") dated as of [date].
 
1.  .
Grant; Plan Incorporated by Reference
 
                (a)  On the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, the Company hereby awards to Grantee 125,000 shares of Stock (the "Restricted Stock"), as provided for in Section 4.4 of the Employment Agreement between the Company and Grantee dated April 15, 2008 (the "Employment Agreement").  The award of the Restricted Shares is made pursuant to and is governed by the ArQule, Inc. Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan"), the terms of which are incorporated into this Agreement by this reference, and nothing herein shall be deemed to supercede the terms and conditions of the Plan.  Upon execution of this Agreement, the Company will cause the shares of Restricted Stock to be issued, in electronic form (with the restrictions contained herein electronically noted) in the Grantee's name.  The term "Restricted Stock" shall include any additional shares of Stock issued on account of the forgoing shares by reason of stock dividends, stock splits or recapitalizations (whether by way of mergers, consolidations, combinations or exchanges of shares or the like).
 
                (b)  Grantee agrees and acknowledges that this Agreement shall constitute, for purposes of Section 151(f) of the Delaware General Corporation Law, notice of the restrictions set forth herein with respect to the Restricted Stock.
 
                (c)  Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined in this Agreement will have the meanings ascribed to them in the Plan.  The Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee of the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. (the "Committee") administers the Plan and its determinations regarding the interpretation and operation of the Plan are final and binding.  A copy of the Plan, the Plan Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement are available on the ArQule Intranet site.
 
2.  .  Subject to Section 8 below, and subject to the terms and conditions of the Employment Agreement, the schedule for vesting of rights (i.e., the date upon which the restrictions on the Grantee's Restricted Stock will lapse) is as follows:
Schedule for Vesting of Rights
 
(a)
                                 
62,500 shares of Restricted Stock will be vested and free of restrictions as of the effective date of the Employment Agreement; and
 
(b)
                                
62,500 shares of Restricted Stock will be vested and free of restrictions on the first anniversary of the effective date of the Employment Agreement.
 
3.  .  Subject to the terms and conditions of the Employment Agreement, if the Grantee ceases to be an employee of the Company or an affiliate for any reason, including disability, death and retirement, all shares of Restricted Stock that remain subject to the restrictions imposed under Section 2 hereof shall be forfeited upon such termination of employment and returned to the Company unless the Board or Committee in its discretion shall otherwise determine, and
Forfeiture
 
neither the Grantee nor any successors, heirs, assigns or personal representatives of the Grantee shall thereafter have any further rights or interest in such shares.
 
4.  .  The Grantee will have all the rights of a shareholder with respect to the Restricted Stock except as provided in Section 5 below.  Accordingly, the Grantee will have the right during the Restricted Period to vote the Restricted Stock and to receive any dividends paid with respect to the Restricted Stock.  All such rights shall cease upon forfeiture of the Restricted Stock.
Rights as a Stockholder
 
5.  .
Award not Transferable
 
(a)  For purposes of this Agreement, "Restricted Period" shall mean, with respect to any shares of Restricted Stock, the period of time between the date of this Agreement and the date on which rights in such shares of Restricted Stock become vested in accordance with Section 2 above.
 
(b)  During the Restricted Period, neither the Restricted Stock nor any rights relating to such shares may be sold, transferred, assigned, pledged or otherwise encumbered or disposed of by the Grantee.
 
(c)  The Company shall not be required (i) to transfer on its books any shares of Restricted Stock which have been sold or transferred in violation of any of the provisions of this Agreement, or (ii) to treat as owner of such shares or to accord the right to vote or to pay dividends to anyone to whom such shares have been so transferred.
 
6.  .  In the event that the Restricted Period shall terminate with respect to the Restricted Stock and the Restricted Stock shall not have been previously forfeited to the Company, the Company will remove the restrictions on the shares and will deliver (in either electronic or certificated form) such unrestricted shares to the Grantee or his or her legal representative.
Termination of Restrictions
 
7.  .  If the Grantee timely files an election pursuant to Section 83(b) of the Code in respect of the Restricted Stock, the Grantee shall promptly deliver to the Company a copy of the election.
Section 83(b) Election
 
8.  .  Any obligation of the Company to deliver shares upon the termination of the Restricted Period with respect to the Restricted Stock, and any obligation to deliver any dividends on those shares, will be subject to the satisfaction of all applicable federal, state and local tax withholding requirements.  Unless otherwise determined by the Committee, withholding requirements shall, at Grantee's election, be satisfied with respect to shares of Restricted Stock (i) for which no Section 83(b) election is made, by (A) the Company's retention of shares, with a Fair Market Value equal to the Company's required withholding obligation, otherwise issuable to the Grantee as the result of the termination of the Restricted Period, or (B) by the Company's withholding, through payroll, of the required amounts from payments otherwise due to the Grantee and (ii) for which a Section 83(b) election is made, by the Company's withholding, through payroll, of the required amounts from payments otherwise due to the Grantee.
Taxes
 
Unless otherwise determined by the Committee, withholding requirements with respect to any dividend paid on shares of Restricted Stock during the Restricted Period shall be satisfied (i) in the case of a cash dividend, by withholding from such cash, and (ii) in the case of a stock
 
dividend, by withholding shares from such dividend with a Fair Market Value equal to the Company's required withholding obligation.
 
The Grantee hereby authorizes and agrees to all such tax withholding.  For purposes of this Section 8, shares that are withheld to satisfy any applicable withholding obligation shall be valued at their Fair Market Value on the date the withholding obligation arises and in no event shall the aggregate Fair Market Value of the shares withheld exceed the amount of taxes required to be withheld.
 
9.  .  Nothing in the Plan or this Agreement confers upon the Grantee any right to continue in the service of the Company for any period of specific duration or shall be construed to interfere with or otherwise restrict in any way the rights of the Company or of the Grantee, which rights are expressly reserved by each, to terminate the Grantee's service at any time and for any reason, with or without cause.
No Retention Rights
 
10.  .  It shall be a condition to Grantee's right to receive the shares of Restricted Stock hereunder that the Company may, in its discretion, require (a) that the shares of Restricted Stock shall have been duly listed, upon official notice of issuance, upon any national securities exchange or automated quotation system on which the Company's Common Stock may then be listed or quoted, (b) that either (i) a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), with respect to the shares shall be in effect, or (ii) in the opinion of counsel for the Company, the proposed issuance and delivery of the shares to the Grantee shall be exempt from registration under the Act and the Grantee shall have made such undertakings and agreements with the Company as the Company may reasonably require, and (c) that such other steps, if any, as counsel for the Company shall consider necessary to comply with any law applicable to the issue of such shares by the Company shall have been taken by the Company or the Grantee, or both.  The certificates representing the shares of Restricted Stock may contain such legends as counsel for the Company shall consider necessary to comply with any applicable law.
Compliance with Securities Laws
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have executed this Agreement effective on the date first set forth above.
 
The exercise price of the Execution Stock Option is the Fair Market Value of ArQule's Common Stock (as defined below) as of the Effective Date as defined in Section 1 of the Employment Agreement between the Company and Executive.
 
The Fair Market Value of ArQule's Common Stock shall be the closing price of the Common Stock as reported by the NASDAQ National Market on the trading day of the commencement of Executive's employment with the Company.
 
Pursuant to Section 5.1.1(a)(ii), the portion of Executive's Severance Payment based on bonuses ("Bonus Severance") awarded to Executive, if any, would be calculated in the following manner:
 
Example #1
 Executive terminated in year one of employment.
 
Bonus Component of Severance Payment = $450,000 (deemed bonus amount for two-year lookback period where Executive did not work for the Company).
 
Example #2
 Executive deemed awarded a $225,000 bonus for year one of employment, and awarded no bonus for year 2 of employment, then terminated during year 3.
 
Bonus Component of Severance Payment = $225,000 (deemed year 1 bonus and year 2 bonus actually awarded).
 
Example #3
 Executive awarded a $225,000 bonus for year 2 of employment, and awarded a $180,000 bonus for year 3 of employment (40% of target), then terminated during year 4.
 
Bonus Component of Severance Payment = $405,000 (total of year 2 and year 3 bonuses actually awarded)
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced the appointment of Paolo Pucci as chief executive officer and a member of the Company's board of directors, effective June 9, 2008.  Mr. Pucci succeeds Dr. Stephen A. Hill, who joined Solvay Pharmaceuticals as president and chief executive officer on April 1, 2008.  Peter Lawrence will remain at ArQule as president and chief operating officer.
Woburn, MA, April 15, 2008 
 
Mr. Pucci comes to ArQule from Bayer A.G., where he currently serves as senior vice president and president in charge of the Bayer-Schering Pharmaceuticals Global Oncology/Specialized Therapeutics Business Units.  Previously Mr. Pucci was senior vice president and president of Bayer Pharmaceuticals Global Specialty Business Unit, head of U.S. Pharmaceutical Operations and a member of the Bayer Pharmaceuticals Global Management Committee.  Mr. Pucci joined Bayer as head of its Italian Pharmaceutical operations in 2001.  Prior to Bayer, Mr. Pucci held positions of increasing responsibility with Eli Lilly, culminating with his appointment as managing director, Eli Lilly Sweden AB.  At Lilly, his responsibilities included operations, sales, marketing and strategic planning.  Mr. Pucci holds an MBA from the University of Chicago and is a graduate of the Universita Degli Studi Di Napoli in Naples, Italy.
 
"Paolo Pucci brings to ArQule an ideal set of professional experiences and skills spanning clinical development, regulatory review, corporate alliance management, product launch and marketing," said Patrick J. Zenner, chairman of ArQule's board of directors. "In particular, his experience with Nexavar (sorafenib), an oral multiple kinase inhibitor to treat liver and kidney cancers, will be invaluable as ArQule advances ARQ 197 and its other product candidates in advanced-stage clinical trials leading to regulatory review and product launch.
 
"Paolo's success in leading stand-alone business units within large pharmaceutical companies makes him a good fit for the entrepreneurial culture of ArQule," said Mr. Zenner.  "His team leadership approach, as exhibited at Bayer and Lilly, will also serve him well as he guides the Company into its next stages of growth."
 
"I am looking forward to joining ArQule at an inflection point in the Company's growth trajectory," said Mr. Pucci.  "ArQule is a well positioned innovator with a novel lead compound in Phase 2 clinical
 
 
trials and multiple earlier-stage product candidates that are differentiated from the competition.  Having contributed to the advancement of novel treatments that have delivered tangible benefits to cancer patients, I believe ArQule has the capability to introduce a new generation of molecules that target cancer cells with a high degree of specificity.  These products, and the technology platforms upon which they are based, have the potential to significantly improve the way cancer is treated."
 
"The entire board would like to thank Peter Lawrence for his leadership of ArQule during this transition period," said Mr. Zenner. "We look forward to Paolo Pucci assuming the role of chief executive officer, and we share his enthusiasm for the prospects of the Company as embodied in its clinical-stage products and its pipeline."
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's clinical-stage products consist of ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, and ARQ 501, an activator of the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor.  The Company's most advanced pre-clinical development programs are focused on ARQ 761, a second-generation E2F-1 activator, as well as compounds that inhibit the Eg5 kinesin spindle protein and the B-RAF kinase.  ArQule's discovery efforts are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate), an energy source for cells.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's products and product candidates.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, the Company's may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully
 
 
pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080516135842.txt.gz
TIME:20080516135842
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On May 12, 2008, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated May 12, 2008
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
May 16, 2008

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
 
Woburn, MA, May 12, 2008
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2008.
 
For the quarter ended March 31, 2008, the Company reported a net loss of $13,914,000 or $0.32 per share, compared to a net loss of $14,504,000, or $0.40 per share, for the first quarter of 2007.
 
At March 31, 2008, the Company had a total of approximately $119,564,000 in cash, equivalents and long-term marketable securities.
 
Operational Review
 
"In March, we enrolled the first patient in a Phase 1/2 clinical trial program of ARQ 197 administered in combination with erlotinib in advanced non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC)," said Peter S. Lawrence, president and chief operating officer of ArQule.  "Following the successful completion of a Phase 1 trial to determine safety, tolerability and a recommended Phase 2 dose of ARQ 197 in combination with erlotinib, we plan to initiate a multi-center, placebo controlled, randomized Phase 2 trial comparing ARQ 197 plus erlotinib to placebo plus erlotinib.
 
"Our Asian partner for ARQ 197, Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd., has moved that compound into Phase 1 clinical testing," said Mr. Lawrence.  "In connection with this milestone, ArQule received a $3 million payment during the quarter from Kyowa.  Our two companies are committed to the timely development of ARQ 197, a selective c-Met inhibitor, and we are pleased that Kyowa is bringing its significant clinical development capabilities and expertise to bear upon this program in Asia.
 
"In April, we announced that we will not pursue clinical testing of ARQ 171, a second generation product in our E2F-1 program," said Mr. Lawrence.  "We are conducting GLP toxicology studies with ARQ 761, another second generation E2F-1 product, after which we would expect to file an IND in the second half of this year.  If we successfully complete pre-clinical and Phase 1 clinical development, we would expect to have a recommended Phase 2 dose for ARQ 761 in 2009.  Our partner, Roche, has an option to the E2F-1 program that runs through 2008, and Roche has the right to extend the option period through 2009 in exchange for financial support of further program deliverables.
 
 
"At the 2008 Annual Meeting of the American Association for Cancer Research in April, we presented several posters based on pre-clinical studies," said Mr. Lawrence.  "Findings from these studies support the Company's novel approaches to molecularly targeted cancer therapy.
 
"Finally, we announced the appointment of Paolo Pucci as chief executive officer and a member of ArQule's board of directors, effective June 9," said Peter S. Lawrence, president and chief operating officer of ArQule.  "Paolo brings an invaluable body of experience in oncology drug development and marketing, including his playing a major role in the development of sorafenib while at Bayer.  I look forward to working closely with him as we advance ARQ 197 and our other product candidates through the clinic."
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
The Company reported total revenues of $3,527,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2008, compared to revenues of $1,652,000 for the first quarter of 2007.  Revenues in the 2008 quarter included a milestone payment and licensing revenue from Kyowa related to ARQ 197 and financial support from Roche related to the E2F-1 program.
 
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended March 31, 2008 were $19,086,000 compared to $17,214,000 for the first quarter of 2007.   Research and development costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2008 were $13,452,000 compared to $13,704,000 for the first quarter of 2007.  General and administrative costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2008 were $5,634,000 compared to $3,510,000 for the first quarter of 2007.  The increased 2008 general and administrative expenses were primarily due to non-cash, stock-based compensation costs resulting from amendments to the Company's employment agreements with Dr. Stephen Hill, its previous president and chief operating officer, who left the Company on March 31, 2008 to assume the position of
the president and chief executive officer of Solvay Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (U.S.)
.
 
Financial Guidance
 
As previously stated, for 2008 ArQule expects revenues to range between $10.0 and $10.5 million, related to the ongoing partnerships with Roche and Kyowa.  Net use of cash is expected to range between $55 and $60 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $69 and $74 million, and net loss per share to range between $1.57 and $1.68 for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2008 with between $75 and $80 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
Conference call details
 
 
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 888-286-8010 and outside the U.S. 617-801-6888.  The access code is 25146187.
 
You may use the following link to pre-register and view important information about this conference call.  Pre-registering is not mandatory, but it will provide you immediate entry into the call and will facilitate the timely start of the call.  You may pre-register at any time, including up to and after the call start time.  To pre-register, go to:
 
http://www.theconferencingservice.com/prereg/key.process?key=PFP4XJHG7
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's clinical-stage products consist of ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, and ARQ 501, an activator of the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor.  The Company's most advanced pre-clinical development programs are focused on ARQ 761, a second-generation E2F-1 activator, as well as compounds that inhibit the Eg5 kinesin spindle protein and the B-RAF kinase.  ArQule's discovery efforts are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate), an energy source for cells.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, as well as its agreements with Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd. and Hoffmann-La Roche.  These statements include references to potential future milestone and royalty payments that could result from the future development of ARQ 197 and products in the Company's E2F-1 cancer program, including ARQ 501 and ARQ 761.  Failure to successfully develop these products could prevent the Company from receiving these future payments.  Additional forward-looking statements relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including Phase 1 and 2 trials with ARQ 197 and to the progress of its pre-clinical development activities with ARQ 761. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 and ARQ 761 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in further pre-clinical testing and in current, later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional
 
 
studies
.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 and ARQ 761 are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080604171515.txt.gz
TIME:20080604171515
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
                          
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
                          
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
                          
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          
 
 
Section 8Other Events
 
Item 8.01   Other Events.
 
On May 15, 2008, at the 2008 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc. (the
"Registrant") the stockholders voted:
 
1.     to elect Ronald M. Lindsay, William G. Messenger, and Patrick J. Zenner as directors of the Registrant to hold office for a term of three years and until their respective successors are elected and qualified;
 
2.     not to approve amendments to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan") to increase the number of shares of common stock available for to awards granted under the Plan by 2,400,000, from 9,600,000 to 12,000,000 shares of common stock and to incorporate other changes described in the Registrant's proxy statement; and
 
3.     to ratify the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit the Registrant's financial statements for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2008.
 
The voting results are set forth in Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1  Report of Matters Voted Upon by Stockholders
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
June 4, 2008

Exhibit 99.1
 
1.
              
The 2008 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of the Registrant (the "Annual Meeting") was held at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, on May 15, 2008 commencing at 10:00 a.m. pursuant to notice properly given.
 
2.
              
At the close of business on March 28, 2008, the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the Annual Meeting, the outstanding voting securities of the Company were 43,772,775 shares of common stock, $0.01 par value.  Each of the outstanding shares was entitled to one vote on the matters to come before the Annual Meeting.
 
3.
              
At the Annual Meeting 34,148,594 shares of the Registrant's issued and outstanding common stock, were represented in person or by proxy, constituting a quorum.
 
4.
              
At the Annual Meeting, each of the following nominees for director received the respective number of votes set forth opposite his name, constituting a plurality of the votes cast, and was duly elected as a director of the Registrant.
 
 
5.
              
The following table states the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve amendments to our Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for to awards granted under the Plan by 2,400,000, from 9,600,000 to 12,000,000 shares of common stock and to incorporate other changes described in our proxy statement.
 
 
6.
              
The following table states the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to ratify the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit ArQule's financial statements for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2008.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080611151757.txt.gz
TIME:20080611151757
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
(d) On June 9, 2008, Paolo Pucci was appointed to the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant").   As previously disclosed, on April 15, 2008 the Registrant entered into an employment agreement with Mr. Pucci.  Pursuant to the terms of the employment agreement, commencing on June 9, 2008 the Registrant would employ Mr. Pucci as its Chief Executive Officer and would nominate him to serve on the Board of Directors during the term of his employment.  The terms of Mr. Pucci's employment as Chief Executive Officer are set forth in the Form 8-K filed by the Registrant on April 18, 2008.
 
Since Mr. Pucci is an employee of the Registrant, he will not receive any compensation for his services as a director.  Except as set forth in the employment agreement, there was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Pucci and the Registrant (or any other person known to the Registrant) pursuant to which Mr. Pucci was appointed.  Mr. Pucci will serve on the Registrant's Board of Directors until its 2009 Annual Meeting of Stockholders, at which time the Registrant anticipates that Mr. Pucci will be nominated to serve for an additional term.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
June 11, 2008
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080620162302.txt.gz
TIME:20080620162302
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
                         
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                         
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                         
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                         
 
Section 5   Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02(b) Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Section 8.01 Other Events.
 
The press release included herewith as Exhibit 99.1 hereto, is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1   Text of Press Release dated June 20, 2008 announcing the appointment of Brian Schwartz as Chief Medical Officer effective July 14, 2008.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ARQULE ANNOUNCES APPOINTMENT OF BRIAN SCHWARTZ
 
AS CHIEF MEDICAL OFFICER
 
Woburn, MA, June 20, 2008 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced the appointment of Brian Schwartz, M.D., as chief medical officer effective July 14, 2008.
 
Dr. Schwartz brings to ArQule significant experience in oncology drug development in both the biotechnology and pharmaceutical industries.  He was most recently senior vice president, clinical and regulatory affairs, and chief medical officer at Ziopharm Oncology, Inc., which he joined in 2006 and where he built and led clinical, regulatory, and quality assurance departments responsible for the development of new cancer drugs.
 
Prior to joining Ziopharm, Dr. Schwartz held a number of positions at Bayer Healthcare and Leo Laboratories.  Over the past eight years, he has focused on oncology clinical development of novel cytostatic, cytotoxic and immunological agents, achieving awards of excellence from both companies.  At Bayer, Dr. Schwartz was a key physician responsible for the global clinical development of sorafenib (Nexavar) and led the clinical team through a successful Phase 3 trial in renal cell cancer, leading to U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approval.  He has extensive regulatory experience working with the FDA's Oncology Division, the European Medicines Evaluation Agency (EMEA), and numerous other health authorities.  Dr. Schwartz was also responsible for U.S. clinical and regulatory activities, including Phase 4 studies and interactions with the National Cancer Institute and other oncology cooperative groups.  He has broad experience in working with scientific advisory boards and international project teams, as well as in leading joint development projects with biotechnology companies.  Dr. Schwartz received his medical degree from the University of Pretoria, South Africa, practiced medicine, and worked at the University of Toronto prior to his career in industry.
 
"Dr. Schwartz' depth and breadth of oncology product development experience will help advance the development of our lead molecule, ARQ 197, a selective, small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, and our earlier-stage product candidates in an effective and timely fashion," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "His insights into state-of-the-art clinical operations, combined with his U.S. and international experience, will allow us to maximize the development opportunities for ARQ 197 so that the significant clinical and commercial potential of this product is realized.  Furthermore, Brian is a team leader who understands the imperatives at a small company like ArQule to leverage resources efficiently and to galvanize development teams."
 
"I am excited about the prospect of working in one of the most promising, emerging areas of oncology clinical research, c-Met inhibition," said Dr. Schwartz.  "ARQ 197 and ArQule's earlier stage, novel oncology therapeutics have all benefited from the Company's proven chemistry capabilities and insights into cancer biology.  I am looking forward to driving these programs forward in multiple oncology indications and ultimately to bringing their benefits to cancer patients in serious need of improved treatments."
 
Dr. Schwartz will be responsible for the Company's clinical trial and regulatory affairs operations. Dr. Nigel Rulewski, the Company's current chief medical officer, intends to remain as CMO of ArQule until Dr. Schwartz joins and thereafter will assist the Company during a transition period.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead products, which are in clinical-stage development, consist of ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, and ARQ 501, an activator of the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor.  The Company's most advanced pre-clinical development programs are focused on ARQ 761, a second-generation E2F-1 product candidate, as well as compounds that inhibit the Eg5 kinesin spindle protein and the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's discovery efforts are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate), an energy source for cells.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with ARQ 197 and earlier stage products.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 and the Company's other products may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that
could
lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 and the Company's other products are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080714160211.txt.gz
TIME:20080714160211
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1
 Registrant's Business and Operations
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
The information provided in response to Item 2.03 is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation Under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
 
On July 8, 2008, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") entered into a collateralized, revolving credit line agreement for up to $47.5 million with UBS Bank USA (the "Facility").  The Facility is secured by a first priority lien and security interest in  the auction rate securities held by the Registrant in an account with UBS Financial Services Inc., an affiliate of UBS Bank USA. The credit line is uncommitted and any outstanding balance, including interest, is payable upon demand.  Variable rate advances under the Facility currently bears interest at LIBOR plus 100 basis points and interest will be payable monthly.
 
The Facility replaces the $15 million standard margin loan agreement with UBS Financial Services Inc. the Registrant entered into on May 8, 2008.
 
On July 8, 2008, the Registrant drew down $30 million under the Facility. The funds will be available for research and development efforts, including clinical trials, and for general corporate purposes, including working capital.
 
A copy of the credit line agreement will be filed as an exhibit to the Registrant's Form 10-Q on or about November 10, 2008.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
July 14, 2008
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080724170720.txt.gz
TIME:20080724170720
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation Under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
 
As previously reported, on July 8, 2008, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") entered into a collateralized, revolving credit line agreement with UBS Bank USA (the "Facility") and drew down $30 million under the Facility. On July 21, 2008, the Registrant drew down an additional $16.05 million for a total balance of $46.05 million, the maximum amount currently available under the Facility.  The funds will be available for research and development efforts, including clinical trials, and for general corporate purposes, including working capital.
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
(e) As previously reported, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") announced on June 20, 2008 that it had hired Brian Schwartz, M.D. as its Chief Medical Officer replacing Dr. Nigel J. Rulewski, effective July 9, 2008.  Dr. Rulewski agreed to assist the Registrant during the management transition.  In connection with his departure, on July 22, 2008, Dr. Rulewski and the Registrant entered into a separation agreement (the "Separation Agreement") superseding the terms of his employment agreement with the Registrant dated August 1, 2006.  The payments and benefits described below are in lieu of those provided for in the employment agreement. The material terms of the Separation Agreement are summarized below. 
 
Dr. Rulewski will resign from his employment with the Registrant effective as of August 29, 2008 (the "Separation Date").  Pursuant to the terms of the Separation Agreement, Dr. Rulewski will receive the following payments and benefits in exchange for a general release:
 
(i)            a lump sum separation payment of $416,000: (a) $325,000 of which represents Dr. Rulewski's current base salary through the end of the twelve (12) month period commencing on the Separation Date and (b) $91,000 of which represents the average bonus paid by the Registrant to Dr. Rulewski with respect to calendar years 2006 and 2007;
 
(ii)           $75,840, which represents Dr. Rulewski's estimated bonus for 2008, pro-rated from January 1, 2008 through the Separation Date;
 
(iii)          accelerated vesting of options for 50,000 shares of the Registrant's common stock, which represents 50% of the unvested portion of the stock options granted to Dr. Rulewski at the time of his employment; and extension of the period in which to exercise these options and his other currently vested stock options for 112,500 shares of common stock, a total of 162,500 shares, from November 29, 2008 to February 26, 2010;
 
(iv)          eligibility for continuation of certain group health benefits through August 31, 2009; and
 
outplacement services at a cost not to exceed $20,000.
(v)          
The foregoing summary of the material terms of Dr. Rulewski's separation agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the agreement which is included as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference and to the terms of his employment agreement filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K, dated August 1, 2006, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
July 24, 2008

Exhibit 10.1
 
This agreement ("Agreement") is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation, with its principal place of business at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801 (the "Company") and Nigel J. Rulewski ("Employee").  In consideration of the mutual covenants contained herein, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties agree as follows:
 
  In order to pursue other employment opportunities, Employee shall resign his employment with the Company effective as of August 29, 2008 (the "Separation Date").  The Company hereby waives the sixty (60) days prior notice requirement under Employee's Employment Agreement with the Company dated as of August 1, 2006 (the "Employment Agreement").
1.
                                      
Separation of Employment.
 
Regardless of whether Employee signs this Agreement, Employee acknowledges that, as of the Separation Date, Employee will receive any and all wages earned but unpaid through the Separation Date, including accrued but unused vacation time.  In the event that Employee signs this Agreement, returns it to the Company and does not (and may no longer) revoke as provided in Section 17, Employee will receive the following separation package (the "Separation Package"):
2.
                                      
Separation Package. 
 
  The Company shall pay Employee a lump sum separation payment (the "Separation Payment") in the following gross amount, which shall be subject to legally required and voluntarily authorized deductions and withholdings:
a.
                                      
Lump Sum Separation Payment.
 
$325,000 which amount represents Employee's current base salary through the end of the twelve (12) month period commencing on the Separation Date; plus
i.
                                         
 
$91,000, which amount represents the average bonus paid by the Company to Executive with respect to calendar years 2006 and 2007.
ii.
                                      
 
Because Employee is a specified person for purposes of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the Separation Payment shall be made on the date that is six months after the date of Employee's separation from service, as that term is defined under Section 409A, or such earlier date, if any, compliant with Section 409A.
 
  Employee has been granted certain stock options to purchase shares of the Company's Common Stock pursuant to the Plan.  As set forth in Exhibit A, as of the Separation Date, options for 162,500 shares (the "Vested Options") will be vested and exercisable.  The time in which Employee may exercise the Vested Options that have vested as of the Separation Date shall be extended to February 26, 2010, and any agreement or terms and conditions with respect to such Vested Options shall be amended accordingly.  It
b.
                                     
Extension of Time to Exercise Options.
 
is expressly agreed that, in the absence of this extension, Employee would have had three months from the Separation Date to exercise the Vested Options.
 
Employee specifically acknowledges that the Separation Package described above exceeds any legal payment obligation of the Company and provides valid consideration for the General Release contained in this Agreement.
 
In the event that Employee signs this Agreement, returns it to the Company and does not (and may no longer) revoke as provided in Section 16, the Company shall pay Employee the following gross amount, which shall be subject to legally required and voluntarily authorized deductions and withholdings:  $75,840, which amount represents Employee's estimated bonus for 2008, pro-rated from January 1, 2008 through the Separation Date.
3.
                                      
2007 Bonus. 
 
Unless otherwise provided for expressly in this Agreement, all benefits provided by the Company to Employee will cease as of the Separation Date.
4.
                                      
Insurance and Other Benefits.
 
  A COBRA notice will issue on the Separation Date.  If Employee is eligible for and elects to continue health and/or dental insurance coverage through COBRA, the Company will pay 80% of the monthly premium for such insurance (and Employee shall be required to pay the remaining 20% of the monthly premium for such insurance), as applicable, through August 31, 2009.  Any continuing coverage after August 31, 2009 will be at Employee's sole expense as provided by federal COBRA law.  Eligibility to continue insurance coverage ceases upon the termination of any period allowed by law and is at all times subject to the terms and conditions of the applicable plan(s).
a.
                                      
Group Health, Dental and Vision Coverage.
 
  The Company shall not contest Employee's claim, if any, for unemployment insurance benefits, it being understood and agreed that Employee's entitlement to unemployment insurance benefits shall be determined solely by the Massachusetts Division of Unemployment Assistance.
b.
                                     
Unemployment.
 
  Upon the Separation Date, Employee may apply to convert the existing group life insurance to an individual policy at Employee's own expense.
c.
                                      
Life Insurance Coverage.
 
  Disability insurance coverage will cease as of the Separation Date, and there is no right of individual conversion.
d.
                                     
Disability Insurance.
 
  Employee shall be entitled to Employee's vested benefit in the Company's 401(k) plan as of the Separation Date, as determined by the plan provision.  Service credit, salary reduction and Company contribution shall cease as of the Separation Date.
e.
                                      
Retirement Plans.
.  The Company shall pay, in an amount not exceed $20,000, for outplacement services for Employee to be performed by a consulting firm selected by the Company.
f.
                                        
Outplacement
 
  No later than the Separation Date, Employee shall return all property belonging to the Company, including but not limited to papers, files and documents (physical or electronic), computers, telephones, PDAs, reference guides, equipment, keys, identification cards, credit cards, software, computer access codes, disks and institutional manuals.  Employee shall not retain any copies, duplicates, reproductions or excerpts thereof.  In addition, Employee warrants that Employee has deleted any information belonging to the Company from any personal computer that Employee may have at home or elsewhere (other than the Company's offices) without retaining any copies of any such information, in electronic or other format, and will permit the Company to have access to such computer at times reasonably agreed to by Employee with reasonable notice to confirm such deletion.
5.
                                      
Return of Property.
 
  Employee acknowledges that during the course of Employee'semployment with the Company Employeehas had access to and/or developed confidential information belonging to the Company and/or its customers.  Employee agrees not to use to Employee'sown advantage or to disclose, except as required by law, to any person or entity any confidential information of the Company or of any past or present customer of the Company, including but not limited to financial data or projections, customer lists, projects, economic information, systems, plans, methods, procedures, operations, techniques, know-how, trade secrets or merchandising or marketing strategies.  Moreover, Employee agrees that, as a condition of receipt of the benefits described in this Agreement, Employee shall continue to be bound by all of the terms of the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement previously executed by Employee, which is attached as Exhibit B, the terms of which are incorporated herein by reference (including, without limitation, the confidentiality, non-competition and non-solicitation provisions of the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement).
6.
                                      
Nondisclosure of Confidential Information.
 
  Employee agrees and covenants as a material term of this Agreement to provide reasonable cooperation to the Company until August 29, 2009 including, without limitation, with respect to matters previously within Employee's scope or course of employment with the Company.  The Company will reimburse Employee for out-of-pocket expenses related thereto and, after August 29, 2009, for any time expended on behalf of the Company at the request of the Company at an agreed-to per diem or per hour rate (or pro-rata share thereof) and reimburse Employee.  In the event that the Company determines that such expense reimbursement is or would be prohibited by law, the Company promptly shall notify Employee to such effect, and such reimbursement shall not be made to Employee.
7.
                                      
Cooperation.
 
  Except with respect to any rights, obligations or duties arising out of this Agreement, and in consideration of the Separation Package and other benefits set forth in this Agreement, Employee hereby unconditionally and irrevocably releases and discharges the Company and its officers, directors, partners, stockholders, trustees, attorneys, insurers, representatives, agents and employees, in both their individual and
8.
                                      
General Release.
corporate capacities (collectively, the "Releasees"), of and from any and all complaints, charges, lawsuits, costs (including attorney fees and costs actually incurred), debts, liabilities or claims for relief of any kind by Employee that Employeenow has or ever had against the Releasees or any one of them, whether known or unknown, arising out of any matter or thing that has happened before the signing of this Agreement (collectively, "Claims"), including but not limited to (i) Claims for tort or contract, or relating to salary, wages, bonuses, severance, commissions, stock, and stock options, the breach of any oral or written contract or promise, misrepresentation, defamation, and interference with prospective economic advantage, interference with contract, intentional and negligent infliction of emotional distress, negligence, breach of the covenant of good faith and fair dealing, medical, disability or other leave; (ii) Claims arising out of, based on, or connected with Employee'semployment, including terms and conditions of employment, by the Company and the termination of that employment, including but not limited to claims arising under Section 806 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, and any other claims alleging retaliation of any nature; (iii) Claims under G.L. c. 93A or in any way related to restricted stock, stock options, or vesting or exercise of the same, or for alleged securities violations; and (iv) Claims for unlawful employment discrimination of any kind, including discrimination due to age, sex, disability or handicap, including failure to offer reasonable accommodations, race, color, religion, pregnancy, sexual orientation, national origin, or sexual or other unlawful harassment arising under or based on the following, all as amended: Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964; the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 ("ADEA"); the Americans with Disabilities Act ("ADA"); the Equal Pay Act of 1963; the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938; the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 ("COBRA"); the Family and Medical Leave Act; the Massachusetts Fair Employment Practices Act; the Massachusetts Civil Rights Act; the Massachusetts Equal Rights Law; the Massachusetts or United States Constitution, including any right of privacy thereunder; and any other state or federal equal employment opportunity or anti-discrimination law, policy, order, regulation or guidelines affecting or relating to claims or rights of employees.  It is further expressly agreed and understood by Employeethat the release contained herein is a GENERAL RELEASE.
 
  Employee represents and warrants that Employee has not filed any complaints, charges, or claims for relief against the Releasees, or any one of them, with any local, state or federal court or administrative agency, any professional or regulatory board, or any other agency or entity.  Employeefurther warrants that Employee has not previously assigned or transferred any of the claims that are the subject of the General Release contained herein.  Employee agrees and covenants not to sue or bring any claims or charges against the Releasees, or any one of them, with respect to matters subject to the General Release contained herein.  Employee further agrees not to institute any claim, charge, complaint or lawsuit to challenge the validity of the General Release or the circumstances surrounding its execution.  In the event that Employeeinstitutes any action covered by this Section, that action shall be dismissed upon presentation of this Agreement and Employee shall reimburse the affected Releasees for all legal fees and expenses incurred in defending such claim and obtaining its dismissal.
9.
                                      
Covenant Not to Sue.
  Nothing in this Agreement shall preclude Employee from filing a charge or complaint, including a challenge to the validity of this Agreement, with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, the Massachusetts Commission Against Discrimination or any other state anti-discrimination agency or from participating or cooperating in any investigation or proceeding conducted by any of such agencies.  In the event that a charge or complaint is filed with any administrative agency by Employee or in the event of an authorized investigation, charge or lawsuit filed by any administrative agency, Employee expressly waives and shall not accept any monetary award or damages, costs or attorneys' fees of any sort therefrom against the Company or any of the Releasees.
10.
                                
Exclusion.
 
  It is understood and agreed that this Agreement does not constitute any admission by the Company that any action taken with respect to Employee was unlawful or wrongful, or that such action constituted a breach of contract or violated any federal or state law, policy, rule or regulation.
11.
                                
Nonadmissions Clause.
 
  Except as expressly set forth in this Agreement and except to the extent publicly disclosed by the Company, Employee expressly agrees that the nature and terms of this Agreement are confidential, and expressly agrees not to discuss or disclose them, or the facts and contentions contained therein, without the prior written consent of the Company, with or to any person, except to Employee's accountant, tax advisor, attorney, immediate family, therapist or healthcare provider, if any, the Internal Revenue Service, state tax authorities, or as required by law.  If Employee makes any disclosure authorized by this Section, Employeeshall apprise the person or entity to whom such disclosure is made of the confidential nature of the terms and conditions of the Agreement and shall use reasonable and good faith efforts to secure the confidentiality of the information so disclosed.  In particular, if Employee is compelled to disclose the terms or conditions of this Agreement in response to a subpoena or discovery request issued in litigation, Employeeshall provide the Company with a copy of the subpoena or discovery request as promptly as practicable following receipt by the Employee in order to provide the Company with the opportunity to seek a protective order from the appropriate court.
12.
                                
Nondisclosure of this Agreement.
 
  Employee agrees, as a material term of this agreement, not to disparage or make negative statements about the Company or any of the Company's programs or products.  The Company agrees to instruct all members of the Company's executive management team not to disparage or make negative statements about Employee, provided that nothing in this Section shall be construed in any way to restrict or prevent Employee or the Company from providing truthful information to, or truthful responses to requests from, their respective auditors, accountants, investment bankers, insurers, potential purchasers, successors, acquirers, or any other persons or entities as required by business necessity or for a legitimate business reason.  Nothing in this Agreement shall bar Employee or the Company from providing truthful testimony in any legal proceeding, or in responding to any request from any governmental agency, or as required by law, or by court order or other legal process.
13.
                                
Nondisparagement.
  Any reference request for Employee will be directed to Anthony S. Messina, or his successor as Vice President of Human Development or a similar position, who will respond in accordance with Company practice with only Employee's dates of employment and job titles and by stating that Company policy precludes the provision of any further information to the inquirer.  However, if Employee completes and return to the Company a reference release request in a form acceptable to the Company, the Company will answer questions about Employee's employment based on Employee's employment records.
14.
                                
References.
 
  In the event Employeetakes any action or engages in any conduct deemed by the Company to be in violation of this Agreement or otherwise commits a material breach of this Agreement, (i) any consideration (including, without limitation, rights and benefits pursuant to Sections 2, 3 and 4a) contained in this Agreement which flows to Employeefrom the Company and is unrealized as of such violation or breach, shall be forfeited and terminated, and (ii) any such consideration which was previously paid or provided to Employee (including, without limitation, the Separation Payment; any shares issued upon exercise of Vested Options, or proceeds thereof; and the value of benefits pursuant to Section 3 and 4a) shall be disgorged and repaid to the Company by Employee. In the event that Employee institutes legal proceedings to enforce this Agreement, Employeeagrees that the sole remedy available to Employeeshall be enforcement of the terms of this Agreement, but that under no circumstances shall Employee be entitled to receive or collect any damages for Claims that Employee has released under this Agreement in accordance with the General Release contained in Section 9 of this Agreement.
15.
                                
Breach.
 
  This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such jurisdiction and without giving effect to its choice or conflict of laws rules or principles.  Each of the parties irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and of any United States federal court sitting in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, and irrevocably agrees that all claims in respect of such action or proceedings shall be heard and determined in any such Massachusetts or United States federal court.
16.
                                
Governing Law.
 
17.
                                
Time to Consider Agreement.
 
Employee acknowledges that Employeehas been given the opportunity to consult an attorney of Employee's choice before signing this Agreement.
a.
                                      
 
Employee acknowledges that Employee has been given the opportunity to review and consider this Agreement for at least twenty-one (21) days before signing it and that, if Employee has signed this Agreement in less than that time, Employeehas done so voluntarily in order to obtain sooner the benefits of this Agreement.
b.
                                     
 
Employee further acknowledges that Employeemay revoke this Agreement within seven (7) days of signing it, provided that this Agreement will not become effective until such seven-day period has expired.  To be effective, any such
c.
                                      
revocation must be in writing and delivered to the Company's principal place of business (as set forth in the preamble to this Agreement) to the attention of Anthony S. Messina by close of business on the seventh day after signing and must expressly state Employee's intention to revoke the Agreement.  The eighth day following Employee's execution hereof shall be deemed the "Effective Date" of this Agreement.
 
The parties also agree that the release provided by Employee in this Agreement does not include claims under the ADEA arising after the date Employee signs this Agreement.
d.
                                     
 
Employee further acknowledges and agrees that the consideration Employeeis to receive under this Agreement exceeds the consideration to which Employeewould otherwise be entitled to upon his termination from employment with the Company.
e.
                                      
 
  Employee acknowledges that in exchange for entering into this Agreement Employeehas received good and valuable consideration in excess of that to which Employeewould otherwise have been entitled in the absence of this Agreement.  This consideration includes, but is not limited to, the Separation Package described in Section 2.  Employee further acknowledges the sufficiency of that consideration.  The Company and Employee attest that no other representations were made regarding this Agreement other than those contained herein.
18.
                                
Representations.
 
  If any of the terms of this Agreement shall be held to be invalid and unenforceable, the remaining terms of this Agreement are severable and shall not be affected thereby.  However, should the general release or covenant not to sue provisions of this Agreement be declared or determined by any tribunal, administrative agency or court of competent jurisdiction to be illegal or invalid, and should Employee thereupon seek to institute any Claims that would have been within the scope of the general release or covenant not to sue, (i) any consideration (including, without limitation, rights and benefits pursuant to Sections 2, 3 and 4a) contained in this Agreement which flows to Employeefrom the Company and is unrealized as of the date of such Claim, shall be forfeited and terminated, and (ii) any such consideration which was previously paid or provided to Employee (including, without limitation, the Separation Payment; any shares issued upon exercise of Vested Options, or proceeds thereof; and the value of benefits pursuant to Section 3a) shall be disgorged and repaid to the Company by Employee.
19.
                                
Severability.
 
  This Agreement and its Exhibits constitute the entire agreement between the parties about or relating to the Company's obligations to Employee with respect to Employee'sterms and conditions of employment, and termination of employment, and fully supersedes any and all prior agreements or understandings between the parties other than the Employee Non-Disclosure and Inventions Agreement, referenced in Section 5 above.  The terms of this Agreement are contractual in nature and not a mere recital, and they shall take effect as a sealed document.  This Agreement may not be modified orally, but only by agreement in writing signed by both parties.
20.
                                
Entire Agreement.
Each party agrees that in any dispute regarding the interpretation or construction of this Agreement, no presumption shall operate in favor of or against any party by virtue of such party's role in drafting, or not drafting, the terms and conditions set forth herein.
21.
                                
Interpretation. 
 
Any notice under this Agreement given to Employee, shall be by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address set forth in the Employee's personnel file at the Company.
22.
                                
Notice. 
 
Any notice under this Agreement given to Company, shall be to:
 
Anthony S. Messina
Vice President, Human Development
ArQule, Inc.
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA 01801
 
  This Agreement may be executed in two or more of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered constitutes an original of this Agreement, but all the counterparts shall together constitute one and the same agreement.  No counterpart shall be effective until each party has executed at least one counterpart.
23.
                                
Counterparts.
 
EMPLOYEE REPRESENTS, WARRANTS AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EMPLOYEEHAS CAREFULLY READ ALL OF THIS AGREEMENT, THAT EMPLOYEEHAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO CONSULT WITH LEGAL COUNSEL CONCERNING THE LEGAL EFFECT OF THIS AGREEMENT AND THE ADVISABILITY OF ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND GIVING THE GENERAL RELEASE PROVIDED FOR HEREIN, AND THAT EMPLOYEEFULLY UNDERSTANDS THE SAME.  EMPLOYEE FURTHER REPRESENTS, WARRANTS AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EMPLOYEEIS EXECUTING THIS AGREEMENT WITH THE INTENT TO GRANT THE GENERAL RELEASE SET FORTH HEREIN, WITHOUT RELIANCE UPON ANY STATEMENT OR REPRESENTATION OF THE COMPANY OR ANY REPRESENTATIVE, EMPLOYEE, DIRECTOR OR ATTORNEY OF THE COMPANY OTHER THAN AS SET FORTH HEREIN, AND THAT EMPLOYEEHAS SIGNED THIS AGREEMENT ON EMPLOYEE'SOWN BEHALF AND OF EMPLOYEE'SOWN FREE WILL.
24.
                                
Access to Legal Counsel. 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Employeehave duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year written below.
 
 
Date:  July 21, 2008
 
Employee
 
 
 
Exhibit A


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080811160700.txt.gz
TIME:20080811160700
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 11, 2008, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2008.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated August 11, 2008
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
August 11, 2008
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Contact:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ARQULE REPORTS SECOND QUARTER 2008 FINANCIAL RESULTS
 
Woburn, MA, August 11, 2008 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2008.
 
For the quarter ended June 30, 2008, the Company reported a net loss of $16,040,000 or $0.37 per share, compared with a net loss of $13,361,000, or $0.36 per share, for the second quarter of 2007.  For the six-month period ended June 30, 2008, the Company reported a net loss of $29,954,000 or $0.68 per share, compared to a net loss of $27,865,000, or $0.77 per share, for the six-month period ended June 30, 2007.
 
At June 30, 2008, the Company had a total of approximately $102,520,000 in cash, cash equivalents and long-term marketable securities.
 
Operational Highlights
 
                 
Data presented at ASCO identify maximum tolerated dose and confirm c-Met inhibition by ARQ 197 in patient tumor biopsy samples
 
                 
Paolo Pucci joins ArQule as new chief executive officer on June 9, 2008
 
                 
Dr. Brian Schwartz joins ArQule as new chief medical officer on July 14, 2008
 
"On the clinical front, findings from a Phase 1, dose-escalation trial with ARQ 197 that were presented at the recent 2008 Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology showed a dose-dependent increase in systemic drug exposure and identified a maximum tolerated dose of 300 milligrams twice daily," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule. "We are discussing these findings with clinical investigators and regulatory authorities to further focus our clinical program.
 
"The arrival of Dr. Brian Schwartz, our new chief medical officer, on July 14 underscores the sense of urgency to advance ARQ 197 along the clinical development pathway," said Mr. Pucci.  "We welcome Brian's depth and breadth of oncology product development experience, which encompasses cytostatic, cytotoxic and immunological agents.  Of particular relevance is his recent experience in the development of sorafenib (Nexavar) in renal cell carcinoma.
 
 
 
 
"We are also conducting in-depth scientific, regulatory and commercial analyses to map out and prioritize the optimal advanced-stage development pathways for this compound," said Mr. Pucci.  "We expect to communicate additional details regarding this program in the third quarter."
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
The Company reported total revenues of $2,583,000 for the quarter ended June 30, 2008, compared to revenues of $2,235,000 for the second quarter of 2007.  Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2008 were $6,110,000 compared to revenues of $3,887,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2007.Increased revenues for the 2008 six-month period are primarily due to revenues from Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd. (Kyowa).
 
 
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended June 30, 2008 were $19,269,000 compared to $16,873,000 for the second quarter of 2007.  Total costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2008 were $38,355,000 compared to $34,087,000 for the same period in 2007.  Research and development costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2008 were $14,980,000 and $28,432,000, respectively, compared with $13,077,000 and $26,781,000 for the 2007 three and six-month periods.  Increased research and development costs and expenses in 2008 were primarily the result of clinical development and related costs for Phase 2 clinical trials with ARQ 197.
 
General and administrative costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2008 were $4,289,000 and $9,923,000 respectively, compared with $3,796,000 and $7,306,000 for the 2007 three and six-month periods.  The increased 2008 general and administrative expenses were primarily due to
non-cash, stock-based compensation costs resulting from the Company's employment agreements with its previous and current chief executive officers.
 
Financial Guidance
 
As previously stated, for 2008 ArQule expects revenues to range between $10.0 and $10.5 million, related to the Company's ongoing partnerships with Roche and Kyowa.  Net use of cash is expected to range between $55 and $60 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $69 and $74 million, and net loss per share to range between $1.57 and $1.68 for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2008 with between $75 and $80 million in cash, cash equivalents and long-term marketable securities.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
 
 
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 888-286-8010 and outside the U.S. 617-801-6888.  The replay access code is 60157973.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's clinical-stage products consist of ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, and ARQ 501, an activator of the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor.  The Company's most advanced pre-clinical development programs are focused on ARQ 761, a second-generation E2F-1 activator, as well as compounds that inhibit the Eg5 kinesin spindle protein and the B-RAF kinase.  ArQule's discovery efforts are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate), an energy source for cells.  For more information, please visit www.arqule.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations and its financial condition, which would be affected by such factors as the rate of research and development and other expenditures, new sources of revenue and  potential future milestone and royalty payments from its existing partners Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd., and Hoffmann-La Roche that could result from the future development of ARQ 197 and products in the Company's E2F-1 cancer program, including ARQ 501 and ARQ 761.  Failure to successfully develop these products could prevent the Company from receiving these future payments.  Additional forward-looking statements relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including Phase 2 trials with ARQ 197. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in further pre-clinical testing and in current, later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20080822155351.txt.gz
TIME:20080822155351
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Section 8Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
Pursuant to a stock purchase agreement between ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") and Paolo Pucci, the Registrant's Chief Executive Officer (the "Stock Agreement"), on August 19, 2008, Mr. Pucci purchased 37,706 shares of the Registrant's common stock, $0.01 par value, at a price per share of $3.62.
 
As previously disclosed, on April 15, 2008, the Registrant entered into an employment agreement with Mr. Pucci.  Pursuant to the terms of the employment agreement, he was entitled to receive a cash signing bonus in the amount of $200,000.00 (the "Bonus"), payable on the date of the Registrant's next regular payroll following commencement of his employment.
 
In lieu of receiving cash and with the approval of the board of directors of the Registrant, including the independent members of its Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee, Mr. Pucci decided to apply the Bonus to the purchase of shares of the Registrant's common stock.  After deduction of withholding taxes, Mr. Pucci used the net amount of the Bonus, $136,496, as payment to the Registrant for 37,706 shares of common stock.
 
The foregoing summary of the of the material terms of the stock purchase transaction and the terms of Mr. Pucci's employment are qualified by reference to the full text of the Stock Agreement, a copy of which is included as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference and to the full text of Mr. Pucci's employment agreement included as an exhibit to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 18, 2008.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1
        
Stock Purchase Agreement, dated as of August 19, 2008, between ArQule, Inc. and Paolo Pucci. Filed herewith (File No. 000-21429).
 
99.2
        
Employment Agreement dated as of April 15, 2008, between ArQule, Inc. and Paolo Pucci. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 18, 2008 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT
 
THIS STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT (the ) is made as of the 19th day of August, 2008, by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ), and Paolo Pucci (the ).
"Agreement"
"Company"
"Purchaser"
 
WHEREAS, pursuant to Section 4.5 of the Employment Agreement, by and between the Company and the Purchaser, dated April 15, 2008, the Purchaser was entitled to receive a cash signing bonus in the amount of $200,000.00 (the ""), payable on the Company's next regular payroll following commencement of his employment with the Company;
Bonus
 
WHEREAS, the Purchaser agreed to postpone receipt of the Bonus and agreed to use the Bonus to purchase shares of the Company's common stock, $0.01 par value (""); and
Common Stock
 
WHEREAS, the Board of Directors of the Company, including the independent members of its Compensation Committee, authorized the purchase by the Purchaser of a number of shares of Common Stock (the "") equivalent in value to the Bonus, less applicable taxes withheld, with the price per share to be the closing price of a share of Common Stock on the NASDAQ National Market on the date hereof (the "");
Securities
Pricing Date
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants, promises and agreements herein contained, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
1.
            
Purchase and Sale of Stock.
  The Purchaser hereby agrees to purchase from the Company, and the Company hereby agrees to sell to the Purchaser the Securities, with the price per share to be determined on the Pricing Date.
 
2.
            
Issuance of Stock.
  Within two (2) business days of the Pricing Date, the Company shall request its stock transfer agent to issue a duly executed certificate evidencing the Securities in the name of the Purchaser.
 
3.
            
Investment Representations.
  In connection with the purchase of the Securities, the Purchaser represents to the Company the following:
 
a.
            
The Purchaser is an "accredited investor" within the meaning of Rule 501(a)(1), (2), (3) or (7) of Regulation D under the United States Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ""), as presently in effect.
Securities Act
 
b.
            
The Purchaser is obtaining such Securities solely for his own account and beneficial interest for investment and not for sale or with a view to, or for resale in connection with, the distribution thereof, has no present intention of selling (in connection with a distribution or otherwise), granting any participation in, or otherwise distributing the Securities, and does not presently have any reason to anticipate a change in such intention.
 
c.
            
The Purchaser has such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters that he is capable of evaluating the merits and risk of an investment in the Securities and is able to bear the economic risk of such investment.
d.
            
The Purchaser understands that the Securities are characterized as "restricted securities" under the Securities Act, inasmuch as they are being acquired from the Company in a transaction not involving a public offering and that under the Securities Act and applicable regulations thereunder such securities may be resold without registration under the Securities Act only in certain limited circumstances.  In this connection, the Purchaser represents that he is familiar with Rule 144 under the Securities Act, as presently in effect, and understands the resale limitations imposed thereby and by the Securities Act. The Purchaser understands that the Company is not obligated to register the Securities.  The Purchaser also understands that the certificates evidencing the Securities will bear the legend set forth below:
 
THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS CERTIFICATE HAVE BEEN ACQUIRED BY THE HOLDER FOR HIS OWN ACCOUNT, FOR INVESTMENT PURPOSES AND NOT WITH A VIEW TO THE DISTRIBUTION OF SUCH SECURITIES.  THESE SECURITIES HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "ACT"), OR ANY APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS AND MAY NOT BE SOLD OR OTHERWISE TRANSFERRED EXCEPT (I) PURSUANT TO AN EFFECTIVE REGISTRATION STATEMENT UNDER THE ACT, (II) IN COMPLIANCE WITH RULE 144 UNDER THE ACT AND APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS, OR (III) UPON THE DELIVERY TO ARQULE, INC., (THE "COMPANY) OF AN OPINION OF COUNSEL OR OTHER EVIDENCE SATISFACTORY TO THE COMPANY THAT SUCH REGISTRATION AND/ OR COMPLIANCE IS NOT REQUIRED.
 
e.
            
The Purchaser is aware of his reporting obligations under Section 16(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
4.
            
Release. 
Upon execution of this Agreement
, the Purchaser
does hereby confirm that, in accordance with his instructions, the Bonus has been applied to the purchase price of the Securities and required withholding of applicable income taxes and
upon receipt of the Securities
releases, and forever discharges the Company from its
obligation to make payment of the Bonus.
 
5.
            
Miscellaneous.
 
a.
            
Successors and Assigns.
 This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of the successors and assigns of the Company and, subject to the restrictions on transfer herein set forth, be binding upon the Purchaser, the Purchaser's successors, and assigns.
 
b.
            
Governing Law; Venue.
  This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware.  The parties agree that any action brought by either party to interpret or enforce any provision of this Agreement shall be brought in, and each party agrees to, and does hereby, submit to the jurisdiction and venue of, the appropriate state or federal court for the district encompassing the Company's principal place of business.
 
c.
            
Further Execution.
  The parties agree to take all such further action (s) as may reasonably be necessary to carry out and consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement as soon as practicable, and to take whatever steps may be necessary to qualify the
issuance of the Securities and to comply with other requirements of applicable law and regulations.
 
d.
            
Entire Agreement; Amendment.
  This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes and merges all prior agreements or understandings, whether written or oral.  This Agreement may not be amended, modified or revoked, in whole or in part, except by an agreement in writing signed by each of the parties hereto.
 
e.
            
Severability.
  If one or more provisions of this Agreement are held to be unenforceable under applicable law, the parties agree to renegotiate such provision in good faith.  In the event that the parties cannot reach a mutually agreeable and enforceable replacement for such provision, then (i) such provision shall be excluded from this Agreement, (ii) the balance of the Agreement shall be interpreted as if such provision were so excluded and (iii) the balance of the Agreement shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms.
 
f.
             
Counterparts.
  This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original and all of which together shall constitute one instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF,
the parties hereto have executed this Stock Purchase Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20081107154135.txt.gz
TIME:20081107154135
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Section 1 Registrant's Business and Operations
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On November 3, 2008, ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule" or the "Registrant") accepted an offer by UBS AG ("UBS") of certain rights to cause UBS to purchase auction rate securities owned by the Registrant. The repurchase rights are offered in connection with UBS's obligations under settlement agreements with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission and other federal and state regulatory authorities. The offering, the settlement agreements, and the respective rights and obligations of the parties, including a release by the Registrant of UBS and its employees and agents from all claims except claims for consequential damages relating to UBS's marketing and sale of auction rate securities, are described in a prospectus issued by UBS dated October 7, 2008, File No. 333-153882 (the "Prospectus").
 
As previously reported, on July 8, 2008, the Registrant entered into a revolving credit line agreement for up to $47.5 million with UBS Bank USA with the Registrant's auction rate securities pledged as collateral. In July 2008, the Registrant drew down $46.1 million under the credit line. In accordance with the offering by UBS, the existing credit line will be treated as a "no net cost loan" as defined in the Prospectus. As such, the credit line will remain payable on demand; however, if UBS Bank should exercise its right to demand repayment of any portion of the Registrant's indebtedness prior to the date the Registrant can exercise its repurchase rights (other than for reasons specified in the Prospectus), UBS and certain of its affiliates will arrange for alternative financing on terms and conditions substantially the same as those contained in the existing credit line agreement. If alternative financing cannot be established, then UBS or one of its affiliates will purchase the Registrant's pledged auction rate securities at par.
 
As a result of accepting UBS's offer, the Registrant can require UBS to repurchase the securities at par value at any time during the period from June 30, 2010 through July 2, 2012, if the Registrant's auction rate securities have not previously been sold by the Registrant or by UBS on its behalf. The Registrant cannot assure that UBS will have adequate financial resources to fulfill its repurchase obligations. Proceeds of sales of the Registrant's auction rate securities will first be applied to repayment of the credit line with the balance for the Registrant's account.
 
A copy of the form of offer letter is included in a prospectus issued by UBS dated October 10, 2008.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20081110135820.txt.gz
TIME:20081110135820
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Section 1  Registrant's Business and Operations
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On November 10, 2008, ArQule, Inc. ("ArQule" or the "Registrant") announced that it has entered into the two agreements described below with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. ("Daiichi Sankyo").  The agreements form the basis of a strategic relationship for the development and discovery of novel oncology therapeutics.
 
(i)  On November 7, 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo entered into a binding letter of intent for an agreement to co-develop and co-commercialize ARQ 197, a small molecule, selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, in human cancer indications.  The agreement will cover the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where, as previously disclosed,  Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has obtained exclusive rights from ArQule for development and commercialization of ARQ 197.
 
The binding letter of intent provides for a $60 million cash upfront licensing payment and an additional $560 million in potential development and sales milestone payments from Daiichi Sankyo to ArQule. Upon commercialization, ArQule will receive tiered, double digit royalties from Daiichi Sankyo on net sales of ARQ 197 commensurate with the magnitude of the transaction. ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo will share equally the costs of Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical studies, with ArQule's share of Phase 3 costs payable solely from milestone and royalty payments.  Daiichi Sankyo will fund the costs of commercialization. ArQule retains the option to participate in the commercialization of ARQ 197 in the U.S.  The definitive contract based on the binding letter of intent, which will include the terms set forth above, is expected to be signed in December 2008.  The upfront payment provided for in the binding letter of intent will be paid upon the later of: (i) December 8, 2008 or (ii) the expiration or termination of the applicable waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976.
 
A copy of the Registrant's November 10, 2008 press release announcing the transaction is filed as exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(ii) On November 7, 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo entered into a research collaboration, exclusive license and co-commercialization agreement under which ArQule will apply its proprietary technology and know-how to the discovery of therapeutic compounds that selectively inhibit certain kinases.
 
The agreement provides for a $15 million upfront payment, payments for research support in the first and second years of the collaboration, and licensing fees for compounds discovered as a result of this research.  ArQule will also receive milestone payments related to clinical development, regulatory review and sales, and royalty payments on net sales of compounds from the collaboration. Milestone amounts and the percentages for tiered royalties payable on net sales amounts will be determined within the 6-month period following execution of the agreement. ArQule retains the option to co-commercialize licensed products in the U.S., and Daiichi Sankyo will fund the costs of worldwide development, commercialization and manufacturing.
 
A copy of the Registrant's November 10, 2008 press release announcing the transaction is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing transactions referred to herein dated November 10, 2008
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
November 10, 2008

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Woburn, MA, November 10, 2008 and Tokyo, Japan, November 11, 2008 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. (TSE: 4568) today announced that they have entered into two agreements that form the basis of a strategic relationship for the development and discovery of novel oncology therapeutics.
 
ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo will co-develop ARQ 197, a proprietary, orally administered, small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, to treat cancer.  In addition, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo will advance the application of ArQule's kinase inhibitor discovery platform (AKIP) to develop a new generation of highly selective, anti-cancer kinase inhibitors intended to ensure a long-term presence in this therapeutic category.  On a combined basis, the two deals include $75 million in cash upfront to ArQule from Daiichi Sankyo.
 
"We are delighted to welcome Daiichi Sankyo as a partner in our shared quest to bring innovative cancer therapeutics to patients and their physicians," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "With this announcement, we complete the ARQ 197 partnership process and set the stage to bring the ARQ 197 development program to the next level.  We are also very pleased to broaden this relationship by welcoming Daiichi Sankyo as our first partner for ArQule's AKIP platform.
 
"For ArQule, this strategic relationship will achieve several product development, scientific and financial objectives," said Mr. Pucci.  "First, it will allow us to optimize a clinical program with ARQ 197 that elicits the full therapeutic potential of this highly selective c-Met inhibitor.  Second, it supports and further validates the application of our proprietary technology platform to the discovery of a new generation of selective inhibitors of kinases implicated in cancer.  Finally, it provides meaningful, non-dilutive infusions of cash, as well as an opportunity for cost sharing."
 
"Daiichi Sankyo looks forward to being able to collaborate with ArQule to realize differentiated and innovative approaches in the treatment of these devastating diseases," said Takashi Shoda, president and chief executive officer of Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd.  "This strategic partnership is the next important milestone for Daiichi Sankyo to solidify a strong and viable pipeline in oncology."
 
ARQ 197 Agreement Summary
 
ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo have entered into a binding letter of intent for an exclusive license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement under which they shall collaborate to conduct research, clinical trials and the market launch of ARQ 197 in human cancer indications in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. (Kyowa) has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.
 
The binding letter of intent provides for a $60 million cash upfront licensing payment from Daiichi Sankyo to ArQule.  In addition, the binding letter of intent includes significant development and sales milestone payments. ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo will share equally the costs of Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical studies, with ArQule's share of Phase 3 costs payable solely from milestone and royalty payments by Daiichi Sankyo.  Upon commercialization, ArQule will receive tiered royalties from Daiichi Sankyo on net sales of ARQ 197. ArQule retains the option to participate in the commercialization of ARQ 197 in the U.S.  The final contract based on the binding letter of intent, including the terms above, is expected to be signed in December 2008.  The upfront payment provided for in the binding letter of intent will be paid upon the later of December 8, 2008 or the expiration or termination of the applicable waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976.
 
Kinase Inhibitor Discovery Agreement Summary
 
ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo have entered into a research collaboration, exclusive license and co-commercialization agreement under which ArQule will apply its proprietary technology and know-how from its AKIP platform for the discovery of therapeutic compounds that selectively inhibit certain kinases. The agreement defines two such kinase targets, and Daiichi Sankyo will have an
 
option to license compounds directed to these targets following the completion of certain pre-clinical studies.
 
The agreement provides for a $15 million upfront payment, undisclosed payments in research support for the first and second years of the collaboration, licensing fees for compounds discovered as a result of this research, milestone payments related to clinical development, regulatory review and sales, and royalty payments.   ArQule retains the option to co-commercialize licensed products in the U.S.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning at 11:00 a.m. today for five days and can be accessed by dialing 1-888-286-8010 from the U.S. and Canada, and 1-617-801-6888 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is 32056271.
 
About ARQ 197 and c-Met
 
ARQ 197 is a selective inhibitor of c-Met, a receptor tyrosine kinase.  When abnormally activated, c-Met plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.  Pre-clinical data have demonstrated that ARQ 197 inhibits c-Met activation in a range of human tumor cell lines, including clear cell sarcoma, and shows anti-tumor activity against several human tumor xenografts.  In clinical studies to date, treatment with ARQ 197 has been well tolerated and has resulted in tumor responses and prolonged stable disease across broad ranges of tumors and doses.
 
About ArQule's Kinase Inhibitor Discovery Platform
 
Insights into the binding of ARQ 197 to c-Met formed the basis of ArQule's discovery platform, which the Company is leveraging to design a new type of kinase inhibitors.  These compounds will be intended to selectively inhibit each targeted kinase potently, selectively and without competing with ATP (adenosine triphosphate, an energy source for cells).  The Company is assessing the potential of multiple kinases as targets for this drug discovery platform, named AKIP, and is
 
applying the platform to discover and validate compounds that inhibit these kinase targets with mechanisms similar to that of ARQ 197.
 
About Daiichi Sankyo
 
A global pharma innovator, Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. was established in 2005 through the merger of two leading Japanese pharmaceutical companies.  This integration created a more robust organization that allows for continuous development of novel drugs that enrich the quality of life for patients around the world.  A central focus of Daiichi Sankyo's research and development are thrombotic disorders, malignant neoplasm, diabetes mellitus, and autoimmune disorders.  Equally important to the company are hypertension, hyperlipidemia or atherosclerosis, and bacterial infections.
 
For more information, visit www.daiichisankyo.com.
 
Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., a subsidiary of the global research-based pharmaceutical company, is based in Parsippany, NJ.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead product, which is in clinical-stage development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  An additional clinical-stage program includes compounds that activate the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor. The Company's most advanced pre-clinical development programs are focused on compounds that inhibit the Eg5 kinesin spindle protein and the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate), an energy source for cells.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with ARQ 197 and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development covered by the Company's agreements with Daiichi Sankyo. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or Daiichi Sankyo to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of
 
clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20081222155243.txt.gz
TIME:20081222155243
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 Registrant's Business and Operations
Section 1
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") previously announced that it had entered into a binding letter of intent for an agreement to co-develop and co-commercialize ARQ 197, a small molecule, selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, in human cancer indications.
 
the relevant waiting period under the
On December 19, 2008, the Registrant announced that
Hart
-
Scott
-
Rodino Anti-Trust Improvements Act of 1976 had expired, thereby permitting consummation of the transaction including payment of the $60 million cash up-front licensing payment from Daiichi Sankyo.
 
The agreement will cover the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where, as previously disclosed,  Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has obtained exclusive rights from ArQule for development and commercialization of ARQ 197.
 
In addition to the $60 million cash upfront licensing payment, the agreement provides for up to an additional $560 million in potential development and sales milestone payments from Daiichi Sankyo to ArQule. Upon commercialization, ArQule will receive tiered, double digit royalties from Daiichi Sankyo on net sales of ARQ 197 commensurate with the magnitude of the transaction. ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo will share equally the costs of Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical studies, with ArQule's share of Phase 3 costs payable solely from milestone and royalty payments.  Daiichi Sankyo will fund the costs of commercialization. ArQule retains the option to participate in the commercialization of ARQ 197 in the U.S.
 
A copy of the Registrant's December 19, 2008 press release announcing the signing of the agreement and the licensing payment is filed as exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of  press release announcing the transaction referred to herein, dated December 19, 2008.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
December 22, 2008

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT WITH DAIICHI SANKYO EXECUTED,
 
$60 MILLION PAYMENT RECEIVED BY ARQULE
 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that it has signed a License, Co-Development and Co-Commercialization Agreement with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. to co-develop ARQ 197, the Company's selective c-Met inhibitor, in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.  The definitive agreement supersedes the binding letter of intent announced on November 10, 2008 covering the same subject matter.
Woburn, MA, December 19, 2008 
 
The Company also announced today the expiration of the waiting period under the
Hart
-
Scott
-
Rodino Anti-Trust Improvements Act of 1976, thereby permitting consummation of the collaboration, including receipt of a $60 million cash up-front licensing payment from Daiichi Sankyo in connection therewith.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead product, which is in clinical-stage development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  Additional programs are focused on compounds that inhibit the Eg5 kinesin spindle protein and the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate), an energy source for cells.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's development of ARQ 197 under the Company's agreement with Daiichi Sankyo. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage
 
clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or Daiichi Sankyo to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company and Daiichi Sankyo to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to meet its obligations or take advantage of its rights under the License, Co-Development and Co-Commercialization Agreement. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20081223165839.txt.gz
TIME:20081223165839
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 Other Events
Section 8
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On December 19, 2008, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") announced that Roche notified the Registrant of its intention not to exercise its option to license the E2F program.  Pursuant to the terms of the Roche agreement, Roche has until December 31, 2008 to exercise its option, and, if it has not done so, Roche's rights to develop and commercialize potential drugs under the agreement will terminate as of the end of the year.
 
A copy of the Registrant's December 19, 2008 press release announcing an update of its early-stage pipeline is filed as exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1  Text of Press Release announcing the Registrant's Update on Early-Stage Pipeline, dated December 19, 2008.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ARQULE PROVIDES UPDATE ON EARLY-STAGE PIPELINE
 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today provided an update on the status of two products in its early-stage product pipeline: ARQ 621, a selective inhibitor of the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 761, an activator of the E2F biological pathway.
Woburn, MA, December 19, 2008 
 
The U.S. FDA has accepted an Investigational New Drug application (IND) for ARQ 621, and the Company plans to initiate a Phase 1 clinical trial with this compound in 2009.  ARQ 621 has been shown pre-clinically to potently and selectively inhibit Eg5 and to induce cell death across multiple human cancer cell lines and , while being non-toxic to bone marrow cells in animal models.
in vitro
in vivo
 
With respect to ARQ 761, a second generation compound in its E2F program, the Company's partner, Roche, has notified the Company that it does not intend to exercise its option to license the program, and hence Roche's rights to develop and commercialize candidates under the agreement will terminate as of the end of the year.
 
"In addition to our lead product, ARQ 197, which is in Phase 2 clinical trials, our assets now include two products with accepted INDs and a pipeline of earlier pre-clinical candidates, some of which are derived from our selective kinase inhibitor discovery platform," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "We have begun to prioritize this portfolio of assets, and we will be exploring all options, including partnering, to advance selected products cost-effectively along the development pathway."
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead
product, which is in clinical-stage development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  Additional programs are focused on compounds that inhibit the Eg5 kinesin spindle protein and the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate), an energy source for cells.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with ARQ 621 and ARQ 761.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 621 and ARQ 761 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 621 is subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20090204163136.txt.gz
TIME:20090204163136
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
 
 
 Registrant's Business and Operations
Section 1
 
Item 1.02 Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On December 19, 2008, the Registrant announced that Roche had notified the Registrant of its intention not to exercise its option to license the Registrant's E2F-1 program under the agreement.  On January 30, 2009, the Registrant notified Roche that the agreement had been terminated in accordance with its terms. As a result, all rights and licenses granted by the Registrant to Roche under the agreement also terminated and reverted to the Registrant.
As previously reported, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") entered into a strategic alliance agreement with F. Hoffman-La Roche Ltd. and Hoffman-La Roche Inc. (collectively, "Roche") dated April 1, 2004. 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
February 4, 2009


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20090309154444.txt.gz
TIME:20090309154444
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On March 5, 2009, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the year ended December 31, 2008.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated March 5, 2009.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
March 9, 2009

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ARQULE REPORTS FISCAL 2008 YEAR END AND
FOURTH QUARTER RESULTS
 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the year and for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2008.
Woburn, MA, March 5, 2009 
 
The Company reported a net loss of $50,864,000 or $1.16 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2008, compared with a net loss of $53,372,000 or $1.33 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2007.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2008, the Company reported a net loss of $9,629,000, or $0.22 per share, compared with a net loss of $14,389,000, or $0.33 per share, for the quarter ended December 31, 2007.
 
At December 31, 2008, the Company had a total of approximately $206,109,000 in cash and marketable securities, which includes $47,750,000 drawn down during the third and fourth quarters of 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities.  Net of these notes, at December 31, 2008, the Company had a total of approximately $158,359,000 in cash and marketable securities.
 
Operational Highlights for 2008
 
Two agreements with Daiichi Sankyo providing a combined $75 million in upfront cash, cost sharing, expense reimbursement, milestone payments, royalties and co-commercialization rights to ARQ 197 and compounds discovered through the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform;
                 
 
Cash resources at December 31, 2008 projected to fund Company operations for at least three years;
                 
 
Expansion and refinement of ARQ 197 clinical trial program, which currently includes four indications: MiT (Microphthalmia Transcription factor) tumors, non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), pancreatic cancer, and hepatocellular carcinoma;
                 
 
Selective advancement of pipeline products, with two new INDs filed.
                 
 
"Our financial resources at the end of 2008, which total approximately $158 million of cash and marketable securities net of the loans collateralized by our auction rate securities, underscore the strength of our capitalization and should allow us to fund operations through at least the end of 2011," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule. "Any future cash inflow from milestones
related to existing contracts or from new business development deals will be incremental to the end of 2008 cash balance.
 
"We expect to generate meaningful clinical data from multiple programs during 2009, and we have the flexibility to refine our regulatory strategies and to prioritize our pipeline based on these data," said Mr. Pucci. "Specific to ARQ 197, in 2009 we plan to:
 
complete patient enrollment in the Phase 2 monotherapy trial in MiT tumors and prepare to move into Phase 3 if Phase 2 endpoints are met;
                 
 
substantially complete patient enrollment in our randomized Phase 2 combination therapy trial in NSCLC with erlotinib;
                 
 
initiate patient enrollment in the pharmacokinetic combination trial with gemcitabine as part of the modified pancreatic cancer program;
                 
 
complete enrollment in the Phase 1 monotherapy trial in HCC and, pending the results of that trial, initiate Phase 2 trials in monotherapy and/or combination therapy with sorafenib;
                 
 
initiate patient enrollment in the pharmacokinetic combination trial with sorafenib.
                 
 
"During 2009, we will also integrate our clinical development efforts with Daiichi Sankyo, and we will work closely with Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin to coordinate a global development plan for ARQ 197," said Mr. Pucci.
 
"Our product pipeline activities will be focused upon defining the most cost-effective ways to advance key projects, either through corporate partnering or independently," said Mr. Pucci.  "We plan to initiate during the first half of the year a Phase 1 program for ARQ 621, the lead product from our Eg5 program.  We also expect to complete work leading to the filing of an additional IND in 2010. Finally, we will explore additional collaborations that apply our proprietary ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) asset in oncology and other therapeutic areas."
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
Revenues for the year ended December 31, 2008 were $14,141,000, compared with revenues of $9,165,000 for the year ended December 31, 2007.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2008, revenues were $5,367,000, compared with revenues of $2,542,000 for the quarter ended December 31, 2007.
 
The increase in revenue for the 2008 periods was due to revenue from licensing rights to ARQ 197 to Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd., as well as from a research collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo.  In addition, revenue for 2008 included revenue from a milestone payment for the development of ARQ 197 from Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. Revenues for both years included financial support from Roche for the Company's ongoing development of products in its E2F cancer therapy program. Following the termination of our license agreement with Roche, $1,609,000 of deferred revenue was recognized in the fourth quarter of 2008. No further revenues will be recognized under the Company's E2F collaboration with Roche.
 
Fiscal 2008 research and development expenses were $49,629,000 compared with $53,727,000 for fiscal 2007.  Fourth quarter 2008 research and development expenses were $10,409,000 compared with $14,417,000 for the fourth quarter of 2007.  The decrease in research and development expenses in 2008 is primarily due to a decrease in clinical outsourcing expenses.
General and administrative expenses for fiscal 2008 were $16,918,000 compared to $15,069,000 for fiscal 2007.  The increased 2008 general and administrative expenses were primarily due to non-cash, stock-based compensation costs resulting from senior management transitions. In the fourth quarter of 2008, general and administrative expenses were $3,499,000 compared with $4,407,000 in the fourth quarter of 2007.   The decrease in general and administrative expenses in the fourth quarter of 2008 was principally related to stock-based compensation costs incurred in the fourth quarter of 2007 in conjunction with the employment agreement of the prior chief executive officer that did not recur in the fourth quarter of 2008.
 
2009 Financial Guidance
 
For 2009, ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $46 and $49 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $21 and $24 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $44 and $47 million, and net loss per share to range between $0.98 and $1.05 for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2009 with between $157 and $160 million in cash and marketable securities, which includes $47.8 million drawn down in 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities. Net of these notes, the Company expects to end 2009 with net cash and marketable securities in a range of between $109 and $112 million.  These figures do not assume incremental revenue and cash resources from additional partnering transactions or milestone payments that may occur or be triggered during 2009.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. eastern time today, March 5, 2009.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning at Noon on March 5 for seven days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 1-888-286-8010 and outside the U.S. 1-617-801-6888.  The access code is 45203516.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead product, which is in clinical-stage development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  An additional clinical-stage program includes compounds that activate the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor. The Company's most advanced pre-clinical development programs are focused on compounds that inhibit the Eg5 kinesin spindle protein and the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts are focused on
the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate), an energy source for cells.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with ARQ 197 and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Company's ability to fund operations for the next three years with current cash and marketable securities and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197and additional product candidates are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. In addition, certain of the Company's marketable securities (auction rate securities) are traded in a market experiencing liquidity problems. Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the ARQ 197 license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of ARQ 197 on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20090507083534.txt.gz
TIME:20090507083534
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On May 7, 2009, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2009.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated May 7, 2009.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ARQULE REPORTS FIRST QUARTER 2009 FINANCIAL RESULTS
 
Woburn, MA, May 7, 2009 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2009.
 
For the quarter ended March 31, 2009, the Company reported a net loss of $9,908,000 or $0.23 per share, compared to a net loss of $13,914,000, or $0.32 per share, for the first quarter of 2008.
 
At March 31, 2009, the Company had a total of $192,371,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities, which includes $47,750,000 drawn down during the third and fourth quarters of 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities.  Net of these notes, at March 31, 2009 the Company had a total of $144,621,000.
 
Operational Highlights
 
                 
ARQ 197, a selective inhibitor of c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase
                 
Patient enrollment in the Phase 2 MiT (Microphthalmia Transcription Factor) and NSCLC (non-small cell lung cancer) trials proceeding as planned
                 
Dosing of the first patients in a Phase 1 trial in HCC (hepatocellular carcinoma) and in a new combination therapy arm with ARQ 197 and gemcitabine in pancreatic cancer
                 
ARQ 621, a novel inhibitor of the Eg5 kinesin motor protein
                 
Completed accrual of the first patient cohort in a Phase 1 safety and dose finding trial
 
"In partnership with Daiichi Sankyo, we continue to expand the development program for ARQ 197," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "Each of the four tumor programs currently in development is based upon the biological rationales for c-Met inhibition in the respective tumor types.  Specifically in our newest program, HCC, the over-expression of c-Met and its ligand, hepatocyte growth factor, is associated with poor patient prognosis.
 
"We advanced our clinical-stage product portfolio during the quarter with the accrual of the first patient cohort in a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621, a second-generation, small molecule inhibitor of the Eg5 kinesin motor protein," said Mr. Pucci.  "We plan to complete this dose escalation trial late this year.
 
"Finally, pre-clinical findings with two of our products were highlighted in posters at the 2009 Annual Meeting of the American Association for Cancer Research in April," said Mr. Pucci. "The data in these posters were generated from and studies with ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 that support the clinical rationale for our ongoing trials."
in vivo
in vitro
 
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
The Company reported total revenues of $5,420,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2009, compared with revenues of $3,527,000 for the first quarter of 2008.  The increase in revenues in the first quarter of 2009 was primarily due to revenue from the Company's development and research collaboration agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. entered into in late 2008.  Revenues in 2009 also included revenue from the Company's license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.  The first quarter of 2008 included revenues from the Company's previous collaboration with Roche, which terminated in the fourth quarter of 2008.
 
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 were $14,994,000 compared to $19,086,000 for the first quarter of 2008.   Research and development costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 were $11,334,000 compared to $13,452,000 for the first quarter of 2008.  The decreased 2009 research and development costs were primarily due to lower clinical outsourcing costs, including those related to the E2F program.  Reimbursement from Daiichi Sankyo for Phase 2 clinical trial expenses for ARQ 197 incurred in the quarter ended March 31, 2009 will be received in the following quarter.
 
General and administrative costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 were $3,660,000 compared to $5,634,000 for the first quarter of 2008.  The decreased 2009 general and administrative expenses were primarily due to non-recurring, non-cash, stock-based compensation costs resulting from senior management transitions in the first quarter of 2008.
 
Confirmed Financial Guidance
 
As previously stated, for 2009, ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $46 and $49 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $21 and $24 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $44 and $47 million, and net loss per share to range between $0.98 and $1.05 for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2009 with between $157 and $160 million in cash and marketable securities, which includes $47.8 million drawn down in 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities. Net of these notes, the Company expects to end 2009 with net cash and marketable securities in a range of between $109 and $112 million.  These figures do not assume incremental revenue and cash resources from additional partnering transactions or milestone payments that may occur or be triggered during 2009.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
Conference call details
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 888-286-8010 and outside the U.S. 617-801-6888.  The access code is 48256941.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  An additional clinical-stage program includes compounds that activate the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor. The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP)  are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate).
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations or its financial condition, as well as its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co. Ltd. and Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd.  These statements include references to potential future milestone and royalty payments that could result from the future development of ARQ 197 and products generated from the company's AKIP platform.  Failure to successfully develop these products could prevent the Company from receiving these future payments.  Additional forward-looking statements relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including Phase 2 trials with ARQ 197 and a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in further pre-clinical testing and in current, later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 is subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to pursue drug discovery successfully in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20090529145100.txt.gz
TIME:20090529145100
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Section 1
 Registrant's Business and Operations
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
As previously reported, on November 7, 2008, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. ("Daiichi Sankyo") entered into a collaborative research, development and license agreement (the "Agreement") under which the Registrant is applying its proprietary technology and know-how to the discovery of therapeutic compounds that selectively inhibit certain kinases. The Agreement provides that, subsequent to its effective date, the parties would agree upon milestone payments and royalties to be paid for each product licensed by Daiichi Sankyo pursuant to the Agreement.
 
On May 25, 2009, the Registrant and Daiichi Sankyo entered into an agreement pursuant to which the parties agreed to potential future milestones and royalties.  In accordance therewith, the Registrant could receive for each product selected for clinical development up to $265 million in potential development and sales milestone payments, in addition to the previously reported $15 million cash upfront payment received by the Registrant.  Upon commercialization of a licensed product, the Registrant would also receive tiered double-digit royalties on its net sales.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20090604165327.txt.gz
TIME:20090604165327
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 7
Regulation FD
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
This report updates information contained in an earlier press release relating to data on disease control rates published in an abstract at the 2009 Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncologists (ASCO) and issued prior to the final presentation of preliminary data from an ongoing Phase 2 clinical trial.  This trial is designed to evaluate the efficacy of ARQ 197 when used to treat a group of tumors associated with dysregulation of the Microphthalmia Transcription Factor (MiT).
 
As presented at the ASCO Annual Meeting, an overall disease control rate (objective responses and stable disease) of 64 percent has been observed in preliminary results from the trial. The disease control rates by MiT tumor type and the numbers of evaluable patients with each tumor type are as follows:
 
                 
Alveolar Soft Part Sarcoma, 81%, 16 patients;
                 
Clear Cell Sarcoma, 43%, 7 patients; and
                 
Renal Cell Carcinoma, 40%, 5 patients.
 
In accordance with General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K, the information in this section of this report shall not be deemed filed for the purpose of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing.  The furnishing of this information does not mean that it is material or that disclosure of the information is required.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20090708152343.txt.gz
TIME:20090708152343
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
                                   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 8Other Events
 
Item 8.01   Other Events.
 
On May 14, 2009, at the 2009 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") the stockholders voted:
 
1.     To elect Timothy C. Barabe and Paolo Pucci as directors of the Registrant to hold office for a term of three years and until their respective successors are elected and qualified;
 
2.     To approve amendments to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for awards granted under the Plan by 1,400,000, from 9,600,000 to 11,000,000 shares of common stock and to incorporate other changes described in the Registrant's proxy statement;
 
3.     To approve amendments to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Employee Stock Purchase Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for purchase by participants under the Plan by 400,000, from 1,600,000 to 2,000,000 shares of common stock; and
 
3.     To ratify the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit the Registrant's financial statements for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2009.
 
The voting results are set forth in Exhibit 99.1 to this report and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1  Report of Matters Voted Upon by Stockholders
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
1.     The 2009 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc.  (the "Annual Meeting") was held at the company's offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, on May 14, 2009 commencing at 10:00 a.m. pursuant to notice properly given.
 
2.     At the close of business on March 27, 2009, the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the Annual Meeting, the outstanding voting securities of the Company were 44,557,477 shares of common stock, $0.01 par value.  Each of the outstanding shares was entitled to one vote on the matters before the Annual Meeting.
 
3.     At the Annual Meeting, 42,000,290 shares of the Registrant's issued and outstanding common stock were represented in person or by proxy, constituting a quorum.
 
4.     At the Annual Meeting, each of the following nominees for director received the respective number of votes set forth opposite his name, constituting a plurality of the votes cast, and was duly elected as a director of the Registrant.
 
 
5.     The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve amendments to our Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for awards granted under the Plan by 1,400,000, from 9,600,000 to 11,000,000 shares of common stock and to incorporate other changes described in our proxy statement.
 
 
6.     The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve amendments to our Amended and Restated 1996 Employee Stock Purchase Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for purchase by participants under the Plan by 400,000, from 1,600,000 to 2,000,000 shares of common stock.
 
 
 
7.     The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to ratify the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit ArQule's financial statements for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2009.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20090806095234.txt.gz
TIME:20090806095234
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
o
       Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
       Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
       Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
       Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 6, 2009, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2009.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated August 6, 2009.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ARQULE REPORTS SECOND QUARTER 2009 FINANCIAL RESULTS
 
Woburn, MA, August 6, 2009 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2009.
 
For the quarter ended June 30, 2009, the Company reported a net loss of $8,272,000 or $0.19 per share, compared with a net loss of $16,040,000, or $0.37 per share, for the second quarter of 2008.  For the six-month period ended June 30, 2009, the Company reported a net loss of $18,180,000 or $0.41 per share, compared to a net loss of $29,954,000, or $0.68 per share, for the six-month period ended June 30, 2008.
 
At June 30, 2009, the Company had a total of approximately $185,741,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities, which includes $47,750,000 drawn down in 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities.  Net of these notes, at June 30, 2009, the Company had a total of $137,991,000.
 
Operational Highlights Include ARQ 197 Clinical Data Presentations At 2009 Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO)
 
                 
Phase 1 data show good tolerability among patients treated with erlotinib plus ARQ 197, and prolonged stable disease was noted among patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).  These data were subsequently updated and expanded upon in an oral presentation at the 13
th
 World Conference on Lung Cancer in San Francisco, July 31  August 4, 2009.
                 
Phase 2 interim data in Microphthalmia Transcription Factor-associated (MiT) tumors demonstrate preliminary anti-cancer activity and favorable safety profile of ARQ 197.
                 
Findings from a pharmacokinetic and pharmacodynamic trial suggest anti-angiogenic effects of ARQ 197, as measured by declines in circulating endothelial cells and decreases in apparent tumor blood flow.
 
"The findings with ARQ 197 presented at ASCO provide additional signals of anti-cancer activity and strengthen the therapeutic rationale for c-MET inhibition in multiple tumor types," said Paolo
 
Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "Patient accrual continues as planned in our lead Phase 2 trials in NSCLC and MiT-associated tumors, as well as in safety trials in hepatocellular carcinoma and pancreatic cancer.  As we have mentioned previously, our agreement with Daiichi Sankyo provides for the selection of an additional tumor type this year, and we are on track for the conclusion of that process.
 
"In our second clinical-stage program, we are continuing to dose escalate and enroll patients in a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621, a second-generation, small molecule inhibitor of the Eg5 kinesin motor protein," said Mr. Pucci.  "We expect to conclude enrollment by late 2009 or early 2010, depending on when we reach dose-limiting toxicity."
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
The Company reported total revenues of $6,056,000 for the quarter ended June 30, 2009, compared to revenues of $2,583,000 for the second quarter of 2008.  Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2009 were $11,476,000, compared to revenues of $6,110,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2008.Revenues for the 2009 three and six-month periods were primarily due to revenues from the Company's agreements with Daiichi Sankyo for ARQ 197 and the AKIP (ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform) discovery collaboration, both signed in late 2008.  Revenues for both years also included revenue from the Company's license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.
 
 
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended June 30, 2009 were $15,881,000 compared to $19,269,000 for the second quarter of 2008.  Total costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2009 were $30,875,000 compared to $38,355,000 for the same period in 2008.
 
Research and development costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2009 were $12,678,000 and $24,012,000, respectively, compared with $14,980,000 and $28,432,000 for the 2008 three and six-month periods.  The decreases in research and development costs for the 2009 periods were related primarily to reduced outsourcing costs.
 
General and administrative costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2009 were $3,203,000 and $6,863,000 respectively, compared with $4,289,000 and $9,923,000 for the 2008 three and six-month periods.  The decreased general and administrative costs for the three-month period ended June 30, 2009 were primarily due to non-cash, stock-based compensation costs incurred in the three months ended June 30, 2008 related to the Company's employment agreement with its current chief executive officer as well as reduced professional fees.  The decreased general and administrative costs for the six-month period ended June 30, 2009 were primarily due to reduced non-cash, stock-based compensation costs incurred in the six months ended June 30, 2008 related to the Company's employment agreements with its previous and current chief executive officers.
 
Confirmed Financial Guidance
 
As previously stated, for 2009, ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $46 and $49 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $21 and $24 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $44 and $47 million, and net loss per share to range between $0.98 and $1.05 for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2009 with between $157 and $160 million in cash and marketable securities, which
 
includes $47.8 million drawn down in 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities. Net of these notes, the Company expects to end 2009 with net cash and marketable securities in a range of $109 to $112 million.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 888-286-8010 and outside the U.S. 617-801-6888.  The replay access code is 31608566.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  An additional clinical-stage program includes compounds that activate the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor. The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations and its financial condition, and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co. Ltd. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.  These statements include references to potential future milestone and royalty payments that could result from the future development of ARQ 197 and products generated from the company's AKIP platform.  Failure to successfully develop these products could prevent the Company from receiving these future payments.  Additional forward-looking statements relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including Phase 2 and Phase 1 trials with ARQ 197 and a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621, as well as progress in the pre-clinical development of products in the Company's BRAF kinase program and its AKIP discovery platform.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results is not necessarily indicative of clinical efficacy and
 
does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in further pre-clinical testing and in current, later-stage or larger-scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later-stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later-stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 is subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to pursue drug discovery and development successfully in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug discovery and development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
(1) Net unrealized gain from auction rate securities and auction rate put option.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20091105080932.txt.gz
TIME:20091105080932
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 5, 2009, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2009.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated November 5, 2009.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
For Immediate Release:
 
ARQULE ANNOUNCES THIRD QUARTER FISCAL 2009 RESULTS
 
Conference call scheduled today at 9:00 a.m. eastern time
 
Woburn, Mass., November 5, 2009
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today reported its results of operations for the fiscal quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2009.
 
The Company reported a net loss of $8,088,000 or $0.18 per share, for the quarter ended September 30, 2009, compared to a net loss of $11,281,000, or $0.26 per share, for the quarter ended September 30, 2008.  For the nine-month period ended September 30, 2009, the Company reported a net loss of $26,268,000 or $0.60 per share, compared to a net loss of $41,235,000, or $0.94 per share, for the same period in 2008.
 
At September 30, 2009, the Company had a total of $178,106,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities, which includes $47,750,000 drawn down in 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities.  Net of these notes, at September 30, 2009, the Company had a total of $130,356,000.
 
Recent Operational Highlights
 
ARQ 197:
                 
Completion of patient enrollment in the Phase 2 non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) trial testing the combination therapy of ARQ 197 and erlotinib;
                 
Initiation of patient enrollment in a Phase 2 trial with ARQ 197 in hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC);
                 
Designation of ARQ 197 as an orphan medical product for the treatment of soft tissue sarcoma by the European Medicines Evaluation Agency (EMEA);
                 
Continued patient enrollment as planned in the Phase 2 monotherapy trial with ARQ 197 in Microphthalmia Transcription Factor (MiT)-associated tumors;
                 
Progress in combination safety trials of ARQ 197 with sorafenib and ARQ 197 with gemcitabine, with potential target indications of HCC and pancreatic cancer, respectively.
Pipeline:
                 
Continued dose escalation in a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621;
                 
Acceptance of an abstract highlighting the discovery of fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR) inhibitors for presentation at the 2009 AACR-EORTC-NCI Molecular Targets and Cancer Therapeutics Conference.
 
"Progress in our clinical development program with ARQ 197 is being made across four indications and three combination regimens," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "Notably, we have completed patient enrollment in our Phase 2 trial in non-small cell lung cancer ahead of schedule, and we expect to have data from this trial available in the first half of 2010.
 
"We also expect to complete enrollment in our Phase 2 MiT trial late this year, and we recently initiated enrollment in a Phase 2 trial in hepatocellular carcinoma following the successfully completed evaluation of patients in a safety trial," said Mr. Pucci. "ARQ 197 combination therapy safety trials with sorafenib and gemcitabine are proceeding as well.
 
"We recently received notification that the EMEA has designated ARQ 197 as an orphan medical product for the treatment of soft tissue sarcoma," said Mr. Pucci.  "Future interactions with regulatory authorities, combined with the evaluation of clinical data from our MiT trial expected to be available in early 2010, will inform our decisions related to the possible advancement of this program.
 
"Our Phase 1, dose escalation trial with ARQ 621, an inhibitor of the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, is progressing well," said Mr. Pucci.  "We continue to increase dosing and expect to complete this trial early next year.
 
"With a presentation at the AACR-EORTC-NCI meeting later this month, we will introduce our newest program," said Mr. Pucci.  "This program is focused on the development of potent, small molecule inhibitors of the fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR) based upon the independent application of our proprietary kinase discovery technology.  Pending successful pre-clinical development, we expect to file an Investigational New Drug (IND) application with a lead candidate from this program in 2010.
 
"Our oncology-focused, ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. continues to move forward," said Mr. Pucci.  "The range and stages of our clinical and pre-clinical activities position us for a number of potential inflection points beginning in the first half of 2010."
Revenues and Expenses
 
The Company reported total revenues of $6,436,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2009, compared to revenues of $2,664,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2008.  Revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2009 were $17,912,000, compared to revenues of $8,774,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2008.  Increased revenues for the 2009 periods were primarily due to revenues from the Company's agreements with Daiichi Sankyo
Co., Ltd.
for ARQ 197 and the AKIP discovery collaboration, both signed in late 2008.  Revenues for both years include revenue from the Company's agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.
 
For the quarter ended September 30, 2009, the Company reported total costs and expenses of $14,481,000, compared to total costs and expenses of $14,284,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2008.  Total costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2009 were $45,356,000, compared to $52,639,000 for the same period in 2008.
 
Research and development costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2009 were $11,347,000 and $35,359,000 respectively, compared with $10,788,000 and $39,220,000 for the 2008 three and nine-month periods.  The decrease in research and development expense in the nine-month period ended September 30, 2009 was primarily due to clinical trial costs in 2008 related to ARQ 501 that did not recur in 2009, lower personnel-related costs, and executive transition costs that did not recur in 2009.
 
General and administrative costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2009 were $3,134,000 and $9,997,000, respectively, compared with $3,496,000 and $13,419,000 for the 2008 three and nine-month periods.  The decrease in general and administrative costs in the 2009 three-month period was primarily due to lower personnel related costs.  The decrease in general and administrative costs in the 2009 nine-month period was principally due to lower personnel related costs and to non-cash, stock-based compensation costs incurred in 2008 related to the Company's employment agreements with its previous and current chief executive officers.
 
Financial Guidance
 
The Company previously stated, that for 2009, it expects net use of cash to range between $46 and $49 million, revenues to range between $21 and $24 million, net loss to range between $44 and $47 million, and net loss per share to range between $0.98 and $1.05 for the year.  The Company also stated that it expects to end 2009 with between $157 and $160 million in cash and marketable securities, which includes $47.8 million drawn down in 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities. Net of these notes, the Company previously stated that it expects to end 2009 with net cash and marketable securities in a range of $109 to $112 million.
 
The Company believes that several factors may cause net use of cash for the year to be favorable to guidance.  Key among these are the timing of reimbursement of development costs for ARQ 197 from Daiichi Sankyo and cost savings initiatives that have been implemented throughout the year.  The net impact will be revenues at or above the high end of guidance, expenses at or below the low
end of guidance, and a resulting net loss below the low end of guidance.  In addition, the total of the Company's net cash and marketable securities at year end is expected to be above the high end of the range, which is $112 million.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning at 12:00 p.m. today for seven days and can be accessed by dialing 1-888-286-8010 from the U.S. and Canada, and 1-617-801-6888 from elsewhere.  For archived calls, the access code is 86035092.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to cancer. ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  An additional clinical-stage program includes compounds that activate the cell's DNA damage response mechanism mediated by the E2F-1 transcription factor. The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations and its financial condition, and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.  These statements include references to potential future milestone and royalty payments that could result from the future development of ARQ 197 and products generated from the company's AKIP platform.  Failure to successfully develop these products could prevent the Company from receiving these future payments.  Additional forward-looking statements
relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including Phase 1 and Phase 2 trials with ARQ 197 and a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621, as well as progress in the pre-clinical development of the Company's BRAF kinase program and its AKIP discovery platform.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results is not necessarily indicative of clinical efficacy and does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current, later-stage or larger-scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later-stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later-stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 is subject to the ability of the Company or in certain cases, its partners, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to pursue drug discovery and development successfully in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug discovery and development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
(1) Net unrealized gain from auction rate securities and auction rate put option.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20100302081445.txt.gz
TIME:20100302081445
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
                
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
                
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
                
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
                
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On March 2, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the year ended December 31, 2009.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated March 2, 2010.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ARQULE REPORTS FISCAL 2009 YEAR END AND
 
FOURTH QUARTER RESULTS
 
Woburn, MA, March 2, 2010 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the year and for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2009.
 
The Company reported a net loss of $36,136,000, or $0.82 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2009, compared with a net loss of $50,864,000, or $1.16 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2008.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2009, the Company reported a net loss of $9,868,000, or $0.22 per share, compared with a net loss of $9,629,000, or $0.22 per share, for the quarter ended December 31, 2008.
 
At December 31, 2009, the Company had a total of approximately $163,491,000 in cash and marketable securities, which includes $46,100,000 drawn down in 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities.  Net of these notes, at December 31, 2009, the Company had a total of approximately $117,391,000 in cash and marketable securities.
 
Operational Highlights for 2009
 
ARQ 197
 
                 
Completion of patient enrollment in a randomized, placebo controlled Phase 2 trial in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) testing the combination therapy of ARQ 197, an orally available, small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, and erlotinib;
                 
Substantial completion of patient enrollment in an open label Phase 2 trial of ARQ 197 in c-Met-associated soft tissue sarcomas;
                 
Advancement and expansion of the ARQ 197 clinical trial program to include the following indications: NSCLC, c-Met-associated soft tissue sarcomas, pancreatic adenocarcinoma, hepatocellular carcinoma, colorectal cancer and germ cell tumors;
                 
Expanded testing of ARQ 197 in combination with targeted and cytotoxic therapies, including sorafenib and gemcitabine.
Pipeline / Discovery
 
                 
Continued dose escalation in a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621,
an inhibitor of the Eg5 kinesin motor protein
;
                 
Presentation of pre-clinical data regarding fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR) inhibitors;
                 
Progress in our AKIP technology collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo leading to renewed financial commitment.
 
Plans for 2010
 
ARQ 197
 
"Clinical progress with ARQ 197 during 2009 has laid the foundation for establishing the following objectives for 2010, " said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.
 
                 
Reporting of data from Phase 2 trials in second/third line NSCLC and c-Met-associated soft tissue sarcomas in the first half of the year;
                 
Initiation of Phase 3 trials in NSCLC and c-Met-associated soft tissue sarcomas if the final analysis of Phase 2 data, as well as discussions with our partner, Daiichi Sankyo, and regulatory authorities, support such trials.
 
"We also plan an additional set of objectives related to the second wave of ARQ 197 clinical trials that has been agreed upon with our partner," said Mr. Pucci.
 
                 
Substantial completion of patient accrual in the ongoing Phase 2 hepatocellular carcinoma trial;
                 
Completion of Phase 1 combination trials with gemcitabine and sorafenib;
                 
Accrual of patients in the recently initiated Phase 1-2 trial in colorectal cancer and Phase 2 trial in germ cell tumors.
 
Pipeline
 
                 
Completion of dose escalation in the ongoing Phase 1 trial of ARQ 621 in the first half of the year;
                 
Filing of an Investigational New Drug (IND) application for one new molecule from either our B-RAF or FGFR programs.
 
"Having ended 2009 with $117.4 million in cash and marketable securities, net of notes payable of $46.1 million, we believe we are in a strong position to fund these activities going forward," said Mr. Pucci.  "We are committed to manage our resources in a highly disciplined fashion, and we will continue to conduct portfolio prioritization on a regular basis."
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
Revenues for the year ended December 31, 2009 were $25,198,000, compared with revenues of $14,141,000 for the year ended December 31, 2008.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2009,
revenues were $7,286,000, compared with revenues of $5,367,000 for the quarter ended December 31, 2008.
 
Revenues in 2009 included research and development revenue from the Company's ARQ 197 development and AKIP research collaboration agreements with Daiichi Sankyo and its ARQ 197 license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kirin.  The increases in the 2009 periods were primarily due to revenue from Daiichi Sankyo.
 
Fiscal 2009 research and development expenses were $49,495,000, compared with $49,629,000 for fiscal 2008.  Fourth quarter 2009 research and development expenses were $14,136,000, compared with $10,409,000 for fourth quarter 2008.  Research and development expenses increased in the fourth quarter of 2009 primarily due to costs associated with ARQ 197 clinical programs.
 
General and administrative expenses for fiscal 2009 were $13,317,000, compared to $16,918,000 for fiscal 2008.  Fourth quarter 2009 general and administrative costs were $3,320,000, compared with $3,499,000 for the fourth quarter 2008.  The decrease in 2009 general and administrative costs was primarily due to non-recurring stock compensation costs incurred in 2008.
 
2010 Financial Guidance
 
For 2010, ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $43 and $47 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $24 and $28 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $34 and $38 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.76) and $(0.84) for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2010 with between $70 and $74 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
ArQule will hold a conference call at 9:00 a.m. eastern time today, March 2, 2010.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning at Noon on March 2, 2010 for seven days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (800) 642-1687 and outside the U.S. (706) 645-9291.  The confirmation code for replayed calls is 57465288.
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the B-RAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with ARQ 197 and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Company's financial guidance for 2010 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2010), key corporate objectives for 2010, ability to fund operations with current cash and marketable securities, and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo, Inc.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of ARQ 197, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. In addition, certain of the Company's marketable securities (auction rate securities) are traded in a market experiencing liquidity problems. Moreover, Daiichi
Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the ARQ 197 license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of ARQ 197 on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
(1) Net unrealized gain (loss) from auction rate securities and auction rate put option.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20100331084120.txt.gz
TIME:20100331084120
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On March 31, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") announced results of its Phase 2 clinical trial of the Registrant's c-Met inhibitor, ARQ 197, in combination with erlotinib.
 
The Registrant's press release dated March 31, 2010, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1
   Text of press release announcing clinical trial results dated March 31, 2010.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
March 31, 2010

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
Woburn, MA, March 31, 2010 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced that ARQ 197, when used in combination with erlotinib, demonstrated a 66% improvement in median Progression-Free Survival (PFS) in patients with advanced, refractory non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).  In the intent to treat (ITT) population (n = 167), median PFS was 16.1 weeks in the ARQ 197 plus erlotinib arm, compared with 9.7 weeks in the erlotinib plus placebo arm.
 
The difference in PFS between the two arms did not achieve statistical significance (hazard ratio = 0.809) by applying a log-rank test. When adjusting for imbalances in the distribution of key prognostic factors, the difference in PFS was statistically significant (hazard ratio = 0.675) by applying a Cox regression analysis specified for secondary efficacy analyses.
 
Improvement in median PFS was more pronounced in the pre-defined sub-group of patients with non-squamous histology (n = 117); median PFS was 18.9 weeks in the treatment arm versus 9.7 weeks in the control arm, which represents a 94% improvement.  Based on an exploratory Cox regression analysis, the endpoint of PFS was met in the sub-group and achieved statistical significance (hazard ratio = 0.613).
 
There were no clinically relevant differences in adverse event rates between the treatment and control arms.  The majority of adverse events were mild in intensity and included rash, diarrhea and fatigue.
 
"We believe the treatment benefit observed in this trial would represent a meaningful clinical improvement over standard therapy if replicated in Phase 3 trials," said Dr. Brian Schwartz, chief medical officer of ArQule.  "We are especially encouraged by the potential benefit for the large sub-group of non-squamous cell patients.  We will thoroughly analyze our extensive database from
this trial, including additional patient sub-group characteristics, to optimize ongoing and future trials of ARQ 197."
 
Complete data from this trial, which will include biomarker analyses, will be presented at a future medical meeting during 2010.
 
One hundred sixty-seven patients were evaluated in the Phase 2 trial.  Participating patients were EGFR (epidermal growth factor receptor) inhibitor nave and were randomized one-to-one to receive either the combination of ARQ 197 plus erlotinib or placebo plus erlotinib in second and third line settings.  ARQ 197 is an orally available, small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  Erlotinib, marketed as Tarceva, is an inhibitor of the EGFR tyrosine kinase.
 
ARQ 197 is also currently being evaluated in clinical trials as a single agent and in combination with other anti-cancer therapies in a number of indications, including c-Met-associated soft-tissue sarcomas, hepatocellular carcinoma, pancreatic adenocarcinoma, germ cell tumors and colorectal cancer.
 
Patients, physicians and other healthcare professionals seeking additional information regarding trials involving ARQ 197 may call 1-800-373-7827.
 
The American Cancer Society's estimates of the impact of lung cancer in the U.S. during 2009 include approximately 219,000 new cases (both non-small cell and small cell) and 159,000 deaths resulting from the disease, accounting for 28 percent of all cancer deaths.  Lung cancer is the leading cause of cancer death among both men and women.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
ArQule will hold a conference call at 8:30 a.m. eastern time today, March 31, 2010 to discuss the results of the trial described above.
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning at Noon on March 31, 2010 for seven days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (800) 642-1687 and outside the U.S. (706) 645-9291.  The confirmation code for replayed calls is 66413046.
 
About c-Met and ARQ 197
 
When abnormally activated, the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.  Pre-clinical data have demonstrated that ARQ 197 inhibits c-Met activation in a range of human tumor
cell lines and shows anti-tumor activity against several human tumor xenografts.  In clinical trials to date, treatment with ARQ 197 has been well tolerated and has resulted in tumor responses and prolonged stable disease across broad ranges of tumors and doses.
 
About ArQule, Inc. and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd.
 
On December 19, 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd. signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop ARQ 197 in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company is also conducting Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the B-RAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.  The most advanced AKIP program is focused on the discovery of inhibitors of fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR).
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including its Phase 2 trial with ARQ 197 in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and trials which may be conducted by Daiichi Sankyo and/or Kyowa Hakko Kirin under their agreements with the Company.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results is not necessarily indicative of clinical efficacy and does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, this compound may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in further pre-clinical testing and in current, later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data, information or studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of ARQ 197, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the ARQ
197 license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to pursue drug discovery successfully in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20100506081314.txt.gz
TIME:20100506081314
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
    Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
    Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On May 6, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2010.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated May 6, 2010.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Contact:
William B. Boni
VP, Investor Relations/
Corp. Communications
(781) 994-0300
www.ArQule.com
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ARQULE REPORTS FIRST QUARTER 2010 FINANCIAL RESULTS
 
Woburn, MA, May 6, 2010 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2010.
 
For the quarter ended March 31, 2010, the Company reported a net loss of $9,752,000 or $0.22 per share, compared to a net loss of $9,908,000, or $0.23 per share, for the first quarter of 2009.
 
At March 31, 2010, the Company had a total of $146,762,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities, which includes $39,800,000 drawn down during 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities.  Net of these notes, at March 31, 2010 the Company had a total of $106,962,000.
 
Operational Update
 
                 
ARQ 197, a selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase
                 
Results of Phase 2 trial in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) announced on March 31, 2010 provide a signal of anti-cancer activity with no clinically relevant differences in adverse events between treatment and control arms
                 
Results of Phase 2 c-Met sarcoma trial planned for announcement during 2H 2010
                 
Enrollment continuing in single agent and combination therapy regimens in four additional indications, including hepatocellular carcinoma, pancreatic adenocarcinoma, germ cell tumors and colorectal cancer
                 
ARQ 621, a novel inhibitor of the Eg5 kinesin motor protein: enrollment continuing in a Phase 1 safety trial
                 
BRAF and FGFR programs: pre-clinical activities continue with the goal of filing an Investigational New Drug (IND) application from at least one of these programs in 2010
 
"The first quarter of the year was highlighted by analyses of data from our Phase 2 trial with ARQ 197 in NSCLC," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "We believe the treatment benefit observed in this rigorously conducted randomized Phase 2 trial would represent a meaningful clinical improvement over standard therapy if replicated in a Phase 3 trial. We look forward to presenting the complete set of data analyses from this trial, as well as data from a number of other trials with ARQ 197, at the 2010 Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology."
Revenues and Expenses
 
The Company reported revenues of $6,325,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2010, compared with $5,420,000 for the first quarter of 2009.  The increase in the first quarter of 2010 was primarily due to revenue from the Company's ARQ 197 and AKIP
TM
 collaborations with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. The 2010 and 2009 periods also included revenue from the Company's license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.
 
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended March 31, 2010 were $15,773,000 compared to $14,994,000 for the first quarter of 2009.   Research and development costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2010 were $12,444,000 compared to $11,334,000 for the first quarter of 2009.  The increased 2010 research and development costs were primarily due to higher preclinical, product development and clinical outsourcing costs related to the Company's pipeline programs.
 
General and administrative costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2010 were $3,329,000 compared to $3,660,000 for the first quarter of 2009.  The decreased costs in 2010 were due to lower personnel and related costs.
 
Confirmed Financial Guidance
 
As previously stated, for 2010 ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $43 and $47 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $24 and $28 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $34 and $38 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.76) and $(0.84).  ArQule expects to end 2010 with between $70 and $74 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
Conference call details
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 800-642-1687 and outside the U.S. 706-645-9291.  The access code is 70967314.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met
receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company is also conducting Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the B-RAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.  These include a series of small molecule inhibitors of fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR).
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with ARQ 197 and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Company's financial guidance for 2010 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2010.  These statements assume the achievement of key corporate objectives for 2010, ability to fund operations with current cash and marketable securities, and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  For example, positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  Furthermore, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of ARQ 197, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Also, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. In addition, certain of the Company's marketable securities (auction rate securities) are traded in a market experiencing liquidity problems. Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the ARQ 197 license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of ARQ 197 on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports
filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
(1) Net unrealized gain (loss) from auction rate securities and auction rate put option.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20100518165627.txt.gz
TIME:20100518165627
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
 
On May 13, 2010, at the 2010 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc. (the "Company"), stockholders considered and approved three proposals, each of which is described in more detail in the Company's definitive proxy statement filed on April 12, 2010. The voting results are presented below.
 
Proposal 1
 
Election of Michael D. Loberg and Nancy A. Simonian as directors of the Company to hold office for a term of three years and until their respective successors are elected and qualified.
 
 
Proposal 2
 
Approval of an amendment to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Plan") to increase the number of shares of common stock available for awards granted under the Plan by 1,500,000, from 11,000,000 to 12,500,000 shares of common stock.
 
 
Proposal 3
 
Ratification of the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit the Company's financial statements for the year ending December 31, 2010.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20100604101044.txt.gz
TIME:20100604101044
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
Beginning on June 5, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") will make the following presentations of clinical data for ARQ 197, a selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, at the 2010 American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) Annual Meeting, which will be held from June 4 to June 8, 2010 in Chicago, Illinois:
 
                 
Clinical Science Symposium - Oral presentation (with slides) #LBA7502: Results from ARQ 197-209: A global randomized placebo-controlled phase II clinical trial of erlotinib plus ARQ 197 versus erlotinib plus placebo in previously treated EGFR inhibitor-nave patients with locally advanced or metastatic non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC);
 
                 
Poster Discussion Session - Poster #3024: A phase I dose-escalation trial evaluating ARQ 197 administered in combination with sorafenib in adult patients (pts) with advanced solid tumors;
 
                 
General Poster Session - Poster #4137: Final results from ARQ 197-114: A phase Ib safety trial evaluating ARQ 197 in cirrhotic patients (pts) with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC); and
 
                 
Trials in Progress Poster Session - Poster #TPS215: ARQ 197-215: A randomized, placebo-controlled phase II clinical trial evaluating the c-Met inhibitor, ARQ 197, in patients (pts) with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC).
 
Commencing on June 5, 2010 at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time, the slides and posters pertaining to the above-described presentations will be available for viewing on the Registrant's website (http://www.arqule.com, in the "Investors and Media" section) as they are presented at the ASCO Annual Meeting.
 
The Registrant's press release, dated May 21, 2010, describing the presentations and providing additional information regarding presentation sites and times, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.  Such information shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1
   Press release, dated May 21, 2010, entitled "ArQule Provides Update on ARQ 197 Presentations at ASCO 2010."
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ARQULE PROVIDES UPDATE ON ARQ 197 PRESENTATIONS AT ASCO 2010
 
Woburn, MA, May 21, 2010 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced that the following presentations of clinical data for ARQ 197,  a selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, will take place at the 2010 American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) Annual Meeting, which will be held June 4-8, 2010 in Chicago, Illinois.
 
Clinical Science Symposium  Oral presentation #LBA7502: Results from ARQ 197-209: A global randomized placebo-controlled phase II clinical trial of erlotinib plus ARQ 197 versus erlotinib plus placebo in previously treated EGFR inhibitor-nave patients with locally advanced or metastatic non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).  The symposium will take place on Saturday, June 5, 2010 from 8:00 AM  9:30 AM, with the presentation time scheduled to begin at 9:00 AM.  Note: this is a late-breaking abstract submission, the embargo for which will be lifted on June 5, 2010.
 
Poster Discussion Section  Poster #3024: A phase I dose-escalation trial evaluating ARQ 197 administered in combination with sorafenib in adult patients (pts) with advanced solid tumors; poster to be presented on Sunday, June 6, 2010 from 2:00 PM  6:00 PM (poster discussion: 5:00 P.M.  6:00 P.M)
 
General Poster Session  Poster #4137: Final results from ARQ 197-114: A phase Ib safety trial evaluating ARQ 197 in cirrhotic patients (pts) with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC); to be presented on Sunday, June 6, 2010 from 2:00 PM  6:00 PM.
 
Trials in Progress Poster Session  Poster #TPS215: ARQ 197-215: A randomized, placebo-controlled phase II clinical trial evaluating the c-Met inhibitor, ARQ 197, in patients (pts) with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC); to be presented on Monday, June 7, 2010, 8:00 AM  12:00 PM.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.
ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company is also conducting Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.    These include a series of small molecule inhibitors of fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR).
 
This press release refers to public presentations that contain statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with ARQ 197.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of ARQ 197, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the ARQ 197 license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of ARQ 197 on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20100607161447.txt.gz
TIME:20100607161447
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
01801
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01.  Other Events.
 
On June 5, 2010, the following presentation of clinical data for ARQ 197, a selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase under development by ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") and its partner was made at the 2010 American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) Annual Meeting in Chicago, Illinois:
 
                 
Clinical Science Symposium - Oral presentation (with slides) #LBA7502: Results from ARQ 197-209: A global randomized placebo-controlled phase II clinical trial of erlotinib plus ARQ 197 versus erlotinib plus placebo in previously treated EGFR inhibitor-nave patients with locally advanced or metastatic non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).
 
Copies of the slides accompanying the oral presentation referred to above are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1
   Slides accompanying oral presentation of clinical trial results.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20100721153300.txt.gz
TIME:20100721153300
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
Amendment and Extension of CEO Employment Agreement
 
On July 15, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant"), acting through its Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee (the "Committee"), amended certain terms of the employment agreement, dated April 15, 2008 and previously filed with the Commission on April 18, 2008, between the Registrant and Paolo Pucci, the Registrant's Chief Executive Officer (the "Employment Agreement").
 
The amendment:  (i) extends the term of the Employment Agreement from June 9, 2012 to June 30, 2015; (ii) increases Mr. Pucci's minimum base salary by approximately five percent; (iii) increases the target amount of the discretionary annual cash bonus payable to Mr. Pucci under the Employment Agreement from fifty percent to sixty percent of Mr. Pucci's annual base salary; (iv) revises the definition of the occurrences following a change in control of the Registrant which constitute a deemed termination of Mr. Pucci's employment; (v) grants Mr. Pucci stock options covering 100,000 shares of the Registrant's common stock; (vi) grants Mr. Pucci 390,000 performance-based stock units, each of which represents a contingent right to receive one share of the Registrant's common stock, in tranches of 300,000 and 90,00 units that vest, respectively, upon the achievement of certain performance targets related to the development of the Registrant's products and the average price of the Registrant's common stock; and (vii) provides that, if a deemed termination of Mr. Pucci's employment under the Employment Agreement occurs prior to achievement of such product development milestones, 300,000 of the performance-based stock units will vest if  the average price of the Registrant's common stock meets or exceeds over a specified period a target price established by the Committee.
 
All other material terms of the Employment Agreement that were in effect prior to the Committee's approval of the amendment remain in effect.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
July 21, 2010


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20100803060217.txt.gz
TIME:20100803060217
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
    Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
 
On August 3, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") announced that it and its co-developer, Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd., will move forward with a Phase 3 clinical trial of ARQ 197, a small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.
 
The Registrant's press release dated August 3, 2010, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1
   Text of press release announcing Phase 3 decision dated August 3, 2010.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Contacts
:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
Woburn, MA and Tokyo, Japan  August 
3
, 2010 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. (TSE 4568) today announced that they will move forward with a Phase 3 clinical trial of ARQ 197, a small molecule inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). In connection with this decision, the
sponsor company, Daiichi Sankyo,
will file a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for a trial comparing ARQ 197 plus erlotinib against erlotinib plus placebo.
 
"The decision to advance ARQ 197 into Phase 3 clinical testing underscores the success of our partnership with Daiichi Sankyo," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed the ARQ 197 partnership in December 2008, and in less than two years, we are requesting an SPA for a Phase 3 trial with this potential first-in-class molecule."
 
"The efficacy observed among patients with NSCLC who received ARQ 197 provides us with encouraging evidence that ARQ 197 may be beneficial to this patient population.  Based on these results, we are developing plans to support a Phase 3 clinical program and bring new hope to patients with this disease," said
Dr. Kazunori Hirokawa, global head of R&D Unit
,
Daiichi Sankyo.
 
 
An SPA is an agreement
with the FDA
establishing the design, endpoints and statistical analysis of a clinical trial intended to provide the necessary data to support a New Drug Application (NDA).  Following FDA review of the SPA, the two companies will implement the protocol for the Phase 3 trial and commence patient enrollment.  Details regarding the trial design will be communicated at that time.
 
This decision follows the completion of a comprehensive review of clinical and pre-clinical data, including discussions with key opinion leaders and a meeting with the FDA following the recently completed Phase 2 trial. In this trial, treatment with ARQ 197 in combination with erlotinib showed promising overall survival and progression-free survival among patients with advanced, refractory NSCLC.  Data from this trial related to overall survival and progression-free survival were statistically significant in patients with non-squamous cell histology when adjusted for imbalances in key prognostic factors.
 
Patients, physicians and other healthcare professionals seeking additional information regarding this trial and other trials involving ARQ 197 may call 1-800-373-7827.
 
About Lung Cancer
 
Lung cancer is the leading cause of cancer-related death in American men and women, accounting for 28 percent of all cancer deaths estimated to have occurred in 2009.  According to the American Cancer Society, in 2009, lung cancer represented about 15 percent of new cancer diagnoses, or 219,000 new cases of lung cancer.  Lung cancer is classified as either non-small cell, which accounts for 85 percent of all lung cancer diagnoses, or small cell, accounting for the remainder of cases.
 
About ARQ 197 and c-Met
 
ARQ 197 is an orally available, selective inhibitor of c-Met, a receptor tyrosine kinase.  When abnormally activated, c-Met plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.  Pre-clinical data have demonstrated that ARQ 197 inhibits c-Met activation in a range of human tumor cell lines and shows anti-tumor activity against several human tumor xenografts.  In clinical trials to date, treatment with ARQ 197 has been well tolerated and has resulted in tumor responses and prolonged stable disease across broad ranges of tumors and doses.
 
About ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd.
 
In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop ARQ 197 in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is
a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to
 
 
human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and upcoming Phase 3 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
About Daiichi Sankyo
 
The Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical products to address the diversified, unmet medical needs of patients in both mature and emerging markets. While maintaining its portfolio of marketed pharmaceuticals for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and bacterial infections, the Group is engaged in the development of treatments for thrombotic disorders and focused on the discovery of novel oncology and cardiovascular-metabolic therapies. Furthermore, the Daiichi Sankyo Group has created a "Hybrid Business Model," which will respond to market and customer diversity and optimize growth opportunities across the value chain. 
For more information, please visit www.daiichisankyo.com.
 
Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., headquartered in Parsippany, New Jersey, is a member of the Daiichi Sankyo Group.  For more information on Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., please visit www.dsi.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the progress of the Companies' Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical trials with ARQ 197.  These statements are based on the Companies' current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results is not necessarily indicative of clinical efficacy and does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Companies or their collaborators to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companies' views of the data or require additional data, information or studies. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, this compound may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in further pre-clinical testing and in current, later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 is subject to the ability of the Companies to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development
 
 
programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to pursue drug discovery successfully in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20100804070027.txt.gz
TIME:20100804070027
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 4, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2010.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated August 4, 2010 announcing results of operations.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
August 4, 2010

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
Woburn, MA, August 4, 2010 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2010.
 
For the quarter ended June 30, 2010, the Company reported a net loss of $8,227,000 or $0.18 per share, compared with a net loss of $8,272,000 or $0.19 per share, for the second quarter of 2009.  For the six-month period ended June 30, 2010, the Company reported a net loss of $17,979,000 or $0.40 per share, compared to a net loss of $18,180,000 or $0.41 per share, for the six-month period ended June 30, 2009.
 
At June 30, 2010, the Company had a total of approximately $111,738,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities, which includes $16,200,000 drawn down in 2008 under notes payable that are collateralized by the Company's auction rate securities.  Net of these notes, at June 30, 2010, the Company had a total of $95,538,000.
 
On July 2, 2010, the Company retired the notes payable at June 30, 2010 under its revolving credit line agreement with UBS AG following the redemption at par value of all $22.9 million of the Company's auction rate securities that had been brokered by UBS AG.
 
Operational Highlights
 
                 
Decision finalized to move forward with a Phase 3 trial with ARQ 197 in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and to file a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) for this trial
                 
Colorectal cancer trial advanced from a Phase 1 lead-in to a double-blind, randomized Phase 2 trial
                 
First patient enrolled in a Phase 2 trial with ARQ 197 in gastric cancer in Asia by Kyowa Hakko Kirin, triggering a $5 million milestone payment to ArQule
"Subsequent to the end of Phase 2 meeting we had with the FDA and building upon the clear signal observed in our randomized Phase 2 trial in NSCLC, we and our partner, Daiichi Sankyo, have made the decision to move forward into Phase 3 development," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "We are filing a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) with the FDA for the Phase 3 trial.
 
"In Asia, our partner, Kyowa Hakko Kirin, has expanded its development program with ARQ 197 into gastric cancer," said Mr. Pucci.  "This indication holds particular promise in Asia, where the incidence of gastric cancer is among the highest in the world and where it is the second most common cause of cancer-related death.
 
"Elsewhere in our pipeline, enrollment is ongoing in a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621," said Mr. Pucci, "and pre-clinical activities are continuing as planned with a B-RAF inhibitor and an FGFR inhibitor."
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
The Company reported total revenues of $7,106,000 for the quarter ended June 30, 2010, compared to revenues of $6,056,000 for the second quarter of 2009.  Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2010 were $13,431,000, compared to revenues of $11,476,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2009.The increase in the 2010 periods was primarily due to revenue from the Company's AKIP
 
TM
 collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. The 2010 and 2009 periods also included revenue from the Company's ARQ 197 license agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.
 
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended June 30, 2010 were $15,844,000, compared to $15,881,000 for the second quarter of 2009.  Total costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2010 were $31,617,000, compared to $30,875,000 for the same period in 2009.
 
Research and development costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2010 were $12,318,000 and $24,762,000, respectively, compared with $12,678,000 and $24,012,000 for the 2009 three and six-month periods.
 
General and administrative costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2010 were $3,526,000 and $6,855,000 respectively, compared with $3,203,000 and $6,863,000 for the 2009 three and six-month periods.
 
Updated Financial Guidance
 
ArQule today is revising its financial guidance for 2010.  ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $22 and $42 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $26 and $30 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $30 and $34 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.67) and $(0.76).  ArQule expects to end 2010 with between $75 and $95 million in cash and marketable securities.
Among the factors that could influence this guidance are: timing of the initiation of the planned Phase 3 trial with ARQ 197 in NSCLC; timing and receipt of milestone payments; variable spending by Daiichi Sankyo on trials with ARQ 197 and its impact on the timing of ArQule's payment of its share of related expenses; the timing of reimbursement of certain of ArQule expenses related to the clinical development of ARQ 197 and the AKIP discovery collaboration; and the pacing of clinical trials with ARQ 197 conducted by Kyowa Kakko Kirin and the timing of corresponding milestone payments.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 800-642-1687 and outside the U.S. 706-645-9291.  The replay access code is 87797623.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and upcoming Phase 3 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company is also conducting Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the B-RAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.  These include a series of small molecule inhibitors of fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR).
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with ARQ 197 and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Company's financial guidance for 2010 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2010).  These statements assume the achievement of key corporate objectives for 2010, ability to fund operations with current cash and marketable securities, and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to
risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  For example, positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. ARQ 197 and ARQ 621 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  Furthermore, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of ARQ 197, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Also, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. In addition, certain of the Company's marketable securities (auction rate securities) are traded in a market experiencing liquidity problems. Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the ARQ 197 license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of ARQ 197 on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
(1) Net unrealized gain (loss) from auction rate securities and auction rate put option.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20101012171234.txt.gz
TIME:20101012171234
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On October 11, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant")
announced a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) agreement with the FDA for the design of a Phase 3 trial of ARQ 197 in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) of non-squamous histology.  The trial is planned for initiation later this year.
 
The SPA process is a procedure by which the FDA provides official evaluation and written guidance on the design and size of proposed protocols that are intended to form the basis for a new drug application. Final marketing approval depends on the results of the trial.
 
The Phase 3 trial will be a randomized, double-blinded, placebo-controlled study of erlotinib plus ARQ 197 versus erlotinib plus placebo in patients with locally advanced or metastatic NSCLC of non-squamous histology.  The primary endpoint is overall survival in the intent-to-treat population.  Key secondary objectives include overall survival in the epidermal growth factor wild-type sub-population and progression-free survival in the intent-to-treat population.  Approximately 1,000 patients will be enrolled from 150 sites in the U.S., Canada, Europe, Russia, Australia and Latin America.
 
Also, on October 11, 2010 the Registrant announced the presentation of final results from a Phase 2 clinical trial in NSCLC of ARQ 197 at the annual meeting of the European Society for Medical Oncology (ESMO).
 
Copies of the press releases dated October 11, 2010 announcing the SPA and the ESMO presentation are filed as Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively, and are incorporated by reference herein.
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(d)  Exhibits
 
99.1  SPA Press release dated October 11, 2010
 
99.2  ESMO Press release dated October 11, 2010
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
October 12, 2010

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
Woburn, MA, October 11, 2010 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) agreement with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for the design of a Phase 3 trial of ARQ 197 in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) of non-squamous histology.
 
Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd., the holder of the Investigational New Drug application for ARQ 197 and ArQule's partner for the development of the compound, will conduct the Phase 3 trial, which is planned for initiation later this year.
 
The trial will be a randomized, double-blinded study of erlotinib plus ARQ 197 in patients with locally advanced or metatstatic NSCLC of non-squamous histology. The primary endpoint is overall survival in the intent-to-treat population. Key secondary objectives include overall survival in the epidermal growth factor receptor wild-type sub-population and progression-free survival in the intent-to-treat population.
 
The SPA process is a procedure by which the FDA provides official evaluation and written guidance on the design and size of proposed protocols that are intended to form the basis for a New Drug Application. Final marketing approval depends on the results of the trial.
 
ARQ 197 is a selective small molecule inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase, and erlotinib is an inhibitor of epidermal growth factor receptor.
 
Patients, physicians and other healthcare professionals seeking additional information regarding this trial and other trials involving ARQ 197 may call 1-800-373-7827.
 
About Lung Cancer
 
Lung cancer is the leading cause of cancer-related death in American men and women, accounting for 28 percent of all cancer deaths estimated to have occurred in 2009. According to the American Cancer Society, in 2009, lung cancer represented about 15 percent of new cancer diagnoses, or 219,000 new cases of lung cancer. Lung cancer is classified as either non-small cell, which accounts for 85 percent of all lung cancer diagnoses, or small cell, accounting for the remainder of cases.
 
About ARQ 197 and c-MET
 
ARQ 197 is an orally available, selective inhibitor of c-MET, a receptor tyrosine kinase. When abnormally activated, c-MET plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis. Pre-clinical data have demonstrated that ARQ 197 inhibits c-MET activation in a range of human tumor cell lines and shows anti-tumor activity against several human tumor xenografts. In clinical trials to date, treatment with ARQ 197 has been well tolerated and has resulted in tumor responses and prolonged stable disease across broad ranges of tumors and doses.
 
In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed a license, co-development and co- commercialization agreement to co-develop ARQ 197 in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next- generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics. The company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers. ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and upcoming Phase 3 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase. The company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein. The company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the BRAF kinase. ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP
TM
), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the progress of the Phase 3 clinical trial with ARQ 197 in non-small cell lung cancer to be conducted by ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo. These statements are based on the companies' current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. Positive information about early stage clinical trial results is not necessarily indicative of clinical efficacy and does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the companies or their collaborators to
 
 
discontinue development. Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the companies' views of the data or require additional data, information or studies. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, this compound may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in further pre-clinical testing and in current, later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 is subject to the ability of the companies to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved. Therapies involving the use of ARQ 197 in combination with other drugs, if approved, are dependent in part on the continued availability of such other drugs. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product. Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to pursue drug discovery successfully in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with ArQule's drug development and other activities see the company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
Woburn, MA, October 11, 2010 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced the presentation of final results from a Phase 2 clinical trial in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) of ARQ 197, a selective small molecule inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase, at the annual meeting of the European Society for Medical Oncology (ESMO).
 
The presentation included new exploratory data analyses related to the anti-metastatic effect of ARQ 197 observed in this trial. Patients treated with ARQ 197 plus erlotinib had a median time to develop new metastases of 7.3 months, compared to 3.6 months for patients treated with erlotinib plus placebo. This effect was more pronounced among patients with non-squamous cell histology, among whom the median time to develop new metastases was 11.0 months for patients treated with ARQ 197 plus erlotinib, compared with 3.6 months for those treated with erlotinib plus placebo.
 
"The metastases-delaying data from this trial further strengthen our mechanistic understanding of the anti-cancer effect of ARQ 197," said Brian Schwartz, M.D., chief medical officer of ArQule. "We believe these findings are of clinical significance and reflect the biological involvement of c-MET in cancer cell metastasis and resistance to treatment with EGFR inhibitors such as erlotinib."
 
As previously announced, data from this trial showed promising overall survival and progression-free survival among patients with advanced, refractory NSCLC treated with ARQ 197 in combination with erlotinib.
Additional ARQ 197 presentations at ESMO
 
Additional presentations scheduled for October 11, 2010 will include data from clinical trials evaluating ARQ 197 in combination with sorafenib and gemcitabine, respectively, as well as biomarker results from a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 197 in cirrhotic patients with hepatocellular carcinoma and results from a Phase 1 trial in Japanese patients. The times and titles of these presentations follow:
 
Monday, October 11, 2010
Poster Presentation III
Hall 3: 12:30 p.m.  1:30 p.m.
 
509P:
A phase 1 dose escalation trial evaluating ARQ 197 administered in combination with sorafenib in adult patients with advanced solid tumors
 
510P:
Phase 1b dose escalation trial evaluating c-MET inhibitor ARQ 197 plus gemcitabine in patients with advanced solid tumors on schedules refined by in vitro mechanistic studies
 
196P:
Biomarker results from ARQ 197-114: a phase 1b trial evaluating the cMET inhibitor ARQ 197 in cirrhotic patients with hepatocellular carcinoma
 
508P:
A Phase 1 dose escalation trial of selective c-MET inhibitor ARQ 197 in Japanese patients with metastatic solid tumors
 
About ARQ 197 and c-MET
 
ARQ 197 is an orally available, selective inhibitor of c-MET, a receptor tyrosine kinase. When abnormally activated, c-MET plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis. Pre-clinical data have demonstrated that ARQ 197 inhibits c-MET activation in a range of human tumor cell lines and shows anti-tumor activity against several human tumor xenografts. In clinical trials to date, treatment with ARQ 197 has been well tolerated and has resulted in tumor responses and prolonged stable disease across broad ranges of tumors and doses.
 
In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop ARQ 197 in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next- generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics. The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers. ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and upcoming Phase 3 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase. The Company is also conducting Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the
 
Eg5 kinesin motor protein. The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the B-RAF kinase. ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP
TM
), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase. The most advanced AKIP
TM
 program is focused on the discovery of inhibitors of fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR).
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including its Phase 2 trial with ARQ 197 in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and trials, which may be conducted by Daiichi Sankyo and/or Kyowa Hakko Kirin under their agreements with the Company. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. Positive information about early stage clinical trial results is not necessarily indicative of clinical efficacy and does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, this compound may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in further pre-clinical testing and in current, later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development. Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data, information or studies. In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of ARQ 197, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved. Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the ARQ 197 license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product. Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to pursue drug discovery successfully in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20101014134145.txt.gz
TIME:20101014134145
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
    Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
    Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrant's Business and Operations
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On October 12, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") announced an amendment of its research, development and license agreement (the "Agreement") with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. which Agreement was previously reported in Form 8-K filings by the Registrant on November 19, 2008 and May 5, 2009.  The Agreement covers research and potential discovery of novel kinase inhibitors in the field of oncology using the Registrant's proprietary ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) technology.
 
The amendment expands the Agreement by designating a third therapeutic target, with an option for a fourth, in the field of oncology and providing for a two-year extension of the Agreement's term. The economic terms of the Agreement, as amended, include payments for research support, licensing fees for compounds discovered as a result of this research, milestone payments related to clinical development, regulatory review and sales, and tiered royalty payments on net sales of each product.  Amounts payable to the Registrant in these categories are substantially equivalent to those provided for in the original Agreement.
 
Daiichi Sankyo has an option to license compounds directed to the targets defined under the Agreement, as amended, following the completion of certain pre-clinical studies.  ArQule retains the option to co-commercialize any resulting licensed products in the U.S.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1
   Text of press release describing contract amendment dated October 12, 2010.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
October 14, 2010

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Woburn, MA, October 12, 2010 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. (TSE 4568) today announced the expansion of their research, development and license agreement for the discovery of novel kinase inhibitors in the field of oncology.  This expanded agreement establishes a third therapeutic target, with an option for a fourth, in the field of oncology, and it includes a two-year extension based on the application of the proprietary ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) technology.
 
"This technology has provided us with a unique and innovative approach for discovery in the treatment of cancer," said Dr. Hideyuki Haruyama, the Global Head of Research, Daiichi Sankyo.  "We expect that the expansion of this collaboration will produce other drug candidates and lay the foundation for future growth in this field."
 
Consistent with the existing AKIP collaboration, the economic terms provided for in the expanded agreement include payments for research support, licensing fees for compounds discovered as a result of this research, milestone payments related to clinical development, regulatory review and sales, and tiered royalty payments on net sales of each product.  Daiichi Sankyo will have an option to license compounds directed to the targets defined under the agreement following the completion of certain pre-clinical studies.  ArQule retains the option to co-commercialize any resulting licensed products in the U.S.
 
"Our initial drug discovery collaboration has identified a development candidate for one target, and we are optimizing advanced lead compounds for the other target," said Dr. Thomas C.K. Chan, chief scientific officer of ArQule.  "The expansion of this collaboration will continue to deploy AKIP technology to discover novel kinase inhibitors for additional oncology targets over the next two years."
 
About the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP)
 
Kinases play pivotal roles in modulating diverse cellular activities and have been implicated as important mediators of certain forms of cancer and other diseases.  The AKIP technology is based on a novel binding mode that leads to inhibition of target kinases by small molecules that do not compete with adenosine triphosphate (ATP).  ArQule has identified binding sites in more than 200 kinases involved in multiple therapeutic areas that are amenable to such non-ATP competitive inhibition.
 
ArQule's ability to rationally design novel kinase inhibitors that encompass new chemical spaces allows for an expanding intellectual property estate.  The Company believes that non-ATP competitive small molecule inhibitors may have fewer off-target side effects and utility in a broad range of human diseases.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is
a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and upcoming Phase 3 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein.  The Company's pre-clinical pipeline includes a compound designed to inhibit the BRAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
About Daiichi Sankyo
 
The Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical products to address the diversified, unmet medical needs of patients in both mature and emerging markets. While maintaining its portfolio of marketed pharmaceuticals for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and bacterial infections, the Group is engaged in the development of treatments for thrombotic disorders and focused on the discovery of novel oncology and cardiovascular-metabolic therapies. Furthermore, the Daiichi Sankyo Group has created a "Hybrid Business Model," which
 
will respond to market and customer diversity and optimize growth opportunities across the value chain. 
For more information, please visit www.daiichisankyo.com.
 
Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., headquartered in Parsippany, New Jersey, is a member of the Daiichi Sankyo Group.  For more information on Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., please visit www.dsi.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) and its related agreement with Daiichi Sankyo. These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical results does not ensure that later stage pre-clinical or clinical development will be successful. For example, targets for the kinase research may not prove to be therapeutically relevant. Compounds developed through application of the AKIP platform may not demonstrate positive activity in pre-clinical in vivo or in vitro testing or in subsequent clinical trials; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile later development as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or Daiichi Sankyo to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's or Daiichi Sankyo's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Daiichi Sankyo may not exercise its option to license compounds even if the compounds show initial promise.  For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20101109070947.txt.gz
TIME:20101109070947
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
    Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
    Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 9, 2010, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2010.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated November 9, 2010 announcing results of operations.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
For Immediate Release:
 
ARQULE ANNOUNCES THIRD QUARTER FISCAL 2010 RESULTS
 
Conference call scheduled today at 9:00 a.m. eastern time
 
Woburn, Mass., November 9, 2010
 ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today reported its results of operations for the fiscal quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2010.
 
The Company reported a net loss of $6,394,000 or $0.14 per share for the quarter ended September 30, 2010, compared to a net loss of $8,088,000 or $0.18 per share for the quarter ended September 30, 2009.  For the nine-month period ended September 30, 2010, the Company reported a net loss of $24,373,000 or $0.55 per share, compared to a net loss of $26,268,000 or $0.60 per share, for the same period in 2009.
 
At September 30, 2010, the Company had a total of $88,481,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities.
 
Recent Operational Highlights
 
ARQ 197
                 
Agreement with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) on a Special Protocol Assessment for the design of a Phase 3 trial in patients with advanced non-squamous non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), announced on October 11, 2010;
                 
Presentation of final results from the Phase 2 clinical trial in patients with advanced NSCLC at the European Society for Medical Oncology (ESMO), announced on October 11, 2010.
 
Pipeline
                 
Expansion of oncology drug discovery collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) technology, announced on October 12, 2010.
"We have reached an SPA agreement for our Phase 3 trial with ARQ 197 in NSCLC, which is planned for initiation late this year," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "The trial will be a randomized, double-blinded study of erlotinib plus ARQ 197 in patients with locally advanced or metatstatic NSCLC of non-squamous histology. The primary endpoint is overall survival in the intent-to-treat population. Key secondary objectives include overall survival in the epidermal growth factor receptor wild-type sub-population and progression-free survival in the intent-to-treat population.
 
"At the ESMO annual meeting, we presented final results from the Phase 2 trial in NSCLC, including new exploratory data analyses demonstrating a prolongation of time to develop new metastases in patients who received ARQ 197 plus erlotinib," said Mr. Pucci.  "These metastases-delaying data potentially add to our mechanistic understanding of the anti-cancer effect of ARQ 197.
 
"Our oncology drug discovery collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo has been expanded, establishing a third therapeutic target, with an option for a fourth, and including a two-year extension," said Mr. Pucci.  "We are delighted with the progress made since this collaboration was established, and we believe its expansion will lead to the discovery of novel kinase inhibitors for additional targets in oncology."
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
The Company reported total revenues of $8,270,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2010, compared to revenues of $6,436,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2009.  Revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2010 were $21,701,000, compared to revenues of $17,912,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2009.
 
Increased revenues for the 2010 periods were primarily due to revenue recognized from a $5,000,000 milestone payment received in September, 2010 from Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. for the initiation of a Phase 2 trial in gastric cancer in Asia.  The 2010 and 2009 periods also include revenue from the Company's ARQ 197 license agreement and AKIP collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo
Co., Ltd.
 
For the quarter ended September 30, 2010, the Company reported total costs and expenses of $14,648,000, compared to total costs and expenses of $14,481,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2009.  Total costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2010 were $46,265,000, compared to $45,356,000 for the same period in 2009.
 
Research and development costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2010 were $11,475,000 and $36,237,000 respectively, compared with $11,347,000 and $35,359,000 for the 2009 three and nine-month periods.
 
General and administrative costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2010 were $3,173,000 and $10,028,000, respectively, compared with $3,134,000 and $9,997,000 for the 2009 three and nine-month periods.
Financial Guidance
 
ArQule today is confirming its financial guidance for 2010. ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $22 and $42 million. Revenues are expected to range between $26 and $30 million. Net loss is expected to range between $30 and $34 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.67) and $(0.76). ArQule expects to end 2010 with between $75 and $95 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
Among the factors that could influence this guidance are: timing of the initiation of the planned Phase 3 trial with ARQ 197 in NSCLC; timing and receipt of a related milestone payment; and the timing of reimbursement of certain ArQule expenses related to the AKIP discovery collaboration.
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 1-800-642-1687 and 1-706-645-9291 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is 19381695.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and upcoming Phase 3 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company is also conducting Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the B-RAF kinase.  ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor
Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.  The most advanced AKIP program is focused on the discovery of inhibitors of fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR).
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's operating performance, such as projections about its future results of operations and its financial condition, and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.  These statements include references to potential future milestone and royalty payments that could result from the future development of ARQ 197 and products generated from the company's AKIP platform.  Failure to successfully develop these products could prevent the Company from receiving these future payments.  Additional forward-looking statements relate to the progress of the Company's clinical trials, including Phase 1, Phase 2 and Phase 3 trials with ARQ 197, a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621, and a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 736, as well as progress in its AKIP discovery platform.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  The Company's drug discovery technology and techniques and their scientific rationales may not produce candidates that are suitable for further pre-clinical and clinical development. Positive information about early stage clinical trial results is not necessarily indicative of clinical efficacy and does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197, ARQ 621 and ARQ 736 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, they may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current, later-stage or larger-scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later-stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partner to discontinue development.  Even if later-stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ
197, ARQ 621 and ARQ 736 is subject to the ability of the Company or in certain cases, its partners, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to pursue drug discovery and development successfully in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug discovery and development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
(1) Net unrealized gain (loss) from auction rate securities and auction rate put option.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110112165352.txt.gz
TIME:20110112165352
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On January 12, 2011, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. ("Daiichi Sankyo") announced the dosing of the first patient in a Phase 3 clinical trial of ARQ 197 in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.  As a result, the Registrant will receive a $25 million milestone payment from Daiichi Sankyo.
 
This payment is provided for under the terms of the License, Co-Development and Co-Commercialization Agreement with Daiichi Sankyo previously disclosed by the Registrant to co-develop ARQ 197 in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization of ARQ 197.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1
   Text of press release describing announcement of dosing of patient and payment of milestone dated January 12, 2011.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Contacts
:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
Tokyo, Japan and Woburn, MA  January 12, 2011 
Daiichi Sankyo Company, Limited (TSE 4568) and ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced that the first patient has been enrolled in the Phase 3 trial of ARQ 197, an investigational selective inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, in combination with erlotinib, for patients diagnosed with non-squamous, non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) who have received one or two prior systemic anti-cancer therapies.
 
The Phase 3 trial is a randomized, double-blinded, controlled study of previously treated patients with locally advanced or metastatic, non-squamous NSCLC who will receive ARQ 197 plus erlotinib or placebo plus erlotinib.
 
The primary objective is to evaluate the overall survival (OS) in the intent-to-treat (ITT) population. Secondary endpoints include OS in the subpopulation of patients with epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) wild type, progression-free survival (PFS) in the ITT population, and further assessment of the safety of ARQ 197 in combination with erlotinib.
 
According to the International Agency for Research on Cancer more than 1.6 million new cases of lung cancer were diagnosed in 2008 globally, and NSCLC accounted for 80 percent of those
 
 
cases(1).  According to the American Cancer Society more than 220,000 cases of lung cancer will have been diagnosed in 2010 in the U.S(2).  Of patients diagnosed with lung cancer in Europe, almost 90 percent die of the disease(3)
 
"With lung cancer accounting for more deaths than colon, breast, and prostate cancers combined(4), we are very pleased to begin this Phase 3 trial to advance the knowledge about the role ARQ 197 might have in the treatment of patients with non-small cell lung cancer in combination with erlotinib," said
Dr. Kazunori Hirokawa, global head of R&D Unit
,
Daiichi Sankyo.
"It is our hope and expectation that this late-stage study will confirm the results we observed in patients with non-squamous cell histology in Phase 2, which showed promise toward extending overall survival and progression-free survival in this group when ARQ 197 was combined with erlotinib."
 
"The start of this Phase 3 trial marks a key milestone in the development of ARQ 197 and our partnership with Daiichi Sankyo," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "Lung cancer is a devastating disease and our hope is that ARQ 197 will prove to be an effective treatment option that will help patients diagnosed with this disease."
 
In October 2010, agreement was reached with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) on a
Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) for the Phase 3 trial comparing ARQ 197 plus erlotinib against erlotinib plus placebo. 
The Phase 3 study of ARQ 197 plus erlotinib will enroll 988 patients in 150 sites in the U.S., Canada, Eastern and Western Europe, Australia and Latin America.  Additional details are available on www.clinicaltrials.gov.
 
About ARQ 197 and c-Met
 
ARQ 197 is an orally available, selective inhibitor of c-Met, a receptor tyrosine kinase that is currently in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical trials and is not yet approved for use.  In healthy adult cells, c-Met is present in normal levels to support natural cellular function, but in cancer cells, c-Met is inappropriately and continuously activated for unknown reasons. When abnormally activated, c-Met plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.
 
Pre-clinical data have demonstrated that ARQ 197 inhibits c-Met activation in a range of human tumor cell lines and shows anti-tumor activity against several human tumor xenografts.  In clinical trials to date, treatment with ARQ 197 has been well-tolerated and has resulted in tumor responses and prolonged stable disease across a broad range of tumors.
 
In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop ARQ 197 in the U.S., Europe, South America and the
 
(1)  International Agency for Cancer Research, URL: http://globocan.iarc.fr/factsheets/cancers/lung.asp. Last accessed November 10, 2010.
(2)  American Cancer Society. Lung Cancer. URL:http://www.cancer.org/Cancer/LungCancer-Non-SmallCell/OverviewGuide/lung-cancer-non-small-cell-overview-key-statistics. Last accessed November 9, 2010.
(3) (GLOBOCAN 2008) International Agency for Research on Cancer: http://globocan.iarc.fr
(4)  American Cancer Society. Lung Cancer. URL:http://www.cancer.org/Cancer/LungCancer-Non-SmallCell/DetailedGuide/non-small-cell-lung-cancer-key-statistics.  Last accessed November 9, 2010.
 
rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.
 
About Daiichi Sankyo
 
The Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical products to address the diversified, unmet medical needs of patients in both mature and emerging markets.  While maintaining its portfolio of marketed pharmaceuticals for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and bacterial infections, the Group is engaged in the development of treatments for thrombotic disorders and focused on the discovery of novel oncology and cardiovascular-metabolic therapies. Furthermore, the Daiichi Sankyo Group has created a "Hybrid Business Model," which will respond to market and customer diversity and optimize growth opportunities across the value chain. For more information, please visit www.daiichisankyo.com.
 
Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., headquartered in Parsippany, New Jersey, is a member of the Daiichi Sankyo Group. For more information on Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., please visit www.dsi.com
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is
a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase. The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the progress of the Companies' Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical trials with ARQ 197.  These statements are based on the Companies' current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about early stage clinical trial results is not necessarily indicative of clinical efficacy and does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Companies or their collaborators to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, the risk exists that unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data or that obstacles may arise or issues be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities or that regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companies' views of the data or require additional data, information or studies. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effect; in addition, this compound may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in further pre-clinical testing and in
 
current, later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 is subject to the ability of the Companies to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and other technical hurdles and issues that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.   Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to pursue drug discovery successfully in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Co mmission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110124133131.txt.gz
TIME:20110124133131
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
    Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
    Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On January 19, 2011, we announced a public offering of  shares of our common stock.  The following summary of our product candidates, clinical trials, pipeline and discovery platform appeared in our preliminary and final prospectus supplements.  We also updated certain risk factors in connection with the offering and have reproduced the risk factors below.
 
Overview
 
We are a clinical-stage biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of innovative cancer therapeutics. Our mission is to produce novel medicines with differentiated mechanisms of action that target specific biological pathways implicated in a wide range of cancers. We employ novel technologies such as our ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) to design and develop drugs that have the potential to fulfill this mission.
 
ARQ 197: Lead Product Candidate
 
We are developing our lead product candidate, ARQ 197, with our partner, Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. ("Daiichi Sankyo") in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan and certain other Asian countries, where we have licensed commercial rights to Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. ("KHK").  ARQ 197 is an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase that does not compete with ATP (adenosine triphospate).  C-Met is a promising target for cancer therapy based on its multiple roles in cancerous cell proliferation, tumor spread, new blood vessel formation and resistance to certain drug therapy.
 
We are implementing a clinical development program designed to realize the broad potential of ARQ 197 as a well tolerated single agent and in combination with other anti-cancer therapies.  We are conducting trials in a number of indications, including non-small cell lung cancer, liver cancer, colorectal cancer and germ cell tumors, and we are completing earlier-stage combination therapy trials that may provide data to support later-stage trials in additional indications.
 
Non-small cell lung cancer: Phase 2 trial
 
We presented Phase 2, proof-of-principle clinical data with ARQ 197 in its lead indication, non-small cell lung cancer, at the 2010 Annual Meeting of the American Society of Oncology ("ASCO") in June 2010, with an update at the Annual Meeting of the European Society for Medical Oncology ("ESMO") in October 2010.  We believe the treatment benefit defined by improved progression-free survival ("PFS"), the primary endpoint in this trial, and by extended median overall survival ("OS") observed in this trial would represent a meaningful clinical improvement over standard therapy if replicated in a Phase 3 trial.  We are especially encouraged by the potential benefit for the large sub-group of non-squamous cell patients.
 
One hundred sixty-seven patients participated in this Phase 2, double blind, randomized signal generation trial.  Patients were EGFR (epidermal growth factor receptor) inhibitor-nave and
randomized one-to-one to receive either the combination of ARQ 197 plus erlotinib (an inhibitor of the EGFR tyrosine kinase marketed as Tarceva) or placebo plus erlotinib in second and third line settings.
 
Key findings from this trial include the following:
 
1. Progression-free survival (primary endpoint of the trial):
 
In the intent to treat ("ITT") population (167 patients), ARQ 197, when used in combination with erlotinib, demonstrated a 66 percent improvement in PFS in patients with advanced, refractory non-small cell lung cancer over patients treated with erlotinib plus placebo.  Median PFS was 16.1 weeks in the ARQ 197 plus erlotinib arm, compared with 9.7 weeks in the erlotinib plus placebo arm. The difference in PFS between the two arms did not achieve statistical significance (hazard ratio = 0.809) by applying a log-rank test. When adjusted for imbalances in the distribution of key prognostic factors, the difference in PFS was statistically significant (hazard ratio = 0.675) by applying a Cox regression analysis specified for secondary efficacy analyses. Improvement in median PFS was more pronounced in the pre-defined sub-group of patients with non-squamous histology (n = 117); median P FS was 18.9 weeks in the treatment arm versus 9.7 weeks in the control arm, which represents a 94% improvement.  Based on an exploratory Cox regression analysis, the endpoint of PFS was met in the sub-group and achieved statistical significance (hazard ratio = 0.613).
 
2. Overall survival
 
Data showed that median OS in the ITT population (n = 167) was 36.6 weeks in the ARQ 197 plus erlotinib arm, compared with 29.4 weeks in the erlotinib plus placebo arm, an improvement of 24 percent (unadjusted hazard ratio = 0.88, p = 0.50).  In the pre-defined sub-group of patients with non-squamous cell histology (n = 117), median OS was 43.1 weeks in the treatment arm, compared with 29.4 weeks in the placebo arm, an improvement of 47 percent (unadjusted hazard ratio = 0.72, p = 0.19).  Based on an exploratory Cox regression analysis, the difference in median OS achieved statistical significance (p < 0.05) in this sub-group when adjusted for imbalances in key prognostic factors that included EGFR status and KRAS status, both of which favored the placebo arm.
 
3. Cross-over arm
 
The trial design included a cross-over arm to assess the impact of ARQ 197 plus erlotinib on patients who failed erlotinib monotherapy.  Of the 23 cross-over patients who were evaluable for response, two had a partial response per Response Evaluation Criteria in Solid Tumors ("RECIST") and nine had stable disease, for a disease control rate of 48 percent.
 
4. Anti-metastatic effect
 
Exploratory analyses showed that patients treated with ARQ 197 plus erlotinib had a median time to develop new metastases of 7.3 months, compared to 3.6 months for patients treated with erlotinib plus placebo (p=0.002).  This effect was more pronounced among patients with non-
squamous cell histology, among whom the median time to develop new metastases was 11.0 months for patients treated with ARQ 197 plus erlotinib, compared with 3.6 months for those treated with erlotinib plus placebo (p=0.007).
 
5. Safety
 
No clinically relevant differences in adverse event rates were observed between the treatment and control arms.  The most prevalent adverse events were mild in intensity and included rash, diarrhea and fatigue.  The combination of ARQ 197 plus erlotinib was shown to be well tolerated, with manageable side effects similar to single agent profiles.
 
Non-small cell lung cancer: Phase 3 trial and Special Protocol Assessment
 
On January 12, 2011, we announced that the first patient was enrolled in the Phase 3 trial of ARQ 197 in combination with erlotinib for patients with non-squamous, non-small cell lung cancer who have received one or two prior systemic anti-cancer therapies.  The Phase 3 trial is a randomized, double-blinded, controlled study of previously treated patients with locally advanced or metastatic, non-squamous NSCLC who will receive ARQ 197 plus erlotinib or placebo plus erlotinib.  The primary objective is to evaluate OS in the ITT population.  Secondary endpoints include OS in the subpopulation of patients with EGFR wild type, PFS in the ITT population, and further assessment of the safety of ARQ 197 in combination with erlotinib.
  Approximately
1,000 patients will be enrolled fr om 150 sites in the U.S., Canada, Europe, Russia, Australia and Latin America. There is a planned interim analysis after approximately 50% of survival events have occurred, and final data is expected in the middle part of 2013.
As a result of the dosing of the first patient in this trial, we will receive a $25 million milestone payment from Daiichi Sankyo.  Daiichi Sankyo is conducting the Phase 3 trial.
 
In October 2010, agreement was reached with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) on a
Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) for this trial.  An SPA is an agreement establishing the design, endpoints and statistical analysis of a clinical trial intended to provide the necessary data, depending on the outcome of the trial,
which could support the filing of a New Drug Application or NDA.  Final marketing approval depends on the results of the trial.
 
We have incorporated into the SPA a broad genotyping and biomarker program designed to expand what is an evolving understanding of the biology of c-Met and of ARQ 197.  In addition, we continue to investigate and add to our understanding of the profile of ARQ 197 and its metabolites to better characterize their scope and effect as anti-cancer agents.  Moreover, data on c-Met inhibition continue to be generated by us and others.  Such findings should help to define additional clinical settings and patient populations that may benefit from c-Met inhibition therapy.
Liver Cancer
 
Our therapeutic approaches to liver cancer include the use of ARQ 197 as both a single agent and in combination with an approved targeted therapy, sorafenib.  Following the successful completion of safety testing with ARQ 197 as a single agent in cirrhotic patients with liver cancer, we have been enrolling patients in a randomized, double-blind, placebo controlled Phase 2 single agent trial and expect to substantially complete enrollment with approximately 100 patients in the first half of 2011.  We have also been enrolling a cohort of patients in a Phase 1 ARQ 197-sorafenib combination safety trial, the final results of which we will evaluate prior to making a decision about initiating a Phase 2 trial with this combination in liver cancer.
 
Initial data from the Phase 1 safety trial with ARQ 197 as a single agent in liver cancer showed a manageable safety profile, with no drug-related worsening of liver function.  A recommended Phase 2 dose of 360 milligrams (mg) twice daily ("BID") was established, and preliminary anti-cancer activity was observed.  At the 2010 Annual Meeting of ESMO, we presented further Phase 1 data describing a higher incidence of bone marrow toxicity in the liver cancer population than observed in previous ARQ 197 studies.  A similar observation has been made in the Phase 2 single agent study, and as a result, we have reduced the starting dose of ARQ 197 to 240 mg BID in our Phase 2 trial.  We continue to monitor the safety profile of ARQ 197 in patients with liver cancer, among whom underlying cirrhosis and compromised liver function may limit the body's ability to process ARQ 197 and thereby increase such toxicity.
 
We presented results from our ongoing Phase 1 ARQ 197-sorafenib combination safety trial, including a cohort of liver cancer patients (see Combination regimens below), at the ASCO and ESMO meetings.  These data showed that the combination appears safe and well tolerated at full standard doses of each agent.  Preliminary evidence of anti-cancer activity was also observed, indicating that the combination has therapeutic potential. Our decision to move forward in liver cancer with this combination will be predicated upon final analysis of data from the safety trial, as well as discussions with our partners and regulatory authorities.
 
Colorectal cancer
 
In February, 2010, Daiichi Sankyo initiated a Phase 1/2 clinical trial designed to evaluate the safety of ARQ 197 administered in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab in approximately 150 patients with metastatic colorectal cancer who possess the wild-type form of the KRAS gene.  Following the successful completion of the Phase 1 safety run-in portion of the trial, the randomized, double-blind, placebo controlled Phase 2 portion of the trial was initiated in August 2010, comparing ARQ 197 in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab to placebo with the same two drugs.  The primary objective of the Phase 2 trial is PFS, and secondary objectives include OS and overall response rate.  Patient enrollment in this trial is proceeding.
 
Germ cell tumors
 
Daiichi Sankyo recently conducted a Phase 2, open label, signal generation trial with ARQ 197 as a single agent in approximately 25 patients in the niche indication of germ cell tumors.  We have not observed a pre-determined, RECIST response rate among patients in this trial that would have supported our plan to move forward on a fast-to-market clinical development pathway.  Consequently, we have elected to de-prioritize clinical development of ARQ 197 in this indication, consistent with our strategy to focus on the most promising indications within our clinical program.
 
C-Met-associated soft tissue sarcomas
 
We completed enrollment in a Phase 2, open label single agent trial with ARQ 197 among approximately 50 patients with c-Met associated soft tissue sarcomas in the first half of 2010.  Patient recruitment in this trial was comparatively lengthy due to the rarity of these tumors.  We and Daiichi Sankyo have decided not to move forward with a company-sponsored trial in this indication, based on an analysis of data to date.  We are continuing to evaluate other clinical development options in these tumors that would leverage external resources, such as those available under a federally sponsored Cooperative Research and Development Agreement.
 
Combination regimens: ARQ 197 plus sorafenib and ARQ 197 plus gemcitabine
 
The ARQ 197 clinical program includes two Phase 1 open-label trials evaluating ARQ 197 in combination therapy regimens.  The first combination, with sorafenib, is being tested in renal cell carcinoma, NSCLC, liver cancer, malignant melanoma and breast cancer.  The second combination, with gemcitabine, is being tested in uterine, ovarian, bladder, NSCLC, pancreatic and breast cancer.  Phase 2 development plans for both combination therapies will be based on final results observed in expanded cohorts of patients within the Phase 1 trials.
 
At the October 2010 ESMO meeting, interim data from the ARQ 197-sorafenib trial showed that this combination is well tolerated at full standard single agent doses and that the pharmacokinetic profile of ARQ 197 in this combination does not differ from the pharmacokinetic profile of ARQ 197 in monotherapy.  Preliminary evidence of anti-cancer activity was observed, suggesting the therapeutic potential of this combination.  Patients continue to be enrolled in this trial.
 
Interim data from the ARQ 197-gemcitabine combination trial was also presented at the ESMO meeting, showing that this combination was well tolerated at full standard single agent doses.  Preliminary evidence of anti-cancer activity was observed, and expanded cohorts of patients with gemcitabine-sensitive tumor types are being enrolled.  An increase in tumor growth inhibition was noted when dosing of these two compounds is alternated.  Patients continue to be enrolled in this trial, although based on data observed to date, we do not plan to continue testing of this combination in pancreatic cancer.
 
Kyowa Hakko Kirin trials
 
Following the successful completion of a Phase 1 safety trial in Japan, KHK has initiated a Phase 2, single agent trial with ARQ 197 in gastric cancer.  We received a $5 million milestone payment related to this clinical milestone in September 2010.  Approximately 30 patients will be enrolled in this trial at clinical sites in Japan and Korea, and the primary objective is to determine disease control rate, defined as a combination of objective responses and stable disease.
 
Earlier Stage Product Candidates
 
Our product pipeline beyond ARQ 197 encompasses ARQ 621, an inhibitor of the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, an inhibitor of the RAF kinases, both of which are in Phase 1
clinical testing.  We are also developing an inhibitor of Fibroblast Growth Factor Receptor based on our AKIP technology that is in pre-clinical development, for which we plan to file an Investigational New Drug application in 2011 or early 2012. Our strategy with this group of three product candidates is to generate pre-clinical and early clinical data beginning in 2010 and going through 2012 that will inform decisions to initiate Phase 2 testing with one or more of them either independently or on a partnered basis.
 
Discovery Platform
 
We are applying our drug discovery capabilities based on our proprietary ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) to generate novel, selective and potent compounds that target the inactive form of kinases. We have assessed AKIP's potential to target multiple kinases in oncology and other therapeutic areas, and we are generating and validating compounds that inhibit these kinase targets.  We are also pursuing a drug discovery collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo that utilizes the capabilities of the AKIP technology to discover compounds that inhibit two such kinase targets in the field of oncology, and we are pursuing additional collaborations based on applications of AKIP.  An expansion of our original collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo, announced in October 2010, established a third therapeutic target, with an option for a fourth, in the field of oncology , and it includes a two-year extension of the initial agreement through 2012.
 
Risk Factors
 
Risks related to our industry and business strategy
 
Development of our products is at an early stage and we may not successfully develop a drug candidate that becomes a commercially viable drug.
 
The discovery and development of drugs is inherently risky and involves a high rate of failure. Discovery and development of commercial drugs are relatively new to us. Our drug candidates and drug research programs are in early stages and require significant, time-consuming and costly research and development, testing and regulatory approvals.
 
Our leading clinical-stage product candidate, ARQ 197, is based on inhibition of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase. Our other clinical-stage products, ARQ 621 and ARQ 736, are designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein and the RAF kinases, respectively. Although drugs have been approved that inhibit the activity of protein kinases and other enzymes and mitotic proteins such as tubulins, to our knowledge, no company has received regulatory approval for a drug based on the specific proteins targeted by any of our product candidates. Our approaches and scientific platforms may not lead to the development of approvable or marketable drugs.
 
In addition to our clinical-stage programs, we have a limited number of pre-clinical and research-stage programs in our pipeline. Our viability as a company depends, in part, on our ability to continue to create drug candidates for ourselves and our collaborators. Numerous significant factors will affect the success of our drug research and development efforts, including the biology and chemistry complexity involved, availability of appropriate technologies, the
uncertainty of the scientific process and the capabilities and performance of our employees. Our research and development capabilities may not be adequate to develop additional, viable drug candidates.
 
We must show the safety and efficacy of our product candidates through expensive, time consuming preclinical testing and clinical trials, the results of which are uncertain and governed by exacting regulations.
 
Our product candidates are in clinical or preclinical stages of development and may not prove to be sufficiently safe or effective in more advanced human clinical trials. We will need to conduct extensive further testing of all of our product candidates, expend significant additional resources and possibly partner emerging programs to realize commercial value from any of our product candidates.
 
Before obtaining regulatory approvals for the commercial sale of our products, we and our collaborative partners must demonstrate through preclinical studies (laboratory or animal testing) and clinical trials (human testing) that our proposed products are safe and effective for use in each target indication. This testing is expensive and time-consuming, and failure can occur at any stage. If we terminate a preclinical or clinical program, we will have expended resources in an effort that will not provide a return on our investment and missed the opportunity to have allocated those resources to potentially more productive uses.
 
Clinical trials must meet FDA and foreign regulatory requirements. We have limited experience in designing, conducting and managing the preclinical studies and clinical trials necessary to obtain regulatory approval for our product candidates in any country. We or our collaborative partners may encounter problems in clinical trials that may cause us or the FDA or foreign regulatory agencies to delay, suspend or terminate our clinical trials at any phase. These problems could include our inability to manufacture or obtain sufficient quantities of materials produced in accordance with current Good Manufacturing Practice, or cGMP, for use in our clinical trials, conduct clinical trials at our preferred sites, enroll a sufficient number of patients for our clinical trials at one or more sites, or begin or successfully complete clinical trials in a timely fashion, if at all. Furthermore, we, the FDA or foreign regulatory agencies may suspend clinical trials of our product candidates at any time if we or they believe the subjects participating in the trials are being exposed to unacceptable health risks as a result of adverse events occurring in our trials or if we or they find deficiencies in the clinical trial process or conduct of the investigation.
 
Acceptable results from initial preclinical studies and clinical trials of products under development are not necessarily indicative of results that will be obtained from subsequent or more extensive preclinical studies and clinical testing in humans. Clinical trials may not demonstrate sufficient safety and efficacy to obtain the required regulatory approvals or result in marketable products. Failure to adequately demonstrate the safety and efficacy of a product under development will delay and could prevent its regulatory approval.
 
A number of companies in the pharmaceutical industry, including biotechnology companies, have suffered significant setbacks in advanced clinical trials, even after generating promising results in earlier trials.
 
Although it is part of our strategy to pursue clinical development to take advantage of available accelerated regulatory approval processes, there is no guarantee that our product candidates will show the evidence predictive of clinical benefit necessary to qualify for such regulatory treatment.
 
Delays in clinical testing could result in increased costs to us and delay our ability to obtain regulatory approval and commercialize our product candidates.
 
Clinical trials typically take several years to complete. The duration and cost of clinical trials will vary greatly depending on the nature, complexity, and intended use of the drug being tested. Even if the results of our clinical trials are favorable, the clinical trials of ARQ 197 and other product candidates will continue for several years and may take significantly longer than expected to complete. Delays in the commencement or completion of clinical testing for ARQ 197 or pre-clinical or clinical testing for any of our other product candidates could significantly affect our product development costs and business plan.  In January 2011, our first patient was enrolled in the Phase 3 trial of ARQ 197 in combination with erlotinib for patients with non-squamous, non-small cell lung cancer who have received one or two prior systemic anti-cancer therapies. This trial is being conduct ed by Daiichi Sankyo, our collaborator in development of ARQ 197.  Phase 3 clinical efficacy trials, in general, are significantly more complex and time-consuming and involve more patients than the Phase 1 and 2 clinical trials that have been completed to date. We do not know whether our Phase 3 clinical trials of ARQ 197 or any other pre-clinical or clinical trials be completed on schedule, if at all.  At any time, a clinical trial can be placed on "clinical hold" or temporarily or permanently stopped for a variety of reasons, principally for safety concerns. We may experience numerous unforeseen events during, or as a result of, the clinical trial process that could delay or prevent us from receiving regulatory approval or commercializing our product candidates, including the following:
 
                 
our clinical trials may produce negative or inconclusive results, and we may decide, or regulators may require us, to provide additional information about formulation or manufacture of our product candidates or clinical trial design or to conduct additional clinical and/or pre-clinical testing or to abandon programs;
 
                 
we may experience delays related to reaching agreement on acceptable terms with prospective clinical research organizations, or CROs, clinical investigators and trial sites, the terms of which can be subject to extensive negotiation and may vary significantly among different CROs, clinical investigators and trial sites;
 
                 
we may be unable to manufacture or obtain sufficient quantities of a product candidate for use in clinical trials;
 
                 
trial results may not meet the level of statistical significance required by the FDA or other regulatory agencies;
 
                 
enrollment in our clinical trials for our product candidates may be slower than we anticipate, resulting in significant delays;
 
                 
we, or regulators, may suspend or terminate our clinical trials if the participating patients are being exposed to unacceptable health risks;
 
                 
the effects of our product candidates on patients may not be the desired therapeutic effects or may include undesirable side effects or other characteristics that may delay or preclude regulatory approval or limit their commercial use, if approved; and
 
                 
the FDA or other regulatory agencies may lack experience in evaluating the safety and efficacy of drugs based on our development platforms, which could lengthen the regulatory review process.
 
Completion and duration of clinical trials depends on, among other things, our ability to enroll a sufficient number of patients, which is a function of many factors, including:
 
                 
the incidence among the general population of diseases which contain therapeutic endpoints chosen for evaluation;
 
                 
the eligibility criteria defined in the protocol;
 
                 
the size of the patient population required for analysis of the trial's therapeutic endpoints;
 
                 
our ability to recruit clinical trial investigators and sites with the appropriate competencies and experience;
 
                 
our ability to obtain and maintain patient consents; and
 
                 
competition for patients by clinical trial programs for other treatments.
 
We have reached a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) agreement with the FDA for the design of a Phase 3 trial of ARQ 197 in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) of non-squamous histology. The SPA process is a procedure by which the FDA provides official evaluation and written guidance on the design and size of proposed protocols that are intended to form the basis for a New Drug Application.  Final marketing approval depends on the results of the trial.  The SPA may not be sufficient for the purpose of obtaining marketing approval for ARQ 197. Clinical trials may also be delayed or repeated as a result of ambiguous or negative interim results or unforeseen complications in testing. In addition, a clinical trial may be suspended or terminated by us, the FDA, the IRB overseeing the clinical trial at issue, any of our clinical trial sites with respect to that site, or other re gulatory authorities due to a number of factors, including:
 
                                         
failure to design appropriate clinical trial protocols;
 
                                         
failure by us, our employees, our CROs or their employees to conduct the clinical trial in accordance with all applicable FDA, DEA or other regulatory requirements or our clinical protocols;
 
                                         
inspection of the clinical trial operations or trial sites by the FDA or other regulatory authorities resulting in the imposition of a clinical hold;
 
                                         
discovery of serious or unexpected toxicities or side effects experienced by study participants or other unforeseen safety issues;
 
                                         
lack of adequate funding to continue the clinical trial, including the incurrence of unforeseen costs due to enrollment delays, requirements to conduct additional trials and studies and increased expenses associated with the services of our CROs and other third parties; - lack of effectiveness of any product candidate during clinical trials;
 
                                         
slower than expected rates of subject recruitment and enrollment rates in clinical trials;
 
                                         
failure of our CROs or other third-party contractors to comply with all contractual requirements or to perform their services in a timely or acceptable manner;
 
                                         
inability or unwillingness of medical investigators to follow our clinical protocols; and
 
                                         
unfavorable results from on-going clinical trials and pre-clinical studies.
 
Additionally, changes in applicable regulatory requirements and guidance may occur and we may need to amend clinical trial protocols to reflect these changes. Amendments may require us to resubmit our clinical trial protocols to IRBs for reexamination, which may impact the costs, timing or successful completion of a clinical trial. If we experience delays in completion of, or if we terminate, any of our clinical trials, the commercial prospects for ARQ 197 and our other product candidates may be harmed, which may have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and prospects.
 
We have limited clinical development and commercialization experience.
 
We have limited experience conducting clinical trials and have never obtained regulatory approvals for any drug. To date, we have filed five IND applications, and we have initiated twenty Phase 1 clinical trials of which fourteen have been completed, and eleven Phase 2 clinical trials of which seven have been completed. We have not conducted a Phase 3, or pivotal, clinical trial, filed an NDA or commercialized a drug. We have no experience as a company in the sale, marketing or distribution of pharmaceutical products and do not currently have a sales and marketing organization. Developing commercialization capabilities will be expensive and time-consuming, and could delay any product launch. We may not be able to develop a successful commercial organization. To the extent we are unable or determine not to acquire these resources internally, we will be forced to rely on third-part y clinical investigators, clinical research
organizations, marketing organizations or our collaboration partners as we have done for our Phase 3 non-small cell lung cancer trial. If we were unable to establish adequate capabilities independently or with others, our drug development and commercialization efforts could fail, and we may be unable to generate product revenues.
 
We depend substantially on the successful completion of Phase 3 clinical trials for our product candidates. The positive clinical results obtained for our product candidates in Phase 2 clinical studies may not be repeated in Phase 3.
 
< /p>
We have completed Phase 2 clinical studies and enrolled the first patient in our Phase 3 non-small cell lung cancer trial on January 12, 2011. However, we have never completed a Phase 3 clinical trial. Our product candidates are subject to the risks of failure inherent in pharmaceutical development. Before obtaining regulatory approval for the commercial sale of any product candidate, we and our collaborators must successfully complete Phase 3 clinical trials. Negative or inconclusive results of a Phase 3 clinical study could cause the FDA to require that we repeat it or conduct additional clinical studies. Furthermore, while we have obtained positive safety and efficacy results for ARQ 197 during our prior clinical trials, we cannot be certain that these results will be duplicated when our product candidates are tested in a larger number of patients in our Phase 3 clinical trials.
 
If our drug discovery and development programs do not progress as anticipated, our revenue and stock price could be negatively impacted.
 
We estimate the timing of a variety of preclinical, clinical, regulatory and other milestones for planning purposes, including when a drug candidate is expected to enter clinical trials, how soon patients will be recruited and enrolled in these trials, when a clinical trial will be completed and when an application for regulatory approval will be filed. We base our estimates on facts that are currently known to us and on a variety of assumptions, many of which are beyond our control. If we or our collaborators do not achieve milestones when anticipated, we will not receive the corresponding revenue, and our stock price could decline. In addition, our research and clinical testing may be delayed or abandoned if we or our competitors subsequently discover other compounds that show improved safety or efficacy compared to our product candidates, which could limit our ability to generate revenues, c ause us to incur additional expense and cause the market price of our common stock to decline significantly.
 
Risks related to our financial condition
 
We have incurred significant losses since our inception and anticipate that we will incur significant continued losses for the next several years, and our future profitability is uncertain.
 
From our inception in 1993 through September 30, 2010 we have incurred cumulative losses of approximately $393 million. These losses have resulted principally from the costs of our research activities, acquisitions, enhancements to our technology and clinical trials. In the
 
past we derived our revenue primarily from license and technology transfer fees and payments for compound deliveries associated with our discontinued chemistry services operations; research and development funding paid under our agreements with collaboration partners; and to a limited extent, milestone payments.
 
We expect our expenses to increase significantly as we spend additional amounts to fund research, development, clinical testing and commercialization of our drug candidates.  We currently have three product candidates in various stages of clinical development. As a result, we will need to generate significant additional revenues to achieve profitability.
 
To attain profitability, we will need to develop clinical products successfully and market and sell them effectively, either by ourselves or with collaborators. We have never generated revenue from the commercialization of our product candidates, and there is no guarantee that we will be able to do so. Even if were to generate product revenues and achieve profitability, we may not be able to maintain or increase profitability. Because of the numerous risks and uncertainties associated with the development of drugs, we are unable to predict the extent of any future losses or when we will become profitable, if at all. If we fail to become profitable, or if we are unable to fund our continuing losses, we may be unable to continue our business.
 
We may need substantial additional funding and due to global capital and credit market conditions or for other reasons, we may be unable to raise capital when needed, or on terms favorable to us, which could force us to delay, reduce or eliminate our drug discovery, product development and commercialization activities.
 
Volatility and disruption in the global capital and credit markets in 2008 and 2009 have led to a tightening of business credit and investment capital in the United States and internationally. If global economic and financial market conditions deteriorate or remain weak for an extended period of time, our efforts to raise capital will face additional difficulties.
 
Developing drugs, conducting clinical trials, and commercializing products are expensive. Our future funding requirements will depend on many factors, including:
 
                 
the progress and cost of our ongoing and future collaborative and independent clinical trials and other research and development activities and our ability to share such costs of our clinical development efforts with third parties;
 
                 
the costs and timing of obtaining regulatory approvals;
 
                 
the costs of filing, prosecuting, maintaining, defending and enforcing any patent applications, claims, patents and other intellectual property rights;
 
                 
the cost and timing of securing manufacturing capabilities for our clinical product candidates and commercial products, if any;
 
                 
the costs and timing of commercializing our product candidates, including establishing or contracting for sales, marketing and distribution capabilities, if any such candidates receive regulatory approval for commercial sale; and
 
                 
the costs of any acquisitions of or investments in businesses, products and technologies.
 
We may seek the capital necessary to fund our operations through public or private equity offerings, debt financings, or collaboration and licensing arrangements. To the extent that we raise additional capital through the sale of equity or convertible debt securities, our stockholders' ownership interests will be diluted and the terms of such securities may include liquidation or other preferences that adversely affect our stockholders' rights. Other debt-financing arrangements may require us to pledge certain assets and enter into covenants that would restrict certain business activities or our ability to incur further indebtedness. If we raise additional funds through collaboration and licensing arrangements with third parties, we may have to relinquish rights to certain product candidates that we might otherwise seek to develop or commercialize independently, or grant licenses on t erms that are not favorable to us. There can be no assurance that sufficient funds will be available to us when required, on satisfactory terms, or at all. If we are unable to obtain additional funds when needed, we may have to delay, reduce the scope of or eliminate some of our development and commercialization programs, or obtain funds through other arrangements on unattractive terms, which could prevent us from successfully executing our business strategy.
 
We have federal and state net operating losses ("NOL") and research and development credit carryforwards which, if we were to become profitable, could be used to offset/defer federal and state income taxes. Such carryforwards may not, under certain circumstances related to changes in ownership of our stock, be available to us.
 
As of December 31, 2009, we had federal NOL, state NOL, and research and development credit carryforwards of approximately $179 million, $117 million and $21 million respectively, which expire at various dates through 2030. Such carryforwards could potentially be used to offset certain future federal and state income tax liabilities. Utilization of carryforwards may be subject to a substantial annual limitation pursuant to Section 382 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as well as similar state provisions due to ownership changes that have occurred previously or that could occur in the future. In general, an ownership change, as defined by Section 382, results from transactions increasing the ownership of certain shareholders or public groups in the stock of a corporation by more than 50 percentage points over a three-year period. We undertook a detailed study of our NOL and research and development credit carryforwards in the fourth quarter of 2009 to determine whether such amounts are likely to be limited by Section 382. As a result of this analysis and a review of ownership changes in 2010, we currently do not believe Sections 382's limitations will significantly impact our ability to offset income with available NOL and research and development credit carryforwards. However, future ownership changes under Section 382 may limit our ability to fully utilize these tax benefits.
 
Any limitation may result in expiration of a portion of the carryforwards before utilization. If we were not able to utilize our carryforwards, we would be required to use our cash resources to pay taxes that would otherwise have been offset, thereby reducing our liquidity.
 
Risks related to regulatory approval
 
Our product candidates are subject to a lengthy and uncertain regulatory process that may not result in the necessary regulatory approvals, which would adversely affect our ability to commercialize products. We have only limited experience in regulatory affairs.
 
Our product candidates, as well as the activities associated with their research, development and commercialization, are subject to extensive regulation by the FDA in the United States and by comparable authorities in other countries, for example EMA in the E.U. These regulations govern or influence the manufacturing, assessment of benefit and risk, safety, labeling, storage, records and marketing of these products.
 
Failure to obtain regulatory approval for a product candidate would prevent us from commercializing that product candidate. We have not applied for or received regulatory approval to market any of our product candidates in any jurisdiction and have only limited experience in preparing and filing the applications necessary to gain regulatory approvals. The process of obtaining regulatory approvals is expensive, often takes many years, if approval is obtained at all, and can vary substantially based upon the type, complexity and novelty of the product candidates involved.
 
The regulatory process requires preclinical testing, and data obtained from preclinical and clinical activities are susceptible to varying interpretations, which could delay, limit or prevent regulatory approval. In addition, the results of later trials may not confirm the positive results of earlier preclinical studies or trials. Delays or rejections may also be encountered based upon changes in regulatory policy for product approval during the period of product development and regulatory agency review. Changes in regulatory approval policy, regulations or statutes or the process for regulatory review during the development or approval phases of our product candidates may cause delays in the approval or rejection of an application. We are currently in Phase 1 and Phase 2 clinical testing of ARQ 197 and have enrolled a patient in our Phase 3 non-small cell lung cancer trail being cond ucted by Daiichi Sankyo and Phase 1 clinical testing of ARQ 621 and ARQ 736. We have never conducted a Phase 3, or pivotal, clinical trial, nor have we filed or prosecuted the applications necessary to gain regulatory approvals.
 
A company first must conduct preclinical studies in the laboratory and in animal models to gain preliminary information on a candidate compound's activity and to identify potential safety problems. Preclinical studies must be conducted in accordance with applicable regulations of the relevant regulatory authority (e.g. the FDA in the United States, the EMA in E.U.). The results of these studies are submitted as a part of an IND application with the FDA or a CTA application with the appropriate regulatory authority outside of the United States. The regulatory agency involved must review the data in the application before human clinical trials of an investigational drug can commence. If the regulatory authority does not object, a drug developer can begin clinical trials after expiration of a specified statutory period following submission of
 
the application. Notwithstanding that the regulatory authority does not respond during the thirty-day, post-submission review period, the regulatory authority may at any time re-evaluate the adequacy of the application and require additional information about any aspect of the IND or CTA application and corresponding clinical trial, e.g. preclinical testing, drug formulation and manufacture, dosing regimens and drug administration or potential safety risk. Before a new marketing application can be filed with the FDA or other regulatory authority, the product candidate must undergo extensive clinical trials. Any clinical trial may fail to produce results satisfactory to the regulatory authority, typically for lack of safety or efficacy or for safety risks. For example, the regulatory authority could determine that the design of a clinical trial is inadequate to produce reliable results or convincing results .
 
Even if our drug candidates obtain regulatory approval, we and our collaborators will be subject to ongoing government regulation.
 
Even if regulatory authorities approve any of our drug candidates, the manufacture, marketing and sale of these drugs will be subject to strict and ongoing regulation. Compliance with such regulations may consume substantial financial and management resources and expose us and our collaborators to the potential for other adverse circumstances. For example, a regulatory authority can place restrictions on the sale or marketing of a drug in order to manage the risks identified during initial clinical trials or after the drug is on the market. A regulatory authority can condition the approval for a drug on costly post-marketing follow-up studies. Based on these studies, if a regulatory authority does not believe that the drug demonstrates a clinical benefit to patients or an acceptable safety profile, it could limit the indications for which a drug may be sold or revoke the drug's marketing a pproval. In addition, identification of certain side effects either during clinical trials or after a drug is on the market may result in reformulation of a drug, additional preclinical and clinical trials, labeling changes, termination of ongoing clinical trials or withdrawal of approval. Any of these events could delay or prevent us from generating revenue from the commercialization of these drugs and cause us to incur significant additional costs.
 
Even if we or our collaborators bring products to market, we may be unable to price our products effectively or obtain adequate reimbursement for sales of our products, which would have an adverse effect on our revenues.
 
Third party payors, such as government and private insurance plans, frequently require companies to provide rebates and predetermined discounts from list prices and are increasingly challenging the prices charged for pharmaceuticals and other medical products. Our products may not be considered cost-effective, and reimbursement to the patient may not be available or be sufficient to allow the sale of our products on a competitive basis. We, or our collaborators, may not be able to negotiate favorable reimbursement rates for our products. If we, or our collaborators, fail to obtain an adequate level of reimbursement for our products by third-party payors, sales of the drugs would be adversely affected or there may be no commercially viable market for the products.
We face potential liability related to the privacy of health information we obtain from research institutions.
Most health care providers, including research institutions from which we or our collaborators obtain patient information, are subject to privacy regulations promulgated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, or HIPAA. Although we are not directly regulated by HIPAA, we could face substantial criminal penalties if we knowingly receive individually identifiable health information from a health care provider or research institution that has not satisfied HIPPA's disclosure standards. In addition, certain state privacy laws may apply directly to our operations and/or those of our collaborators and may impose restrictions on our use and dissemination of individuals' health information. Moreover, patients about whom we or our collaborators obtain information, as well as the providers who share this information with us, may have contractual rights that limit our ability to use and disclose the information. Claims that we have violated individuals' privacy rights or breached our contractual obligations, even if we are not found liable, could be expensive and time-consuming to defend and could result in adverse publicity that could harm our business.
 
Risks related to collaborations
 
Part of our business strategy involves collaborative out-licensing of our drug candidates while retaining commercialization or co-promotional rights in parts of the world. We may not be able to find collaborators or successfully form suitable collaborations to further our drug development and commercialization efforts.
 
We have sought and may seek collaborators for our drug development and commercialization efforts. We may enter into these collaborations to obtain external financing for drug development and to obtain access to drug development and commercialization expertise. The availability of partners depends on the willingness of pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies to collaborate in drug discovery activities. Only a limited number of pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies would fit our requirements. The number could decline further through consolidation, or the number of collaborators with interest in our drugs could decline. If the number of our potential collaborators were to decline, the remaining collaborators may be able to negotiate terms less favorable to us.
 
We face significant competition in seeking drug development collaborations, both from other biotechnology companies and from the internal capabilities and compound pipelines of the pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies themselves. This competition is particularly intense in the oncology field. Our ability to interest such companies in forming co-development and commercialization arrangements with us will be influenced by, among other things:
 
                 
the compatibility of technologies;
 
                 
the potential partner's acceptance of our approach to drug discovery;
 
                 
the novelty, quality and commercial potential of any drug candidate we may succeed in developing; and
 
                 
our ability, and collaborators' perceptions of our ability, to achieve intended results in a timely fashion, with acceptable quality and cost.
 
Even if we are able to gain the interest of potential drug development partners, the negotiation, documentation and implementation of collaborative arrangements are complex and time-consuming. Collaborations may not be available on commercially acceptable terms and, if formed, may not be commercially successful or, if successful, may not realize sufficient benefit for us. If we are unable to form collaborations, we may not gain access to the financial resources and industry expertise necessary to develop and commercialize drug products or successfully market any products we develop on our own and, therefore, be unable to generate revenue from our products. In addition, our past, existing and future collaboration terms contain or will likely contain, limitations on classes of chemical compounds or biological targets that we may explore outside those collaborations for our own use.
 
Our success depends in part on the efforts of our current and possible future collaborators, who will likely have substantial control and discretion over the continued development and commercialization of drug candidates, including ARQ 197, that are the subjects of our collaborations.
 
Our current collaborators, Kyowa Hakko Kirin and Daiichi Sankyo have, and future collaborators will have significant discretion in determining the efforts and amount of resources that they dedicate to our collaborations. Our collaborators may determine not to proceed with clinical development or commercialization of a particular drug candidate for a number of reasons that are beyond our control, even under circumstances where we might have continued such a program. In addition, our rights to receive milestone payments and royalties from our collaborators will depend on our collaborators' abilities to establish the safety and efficacy of our drug candidates, obtain regulatory approvals and achieve market acceptance of products developed from our drug candidates. We may also depend on our collaborators to manufacture clinical scale quantities of some of our drug candidates and, possibly, for commercial scale manufacture, distribution and direct sales. Our collaborators may not be successful in manufacturing our drug candidates or successfully commercializing them.
 
We face additional risks in connection with our existing and future collaborations, including the following:
 
                 
our collaborators may develop and commercialize, either alone or with others, products that are similar to or competitive with the products that are the subject of the collaboration with us;
 
                 
our collaborators may underfund, not commit sufficient resources to, or conduct in an unsatisfactory matter the testing, marketing, distribution or other development of our drug candidates;
 
                 
our collaborators may not properly maintain or defend our intellectual property rights or they may utilize our proprietary information in such a way as to invite litigation that could jeopardize or potentially invalidate our intellectual property or proprietary information or expose us to potential liability;
 
                 
our collaborators may encounter conflicts of interest, changes in business strategy or other business issues which could adversely affect their willingness or ability to fulfill their obligations to us (for example, pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies historically have re-evaluated their priorities following mergers and consolidations, which have been common in recent years in these industries); and
 
                 
disputes may arise between us and our collaborators delaying or terminating the research, development or commercialization of our drug candidates, resulting in significant litigation or arbitration that could be time-consuming and expensive, or causing collaborators to act in their own self-interest and not in the interest of our stockholders;
 
                 
we might not have the financial or human resources to meet our obligations or take advantage of our rights under the terms of our existing and future collaborations; and
 
                 
our existing collaborators may exercise their respective rights to terminate without cause their collaborations with us, in which event, we might not be able to complete development and commercialization of ARQ 197 and other drug candidates on our own.
 
We may not receive any further milestone, royalty or license payments under our current collaborations.
 
Although we have received license fees and other payments to date under our current drug development collaborations with Kyowa Hakko Kirin and Daiichi Sankyo, we may not receive any royalty payments or additional license and milestone fees under such agreements. Our receipt of any future milestone, royalty or license payments depends on many factors, including whether our collaborators want or are able to continue to pursue potential drug candidates, intellectual property issues, unforeseen complications in the development or commercialization process, and the ultimate commercial success of the drugs.
 
Risks related to relationships with third party vendors
 
We rely heavily on third parties such as contract research organizations, to conduct clinical trials and perform research and analysis services for us. If third parties upon which we rely do not perform as contractually required or expected, we may not be able to develop further, obtain regulatory approval for or commercialize our product candidates.
 
We do not have the ability or the human resources to perform all of the testing or conduct all of the clinical trials that are necessary in connection with the development of our product candidates. We are using third-party clinical research organizations, or CROs, to oversee many of our ongoing clinical trials and expect to use the same or similar organizations for certain of our future clinical trials. Our reliance on these third parties reduces our control over these activities. We may face delays outside of our control if these parties do not perform their obligations in a timely or competent fashion or if we are forced to change service providers or if
 
the quality or accuracy of the data they obtain is compromised due to their failure to adhere to our clinical protocols or regulatory requirements or for other reasons. These risks are heightened if we conduct clinical trials outside of the United States, where it may be more difficult to ensure that studies are conducted in compliance with FDA requirements. Any third party that we hire to conduct clinical trials may also provide services to our competitors, which could compromise the performance of their obligations to us. If we experience significant delays in the progress of our clinical trials and in our plans to file NDAs, the commercial prospects for product candidates could be harmed and our ability to generate product revenue would be delayed or prevented.
 
If the third parties we rely upon to conduct, supervise and monitor our clinical studies perform in an unsatisfactory manner, it may harm our business.
 
We rely on CROs and clinical trial sites to ensure the proper and timely conduct of our clinical trials. While we have agreements governing their activities, we have limited influence over their actual performance. We have relied and plan to continue to rely upon CROs to monitor and manage data for our ongoing clinical programs for ARQ 197 and our other product candidates, as well as the execution of nonclinical studies. We control only certain aspects of our CROs' activities. Nevertheless, we are responsible for ensuring that each of our studies is conducted in accordance with the applicable protocol, legal, regulatory and scientific standards and our reliance on the CROs does not relieve us of our regulatory responsibilities. We and our CROs are required to comply with the FDA's current good clinical practices, or cGCPs, which are regulations and guidelines enforced by the FDA for a ll of our product candidates in clinical development. The FDA enforces these cGCPs through periodic inspections of trial sponsors, principal investigators and clinical trial sites. If we or our CROs fail to comply with applicable cGCPs, the clinical data generated in our clinical trials may be deemed unreliable and the FDA may require us to perform additional clinical trials before approving our marketing applications. Upon inspection, the FDA may determine that our Phase 3 clinical trials do not comply with cGCPs. In addition, our Phase 3 clinical trials will require a sufficiently large number of test subjects to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of ARQ 197. Accordingly, if our CROs fail to comply with these regulations or fail to recruit a sufficient number of patients, we may be required to repeat the Phase 3 clinical trials, which would delay the regulatory approval process. Our CROs are not our employees, and we cannot control whether or not they devote sufficient time and resources to our ongoing clinical and nonclinical programs. These CROs may also have relationships with other commercial entities, including our competitors, for whom they may also be conducting clinical studies, or other drug development activities which could harm our competitive position. We face the risk of potential unauthorized disclosure or misappropriation of our intellectual property by CROs, which may allow our potential competitors to access our proprietary technology. If our CROs do not successfully carry out their contractual duties or obligations, fail to meet expected deadlines, or if the quality or accuracy of the clinical data they obtain is compromised due to the failure to adhere to our clinical protocols or regulatory requirements, or for any other reasons, our clinical trials may be extended, delayed or terminated, and we may not be able to obtain regulatory approval for, or successfully commercialize ARQ 197, or our other product candidates. As a result, our financial results and the commercial prospects for AR Q 197 and any future product candidates that we develop would be harmed, our costs could increase, and our ability to generate revenues could be delayed.
 
We have limited manufacturing experience. Currently, we primarily rely on third parties to provide sufficient quantities of our product candidates to conduct pre-clinical and clinical studies. In the future, we may rely on our collaborators for drug supply.  We have no control over our manufacturers', suppliers' and collaborators' compliance with manufacturing regulations, and their failure to comply could interrupt our drug supply.
 
To date, our product candidates have been manufactured in relatively small quantities for preclinical and clinical trials. We have no experience in manufacturing any of our product candidates on a large scale and have contracted with third party manufacturers to provide material for clinical trials and to assist in the development and optimization of our manufacturing processes and methods. Our ability to conduct clinical trials and commercialize our product candidates will depend on the ability of such third parties to manufacture our products on a large scale at a competitive cost and in accordance with cGMP and other regulatory requirements. Significant scale-up of manufacturing may result in unanticipated technical challenges and may require additional validation studies that the FDA must review and approve. If we are not able to obtain contract cGMP manufacturing on commercially reasonable terms, obtain or develop the necessary materials and technologies for manufacturing, or obtain intellectual property rights necessary for manufacturing, we may not be able to conduct or complete clinical trials or commercialize our product candidates. There can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain such requisite terms, materials, technologies and intellectual property necessary to successfully manufacture our product candidates for clinical trials or commercialization. Our product candidates require precise, high-quality manufacturing. The failure to achieve and maintain these high manufacturing standards, including the incidence of manufacturing errors, could result in patient injury or death, product recalls or withdrawals, delays or failures in product testing or delivery, cost overruns or other problems that could seriously hurt our business.
 
The facilities used by our contract manufacturers may undergo inspections by the FDA for compliance with cGMP regulations before our product candidates produced there can receive marketing approval. If these facilities do not satisfy cGMP requirements in connection with the manufacture of our product candidates, we may need to conduct additional validation studies, or find alternative manufacturing facilities, either of which would result in significant cost to us as well as a delay of up to several years in obtaining approval for any affected product candidate. In addition, after approval of a product candidate for commercial use, our contract manufacturers and any alternative contract manufacturer we may utilize will be subject to ongoing periodic inspection by the FDA and corresponding state and foreign agencies for compliance with cGMP regulations, similar foreign regulations and other regu latory standards. We do not have control over our contract manufacturers' compliance with these regulations and standards. Any failure by our third-party manufacturers or suppliers to comply with applicable regulations could result in sanctions being imposed (including fines, injunctions and civil penalties), failure of regulatory authorities to grant marketing approval of our product candidates, delays, suspension or withdrawal of approvals, license revocation, seizures or recalls of product candidates or products, operating restrictions and criminal prosecution.
 
Materials necessary to manufacture our product candidates currently under development may not be available on commercially reasonable terms, or at all, which may delay our development and commercialization of these drugs.
 
Some of the materials necessary for the manufacture of our product candidates currently under development may, from time to time, be available either in limited quantities, or from a limited number of manufacturers, or both. We and/or our collaborators need to obtain these materials for our clinical trials and, potentially, for commercial distribution when and if we obtain marketing approval for these compounds. Suppliers may not sell us these materials at the time we need them or on commercially reasonable terms. If we are unable to obtain the materials needed for the conduct of our clinical trials, product testing and potential regulatory approval could be delayed, adversely impacting our ability to develop the product candidates. If it becomes necessary to change suppliers for any of these materials or if any of our suppliers experience a shutdown or disruption in the facilities used to prod uce these materials, due to technical, regulatory or other problems, it could significantly hinder or prevent manufacture of our drug candidates and any resulting products.
 
Risks related to competition
 
The drug research and development industry is highly competitive, and we compete with some companies that have a broader range of capabilities and better access to resources than we do.
 
The pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries are characterized by rapid and continuous technological innovation. We compete with companies worldwide that are engaged in the research and discovery, licensing, development and commercialization of drug candidates, including, in the area of small molecule anti-cancer therapeutics, biotechnology companies such as Ariad Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; Array BioPharma Inc.; Astex Therapeutics; Cell Genesys, Inc.; Cell Therapeutics, Inc.; Curis, Inc.; Exelixis, Inc.; Idera Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; Infinity Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; Onyx Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; OSI Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; Oxigene, Inc.; Pharmacopeia, Inc.; Plexxikon, Inc. Telik, Inc.; and Vertex Pharmaceuticals, Inc. and many others.
 
With respect to ARQ 197 specifically, we are aware of a number of biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies that are or may be pursuing approaches to c-Met inhibition, including Amgen Inc.; AVEO Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; Bristol-Myers Squibb Company; Cephalon, Inc.; Compugen Ltd.; Eli Lilly & Company; Exelixis, Inc.; Genentech, Inc.; GlaxoSmithKline; Johnson & Johnson; Merck & Co., Inc.; Methylgene Inc.; Pfizer Inc., Roche, Schering-Plough; and Supergen Inc. and others.
 
Even if we are successful in bringing products to market, we face substantial competitive challenges in effectively marketing and distributing our products. Companies and research institutions, including large pharmaceutical companies with much greater financial resources and more experience in developing products, conducting clinical trials, obtaining FDA and foreign regulatory approvals and bringing new drugs to market are developing products within the field
 
of oncology. Some of these entities already have competitive products on the market or product candidates in more advanced stages of development than we do. By virtue of having or introducing competitive products on the market before us, these entities may gain a competitive advantage. In addition, there may be product candidates of which we are not aware at an earlier stage of development that may compete with our product candidates. Some of our competitors have entered into collaborations with leading companies within our target markets.
 
We are in a rapidly evolving field of research. Consequently, our technology may be rendered non-competitive or obsolete by approaches and methodologies discovered by others, both before and after we have gone to market with our products. We also face competition from existing therapies that are currently accepted in the marketplace and from the impact of adverse events in our field that may affect regulatory approval or public perception.
 
We anticipate that we will face increased competition in the future as new companies enter the market and advanced technologies become available. If we are unable to successfully compete in our chosen field, we will not become profitable.
 
We may not be able to recruit and retain the scientists and management we need to compete.
 
Our success depends on our ability to attract, retain and motivate highly skilled scientific personnel and management, and our ability to develop and maintain important relationships with leading academic institutions, clinicians and scientists. We are highly dependent on our senior management and scientific staff, and the loss of the services of one or more of our other key employees could have an adverse effect on the successful completion of our clinical trials or the commercialization of our product candidates.
 
We compete intensely with pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies, including our collaborators, medicinal chemistry outsourcing companies, contract research and manufacturing organizations, and academic and research institutions in the recruitment of scientists and management. The shortage of personnel with experience in drug development could lead to increased recruiting, relocation and compensation costs, which may exceed our expectations and resources. If we cannot hire additional qualified personnel, the workload may increase for both existing and new personnel. If we are unsuccessful in our recruitment efforts, we may be unable to execute our strategy.
 
Risks related to intellectual property
 
Our patents and other proprietary rights may fail to protect our business. If we are unable to adequately protect our intellectual property, third parties may be able to use our technology which could adversely affect our ability to compete in the market.
 
To be successful and compete, we must obtain and protect patents on our products and technology and protect our trade secrets. Where appropriate, we seek patent protection for certain aspects of the technology we are developing, but patent protection may not be available for some of our product candidates or their use, synthesis or formulations. The patent position of biotechnology firms is highly uncertain, involves complex legal and factual questions, and has
 
recently been the subject of much litigation. No consistent policy has emerged from the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office or the courts regarding the breadth of claims allowed or the degree of protection afforded under many biotechnology patents. In addition, there is a substantial backlog of biotechnology patent applications at the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office. As a consequence of these factors, the approval or rejection of patent applications may take several years.
 
We do not know whether our patent applications will result in issued patents. In addition, the receipt of a patent might not provide much practical protection. If we receive a patent with a narrow scope it will be easier for competitors to design products that do not infringe our patent. We cannot be certain that we will receive any additional patents, that the claims of our patents will offer significant protection for our technology, or that our patents will not be challenged, narrowed, invalidated or circumvented.
 
Competitors may interfere with our patent protection in a variety of ways. Competitors may claim that they invented the claimed invention before us. Competitors may also claim that we are infringing on their patents and that, therefore, we cannot practice our technology as claimed under our patents. Competitors may also contest our patents by showing the patent examiner that the invention was not original, was not novel or was obvious. In litigation, a competitor could claim that our issued patents are not valid for a number of reasons. If a court agrees, our patents could be narrowed, invalidated or rendered unenforceable, or we may be forced to stop using the technology covered by these patents or to license the technology from third parties. As a company, we have no meaningful experience with competitors interfering with our patents or patent applications and therefore may not have the exper ience we would need to aggressively protect our patents should such action become necessary.
 
The laws of some foreign countries do not protect intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States. Many companies have encountered significant problems in protecting and defending such rights in foreign jurisdictions. Many countries, including certain countries in Europe, have compulsory licensing laws under which a patent owner may be compelled to grant licenses to third parties. In addition, many countries limit the enforceability of patents against government agencies or government contractors. In these countries, the patent owner may have limited remedies, which could materially diminish the value of the patent. Compulsory licensing of life-saving drugs is also becoming increasingly popular in developing countries either through direct legislation or international initiatives. Such compulsory licenses could be extended to include some of our product candidat es, which could limit our potential revenue opportunities. Moreover, the legal systems of certain countries, particularly certain developing countries, do not favor the aggressive enforcement of patent and other intellectual property protection, which makes it difficult to stop infringement.
 
Drug candidates we develop that are approved for commercial marketing by the FDA would be subject to the provisions of the Drug Price Competition and Patent Term Restoration Act of 1984, known as the "Hatch-Waxman Act." The Hatch-Waxman Act provides companies with marketing exclusivity for varying time periods during which generic versions of a drug may not be marketed and allows companies to apply to extend patent protection for up to five additional years. It also provides a means for approving generic versions of a drug once the
 
marketing exclusivity period has ended and all relevant patents have expired. The period of exclusive marketing, however, may be shortened if a patent is successfully challenged and defeated, which could reduce the amount of revenue we receive for such product.
 
Agreements we have with our employees, consultants and collaborators may not afford adequate protection for our trade secrets, confidential information and other proprietary information.
 
In addition to patent protection, we also rely on copyright and trademark protection, trade secrets, and know-how. It is unclear whether our trade secrets and know-how will prove to be adequately protected. To protect our trade secrets and know-how, we require our employees, consultants and advisors to execute agreements regarding the confidentiality and ownership of such proprietary information. We cannot guarantee, however, that these agreements will provide us with adequate protection against improper use or disclosure of confidential information and there may not be adequate remedies in the event of unauthorized use or disclosure. Our employees, consultants or advisors may unintentionally or willfully disclose our information to competitors. In addition, in some situations, these agreements may conflict with, or be subject to, the rights of third parties with whom our employees, consultants or advisors had or have previous employment or consulting relationships. Like patent litigation, enforcing a claim that a third party illegally obtained and is using our trade secrets is expensive and time-consuming and the outcome is unpredictable. In addition, courts outside the United States are sometimes less willing than our federal and state courts to protect trade secrets. Furthermore, others may independently develop substantially equivalent knowledge, methods and know-how. Our failure or inability to protect our proprietary information and techniques may inhibit or limit our ability to compete effectively or exclude certain competitors from the market.
 
Our success will depend partly on our ability to operate without infringing upon or misappropriating the proprietary rights of others.
 
There are many patents in our field of technology and we cannot guarantee that we do not infringe on those patents or that we will not infringe on patents granted in the future. If a patent holder believes a product of ours infringes on its patent, the patent holder may sue us even if we have received patent protection for our technology.
 
If we do not prevail in litigation or if other parties have filed, or in the future should file, patent applications covering products and technologies that we have developed or intend to develop, we may have to obtain licenses from third parties, which may not be available on commercially reasonable terms, or at all, and may require us to pay substantial royalties or grant a cross-license to some of our patents to another patent holder. Additionally, we may have to change the formulation of a product candidate so that we do not infringe third- party patents. Such reformulation may be impossible to achieve or which may require substantial time and expense. If we are unable to cost-effectively redesign our products so they do not infringe a patent, we may be unable to sell some of our products. Any of these occurrences will result in lost revenues and profits for us.
 
The drug research and development industry has a history of patent and other intellectual property litigation, and we may be involved in costly intellectual property lawsuits.
 
The drug research and development industry has a history of patent and other intellectual property litigation, and we believe these lawsuits are likely to continue. Legal proceedings relating to intellectual property would be expensive, take significant time and divert management's attention from other business concerns. We face potential patent infringement suits by companies that control patents for drugs or potential drugs similar to our product candidates or other suits alleging infringement of their intellectual property rights. There could be issued patents of which we are not aware that our products and their use, whether as single agents or in combination with other products, infringe or patents that we believe we do not infringe that we are ultimately found to infringe. The publication of discoveries in the scientific or patent literature frequently occurs substantially later than the date on which the underlying discoveries were made and patent applications were filed. Because patent applications can take many years to issue, there may be currently pending applications of which we are unaware that may later result in issued patents that we infringe with our drug candidates or resulting products, and their use as single agents or in combination with other products. In addition, technology created under our research and development collaborations may infringe the intellectual property rights of third parties, in which case we may not receive milestone or royalty revenue from those collaborations.
 
If we do not prevail in an infringement lawsuit brought against us, we might have to pay substantial damages and we could be required to stop the infringing activity or obtain a license to use the patented technology or redesign our products so as not to infringe the patent. We may not be able to enter into licensing arrangements at a reasonable cost or effectively redesign our products. Any inability to secure licenses or alternative technology could delay the introduction of our products or prevent us from manufacturing or selling products.
 
Risks related to employees and facilities
 
Our operations could be interrupted by damage to our laboratory facilities.
 
Our operations are dependent upon the continued use of our specialized laboratories and equipment in Woburn, Massachusetts. Catastrophic events, including fires or explosions, could damage our laboratories, equipment, scientific data, work in progress or inventories of chemical compounds and biological materials and may materially interrupt our business. We employ safety precautions in our laboratory activities in order to reduce the likelihood of the occurrence of these catastrophic events; however, we cannot eliminate the chance that such an event will occur. Rebuilding our facilities could be time consuming and result in substantial delays in our development of products and in fulfilling our agreements with our collaborators.
 
Security breaches may disrupt our operations and adversely affect our operating results.
 
Our network security and data recovery measures may not be adequate to protect against computer viruses, break-ins, and similar disruptions from unauthorized tampering with our computer systems. The misappropriation, theft, sabotage or any other type of security breach
 
with respect to any of our proprietary and confidential information that is electronically stored, including research or clinical data, could have a material adverse impact on our business, operating results and financial condition. Additionally, any break-in or trespass of our facilities that results in the misappropriation, theft, sabotage or any other type of security breach with respect to our proprietary and confidential information, including research or clinical data, or that results in damage to our research and development equipment and assets could have a material adverse impact on our business, operating results, and financial condition.
 
Risks related to product liability
 
If our use of chemical and biological materials and hazardous materials violates applicable laws or causes personal injury, we may be liable for damages.
 
Our drug discovery activities, including the analysis and synthesis of chemical compounds, involve the controlled use of chemicals, including flammable, combustible, toxic and radioactive materials that are potentially hazardous if misused. Federal, state and local laws and regulations govern our use, storage, handling and disposal of these materials. These laws and regulations include the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, the Occupational Safety and Health Act, local fire and building codes, regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation, the Drug Enforcement Agency and the Department of Energy, the Department of Health and Human Services, and the laws of Massachusetts where we conduct our operations. We may incur significant costs to comply with these laws and regulations in the future and current or future environmental laws and regulations may impair our research, develop ment and production efforts. Notwithstanding our extensive safety procedures for handling and disposing of materials, the risk of accidental contamination or injury from these materials cannot be completely eliminated. In the event of an accident, our business could be disrupted and we could be liable for damages. Our liability may exceed our insurance coverage and our total assets and have a negative impact on our financial condition and results of operations.
 
We may be exposed to potential liability related to the development, testing or manufacturing of compounds we develop and our insurance coverage may not be sufficient to cover losses.
 
We are developing, clinically testing and manufacturing potential therapeutic products for use in humans. In connection with these activities, we could be liable if persons are injured or die while using these drugs. We may have to pay substantial damages and/or incur legal costs to defend claims resulting from injury or death, and we may not receive expected royalty or milestone payments if commercialization of a drug is limited or ended as a result of such claims. We have product liability and clinical trial insurance that contains customary exclusions and provides coverage per occurrence at levels, in the aggregate, which we believe are customary and commercially reasonable in our industry given our current stage of drug development. Our product liability insurance does not cover every type of product liability claim that we may face or loss we may incur and may not adequately compensate us for the entire amount of covered claims or losses or for the harm to our business reputation. Also, we may be unable to maintain
 
our current insurance policies or obtain and maintain necessary additional coverage at acceptable costs, or at all.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1
   Text of press release announcing offering of common stock dated January 19, 2011.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Contact:
 
William B. Boni
VP, Investor Relations/Corp. Communications
(781) 994-0300
www.ArQule.com
 
ArQule Announces Proposed Public Offering
 
WOBURN, Mass., January 19, 2011  ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its intention to offer, subject to market and other conditions, shares of its common stock in an underwritten public offering. The Company also expects to grant the underwriters a 30-day option to purchase up to an additional 15% of the shares of common stock offered in the public offering to cover over-allotments, if any.
 
Leerink Swann LLC and Lazard Capital Markets LLC are acting as joint book-running managers for the offering.
 
The securities described above are being offered by ArQule pursuant to a registration statement previously filed and declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission. This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the securities in this offering. The offering may be made only by means of a prospectus, copies of which may be obtained, when available, from Leerink Swann LLC, Attention: Syndicate Prospectus Department, by telephone at 617-918-4814, or by facsimile at 617-918-4914.
 
This press release includes forward-looking statements. For these statements, ArQule claims the protection of the safe harbor for forward-looking statements provided by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. It should be noted that there are risks and uncertainties related to the public offering. A review of these risks can be found in ArQule's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009, the prospectus to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission in connection with the offering and other reports and documents filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110125163301.txt.gz
TIME:20110125163301
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
o
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 1.01.Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On January 19, 2011, we entered into an Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with the underwriters listed therein (collectively the "Underwriters"), providing for the offer and sale of 7,000,000 shares of our common stock par value $0.01 per share (the "Common Stock"), sold by us at a price of $6.15 per share ($5.8425 per share, net of underwriting discounts).  In addition, pursuant to the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, we granted the Underwriters a 30-day option to purchase up to 1,050,000 shares of Common Stock to cover over-allotments, if any.  The Underwriters exercised this option in full on January 21, 2011. The closing of the offering occurred on January 25, 2011.
 
The offering was made pursuant to our effective Registration Statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-166532) (the "Registration Statement"), which was previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") and became effective, and a prospectus supplement filed with the SEC.
 
We have made certain customary representations, warranties and covenants in the Underwriting Agreement concerning us and the Registration Statement related to the offering of the shares.  We also have agreed to indemnify the Underwriters against certain liabilities, including liabilities under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.  The representations, warranties and covenants contained in the Underwriting Agreement were made only for purposes of such agreement and as of specific dates, were solely for the benefit of the parties to such agreement, and may be subject to limitations agreed upon by the contracting parties.
 
Pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement, certain of our directors and executive officers entered into agreements in substantially the form agreed to by the Underwriters providing for a 90-day "lock-up" period with respect to sales of specified securities, subject to certain exceptions.
 
The foregoing description of the Underwriting Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Underwriting Agreement, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
We issued press releases on (1) January 20, 2011 announcing the pricing of the offering and (2) January 25, 2011 announcing the closing of the offering. These press releases are attached as Exhibit 99.1 and Exhibit 99.2, respectively, to this report and are incorporated by reference herein.
 
Item 9.01Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Exhibit 1.1Underwriting Agreement dated September 15, 2009
 
Exhibit 5.1Opinion of Arnold & Porter LLP
 
Exhibit 23.1Consent of Arnold & Porter LLP (filed with Exhibit 5.1)
 
Exhibit 99.1Press Released dated January 20, 2011
 
Exhibit 99.2Press Released dated January 25, 2011
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
 
EXECUTION COPY
 
Dated: January 19, 2011
 
 
January 19, 2011
 
Leerink Swann LLC
Lazard Capital Markets LLC As Representatives of the Several Underwriters
 
c/o
      
Leerink Swann LLC One Federal Street, 37th Floor Boston, MA 02110
 
c/o
      
Lazard Capital Markets 30 Rockefeller Plaza New York, New York 10020
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), confirms its agreement with Leerink Swann LLC ("") and Lazard Capital Markets LLC ("") and each of the other Underwriters named in hereto (collectively, the "," which term shall also include any underwriter substituted as hereinafter provided in Section 10 hereof), for whom Leerink Swann and LCM are acting as representatives (in such capacity, the ""), with respect to (i) the issue and sale by the Company and the purchase by the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, of the respective numbers of shares of Common Stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company ("") set forth in said , and (ii) the grant by the Company to the Underwriters, severally and not jointly, of the option described in Section 2(b) hereof to purchase all or any part of 1,050,000 additional shares of Common Stock to cover overallotments, if any. The aforesaid 7,000,000 shares of Common Stock (the "") to be purchased by the Underwriters and all or any part of the 1,050,000 shares of Common Stock subject to the option described in Section 2(b) hereof (the "") are hereinafter called, collectively, the "."
Company
Leerink Swann
LCM
Schedule A
Underwriters
Representatives
Common Stock
Schedule A
Initial Securities
Option Securities
Securities
 
The Company understands that the Underwriters propose to make a public offering of the Securities as soon as the Representatives deem advisable after this Agreement has been executed and delivered.
 
The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") a registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-166532), including the related preliminary prospectus or prospectuses, covering the registration of the Securities under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ""). Promptly after execution and delivery of this Agreement, the Company will prepare and file a prospectus in accordance with the provisions of Rule 430B ("") of the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1933 Act (the "") and paragraph (b) of Rule 424 ("") of the 1933 Act Regulations. The information included in such prospectus that was omitted from such registration statement at the time it became effective but that is deemed to be part of and included in such registration statement at the time it became effective pursuant to Rule 430B (or Rule 430A of the 1933 Act Regulations, as applicable) is referred to as "." Each prospectus used in connection with the offering of the Securities that omitted the Rule 430B Information is herein called a "." Such registration statement, at any given time, including all exhibits, financial schedules and the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act, as amended or supplemented from time to time, and the documents otherwise deemed to be a part thereof or included therein by 1933 Act Regulations (including by Rules 430A or 430B, as applicable), is herein called the "."   Any registration statement filed pursuant to Rule 462(b) of the 1933 Act
Commission
1933 Act
Rule 430B
1933 Act Regulations
Rule 424(b)
Rule 430B Information
preliminary prospectus
Registration Statement
 
Regulations is herein referred to as the "," and after such filing, if applicable, the term "" shall include the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement. The final prospectus in the form first furnished to the Underwriters for use in connection with the offering of the Securities, including the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act at the time of the execution of this Agreement and any preliminary prospectuses that form a part thereof, is herein called the "." For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement to any of the foregoing shall be deemed to include the copy filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval system ("").
Rule 462(b) Registration Statement
Registration Statement
Prospectus
EDGAR
 
All references in this Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "contained," "included" or "stated" in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is incorporated by reference in or otherwise deemed by 1933 Act Regulations to be a part of or included in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be; and all references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include the filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), which is incorporated by reference in or otherwise deemed by 1933 Act Regulations to be a part of or included in the Registration Statement, such preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be.
1934 Act
 
Section 1.      .
Representations and Warranties
 
(a)           . The Company represents and warrants to each Underwriter as of the date hereof, as of the Applicable Time referred to in Section 1(a)(i) hereof, as of the Closing Time referred to in Section 2(c) hereof, and as of each Date of Delivery (if any) referred to in Section 2(b) hereof, and agrees with each Underwriter, as follows:
Representations and Warranties by the Company
 
(i)            . The Company meets the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act, including the transaction requirements set forth in General Instruction I.B.1 of such form. Each of the Registration Statement, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto has become effective under the 1933 Act and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto has been issued under the 1933 Act and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, are contemplated by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information has been complied with.  The date of this Agreement is not more than three years subsequent to the initial effective date of the Registration Statement.
Compliance with Registration Requirements
 
At the respective times the Registration Statement, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any post-effective amendments thereto became effective and at the Closing Time (and, if any Option Securities are purchased, at the Date of Delivery), the Registration Statement, the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any amendments and supplements thereto complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and did not and, as amended, as applicable, will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading. Neither the Prospectus nor any amendments or supplements thereto (including any prospectus wrapper), at the time the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement was issued and at the Closing Time (and, if any Option Securities are purchased, at the Date of Delivery), included or, as amended or supplemented, as applicable, will include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or, as amended or supplemented, as applicable, will omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
 
As of the Applicable Time (as defined below), neither (x) the Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus(es) (as defined below) issued at or prior to the Applicable Time, the Statutory Prospectus (as defined below) and the information included on hereto (collectively, the ""), nor (y) any individual Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the General Disclosure Package, included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary
Schedule B
General Disclosure Package
in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
 
As used in this subsection and elsewhere in this Agreement:
 
"" means 9:00 p.m. (Eastern time) on January 19, 2011 or such other time as agreed upon in writing by the Company and the Representatives.
Applicable Time
 
"" means any "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433 of the 1933 Act Regulations (""), relating to the Securities that (i) is required to be filed with the Commission by the Company, (ii) is a "road show for an offering that is a written communication" within the meaning of Rule 433(d)(8)(i) whether or not required to be filed with the Commission or (iii) is exempt from filing pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(i) because it contains a description of the Securities or of the offering that does not reflect the final terms, in each case in the form filed or required to be filed with the Commission or, if not required to be filed, in the form required to be retained in the Company's records pursuant to Rule 433(g).
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
Rule 433
 
"" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is intended for general distribution to prospective investors (other than a "electronic road show," as defined in Rule 433), as evidenced by its being specified in hereto.
Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus
bona fide
Schedule D
 
"" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not an Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus.
Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus
 
"" as of any time means the prospectus relating to the Securities that is included in the Registration Statement immediately prior to that time, including any document incorporated by reference therein and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof.
Statutory Prospectus
 
Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the public offer and sale of the Securities or until any earlier date that the issuer notified or notifies the Representatives as described in Section 3(e), did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, including any document incorporated by reference therein, and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified.
 
The representations and warranties in this subsection shall not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement to the foregoing, made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
 
Each preliminary prospectus (including the prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statement as originally filed or as part of any amendment thereto) complied when so filed in all material respects with the 1933 Act Regulations and each preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus delivered to the Underwriters for use in connection with this offering was identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
 
At the time of filing the Registration Statement, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any post-effective amendments thereto and at the date hereof, the Company was not and is not an "ineligible issuer," as defined in Rule 405 of the 1933 Act Regulations.
 
(ii)           . The documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, when they became effective or at the time they were or hereafter are filed with the Commission, complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1934 Act, and the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1934 Act (the "").
Incorporated Documents
1934 Regulations
 
(iii)          . The accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement are independent public accountants as required by the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and Rule 3600T of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.
Independent Accountants
 
(iv)          . The financial statements and schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus present fairly the financial condition of the Company as of the respective dates thereof and the results of operations and cash flows of the Company for the respective periods covered thereby, all in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles ("") applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved. The selected consolidated financial data included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus present fairly the information shown therein and have been derived on a basis consistent with the audited financial statements presented therein.
Financial Statements
GAAP
 
(v)           . Subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, except as set forth in or contemplated thereby (exclusive of any amendments or supplements thereto subsequent to the date of this Agreement), (i) there has not occurred any material adverse change, or any development involving a prospective material adverse change, in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business or operations of the Company (a ""), (ii) there has not been and will not have been any change in the capitalization of the Company (other than in connection with the grant or exercise of options or other awards to purchase the Common Stock granted pursuant to the Company's stock incentive plans from the shares reserved therefor), (iii) the Company has not incurred and will not incur, except in the ordinary course of business as described in the General Disclosure Package, any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, (iv) the Company has not entered into and will not enter into, except in the ordinary course of business as described in the General Disclosure Package, any material transactions other than pursuant to this Agreement and the transactions referred to herein and (v) the Company has not and will not have paid or declared any dividends or other distributions of any kind on any class of its capital stock.
No Material Adverse Change in Business
Material Adverse Effect
 
(vi)          . The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, with corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; and is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business, except to the extent that the failure to be so qualified or be in good standing would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
Good Standing of the Company
 
(vii)         . The Company has no subsidiaries.
No Subsidiaries
 
(viii)     . The authorized, issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company is as set forth in the Prospectus (except for subsequent issuances, if any, pursuant to this Agreement, pursuant to reservations, agreements or employee, director and/or consultant benefit or equity incentive plans referred to in the Prospectus or pursuant to the exercise or conversion of convertible securities or options referred to in the Prospectus). The shares of issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable; the stockholders of the Company have no statutory, contractual preemptive or similar rights with respect to its Common Stock; none of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company are or will have been issued in violation of any statutory, contractual preemptive or similar rights of any security holder of the Company.
Capitalization
 
(ix)          . This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
Authorization of Agreement
 
(x)           . The Securities to be purchased by the Underwriters from the Company have been duly authorized for issuance and sale to the Underwriters pursuant to this Agreement and, when issued and delivered by the Company pursuant to this Agreement against payment of the consideration set forth herein, will be validly issued and fully paid and non-assessable; the Common Stock conforms
Authorization and Description of Securities
as to legal matters in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and such description conforms to the rights set forth in the instruments defining the same; no holder of the Securities will be subject to personal liability by reason of being such a holder; and the issuance of the Securities is not subject to any preemptive or other similar rights of any security holder of the Company that have not been validly waived.
 
(xi)          . The Company is not (i) in violation of its charter or by-laws or (ii) in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan or credit agreement, note, lease or other agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party or by which it may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company is subject (collectively, ""), except for any such violation or default that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; and the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein (including the issuance and sale of the Securities and the use of the proceeds from the sale of the Securities as described in the Prospectus under the caption "Use of Proceeds") and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action by the Company and do not and will not, whether with or without the giving of notice or passage of time or both, conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default or Repayment Event (as defined below) under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company pursuant to, the Agreements and Instruments, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the charter or by-laws of the Company or any applicable law, statute, rule, regulation, judgment, order, writ or decree of any government, government instrumentality or court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its assets, properties or operations, except for any such conflict, breach, violation or default that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. As used herein, a "" means any event or condition which gives the holder of any note, debenture or other evidence of indebtedness (or any person acting on such holder's behalf) the right to require the repurchase, redemption or repayment of all or a portion of such indebtedness by the Company.
Absence of Defaults and Conflicts
Agreements and Instruments
Repayment Event
 
(xii)         . No labor problem or dispute with the employees of the Company exist or, to the Company's knowledge, is threatened or imminent, except for any such labor problem or dispute that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Absence of Labor Dispute
 
(xiii)        . There are no legal or governmental proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, to which the Company is a party or to which any of the properties of the Company is subject (i) other than proceedings accurately described in all material respects in the General Disclosure Package and proceedings that would not have a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, taken as a whole, or, if determined adversely to the Company, would not materially and adversely affect the power or ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement or to consummate the transactions contemplated by the General Disclosure Package or (ii) that are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the General Disclosure Package and are not so described; and there are no statutes, regulations, contracts or other documents that are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the General Disclosure Package or to be filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement that are not described or filed as required.  The General Disclosure Package contains in all material respects the same description of the foregoing matters contained in the Prospectus.
Absence of Proceedings
 
(xiv)        .  The Company is subject to and in compliance in all material respects with the reporting requirements of Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the 1934 Act. The Common Stock is registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the 1934 Act and is listed on the Nasdaq Global Market, and the Company has taken no action designed to, or reasonably likely to have the effect of, terminating the registration of the Common Stock under the 1934 Act or delisting the Common Stock from the Nasdaq Global Market, nor has the Company received any notification that the Commission or the Nasdaq Stock Market LLC ("Nasdaq") is contemplating terminating such registration or listing. No consent, approval, authorization or order of, or filing, notification or registration with, the Nasdaq Global Market is required for the listing and trading of the Securities on the Nasdaq Global Market, except for (i) a Notification Form: Listing of Additional Shares and (ii) a Notification Form: Change in the Number of Shares Outstanding. The Company is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable corporate governance requirements set forth in the Nasdaq Marketplace Rules.
Nasdaq and 1934 Act
 
(xv)         . The Company owns, possesses or has valid, binding and enforceable rights to use the Company Intellectual Property (as defined below).  Except as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, (A)  the Company has not received any written notice, nor to the Company's knowledge, any other notice, of any infringement by the Company with respect to any Intellectual Property (as defined below) of any third party, (B) the discoveries, inventions, products or processes of the Company described in the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus do not, to the Company's knowledge, infringe or interfere with any right or valid patent claim of any third party, (C) the Company is not obligated to pay a royalty, grant a license or provide other consideration to any third party in connection with the Company Intellectual Property, (D) no third party has any ownership rights in or to any Company Intellectual Property.  All Company Intellectual Property consisting of patents and patent applications (the "") has been duly and properly filed; the Company is not aware of any facts required to be disclosed to the United States Patent and Trademark Office (the "") that were not disclosed to the PTO and which would preclude the grant of a patent for the Company Patents; and the Company is not aware of any facts which would preclude it from having clear title to the Company Patents that have been identified by the Company as being owned by the Company.  For purposes of this Agreement, "" means patents, patent rights, trademarks, servicemarks, trade dress rights, copyrights, trade names and domain names, and all registrations and applications for each of the foregoing, trade secrets, know-how (including other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures), inventions and technology, and "" means Intellectual Property that is reasonably necessary or used in any material respect to conduct the business of the Company, as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
Possession of Intellectual Property
Company Patents
PTO
Intellectual Property
Company Intellectual Property
 
(xvi)        .  No approval of the shareholders of the Company under the rules and regulations of Nasdaq is required for the Company to issue and deliver to the Underwriters the Securities.
No Shareholder Approval Required
 
(xvii)       . No consent, approval, authorization or order of, or any filing or declaration with, any court or governmental agency or body is required for the consummation by the Company of the transactions on its part contemplated herein, including the offering and sale of the Securities, except such as have been obtained or as may be required under the 1933 Act, the 1933 Act Regulations, state securities laws or the rules and regulations of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. ("") or The Nasdaq Stock Market.
Absence of Further Requirements
FINRA
 
(xviii)      . The Company has not taken, nor will the Company take, directly or indirectly, any action which is designed to or which has constituted or which would be expected to cause or result in stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Securities.
Absence of Manipulation
 
(xix)        . The Company possesses all certificates, authorizations, registrations, permits, licenses, approvals and consents (collectively, "") issued by the appropriate federal, state, local or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business of the Company as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, including without limitation, all such certificates, authorizations, registrations, permits, licenses, approvals and consents required by the United States Food and Drug Administration (the ""), the United States Drug Enforcement Administration or any other federal, state, local or foreign agencies or bodies engaged in the regulation of clinical trials, pharmaceuticals, biologics or biohazardous substances or materials, except where the failure so to possess such Governmental Licenses would not, singly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; the Company is in compliance with the terms and conditions of all such Governmental Licenses, except where the failure so to comply would not, singly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; all of the Governmental Licenses are valid and in full force and effect, except when the invalidity of such Governmental Licenses or the failure of such Governmental Licenses to be in full force and effect would not, singly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; and the Company has not received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such Governmental Licenses which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would have a Material Adverse Effect. To the extent required by applicable laws and regulations of the FDA, the Company has submitted to the FDA an Investigational New Drug Application or amendment or supplement thereto for each clinical trial it has conducted or sponsored or is conducting or sponsoring, all such
Possession of Licenses and Permits
Governmental Licenses
FDA
submissions were in material compliance with applicable laws and rules and regulations when submitted and no material deficiencies have been asserted by the FDA with respect to any such submissions.
 
(xx)         . The Company has operated and currently is in compliance in all material respects with the United States Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, all applicable rules and regulations of the FDA and other federal, state, local and foreign governmental bodies exercising comparable authority. The preclinical studies and tests and clinical trials conducted by or on behalf of the Company that are described in the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus were, and, if still pending, are being, conducted in all material respects in accordance with experimental protocols, procedures and controls pursuant to, where applicable, accepted professional and scientific standards for products or product candidates comparable to those being developed by the Company; the descriptions of such studies, tests and trials, and the results thereof, conducted by or on behalf of the Company contained in the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus are accurate and complete in all material respects; the Company is not aware of any tests, studies or trials not described or referred to in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, the results of which reasonably call into question the results of the tests, studies and trials described or referred to in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; and the Company has not received any notice or correspondence from the FDA or any foreign, state or local governmental body exercising comparable authority, or any Institutional Review Board or comparable authority requiring the termination, suspension, clinical hold or material modification of any tests, studies or trials, which termination, suspension or clinical hold or material modification would have a Material Adverse Effect.
Preclinical Studies and Tests and Clinical Trials
 
(xxi)        . The Company has good and marketable title to all real property owned by the Company and good title to all other properties owned by it that are material to the business of the Company, in each case, free and clear of all mortgages, pledges, liens, security interests, claims, restrictions or encumbrances of any kind except such as (a) are described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus or (b) do not singly or in the aggregate, materially affect the value of such property and do not materially interfere with the use made and proposed to be made of such property by the Company; and all of the leases and subleases material to the business of the Company and under which the Company holds properties described in the General Disclosure Package or the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, are in full force and effect, and, except as described in the Prospectus, the Company has no notice of any material claim of any sort that has been asserted by anyone adverse to the rights of the Company under any of the leases or subleases mentioned above, or affecting or questioning the rights of the Company to the continued possession of the leased or subleased premises under any such lease or sublease.
Title to Property
 
(xxii)       . The Company is not required, and upon the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated and the application of the net proceeds therefrom as described in the Prospectus will not be required, to register as an "investment company" under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "1940 Act").
Investment Company Act
 
(xxiii)      . The Company (a) is in compliance with any and all applicable federal, state, local and foreign laws, rules, regulations, decisions and orders relating to the protection of human health and safety, the environment or hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants (collectively, ""); (b) has received and is in compliance with all permits, licenses or other approvals required of it under applicable Environmental Laws to conduct its business; and (c) has not received notice of any actual or potential liability for the investigation or remediation of any disposal or release of hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants, except in each case would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Environmental Laws
Environmental Laws
 
(xxiv)     . There are no persons with rights to have any securities registered pursuant to the Registration Statement, which rights have not been waived or complied with, nor, except as set forth in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, are there any persons with rights to have any securities otherwise registered by the Company under the 1933 Act.
Registration Rights
 
(xxv)     
Accounting Controls and Disclosure Controls.
 
(A)
      
The Company maintains a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances that (w) transactions are executed in accordance with
management's general or specific authorization; (x) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and to maintain accountability for assets; (y) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (z) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. Except as described in the Prospectus, since the end of the Company's most recent audited fiscal year, there has been (1) no material weakness in the Company's internal control over financial reporting (whether or not remediated) and (2) no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
 
(B)
      
The Company employs disclosure controls and procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the 1934 Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, and is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management, including its principal executive officer or officers and the principal financial officer or officers, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding disclosure.
 
(xxvi)       Solely to the extent that the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission and the Nasdaq Global Market thereunder ("") has been applicable to the Company, there is and has been no failure on the part of the Company or any of the Company's directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply in all material respects with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, including Section 402 related to loans and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
Compliance with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
 
(xxvii)    . Except as disclosed in writing to the Representatives, neither the Company nor, to the Company's knowledge, the Company's officers, directors or affiliates (within the meaning of FINRA Conduct Rule 2720(f)), directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, or is an associated person (within the meaning of Article I, paragraph (ff) of the By-laws of FINRA) of any member firm of FINRA.
FINRA Matters
 
(xxviii)   . The Company has filed all United States federal income tax returns that have been required to be filed and has paid all taxes shown thereon or otherwise assessed, which are due and payable, except assessments against which appeals have been or will be promptly taken and as to which adequate reserves have been provided. The Company has filed all other tax returns that are required to have been filed by it pursuant to applicable state, local or foreign law, except insofar as the failure to file such returns would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and has paid all taxes shown thereon or otherwise assessed, which are due and payable, except assessments against which appeals have been or will be promptly taken and as to which adequate reserves have been provided.  The Company has no tax deficiency that has been or, to the best knowledge of the Company, might be asserted or threatened against it that could have a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Taxes
 
(xxix)     . The Company carries or is entitled to the benefits of insurance, with financially sound and reputable insurers, in such amounts and covering such risks as are appropriate in the judgment of management to protect the Company and its business, and all such insurance is in full force and effect. The Company has no reason to believe that it will not be able (a) to renew its existing insurance coverage as and when such policies expire or (b) to obtain comparable coverage from similar institutions as may be necessary or appropriate to conduct its business as now conducted and at a cost that would not have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company has not been denied any insurance coverage which it has sought or for which it has applied.
Insurance
 
(xxx)      . Any statistical and market-related data included in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus are based on or derived from sources that the Company believes to be reliable and accurate, and, to the extent required by such sources, the Company has obtained the written consent to the use of such data from such sources.
Statistical and Market-Related Data
(xxxi)     . Neither the Company nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee, affiliate or other person acting on behalf of the Company is aware of or has taken any action, directly or indirectly, that would result in a violation by such persons of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (the ""), including, without limitation, making use of the mails or any means or instrumentality of interstate commerce corruptly in furtherance of an offer, payment, promise to pay or authorization of the payment of any money, or other property, gift, promise to give, or authorization of the giving of anything of value to any "foreign official" (as such term is defined in the FCPA) or any foreign political party or official thereof or any candidate for foreign political office, in contravention of the FCPA; and the Company, and, to the knowledge of the Company, its affiliates have conducted their businesses in compliance with the FCPA, and have instituted and maintain policies and procedures designed to ensure, and which are reasonably expected to continue to ensure, continued compliance therewith.
Foreign Corrupt Practices Act
FCPA
 
(xxxii)    . The operations of the Company are and have been conducted at all times in material compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, the money laundering statutes of all applicable jurisdictions, the rules and regulations thereunder and any related or similar rules, regulations or guidelines, issued, administered or enforced by any governmental agency (collectively, the ""), and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator involving the Company with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened.
Money Laundering Laws
Money Laundering Laws
 
(xxxiii)   . Neither the Company nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee, affiliate or person acting on behalf of the Company is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Treasury Department (""); and the Company will not directly or indirectly use the proceeds of the offering, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any subsidiary, joint venture partner or other person or entity, for the purpose of financing the activities of any person currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC.
OFAC
OFAC
 
(xxxiv)   . The Company has (i) orally, to the Underwriters or to counsel to the Underwriters, fairly summarized in all material respects the substance of all of its material communications with representatives of the FDA; and (ii) no knowledge of any pending communication from the FDA, that would cause the Company to revise its strategy for seeking marketing approval from the FDA for ARQ 197 or any of the Company's other products under development as described in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
Regulatory Status
 
(xxxv)    . No forward-looking statement (within the meaning of Section 27A of the 1933 Act and Section 21E of the 1934 Act) contained in either the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus has been made or reaffirmed without a reasonable basis or has been disclosed other than in good faith.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
(b)           . Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company delivered to the Representatives or to counsel for the Underwriters shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company to each Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby.
Officer's Certificates
 
Section 2.      .
Sale and Delivery to Underwriters; Closing
 
(a)           . On the basis of the representations and warranties herein contained and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to sell to each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, and each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, agrees to purchase from the Company, at the price per share set forth in , the number of Initial Securities set forth in opposite the name of such Underwriter, plus any additional number of Initial Securities which such Underwriter may become obligated to purchase pursuant to the provisions of Section 10 hereof.
Initial Securities
Schedule B
Schedule A
 
(b)           . In addition, on the basis of the representations and warranties herein contained and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company hereby grants an option to the Underwriters, severally and not jointly, to purchase up to an additional 1,050,000 shares of Common Stock, at the price per share
Option Securities
 
set forth in , less an amount per share equal to any dividends or distributions declared by the Company and payable on the Initial Securities but not payable on the Option Securities. The option hereby granted will expire 30 days after the date hereof and may be exercised in whole or in part from time to time only for the purpose of covering overallotments which may be made in connection with the offering and distribution of the Initial Securities upon notice by the Representatives to the Company setting forth the number of Option Securities as to which the several Underwriters are then exercising the option and the time and date of payment and delivery for such Option Securities. Any such time and date of delivery (a "") shall be determined by the Representatives, but shall not be later than seven full business days after the exercise of said option, nor in any event prior to the Closing Time, as hereinafter defined. If the option is exercised as to all or any portion of the Option Securities, each of the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, will purchase that proportion of the total number of Option Securities then being purchased which the number of Initial Securities set forth in opposite the name of such Underwriter bears to the total number of Initial Securities, subject in each case to such adjustments as the Representatives in their discretion shall make to eliminate any sales or purchases of fractional shares.
Schedule B
Date of Delivery
Schedule A
 
(c)
                                 
Payment
. Payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of certificates for, the Initial Securities shall be made at the offices of Edwards Angell Palmer & Dodge LLP, 111 Huntington Avenue, Boston, Massachusetts 02199, or at such other place as shall be agreed upon by the Representatives and the Company, at 9:00 A.M. (Eastern time) on the fourth (third, if the pricing occurs before 4:30 P.M. (Eastern time) on any given day) business day after the date hereof (unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of Section 10), or such other time not later than ten business days after such date as shall be agreed upon by the Representatives and the Company (such time and date of payment and delivery being herein called "").
Closing Time
 
In addition, in the event that any or all of the Option Securities are purchased by the Underwriters, payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of certificates for, such Option Securities shall be made at the above-mentioned offices, or at such other place as shall be agreed upon by the Representatives and the Company, on each Date of Delivery as specified in the notice from the Representatives to the Company.
 
Payment shall be made to the Company by wire transfer of immediately available funds to a bank account designated by the Company against delivery to the Representatives for the respective accounts of the Underwriters of certificates for the Securities to be purchased by them. It is understood that each Underwriter has authorized the Representatives, for its account, to accept delivery of, receipt for, and make payment of the purchase price for, the Initial Securities and the Option Securities, if any, which it has agreed to purchase. Subject to Section 10, Leerink Swann or LCM, individually and not as representative of the Underwriters, may (but shall not be obligated to) make payment of the purchase price for the Initial Securities or the Option Securities, if any, to be purchased by any Underwriter whose funds have not been received by the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, as the case may be, but such payment shall not relieve such Underwriter from its obligations hereunder.
 
(d)
                                
Denominations; Registration
. Certificates for the Initial Securities and the Option Securities, if any, shall be in such denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request in writing at least one full business day before the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, as the case may be. The certificates for the Initial Securities and the Option Securities, if any, will be made available for examination and packaging by the Representatives in The City of Boston not later than 10:00 A.M. (Eastern time) on the business day prior to the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, as the case may be.
 
Section 3.
                   
Covenants of the Company
. The Company covenants with each Underwriter as follows:
 
(a)
                                 
Compliance with Securities Regulations and Commission Requests
. The Company, subject to Section 3(b), will comply with the requirements of Rule 430B, and will notify the Representatives immediately, and confirm the notice in writing, (i) when any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement shall become effective, or any supplement to the Prospectus or any amended Prospectus shall have been filed, (ii) of the receipt of any comments from the Commission, (iii) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or any document incorporated by reference therein or otherwise deemed to be a part thereof or for additional information, (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of any order preventing or suspending the use of any preliminary prospectus, or of the suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or of the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for any of such purposes or of any
 
examination pursuant to Section 8(e) of the 1933 Act concerning the Registration Statement and (v) if the Company becomes the subject of a proceeding under Section 8A of the 1933 Act in connection with the offering of the Securities. The Company will effect the filings required under Rule 424(b), in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8)), and will take such steps as it deems necessary to ascertain promptly whether the form of prospectus transmitted for filing under Rule 424(b) was received for filing by the Commission and, in the event that it was not, it will promptly file such prospectus. The Company will make every reasonable effort to prevent the issuance of any stop order and, if any stop order is issued, to obtain the lifting thereof at the earliest possible moment.
 
(b)
                                
Filing of Amendments and Exchange Act Documents
. The Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to file or prepare any amendment to the Registration Statement (including any filing under Rule 462(b)) or any amendment, supplement or revision to either any preliminary prospectus (including any prospectus included in the Registration Statement at the time it became effective) or to the Prospectus, and will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such documents a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing or use, as the case may be, and will not file or use any such document to which the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters shall object. The Company has given the Representatives notice of any filings made pursuant to the 1934 Act or the 1934 Act Regulations within 48 hours prior to the Applicable Time; the Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to make any such filing from the Applicable Time to the Closing Time and will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such documents a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing, as the case may be, and will not file or use any such document to which the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters shall object.
 
(c)
                                 
Delivery of Registration Statements
. The Company has furnished or will deliver to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters, without charge, signed copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (including exhibits filed therewith ) and signed copies of all consents and certificates of experts, and will also deliver to the Representatives, without charge, a conformed copy of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (without exhibits) for each of the Underwriters. The copies of the Registration Statement and each amendment thereto furnished to the Underwriters will be identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
 
(d)
                                
Delivery of Prospectuses
. The Company has delivered to each Underwriter, without charge, as many copies of each preliminary prospectus as such Underwriter reasonably requested, and the Company hereby consents to the use of such copies for purposes permitted by the 1933 Act. The Company will furnish to each Underwriter, without charge, during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act, such number of copies of the Prospectus (as amended or supplemented) as such Underwriter may reasonably request. The Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto furnished to the Underwriters will be identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
 
(e)
                                 
Continued Compliance with Securities Laws
. The Company will comply with the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1934 Act and 1934 Act Regulations so as to permit the completion of the distribution of the Securities as contemplated in this Agreement and in the Prospectus. If at any time when a prospectus is required by the 1933 Act to be delivered in connection with sales of the Securities, any event shall occur or condition shall exist as a result of which it is necessary, in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters or for the Company, to amend the Registration Statement or amend or supplement the Prospectus in order that the Prospectus will not include any untrue statements of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances existing at the time it is delivered to a purchaser, or if it shall be necessary, in the opinion of such counsel, at any such time to amend the Registration Statement or amend or supplement the Prospectus in order to comply with the requirements of the 1933 Act or the 1933 Act Regulations, the Company will promptly prepare and file with the Commission, subject to Section 3(b), such amendment or supplement as may be necessary to correct such statement or omission or to make the Registration Statement or the Prospectus comply with such requirements, and the Company will furnish to the Underwriters such number of copies of such amendment or supplement as the Underwriters may reasonably request. If at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the
 
information contained in the Registration Statement relating to the Securities or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances, prevailing at that subsequent time, not misleading, the Company will promptly notify the Representatives and will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict, untrue statement or omission.
 
(f)
                                   
Blue Sky Qualifications
. The Company will use its best efforts, in cooperation with the Underwriters, to qualify the Securities for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions (domestic or foreign) as the Representatives may designate and to maintain such qualifications in effect for a period of not less than one year from the later of the effective date of the Registration Statement and any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement; provided, however, that the Company shall not be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign corporation or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to subject itself to taxation in respect of doing business in any jurisdiction in which it is not otherwise so subject.
 
(g)
                                
Rule 158
. The Company will timely file such reports pursuant to the 1934 Act as are necessary in order to make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable an earnings statement for the purposes of, and to provide to the Underwriters the benefits contemplated by, the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act.
 
(h)
                                
Use of Proceeds
. The Company will use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities in substantially the manner specified in the Prospectus under "Use of Proceeds."
 
(i)
                                    
Listing
. The Company will use its best efforts to effect and maintain the listing of the Securities on the Nasdaq Global Market.
 
(j)
                                    
Restriction on Sale of Securities
. For the period specified below (the ""), the Company will not, directly or indirectly, take any of the following actions with respect to its Common Stock or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for its Common Stock (""): (i) offer, sell, issue, contract to sell, pledge or otherwise dispose of, Lock-Up Securities, (ii) offer, sell, issue, contract to sell, contract to purchase or grant any option, right or warrant to purchase Lock-Up Securities, (iii) enter into any swap, hedge or any other agreement that transfers, in whole or in part, the economic consequences of ownership of Lock-Up Securities, (iv) establish or increase a put equivalent position or liquidate or decrease a call equivalent position in Lock-Up Securities within the meaning of Section 16 of the 1934 Act or (v) file with the Commission a registration statement under the 1933 Act (other than a registration statement on Form S-8 (a ""), and the Company shall notify Leerink Swann and LCM prior to filing such a Form S-8) relating to Lock-Up Securities, or publicly disclose the intention to take any such action, without the prior written consent of Leerink Swann and LCM, except (a) the Securities to be sold hereunder, (b) the issuance by the Company of shares of Lock-Up Securities upon the exercise of an option or warrant or the conversion of a security outstanding on the date hereof of which the Representatives have been advised in writing or (c) the issuance of stock options and other stock-based awards (or the issuance of shares of Common Stock upon exercise thereof) to eligible participants pursuant to stock incentive plans of the Company described in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus. The initial Lock-Up Period will commence on the date hereof and continue for ninety (90) days after the date of the commencement of the public offering of the Securities or such earlier date that Leerink Swann and LCM consent to in writing.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, if (A) during the last 17 days of the initial 90-day Lock-Up Period, the Company issues an earnings release or material news or a material event relating to the Company occurs; or (B) prior to the expiration of the initial 90-day Lock-Up Period, the Company announces that it will release earnings results during the 16-day period beginning on the last day of the 90-day period, the Lock-Up Period shall continue until the expiration of the 18-day period beginning on the issuance of the earnings release or the occurrence of the material news or material event.  The Company shall promptly notify the Representatives of any earnings release, news or event that may give rise to an extension of the initial 90-day Lock-Up Period.
Lock-Up Period
Lock-Up Securities
Form S-8
 
(k)
                                 
Reporting Requirements
. The Company, during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act, will file all documents required to be filed with the Commission pursuant to the 1934 Act within the time periods required by the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
 
(l)
                                    
Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses
. The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Representatives, and each Underwriter represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Company and the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 405, required to be filed with the Commission. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Representatives or by the Company and the Representatives, as the case may be, is hereinafter referred to as a "." The Company represents that it has treated and agrees that it will treat each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, and has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission where required, legending and record keeping.
Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
 
Section 4.
                   
Payment of Expenses
.
 
(a)
                                 
Expenses
. The Company will pay or cause to be paid all expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (i) the preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statement (including financial statements and exhibits) as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (ii) the preparation, printing and delivery to the Underwriters of this Agreement, any Agreement among Underwriters and such other documents as may be required in connection with the offering, purchase, sale, issuance or delivery of the Securities, (iii) the preparation, issuance and delivery of the certificates for the Securities to the Underwriters, including any stock or other transfer taxes and any stamp or other duties payable upon the sale, issuance or delivery of the Securities to the Underwriters, (iv) the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel, accountants and other advisors, (v) the qualification of the Securities under securities laws in accordance with the provisions of Section 3(f) hereof, including filing fees and the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters in connection therewith and in connection with the preparation of the Blue Sky Survey and any supplement thereto, (vi) the printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of each preliminary prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus and of the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto and any costs associated with electronic delivery of any of the foregoing by the Underwriters to investors, (vii) the preparation, printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of the Blue Sky Survey and any supplement thereto, (viii) the fees and expenses of any transfer agent or registrar for the Securities, (ix) the costs and expenses of the Company relating to investor presentations on any "road show" undertaken in connection with the marketing of the Securities, including without limitation, expenses associated with the production of road show slides and graphics, fees and expenses of any consultants engaged in connection with the road show presentations, travel and lodging expenses of the representatives and officers of the Company and any such consultants, and the cost of aircraft and other transportation chartered in connection with the road show, (x) the filing fees incident to, and the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel to the Underwriters in connection with, the review by FINRA of the terms of the sale of the Securities, (xi) the fees and expenses incurred in connection with the listing of the Securities on the Nasdaq Global Market, and (xii) the costs and expenses (including without limitation any damages or other amounts payable in connection with legal or contractual liability) associated with the reforming of any contracts for sale of the Securities made by the Underwriter caused by a breach of the representation contained in the third paragraph of Section 1(a)(i).  It is understood that, subject to this Section and Section 4(b) hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their costs and expenses, including fees and disbursements of their counsel not payable by the Company pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
(b)
                                
Termination of Agreement
. If this Agreement is terminated by the Representatives in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 or Section 9(a)(i) hereof, the Company shall reimburse the Underwriters for all of their accountable out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters.
 
Section 5.
                   
Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations
. The obligations of the several Underwriters hereunder are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the Company contained in Section 1 hereof and in certificates of any officer of the Company delivered pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its covenants and other obligations hereunder that are required to be performed or satisfied by it at or prior to the Closing Time, and to the following further conditions:
 
(a)
                                 
Effectiveness of Registration Statement
. The Registration Statement, including any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, has become effective and at the Closing Time no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued under the 1933 Act or proceedings therefor initiated or threatened by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of counsel to the Underwriters. A prospectus containing the Rule 430B Information shall have been filed with the Commission in the manner and within the time frame required by Rule 424(b) without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8) or a post-effective amendment providing such information shall have been filed and declared effective in accordance with the requirements of Rule 430B.
 
(b)
                                
Opinion of Counsel for the Company
. At the Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received the favorable opinion and negative assurance letter, dated as of the Closing Time, of (i) Arnold & Porter LLP, counsel for the Company, (ii) Mintz, Levin Cohn Ferris Glovsky and Popeo, PC, intellectual property counsel to the Company, and (iii) Sunstein Kann Murphy & Timbers LLP, intellectual property counsel to the Company, each in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters, together with signed or reproduced copies of such letters for each of the other Underwriters with respect to such matters as the Representatives may reasonably request.
 
(c)
                                 
Opinion of Counsel for Underwriters
. At Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received the favorable opinion and negative assurance letter, dated as of the Closing Time, of Edwards Angell Palmer & Dodge LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, together with signed or reproduced copies of such letter for each of the other Underwriters with respect to such matters as the Representatives may reasonably request.
 
(d)
                                
Officers' Certificate
. At Closing Time, there shall not have been, since the date hereof or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus or the General Disclosure Package, any Material Adverse Effect, and the Representatives shall have received a certificate of the President or another executive officer of the Company and of the principal financial or principal accounting officer of the Company, dated as of Closing Time, to the effect that (i) there has been no such Material Adverse Effect, (ii) the representations and warranties in Section 1(a) hereof are true and correct with the same force and effect as though expressly made at and as of Closing Time, (iii) the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to Closing Time, and (iv) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to their knowledge, contemplated by the Commission.
 
(e)
                                 
Accountant's Comfort Letter
. At the time of the execution of this Agreement, the Representatives shall have received from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP a letter dated such date, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives and PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, together with signed or reproduced copies of such letter for each of the other Underwriters containing statements and information of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
 
(f)
                                   
Bring-down Comfort Letter
. At Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP a letter, dated as of Closing Time, to the effect that they reaffirm the statements made in the letter furnished pursuant to subsection (e) of this Section, except that the specified date referred to shall be a date not more than three business days prior to Closing Time.
 
(g)
                                
Approval of Listing
. At Closing Time, the Securities shall have been approved for inclusion in the NASDAQ Global Market, subject only to official notice of issuance.
 
(h)
                                
Lock-up Agreements
. At the date of this Agreement, the Representatives shall have received a lock-up agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives signed by the persons listed on hereto.
Schedule C
 
(i)
                                    
No Objection
. FINRA shall not have raised any objection with respect to the fairness and reasonableness of the underwriting terms and arrangements.
 
(j)
                                    
Conditions to Purchase of Option Securities
. In the event that the Underwriters exercise their option provided in Section 2(b) hereof to purchase all or any portion of the Option Securities, the representations and warranties of the Company contained herein and the statements in any certificates furnished by the Company shall be true and correct as of each Date of Delivery and, at the relevant Date of Delivery, the Representatives shall have received:
 
(i)
                                    
Officers' Certificate
. A certificate, dated such Date of Delivery, of the President or another executive officer of the Company and of the principal financial or principal accounting officer of the Company confirming that the certificate delivered at the Closing Time pursuant to Section 5(d) hereof remains true and correct as of such Date of Delivery.
 
(ii)
                                 
Opinion of Counsel for Company
. The favorable opinion and negative assurance letter of (a) Arnold & Porter LLP, counsel for the Company, (b) Mintz, Levin Cohn Ferris Glovsky and Popeo, PC, intellectual property counsel to the Company, and (c) Sunstein Kann Murphy & Timbers LLP, intellectual property counsel to the Company, each dated such Date of Delivery, relating to the Option Securities to be purchased on such Date of Delivery and otherwise to the same effect as the opinions required by Section 5(b).
 
(iii)
                              
Opinion of Counsel for Underwriters
. The favorable opinion and negative assurance letter of Edwards Angell Palmer & Dodge LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, dated such Date of Delivery, relating to the Option Securities to be purchased on such Date of Delivery and otherwise to the same effect as the opinion required by Section 5(c) hereof.
 
(iv)
                             
Bring-down Comfort Letter
. A letter from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives and PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP and dated such Date of Delivery, substantially in the same form and substance as the letter furnished to the Representatives pursuant to Section 5(f) hereof, except that the "specified date" in the letter furnished pursuant to this paragraph shall be a date not more than five days prior to such Date of Delivery.
 
(k)
                                 
Additional Documents
. At Closing Time and at each Date of Delivery counsel for the Underwriters shall have been furnished with such documents and opinions as they may require for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated, or in order to evidence the accuracy of any of the representations or warranties, or the fulfillment of any of the conditions, herein contained; and all proceedings taken by the Company in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters.
 
(l)
                                    
Termination of Agreement
. If any condition specified in this Section shall not have been fulfilled when and as required to be fulfilled, this Agreement, or, in the case of any condition to the purchase of Option Securities on a Date of Delivery which is after the Closing Time, the obligations of the several Underwriters to purchase the relevant Option Securities, may be terminated by the Representatives by notice to the Company at any time at or prior to Closing Time or such Date of Delivery, as the case may be, and such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 and except that Sections 1, 6, 7 and 8 shall survive any such termination and remain in full force and effect.
 
Section 6.
                   
Indemnification
.
 
(a)
                                 
Indemnification of Underwriters
. The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, each of its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the 1933 Act (each, an ""), and each of its and their respective directors, officers, members, employees, representatives and agents (including, without limitation Lazard Frres & Co. LLC, (which will provide services to LCM) and its affiliates, and each of its and their respective directors, officers, members, employees, representatives and agents and each person, if any, who controls Lazard Frres & Co. LLC within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act) and each person, if any, who controls such Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act of or Section 20 of the 1934 Act as follows:
Affiliate
 
(i)
                                    
against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430B Information or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact included in any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
 
(ii)
                                 
against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission; provided that (subject to Section 6(d) below) any such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company; and
 
(iii)
                              
against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including the fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by the Representatives), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under (i) or (ii) above;
 
provided
, , that this indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, liability, claim, damage or expense to the extent, but only to the extent, arising out of any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430B Information, or any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
however
 
(b)
                                
Indemnification of Company, Directors and Officers
. Each Underwriter severally agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, its directors, each of its officers who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense described in the indemnity contained in Section 6(a) above, as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430B Information or any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein; provided, however, that the obligation of each Underwriter to indemnify the Company (including any controlling person, director or officer thereof) shall be limited to the net proceeds received by the Company from such Underwriter.
 
(c)
                                 
Actions against Parties; Notification
. Each indemnified party shall give notice as promptly as reasonably practicable to each indemnifying party of any action commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve such indemnifying party from any liability hereunder to the extent it is not materially prejudiced as a result thereof and in any event shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than on account of this indemnity agreement. In the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(a) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the Representatives and, in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(b) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the Company. An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of any such action and, to the extent it shall elect, jointly with any other indemnifying party, assume the defense thereof, with counsel reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified parties; , , that counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party. In no event shall the indemnifying parties be liable for fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to any local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances; , , that after notice from the indemnifying party to an indemnified party that the indemnifying party has elected to assume the defense of any action, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to
provided
however
provided
further
however
 
such indemnified party for any legal fees or expenses of any other counsel or any other expenses, in each case subsequently incurred by such indemnified party, in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. The indemnified party will have the right to employ its own counsel in any such action, but the fees, expenses and other charges of such counsel will be at the expense of such indemnified party unless (i) the employment of counsel by the indemnified party has been authorized in writing by the indemnifying party, (ii) the named parties to any such proceeding (including any impleaded parties) include both the indemnifying party and the indemnified party and representation of both parties by the same counsel would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between them (in which case the indemnifying party will not have the right to direct the defense of such action on behalf of the indemnified party), or (iii) the indemnifying party has not in fact employed counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party to assume the defense of such action within a reasonable time after receiving notice of the commencement of the action, in each of which cases the reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of counsel will be at the expense of the indemnifying party or parties.  No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified parties, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever in respect of which indemnification or contribution could be sought under this Section 6 or Section 7 hereof (whether or not the indemnified parties are actual or potential parties thereto), unless such settlement, compromise or consent (x) includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such litigation, investigation, proceeding or claim and (y) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
 
(d)
                                
Settlement without Consent if Failure to Reimburse
. If at any time an indemnified party shall have requested an indemnifying party to reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel to which it is entitled hereunder, such indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of the nature contemplated by Section 6(a)(ii) effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 45 days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the aforesaid request, (ii) such indemnifying party shall have received notice of the terms of such settlement at least 30 days prior to such settlement being entered into and (iii) such indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed such indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement (other than with respect to fees and expenses that the indemnifying party is contesting in good faith).
 
Section 7.
                   
Contribution
. If the indemnification provided for in Section 6 hereof is for any reason unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount of such losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by such indemnified party, as incurred, (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other hand from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and of the Underwriters on the other hand in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations.
 
The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other hand in connection with the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total net proceeds from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the total underwriting discount received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus bear to the aggregate initial public offering price of the Securities as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus.
 
The relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other hand shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether any such untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or by the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
 
The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 7 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Section 7. The aggregate amount of losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by an indemnified party and referred to above in this Section 7 shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
 
Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
 
No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
 
For purposes of this Section 7, each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act and each Underwriter's Affiliates and selling agents shall have the same rights to contribution as such Underwriter, and each director of the Company, each officer of the Company who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company. The Underwriters' respective obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 7 are several in proportion to the number of Initial Securities set forth opposite their respective names in hereto and not joint.
Schedule A
 
Section 8.
                   
Representations, Warranties and Agreements to Survive
. All representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement or in certificates of officers of the Company submitted pursuant hereto, shall remain operative and in full force and effect regardless of (i) any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or its Affiliates or selling agents, any person controlling any Underwriter, its officers or directors, or any person controlling the Company and (ii) delivery of and payment for the Securities.
 
Section 9.
                   
Termination of Agreement
.
 
(a)
                                 
Termination; General
. The Representatives may terminate this Agreement, by notice to the Company, at any time at or prior to Closing Time (i) if there has been, since the time of execution of this Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus or General Disclosure Package, any Material Adverse Effect, which, in the reasonable judgment of the Representatives is material and adverse and makes it impractical or inadvisable to market the Securities, (ii) if there has occurred any material adverse change in the financial markets in the United States or the international financial markets, any outbreak of hostilities or escalation thereof or other calamity or crisis or any change or development involving a prospective change in national or international political, financial or economic conditions, in each case the effect of which is such as to make it, in the judgment of the Representatives, impracticable or inadvisable to market the Securities or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Securities, or (iii) if trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended or materially limited by the Commission or the NASDAQ Global Market, or if trading generally on the American Stock Exchange or the New York Stock Exchange or in the NASDAQ Global Market has been suspended or materially limited, or minimum or maximum prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices have been required, by any of said exchanges or by such system or by order of the Commission, FINRA or any other governmental authority, or (iv) a material disruption has occurred in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States, or (v) if a banking moratorium has been declared by either Federal or New York authorities.
 
(b)
                                
Liabilities
. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to this Section, such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 hereof, and provided further that Sections 1, 6, 7 and 8 shall survive such termination and remain in full force and effect.
 
(c)
                                 
Termination of Lock-Up Agreements and Non-distribution Agreements.
In the event this Agreement is terminated for any reason, the Representatives shall contemporaneously terminate or waive in their entirety the agreements referred to in Section 5(h).
 
Section 10.
             
Default by One or More of the Underwriters
. If one or more of the Underwriters shall fail at Closing Time or a Date of Delivery to purchase the Securities which it or they are obligated to purchase under this Agreement (the ""), the Representatives shall have the right, within 24 hours thereafter, to make arrangements for one or more of the non-defaulting Underwriters, or any other underwriters, to purchase all, but not less than all, of the Defaulted Securities in such amounts as may be agreed upon and upon the terms herein set forth; if, however, the Representatives shall not have completed such arrangements within such 24-hour period, then:
Defaulted Securities
 
(i)
                                    
if the number of Defaulted Securities does not exceed 10% of the number of Securities to be purchased on such date, each of the non-defaulting Underwriters shall be obligated, severally and not jointly, to purchase the full amount thereof in the proportions that their respective underwriting obligations hereunder bear to the underwriting obligations of all non-defaulting Underwriters, or
 
(ii)
                                 
if the number of Defaulted Securities exceeds 10% of the number of Securities to be purchased on such date, this Agreement or, with respect to any Date of Delivery which occurs after the Closing Time, the obligation of the Underwriters to purchase and of the Company to sell the Option Securities to be purchased and sold on such Date of Delivery shall terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter.
 
No action taken pursuant to this Section shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of its default.
 
In the event of any such default which does not result in a termination of this Agreement or, in the case of a Date of Delivery which is after the Closing Time, which does not result in a termination of the obligation of the Underwriters to purchase and the Company to sell the relevant Option Securities, as the case may be, either the (i) Representatives or (ii) the Company shall have the right to postpone Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, as the case may be, for a period not exceeding seven days in order to effect any required changes in the Registration Statement or Prospectus or in any other documents or arrangements. As used herein, the term "" includes any person substituted for an Underwriter under this Section 10.
Underwriter
 
Section 11.
             
Tax Disclosure
. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, immediately upon commencement of discussions with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby, the Company (and each employee, representative or other agent of the Company) may disclose to any and all persons, without limitation of any kind, the tax treatment and tax structure of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to the Company relating to such tax treatment and tax structure. For purposes of the foregoing, the term "" is the purported or claimed federal income tax treatment of the transactions contemplated hereby, and the term "" includes any fact that may be relevant to understanding the purported or claimed federal income tax treatment of the transactions contemplated hereby.
tax treatment
tax structure
 
Section 12.
             
Notices
. All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to the Underwriters shall be directed to the Representatives, c/o Leerink Swann LLC, One Federal Street, 37th Floor, Boston, MA 02110 and c/o Lazard Capital Markets LLC, 30 Rockefeller Plaza, New York, New York 10020, with copies to (i) Timothy A.G. Gerhold, Leerink Swann LLC, One Federal Street, 37th Floor, Boston, MA 02110, (ii) Winston Kitchingham, Lazard Capital Markets LLC, 30 Rockefeller Plaza, New York, New York, 10020, and (iii) Edwards Angell Palmer & Dodge LLP, 111 Huntington Avenue, Boston, MA 02199, Attention: William C. Hicks, Esq.; notices to the Company shall be directed to it at ArQule, Inc., 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801-5140, Attention: President and Chief Operating Officer, with a copy to Arnold & Porter LLP, 555 12
th
 Street, NW, Washington, DC 20004-1206, Attention: Richard E. Baltz, Esq.
 
Section 13.
             
No Advisory or Fiduciary Relationship
. The Company acknowledges and agrees that (a) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the public offering price of the
 
Securities and any related discounts and commissions, is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company, on the one hand, and the several Underwriters, on the other hand, (b) in connection with the offering contemplated hereby and the process leading to such transaction each Underwriter is and has been acting solely as a principal and is not the agent or fiduciary of the Company or its respective stockholders, creditors, employees or any other party, (c) no Underwriter has assumed or will assume an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter or Lazard Frres & Co. LLC has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) and no Underwriter has any obligation to the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (d) the Underwriters and their respective affiliates and Lazard Frres & Co. LLC may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company, and (e) the Underwriters have not provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering contemplated hereby and the Company has consulted its own respective legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate.
 
Section 14.     . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Underwriters, the Company and their respective successors.  This Agreement shall also inure to the benefit of Lazard Frres & Co. LLC, and each of its successors and assigns, which shall be third party beneficiaries hereof.  Nothing expressed or mentioned in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any person, firm or corporation, other than the Underwriters, the Company and their respective successors and the controlling persons and officers and directors referred to in Sections 6 and 7 and their heirs and legal representatives, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision herein contained. This Agreement and all conditions and provisions hereof are intended to be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Underwriters, the Company and their respective successors, and said controlling persons and officers and directors and their heirs and legal representatives, and for the benefit of no other person, firm or corporation. No purchaser of Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed to be a successor by reason merely of such purchase.
Parties
 
Section 15.     . THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
GOVERNING LAW
 
Section 16.     . TIME SHALL BE OF THE ESSENCE OF THIS AGREEMENT. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE SET FORTH HEREIN, SPECIFIED TIMES OF DAY REFER TO NEW YORK CITY TIME.
TIME
 
Section 17.     . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same Agreement.
Counterparts
 
Section 18.     . The Section headings herein are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
Effect of Headings
 
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to the Company a counterpart hereof, whereupon this instrument, along with all counterparts, will become a binding agreement among the Underwriters and the Company in accordance with its terms.
 
For themselves and as Representatives of the other Underwriters named in hereto.
Schedule A
 
1.             The initial public offering price per share for the Securities shall be $6.15.
 
2.             The purchase price per share for the Securities to be paid by the several Underwriters shall be $5.8425, being an amount equal to the initial public offering price set forth above less $0.3075 per share.
 
Paulo Pucci
 
Peter S. Lawrence
 
Thomas Chan
 
Brian Schwartz
 
Ronald M. Lindsay, Ph.D.
 
William G. Messenger, D. Min.
 
Patrick J. Zenner
 
Timothy C. Barabe
 
Michael D. Loberg, Ph.D.
 
Nancy A. Simonian, M.D.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
 
ArQule, Inc.
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA 01801-5140
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
You have requested our opinion with respect to certain matters in connection with the offering by ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), of up to 8,050,000 shares of the Company's common stock, par value $0.01 (the ""), including 1,050,000 shares of common stock issued upon exercise of the underwriters over-allotment option, pursuant to a Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333- 166532) (the ""), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ""), the prospectus dated May 24, 2010 (the ""), and the prospectus supplement relating to the Shares filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) of the Rules and Regulations of the Act (the ""). (The Base Prospectus and Prospectus Supplement are collectively referred to as the ".") All of the Shares are to be sold by the Company as described in the Registration Statement and Prospectus.
Company
Shares
Registration Statement
Commission
Act
Base Prospectus
Prospectus Supplement
Prospectus
 
In connection with this opinion, we have examined and relied upon the Registration Statement, the Prospectus, the Company's Restated Certificate of Incorporation, its Amended and Restated Bylaws, and the originals or copies certified to our satisfaction of such records, documents, certificates, memoranda and other instruments as in our judgment are necessary or appropriate to enable us to render the opinion expressed below. In rendering this opinion, we have assumed the genuineness and authenticity of all signatures on original documents; the genuineness and authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals; the conformity to originals of all documents submitted to us as copies; the accuracy, completeness and authenticity of certificates of public officials; and the due authorization, execution and delivery of all documents where authorization, execution and delivery are prerequisites to the effectiveness of such documents.
 
Our opinion herein is expressed solely with respect to the federal laws of the United States and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.  As to matters governed by the laws specified in the foregoing sentence, we have relied exclusively on the latest standard compilations of such statutes and laws as reproduced in commonly accepted unofficial publications available to us.  We are not members of the Bar of the State of Delaware and have not obtained any opinions of local counsel.
 
 
On the basis of the foregoing, and in reliance thereon, we are of the opinion that the Shares, when sold in accordance with the Registration Statement and Prospectus, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
 
This letter does not address any matters other than those expressly addressed herein.  This letter is given for your sole benefit and use.  No one else is entitled to rely hereupon.  This letter speaks only as of the date hereof.  We undertake no responsibility to update or supplement it after such date.
 
We hereby consent to your filing of this opinion as Exhibit 5.1 to the Registration Statement and to reference to our firm under Legal Matters in the Prospectus.  By giving such consent we do not thereby admit that we are within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act, or the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission thereunder.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
Woburn, MA, January 20, 2011 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that it has priced a public offering of 7,000,000 shares of its common stock at a price of $6.15 per share.  Net proceeds after underwriting discounts and commissions and expenses will be approximately $40.5 million.  ArQule has granted the underwriters a thirty-day option to purchase up to an additional 1,050,000 shares to cover over-allotments, if any. The offering is expected to close on or about January 25, 2010, subject to satisfaction of customary closing conditions.
 
Leerink Swann LLC and Lazard Capital Markets LLC are acting as joint book-running managers for the offering. Needham & Company, LLC, Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. and BMO Capital Markets Corp. are acting as co-managers.
 
The securities described above are being offered by ArQule pursuant to a registration statement previously filed and declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission. This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the securities in this offering. The offering may be made only by means of a prospectus, copies of which may be obtained, when available, from Leerink Swann LLC, Attention: Syndicate Prospectus Department, by telephone at 617-918-4814, or by facsimile at 617-918-4914.
 
This press release includes forward-looking statements. For these statements, ArQule claims the protection of the safe harbor for forward-looking statements provided by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. It should be noted that there are risks and uncertainties related to the public offering. A review of these risks can be found in ArQule's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009, the prospectus to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission in connection with the offering and other reports and documents filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 

 
Exhibit 99.2
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
Woburn, MA, January 25, 2011 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL)
today announced the completion of its previously announced public offering of 7,000,000 shares of its common stock at a price of $6.15 per share and the full exercise by the underwriters of their over-allotment option to purchase an additional 1,050,000 shares of its common stock. Net proceeds to ArQule of the public offering and the over-allotment option, totaling 8,050,000 shares, are approximately $46.5 million after underwriting discounts and expenses.
 
The net proceeds from the offering will be used to fund ArQule's research and development efforts, including clinical trials for the Company's proprietary product candidates, and for general corporate purposes, including working capital.
 
Leerink Swann LLC and Lazard Capital Markets LLC acted as joint book-running managers for the offering.  Needham & Company, LLC, Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. and BMO Capital Markets Corp. acted as co-managers.
 
The securities described above were offered by ArQule pursuant to a registration statement previously filed and declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission. This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the securities in this offering. The offering was made only by means of a prospectus, copies of which may be obtained, when available, from Leerink Swann LLC, Attention: Syndicate Prospectus Department, by telephone at 617-918-4814, or by facsimile at 617-918-4914.
 
This press release includes forward-looking statements. For these statements, ArQule claims the protection of the safe harbor for forward-looking statements provided by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. It should be noted that there are risks and uncertainties related to the public offering. A review of these risks can be found in ArQule's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009, the prospectus filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission in connection with the offering and other reports and documents filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110214074803.txt.gz
TIME:20110214074803
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On February 10, 2011, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") received a $25 million payment from Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. ("Daiichi Sankyo") in accordance with the terms of their
license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement regarding
the Registrant's c-MET inhibitor, ARQ 197.
 
As previously disclosed on January 12, 2011, the first patient was enrolled in a Phase 3 clinical trial of ARQ 197 in patients with non-small cell lung cancer being conducted by Daiichi Sankyo and the Registrant under the agreement.  The payment to the Registrant resulted from achievement of this clinical milestone.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110228161542.txt.gz
TIME:20110228161542
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
    Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
    Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 
5
 Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On February 23, 2011, Nancy Simonian, M.D., notified ArQule, Inc. of her intent to resign from the Company's Board of Directors, and she has tendered her resignation effective as of March 31, 2011.  Dr. Simonian's decision to resign from the Company's Board of Directors is not based on any disagreement with ArQule, Inc. on any matter relating to the Company's operations, policies or practices.
 
The full text of the Company's press release issued in connection with its announcement of Dr. Simonian's resignation is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1
   Text of press release announcing resignation of director dated February 28, 2011.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
For Immediate Release:
 
Woburn, MA, February 28, 2011
 ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced that Dr. Nancy Simonian has tendered her resignation as a director of the Company effective on March 31, 2011.
 
"I am proud of the progress ArQule has made during the past several years," said Dr. Simonian.  "The Company has advanced its class leading c-Met inhibitor, ARQ 197, efficiently into a pivotal Phase 3 clinical trial in non-small cell lung cancer and has established the foundation for expansion of this product into other indications.  I look forward to ArQule's continued success and to the potential of ARQ 197 to help patients with non-small cell lung cancer and other diseases."
 
"We are grateful for the many significant contributions of Dr. Simonian during her tenure as an ArQule board member," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "The Company has benefitted greatly from her scientific and clinical insights, and I join the rest of the board and management team at ArQule in thanking her for her service."
 
Dr. Simonian's decision to resign from the Company's Board of Directors is not based on any disagreement with ArQule, Inc. or any matter relating to the Company's operations, policies or practices.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is
a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ
 
 
736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with ARQ 197.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 197 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during cl inical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 197 are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of ARQ 197, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  ; Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the ARQ 197 license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of ARQ 197 on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110301071724.txt.gz
TIME:20110301071724
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On March 1, 2011, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the year ended December 31, 2010.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated March 1, 2011.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
Woburn, MA, March 1, 2011 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the year and for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2010.
 
The Company reported a net loss of $30,129,000, or $0.68 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2010, compared with a net loss of $36,136,000, or $0.82 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2009.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2010, the Company reported a net loss of $5,756,000, or $0.13 per share, compared with a net loss of $9,868,000, or $0.22 per share, for the quarter ended December 31, 2009.
 
At December 31, 2010, the Company had a total of approximately $82,849,000 in cash and marketable securities.
 
In January 2011, the Company completed a common stock offering, which combined with the full exercise of an over-allotment option, resulted in net proceeds of approximately $46.5 million, and in February 2011, the Company received a development milestone payment from Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. marking the dosing of the first patient in a Phase 3 trial.
 
Operational Highlights for 2010
 
Tivantinib (ARQ 197)
 
     
Completion and presentations of data from a randomized Phase 2 trial in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), demonstrating treatment benefits in patients with non-squamous cell histology;
     
Development partner, Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., reached agreement with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration on a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) for the pivotal Phase 3 trial in NSCLC, in which the first patient was dosed in January 2011;
 
 
     
Advancement from an open label Phase 1 lead-in trial to a double-blind, randomized Phase 2 trial in colorectal cancer;
     
Initiation of an open label Phase 2 trial by Kyowa Hakko Kirin in gastric cancer in Asia.
 
Pipeline / Discovery
 
     
Filing of the IND (Investigational New Drug application) and enrollment of the first patient in a Phase 1 trial of ARQ 736, an inhibitor of the RAF kinases;
     
Optimization of a lead product from our oncology drug discovery collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP);
     
Expansion of our AKIP collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo.
 
Financials
 
     
Realization of significant clinical development milestone payments from Daiichi Sankyo relative to the pivotal Phase 3 NSCLC trial initiation (received in February 2011) and from Kyowa Hakko Kirin relative to the initiation of an open label Phase 2 gastric cancer trial (received in September 2010).
 
Plans for 2011
 
Tivantinib (ARQ 197)
 
"We began 2011 with the dosing of the first patient in the pivotal Phase 3 trial with tivantinib in combination with erlotinib for patients with non-squamous, NSCLC who have received one or two prior systemic anti-cancer therapies," said Mr. Pucci. "We also anticipate clinical milestones in multiple indications during the next two years.  Our primary objectives with this compound for 2011 include the following:
 
     
Opening of substantially all of the clinical trial sites in the pivotal Phase 3 combination trial with erlotinib in NSCLC;
     
Communication of data from the randomized Phase 2 single agent trial in liver cancer in the second half of the year;
     
Continuation of patient enrollment in a randomized Phase 2 combination trial with irinotecan and cetuximab in colorectal cancer;
     
Evaluation of data from the open label Phase 1 combination trials with gemcitabine and with sorafenib, respectively, in multiple tumor types that may inform further clinical trials.
 
Pipeline and Discovery Platform
 
"We plan to advance our earlier-stage proprietary pipeline through the following activities," said Mr. Pucci.
 
     
Conclusion of the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621 (Eg5 inhibitor);
     
Substantial completion of enrollment in the Phase 1 trial with ARQ 736 (an inhibitor of the RAF kinases);
     
Completion of pre-clinical development of a candidate from our FGFR program;
 
     
Advancement of our recently expanded ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) discovery collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo.
 
Liquidity Position
 
"Our liquidity position at the end of 2010 was approximately $82.8 million in cash and marketable securities," said Mr. Pucci. "In January 2011, we completed a successful equity financing that resulted in net proceeds of $46.5 million, and in February 2011, we received a milestone payment from Daiichi Sankyo that further strengthened our financial position. In light of these two cash inflows, cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities on hand at December 31, 2010 and our collaboration agreements, we expect that our available cash and cash equivalents will be sufficient to finance our working capital requirements into 2013."
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
Revenues for the year ended December 31, 2010 were $29,221,000, compared with revenues of $25,198,000 for the year ended December 31, 2009.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2010, revenues were $7,520,000, compared with revenues of $7,286,000 for the quarter ended December 31, 2009.
 
Revenues in 2010 included research and development revenue from the Company's tivantinib development and AKIP research collaboration agreements with Daiichi Sankyo and its tivantinib license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kirin.  The increases in the 2010 periods were primarily due to additional revenue recognized from the Kyowa Hakko Kirin agreement and from the Daiichi Sankyo agreements, net of cost-sharing obligations.
 
Fiscal 2010 research and development expenses were $47,034,000, compared with $49,495,000 for fiscal 2009.  Fourth quarter 2010 research and development expenses were $10,797,000, compared with $14,136,000 for the fourth quarter 2009.  Research and development expenses decreased in fiscal 2010 primarily due to a decrease in costs associated with tivantinib clinical programs partially offset by an increase in other preclinical and clinical costs.
 
General and administrative expenses for fiscal 2010 were $13,477,000, compared to $13,317,000 for fiscal 2009.  Fourth quarter 2010 general and administrative costs were $3,449,000, compared with $3,320,000 for the fourth quarter 2009.
 
2011 Financial Guidance
 
For 2011, ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $40 and $45 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $27 and $32 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $35 and $40 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.66) and $(0.75) for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2011 with between $85 and $90 million in cash and marketable securities.  This guidance includes certain milestone assumptions from corporate partnership agreements.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
ArQule will hold a conference call today at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning two hours after the completion of the call until March 8, 2011 and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (800) 642-1687 and outside the U.S. (706) 645-9291.  The confirmation code for replayed calls is 40616764.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is
a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib, also known as ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Company's financial guidance for 2011 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2011), key corporate objectives for 2011, ability to fund operations with current cash and marketable securities, and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo, Inc.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 621 and ARQ 736 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully
 
pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
(1)
  
Research and development revenue is shown net of collaboration contra-revenue of $1.8 million and $3.3 million for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2010, respectively.
(2)
  
The 2010 periods include approximately $1.0 million of cash grants received under the Qualified Therapeutic Drug Program (QDTP) and a net loss from auction rate securities and auction rate put option.
(3)
  
The 2009 periods include a net gain from auction rate securities and auction rate put option.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110428090626.txt.gz
TIME:20110428090626
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
    Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
    Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 
5
 Other Events
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
(d)  On April 27, 2011, Susan L. Kelley, M.D. was appointed to the Board of Directors of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant"). Dr. Kelley will serve on the Registrant's Board of Directors until its 2013 Annual Meeting of Stockholders, at which time the Registrant anticipates that Dr. Kelley will be nominated to serve for an additional term.There was no arrangement or understanding between Dr. Kelley and the Registrant (or any other person known to the Registrant) pursuant to which Dr. Kelley was appointed. Dr. Kelley has been appointed to the Science Committee of the Board of Directors.
 
Under the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan upon election as a director Dr. Kelley was automatically granted an option to purchase 30,000 shares of the Registrant's common stock. This option becomes exercisable as to 10,000 shares on the date of each of the Registrant's next three annual meeting of stockholders following the date of grant.  Should she continue to serve on the Registrant's board immediately after each annual meeting of stockholders she will receive an automatic grant of an option to purchase 15,000 shares of common stock.  This option will be fully exercisable on the date of grant. All options referred to in this paragraph have a term of ten years and an exercise price equal to the closing price of the Registrant's common stock as reported by the NASDAQ Stock Market on the date of grant.
 
As a non-employee director, if Dr. Kelley is serving as a director prior to and immediately following any annual meeting of the Registrant's stockholders, she will receive a $20,000 annual retainer.  She will also receive $2,000 for each day she attends a meeting of directors and $1,000 for each day on which a committee of the Board meets and she attends. Under the Registrant's 2005 Director Stock Compensation Plan, Dr. Kelley, as a non-employee director, may elect to receive all or part of her compensation for service as a director in the form of the Registrant's common stock in lieu of such cash fees.
 
From 2001 to 2008, Dr. Kelley was employed by Bayer Healthcare Pharmaceuticals and Bayer- Schering Pharma in Germany and the United States serving as Vice President, Global Strategic Drug Development, Cancer and Metabolics from April 2001 to May 2002 and from May 2002 until June 2008 as Vice President, Global Clinical Development and Therapeutic Area Head-Oncology.  From July 2008 to March 2011, she was Chief Medical Officer of The Multiple Myeloma Research Foundation/Consortium. Most recently, she has been an independent consultant to the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries in the field of oncology drug development and strategy.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
For Immediate Release:
 
Woburn, MA, April 28, 2011
 ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced the appointment of Susan L. Kelley, M.D. to its board of directors, effective April 27, 2011.
 
Dr. Kelley is currently an independent consultant to the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries in the field of oncology drug development and strategy.  From 2008 to 2011, she was Chief Medical Officer of the Multiple Myeloma Research Consortium and its sister organization, the Multiple Myeloma Research Foundation, where her responsibilities spanned the continuum of clinical drug development from translational research and clinical trials to FDA regulatory compliance.
 
From 2001 to 2008, Dr. Kelley was employed by Bayer Healthcare Pharmaceuticals and Bayer-Schering Pharma as Vice President, Global Clinical Development and Therapeutic Area Head  Oncology.  Dr. Kelley worked at Bristol-Myers Squibb Company from 1987 to 2001, most recently as Executive Director, Oncology Clinical Research, at the Bristol-Myers Squibb Pharmaceutical Research Institute.
 
Dr. Kelley received her M.D. from Duke University School of Medicine and an A.B. in biology, magna cum laude, from Colgate University.  She was a Fellow in Medical Oncology and Clinical Fellow in Medicine at Dana-Farber Cancer Institute, Harvard Medical School, and a Fellow in Medical Oncology and Pharmacology at Yale University School of Medicine, where she also served as a Clinical Assistant Professor of Medicine.
 
"Dr. Kelley brings strong clinical development skills and regulatory experience to the ArQule board of directors as the Company's lead product, tivantinib, progresses in its Phase 3 trial in non-small cell lung cancer," said Patrick J. Zenner, chairman of the board of ArQule.  "We welcome her to the board and look forward to her contributions to the advancement of tivantinib and other pipeline products that are directed toward promising therapeutic targets in oncology."
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is
a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to
 
 
human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib and the Company's earlier-stage compounds may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110505075029.txt.gz
TIME:20110505075029
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
o
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On May 5, 2011, ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1 Text of press release announcing results of operations dated May 5, 2011.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
Woburn, MA, May 5, 2011 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2011.
 
For the quarter ended March 31, 2011, the Company reported a net loss of $1,466,000, or $0.03 per share, compared to a net loss of $9,752,000, or $0.22 per share, for the first quarter of 2010.
 
At March 31, 2011, the Company had a total of $137,752,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities.
 
Operational Update
 
                 
Dosing of the first patient in the pivotal Phase 3 combination trial of tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase, and erlotinib in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and the subsequent receipt of a milestone payment from development partner, Daiichi Sankyo, in the first quarter;
 
                 
Presentation of Phase 1 results of tivantinib in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab in colorectal cancer (CRC) at the 2011 Gastrointestinal Cancers Symposium of the American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO);
 
                 
Continuing recruitment of patients in the Phase 2 trial with tivantinib in liver cancer and in the Phase 2 trial with tivantinib in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab in colorectal cancer, as well as enrollment of patients with multiple tumor types in Phase 1 trials of tivantinib in combinations with sorafenib and gemcitabine.
 
"In January 2011, the first patient was enrolled in our Phase 3 trial with tivantinib in combination with erlotinib for patients with non-squamous NSCLC who have received one or two prior systemic therapies," said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  "This trial, led by Daiichi Sankyo, will enroll approximately 1,000 patients at clinical sites in the U.S.,
Canada, Eastern and Western Europe, Australia and Latin America.
 
"Data presentations during the first quarter were highlighted by findings from the Phase 1 lead-in portion of our ongoing Phase 2, randomized trial in CRC with tivantinib in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab at the 2011 ASCO Gastrointestinal Cancers Symposium," said Mr. Pucci.  "These data showed that this combination was well tolerated, with encouraging anti-tumor activity in patients with
 
relapsed, metastatic CRC that included one complete response, two partial responses and five stable diseases among nine patients treated.
 
"In addition, pre-clinical data presented at the American Association for Cancer Research (AACR) support our ongoing development of products targeting the RAF kinases and the FGFR kinase," said Mr. Pucci.
 
Revenues and Expenses
 
The Company reported revenues of $13,405,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2011, compared with $6,325,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2010. The increase in the first quarter of 2011 was primarily due to revenue from the Company's tivantinib collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd., which included a $25 million milestone payment received in February, 2011.  The 2011 and 2010 periods also included revenue from the Company's license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. and its AKIP research collaboration agreement with Daiichi Sankyo.
 
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended March 31, 2011 were $14,936,000, compared to $15,773,000 for the first quarter of 2010.   Research and development costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2011 were $11,393,000, compared to $12,444,000 for the first quarter of 2010.
 
General and administrative costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2011 were $3,543,000, compared to $3,329,000 for the first quarter of 2010.
 
Confirmed Financial Guidance
 
As previously stated, for 2011 ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $40 and $45 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $27 and $32 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $35 and $40 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.66) and $(0.75).  ArQule expects to end 2011 with between $85 and $90 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
Conference call details
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 800-642-1687 and outside the U.S. 706-645-9291.  The confirmation code for replayed calls is 62154751.
About ArQule
 
ArQule is
a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Company's targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQule's lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQule's current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Company's clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Company's financial guidance for 2011 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2011) and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin.  These statements are based on the Company's current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 621 (an Eg5 inhibitor) and ARQ 736 (a RAF kinases inhibitor) may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Company's view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib is subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Company's drug development and other activities, see
 
the Company's periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
(1)
         
Research and development revenue is shown net of collaboration contra-revenue of $5.0 million and zero for the quarters ended March 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively.
 
(2)
         
The 2010 period includes a net loss from auction rate securities and auction rate put option.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110606124845.txt.gz
TIME:20110606124845
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
(e) 
Plan Amendments
 
As discussed below, the stockholders of ArQule, Inc. (the "Registrant") approved an amendment to each of the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the "Equity Plan") and Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan (the "Director Plan").
 
The amendment to the Equity Plan, among other things,:
 
      increases the number of shares of common stock available for awards granted under such plan by 3,000,000 shares (from 12,500,000 to 15,500,000 shares).
 
      makes the minimum vesting periods for awards of performance shares, restricted stock, stock units or other stock-based awards other than nonstatutory stock options, incentive stock options and stock appreciation rights made under the Equity Plan at (i) three years for awards that vest based on continued service to the Registrant and (ii) one year for awards that vest based upon the accomplishment of performance criteria;
 
      provides that no nonstatutory or incentive stock option shall have a term greater than ten (10) years measured from the date of award and that in the case of any incentive stock option granted to a 10% stockholder the term of the incentive stock option shall not exceed five (5) years measured from the date the option is granted; and
 
      provides that to the extent that any award is forfeited, or any stock option or stock appreciation right terminates, expires or lapses without being exercised, the shares subject to such awards not delivered as a result thereof shall again be available for awards under the Equity Plan.
 
The Equity Plan allows for the grant of incentive and nonstatutory stock options, stock appreciation rights, performance shares, restricted stock, stock units and other stock-based awards to eligible employees or consultants of the Registrant.
 
The amendment to the Director Plan increases the number of shares of common stock available for awards granted under such plan by 200,000 shares (from 750,500 to 950,500 shares).  The Director Plan allows for the grant of nonstatutory stock options to non-employee directors of the Registrant.
 
As set forth below, stockholders also approved an amendment to the Amended and Restated 1996 Employee Stock Purchase Plan, a tax-qualified employee stock purchase plan.
 
Descriptions of the terms and conditions of the Equity Plan and the Director Plan are set forth in the Registrant's 2011 proxy statement, filed with the SEC on April 29, 2011, under the headings and respectively, and such descriptions are incorporated herein by reference.  Copies of the Equity Plan and the Director Plan were filed as Appendix A and Appendix C, respectively, to the 2011 proxy statement.
"Proposal 2 - Amendments to Our Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan"
"Proposal 4 - Approval of Amendments to Our Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan,"
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
 
On June 1, 2011, at the 2011 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of the Registrant the stockholders voted:
 
1.
                                      
To elect Ronald M. Lindsay, William G. Messenger and Patrick J. Zenner as directors to hold office for a term of three years and until their respective successors are elected and qualified;
 
2.
                                      
To approve amendments to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for awards granted under such plan by 3,000,000 from 12,500,000 to 15,500,000 shares of common stock and to incorporate other changes described in the Registrant's proxy statement;
 
3.
                                      
To approve an amendment to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Employee Stock Purchase Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for purchase by participants in such plan by 400,000 from 2,000,000 to 2,400,000 shares of common stock;
 
4.
                                      
To approve an amendment to the Registrant's Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for awards under such plan by 200,000 from 750,500 to 950,500 shares of common stock;
 
5.
                                      
To ratify the selection of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit the Registrant's financial statements for the year ending December 31, 2011.
 
6.
                                      
To approve, by non-binding vote, the compensation of the Registrant's named executive officers; and
 
7.
                                      
To recommend, by non-binding vote, annual stockholder voting on approval of the Registrant's executive compensation.
 
The voting results are set forth in Exhibit 99.1 to this report and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Consistent with the Board of Directors' recommendation and the results of the stockholders' advisory vote, an advisory vote to approve executive compensation will be conducted annually.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
10.1  Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (Incorporated by reference from Appendix A to the Registrant's Definitive Proxy Statement dated April 29, 2011)*
 
10.2  Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan (Incorporated by reference from Appendix C to the Registrant's Definitive Proxy Statement dated April 29, 2011)*
 
99.1  Report of Matters Voted Upon by Stockholders
 
*      Management compensatory plan or arrangement
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
1.     The 2011 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc.  (the "Annual Meeting") was held at the offices of ArQule, Inc. (the "Company") at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, on June 1, 2011 commencing at 10:00 a.m. pursuant to notice properly given.
 
2.     At the close of business on April 15, 2011, the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the Annual Meeting, the outstanding voting securities of the Company were 53,115,658 shares of common stock, $0.01 par value.  Each of the outstanding shares was entitled to one vote on the matters before the Annual Meeting.
 
3.     At the Annual Meeting 47,976,229 shares of the Company's issued and outstanding common stock, were represented in person or by proxy, constituting a quorum.
 
4.     At the Annual Meeting, each of the following nominees for director received the respective number of votes set forth opposite his or her name, constituting a plurality of the votes cast, and was duly elected as a director of the Company:
 
 
5.    The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve amendments to the Company's Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for awards granted under such plan by 3,000,000 from 12,500,000 to 15,500,000 shares of common stock and to incorporate other changes described in the Company's proxy statement.
 
 
6.     The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve an amendment to the Company's Amended and Restated 1996 Employee Stock Purchase Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for purchase in such plan by 400,000 from 2,000,000 to 2,400,000 shares of common stock.
 
 
 
7.     The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve an amendment to the Company's Amended and Restated 1996 Director Stock Option Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock available for awards granted under such plan by 200,000 from 750,000 to 950,000 shares of common stock.
 
 
8.     The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to ratify the selection of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit the Company's financial statements for the year ending December 31, 2011.
 
 
9.     The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to approve, by non-binding vote, the compensation of the Company's named executive officers
10.   The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to recommend, by non-binding vote, the frequency of votes approving the Company's executive compensation.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110804090250.txt.gz
TIME:20110804090250
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
  
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 4, 2011, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2011.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.  
 Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated August 4, 2011 announcing results of operations.
  2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
August 4, 2011
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2011.
Woburn, MA, August 4, 2011 
For the quarter ended June 30, 2011, the Company reported a net loss of $10,804,000 or $0.20 per share, compared with a net loss of $8,227,000 or $0.18 per share, for the second quarter of 2010.  For the six-month period ended June 30, 2011, the Company reported a net loss of $12,270,000 or $0.24 per share, compared to a net loss of $17,979,000 or $0.40 per share, for the six-month period ended June 30, 2010.
At June 30, 2011, the Company had a total of approximately $127,248,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities.
Operational Update
Enrollment in our single agent, randomized Phase 2 trial in HCC is substantially completed, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  Availability of data from this trial will depend upon the rate of events observed in the 240 milligram twice daily cohort of patients, and we anticipate having these data toward the end of 2011.
 
 
 
 
We have initiated patient recruitment in a Phase 2 trial comparing tivantinib and erlotinib against chemotherapy in NSCLC patients with KRAS mutations, said Mr. Pucci.  The primary objective is to evaluate progression-free survival in these previously treated patients, based on the clinical benefit observed in this sub-group within our randomized Phase 2 trial.
We expect that Kyowa Hakko Kirin will independently initiate the recruitment of a Phase 3 trial in Asia of tivantinib and erlotinib in non-squamous NSCLC patients with wild type EGFR in the near future, said Mr. Pucci.  The worldwide registration program for tivantinib in NSCLC also includes the ongoing pivotal Phase 3 trial of tivantinib and erlotinib in non-squamous NSCLC conducted by Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. in collaboration with ArQule at more than 200 sites and in more than 20 countries outside of Asia.
Revenues and Expenses
The Company reported total revenues of $5,447,000 for the quarter ended June 30, 2011, compared to revenues of $7,106,000 for the second quarter of 2010.  
Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2011 were $18,852,000, compared to revenues of $13,431,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2010.
 
The revenue decrease in the 2011 three-month period is primarily due to an increase in contra-revenue associated with expenses for our tivantinib collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo, partially offset by revenue recognized from the AKIP discovery collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo.  The revenue increase in the 2011 six-month period is primarily due to revenue recognized from a milestone payment from Daiichi Sankyo received in the first quarter, partially offset by increased contra-revenue.
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended June 30, 2011 were $16,388,000, compared to $15,844,000 for the second quarter of 2010.  Total costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011 were $31,324,000, compared to $31,617,000 for the same period in 2010.
Research and development costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2011 were $12,836,000 and $24,229,000, respectively, compared with $12,318,000 and $24,762,000 for the 2010 three and six-month periods.
General and administrative costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2011 were $3,552,000 and $7,095,000 respectively, compared with $3,526,000 and $6,855,000 for the 2010 three and six-month periods.  
Confirmed Financial Guidance
 
As previously stated, for 2011 ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $40 and $45 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $27 and $32 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $35 and $40 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.66) and $(0.75).  ArQule expects to end 2011 with between $85 and $90 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
 
 
 
Conference Call and Webcast
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 855-859-2056 and outside the U.S. 404-537-3406.  The replay access code is 82746505.
 
About ArQule
 
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Companys financial guidance for 2011 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2011) and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin.  These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 621 (an Eg5 inhibitor) and ARQ 736 (a RAF kinases inhibitor) may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib is subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20110809084153.txt.gz
TIME:20110809084153
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8
Other Information
 
 
Item 8.01 Other Information.
 
On August 9, 2011, Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd., ("Kyowa Hakko Kirin") the licensee of ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant)countries in Asia (China, Korea, and Taiwan) announced dosing of the first patient in its Phase 3 trial of tivantinib in combination with erlotinib in NSCLC patients in Asia.  Dosing of the first patient in this trial triggers a milestone payment in the amount of $10 million to the Registrant from Kyowa Hakko Kirin.
for the exclusive rights to the development and sales of tivantinib (ARQ 197) in Japan and certain other
The Phase 3 trial is a randomized, double-blinded, placebo controlled clinical trial of tivantinib in combination with erlotinib in NSCLC patients with wild-type EGFR.  The trial is designed to compare overall survival (OS) of patients treated with tivantinib and erlotinib to OS of patients treated with placebo and erlotinib. The design of the Phase 3 clinical trial is based on the results of the clinical studies in Japan by Kyowa Hakko Kirin and those by the Registrant in the United States and Europe.
 
2 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
August 9, 2011
 3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20111110072151.txt.gz
TIME:20111110072151
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 10, 2011, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2011.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
 Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated November 10, 2011 announcing results of operations.
 
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
November 10, 2011
3

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
                                                                                     
For Immediate Release:
 
ARQULE ANNOUNCES THIRD QUARTER FISCAL 2011 RESULTS
 
 
Conference call scheduled today at 9:00 a.m. eastern time
 
-- ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today reported its results of operations for the fiscal quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2011.
Woburn, Mass., November 10, 2011
The Company reported a net loss of $2,260,000 or $0.04 per share for the quarter ended September 30, 2011, compared to a net loss of $6,394,000 or $0.14 per share for the quarter ended September 30, 2010.  For the nine-month period ended September 30, 2011, the Company reported a net loss of $14,530,000 or $0.28 per share compared to a net loss of $24,373,000 or $0.55 per share, for the same period in 2010.
At September 30, 2011, the Company had a total of $124,946,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities.
Recent Operational Highlights
Tivantinib (ARQ 197)
Product Pipeline
 
 
 
 
 
With the initiation of patient recruitment by Kyowa Hakko Kirin in the ATTENTION trial in Asia, the worldwide Phase 3 clinical trial program for tivantinib in NSCLC is in place following the initiation of the MARQUEE trial in the West by our partner Daiichi Sankyo early this year, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  We view the beginning of the Asian trial as further validation of the commercial potential of tivantinib in this important part of the world.
We have recently completed enrollment in our single agent Phase 2 trial of tivantinib in HCC, said Mr. Pucci.  Pending the occurrence of events and independent review of findings, we will complete data analyses and expect to have data available very early in 2012.
Our oncology drug discovery collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo has reached an important milestone with the decision announced today to license ARQ 092, an inhibitor of the AKT protein kinase, said Mr. Pucci.  This compound is the first to emerge from the close scientific collaboration between the two companies based on our AKIP technology.
Revenues and Expenses
The Company reported total revenues of $11,954,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2011, compared to revenues of $8,270,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2010.  Revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 were $30,806,000, compared to revenues of $21,701,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2010.
The revenue increase in the quarter ended September 30, 2011 is primarily due to revenue recognized from the milestone payment from Kyowa Hakko Kirin received in August 2011 upon initiation of their Phase 3 ATTENTION clinical trial in Asia.  The revenue increase in the nine months ended September 30, 2011 is primarily due to increased revenues from the Companys AKIP collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo Co. Ltd. and revenue recognized from the milestone payment from Kyowa Hakko Kirin.
For the quarter ended September 30, 2011, the Company reported total costs and expenses of $14,235,000, compared to total costs and expenses of $14,648,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2010.  Total costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 were $45,559,000, compared to $46,265,000 for the same period in 2010.
Research and development costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2011 were $11,108,000 and $35,337,000 respectively, compared with $11,475,000 and $36,237,000 for the 2010 three and nine-month periods.
General and administrative costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2011 were $3,127,000 and $10,222,000, respectively, compared with $3,173,000 and $10,028,000 for the 2010 three and nine-month periods.
Financial Guidance
As a result of a Daiichi Sankyo milestone payment related to initiation of the clinical development of ARQ 092, as well as the timing of expenses incurred in connection with the Phase 3 MARQUEE clinical trial of tivantinib, the Company is revising its financial guidance for 2011 as follows.
 
 
2
 
 
ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $27 and $31 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $38 and $42 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $18 and $22 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.33) and $(0.41).  ArQule expects to end 2011 with between $103 and $107 million in cash, equivalents and marketable securities, reflecting expected fourth quarter expenditures related to the MARQUEE trial.
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m.
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning approximately two hours after its completion for seven days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 1-855-859-2056 and 1-404-537-3406 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is 21439016.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
 
3
 
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Companys financial guidance for 2011 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2011) and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.  These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 092 (an AKT inhibitor), ARQ 621 (an Eg5 inhibitor) and ARQ 736 (a RAF kinases inhibitor) may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib is subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
4
 
 
 
 
 
5


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120117073050.txt.gz
TIME:20120117073050
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On January 17, 2012, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) announced results of its Phase 2 clinical trial of the Registrants c-Met inhibitor, tivantinib, in patients with hepatocellular cancer.
 
The Registrants press release dated January 17, 2012, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1   Text of press release announcing clinical trial results dated January 17, 2012.
 
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
January 17, 2012
 
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced that treatment with tivantinib as single agent therapy produced a statistically significant 56 percent improvement in time-to-progression (TTP) in the intent-to-treat (ITT) population, the primary endpoint in a randomized, controlled Phase 2 clinical trial in previously treated patients with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) (hazard ratio = 0.64; log rank p-value = 0.04).
Woburn, MA, January 17, 2012 
Adverse events were reported at similar rates in the treatment and placebo arms, except for a higher incidence of fatigue and hematologic events, including neutropenia and anemia, in tivantinib-treated patients.  The incidence of hematologic events declined following dose reduction of tivantinib from 360 milligrams twice daily (BID) to 240 milligrams BID.
These findings represent the first randomized data reported with a c-Met inhibitor administered as a single agent in HCC, said Dr. Brian Schwartz, chief medical officer of ArQule.   Second line treatment for HCC remains a challenge, lacking an approved agent.  We look forward to presenting complete data from this trial at a peer-reviewed forum later this year, including secondary endpoint, sub-group and biomarker analyses.
The 107 patients in this trial had unresectable HCC and had experienced disease progression after first-line therapy or were unable to tolerate such therapy.  At the start of the study, patients were randomized to receive tivantinib at 360 milligrams BID or placebo.  As previously disclosed, due to the rate of neutropenia, the tivantinib dose was reduced to 240 milligrams BID for all patients. TTP was defined as the time from patient randomization until objective tumor progression using RECIST (Response Evaluation Criteria in Solid Tumors) 1.1 criteria evaluated by central radiological review.
 
 
 
 
About Hepatocellular Carcinoma (HCC)
Hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) is the most common primary cancer of the liver. The incidence is increasing, and HCC has risen to become the fifth most common malignancy worldwide and the third leading cause of cancer-related death, exceeded only by cancers of the lung and stomach.  The estimated incidence is about 500,000-1,000,000 new cases per year, causing 600,000 deaths globally per year.
1
Chronic hepatitis B and C are recognized as the major factors worldwide increasing the risk of HCC, with risk being even greater in the presence of co-infection with these viruses
2
.   Cirrhosis is also a risk factor for development of HCC.
About c-Met and Tivantinib (ARQ 197)
Tivantinib is an orally available, selective inhibitor of c-Met, a receptor tyrosine kinase, which is currently in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical trials.  In certain healthy adult cells, c-Met is present in low to normal levels to support natural cellular function and renewal, but in some cancer cells, c-Met is inappropriately and continuously activated. When thus abnormally activated, c-Met plays multiple roles in human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.
Pre-clinical data have demonstrated that tivantinib inhibits c-Met activation in a range of human tumor cell lines and shows anti-tumor activity against several human tumor xenografts.  In clinical trials to date, treatment with tivantinib has been well tolerated and has shown clinical activity in the tumors studied.
About ArQule, Inc. and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd.
 
On December 19, 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd. signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop tivantinib in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.
 
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m.
 
Conference Call Dial-In Numbers
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning approximately two hours after its completion for seven days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 1-855-859-2056 and
1-404-537-3406 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is 44134741.
 
Hepatocellular carcinoma: Epidemiology, risk factors and pathogenesis.  World Journal of Gastroenterology 14(27): 4300-08, 2008.
1
 
Chiaramonte M, Stroffolini T, Vian A, et al.: Rate of incidence of hepatocellular carcinoma in patients with compensated viral cirrhosis. Cancer 85 (10): 2132-37, 1999.
2
 
 
2
 
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib, an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with tivantinib and its agreement with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects in such trials; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profiles in later stage or larger scale clinical trials, including among patients with underlying cirrhosis and compromised liver function, as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing tivantinib that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib is subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, its partner, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120223173702.txt.gz
TIME:20120223173702
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
 
 
                                                                                                            
                                                                                                                            
 
(Zip code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o 
    
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
    
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
(e)           Amendment of CMO Employment Agreement
 
On February 23, 2012, the Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee (the Committee) of ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant), approved an amendment to certain terms of the employment agreement, dated June 17, 2008, between the Registrant and Brian Schwartz, the Registrants Chief Medical Officer (the Employment Agreement).
 
The amendment grants Dr. Schwartz 50,000 performance-based stock units, each of which represents a contingent right to receive one share of the Registrants common stock.  The units will vest if during the course of Dr. Schwartzs employment with the Registrant, certain performance goals related to the development of the Registrants products are achieved by a date specified by the Committee.  If, prior to the performance goals being achieved, a termination without Cause (as defined in the Employment Agreement) of Dr. Schwartzs employment with the Registrant occurs and the per share closing stock price of the Companys common stock has averaged at or above a target price for a duration established by the Committee, the units will also vest.  All other material terms of the Employment Agreement that were in effect prior to the Committees approval of the amendment remain in effect.
The foregoing summary of the material terms of the amendment to Dr. Schwartzs Employment Agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the amendment which is included as Exhibit 10.2 hereto and the terms of his Employment Agreement filed as Exhibit 10.1 hereto.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 10.1   Employment Agreement, dated June 17, 2008, by and between the Registrant and Brian Schwartz.
Exhibit No. 10.2   Amendment to Employment Agreement, dated February 23, 2012, by and between the Registrant and Brian Schwartz.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
February 23, 2012
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 10.1
 
This Employment Agreement (the Agreement) dated as of June 17, 2008 (the Execution Date) is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the Company) with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts  01801, and Brian Schwartz (Executive) whose current principal residential address is 18 October Hill Road, Woodbridge, Connecticut 06525.
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to employ Executive as its Chief Medical Officer and Vice President and to enter into an agreement embodying the terms of such employment; and
 
WHEREAS, Executive desires to accept such employment and enter into such an agreement;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive (collectively, the Parties) hereby agree as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(including fringe benefits, 401(k) plan participation, life, health dental, accident and short and long term disability insurance) which the Company may, in its sole and absolute discretion, make available to its similarly-situated employees, whether such benefits are now in effect or hereafter adopted, subject to the terms and conditions of each such plan or policy.  The Company may alter, modify, add to or delete its employee benefit plans and its perquisite plans and policies at any time as it, in its sole judgment, determines to be appropriate, without recourse by Executive.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(subject to any employee contribution requirements applicable to Executive on the Termination Date) through the twelve (12) month period commencing on the Termination Date, to the extent such benefits may continue beyond the Termination Date (for example, among other things, Executives coverage under the Companys life and disability insurance policies will terminate as of the Termination Date).
 
Deemed Termination Process shall mean that (i) the Executive reasonably determines in good faith that a Deemed Termination Condition has occurred; (ii) the Executive provides written notice to the Company of the occurrence of the Deemed Termination Condition within 45 days of the initial occurrence of such condition; (iii) the Executive cooperates in good faith with the Companys efforts, for a period not less than 30 days following such notice (the Cure Period), to remedy the Deemed
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Termination Condition; (iv) notwithstanding such efforts, the Deemed Termination Condition continues to exist; and (v) the Executive provides the Company with a Notice of Termination, which establishes a Termination Date within 30 days after the end of the Cure Period.  If the Company cures the Deemed Termination Condition during the Cure Period, a termination without Cause shall be deemed not to have occurred.
 
If Executives employment is terminated by the Company for Cause, all compensation and benefits provided to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that the Company shall pay Executive all Base Salary owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
to Executive by the Company pursuant to this Agreement or otherwise shall cease as of the Termination Date, except that (a) the Company shall pay Executive all Base Salary owed to Executive for work performed prior to the Termination Date, plus the cash value of any accrued but unused PTO, as of the Termination Date; and (b) provided that Executive first executes a general release in a form and of a scope reasonably acceptable to the Company within sixty (60) days of the Termination Date, Executive shall be entitled to the Severance Package, except that the portion of the Severance Payment based on Executives Base Salary paid as a part of the Severance Package shall be reduced by the amount of Base Salary, salary continuation (short-term disability), and cash disability benefits (long-term disability) paid to Executive for the corresponding period under the Companys employee benefit plans as then in effect.
 
 
 
 
Each payment under this Agreement shall be designated as a separate payment within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code.  To the extent any reimbursement or in-kind benefit due to Executive under this Agreement constitutes deferred compensation under Section 409A of the Code, any such reimbursement or in-kind benefit shall be paid to Executive in a manner consistent with Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-3(i)(1)(iv).
 
 
 
 
consolidation, retain capital stock representing a majority of the voting power of the surviving entity of such merger or consolidation;
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
be construed to affect in any way Executives confidentiality obligations as set forth in Section 7 of this Agreement.  Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit Executive from seeking permission from the Company to engage in any activity which may otherwise fall within the definition of Competitive Activity as set forth in this Section, provided that a grant of permission from the Company, if any, must be in writing.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
jurisdiction or jurisdictions, or in all jurisdictions or in all cases, because of the conflict of any provision with any constitution or statute or rule of public policy or for any other reason, such circumstance shall not have the effect of rendering the provision or provisions in question invalid, inoperative or unenforceable in any other jurisdiction or in any other case or circumstance or of rendering any other provision or provisions herein contained invalid, inoperative or unenforceable to the extent that such other provisions are not themselves actually in conflict with such constitution, statute or rule of public policy, but this Agreement shall be reformed and construed in any such jurisdiction or case as if such invalid, inoperative or unenforceable provision had never been contained herein and such provision reformed so that it would be valid, operative and enforceable to the maximum extent permitted in such jurisdiction or in such case.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Agreement as of the Execution Date.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
require (a) that the shares of Common Stock reserved for issue upon the exercise of this Option shall have been duly listed, upon official notice of issuance, upon any national securities exchange or automated quotation system on which the Companys Common Stock may then be listed or quoted, (b) that either (i) a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933 with respect to the shares shall be in effect, or (ii) in the opinion of counsel for the Company, the proposed purchase shall be exempt from registration under that Act and the Option Holder shall have made such undertakings and agreements with the Company as the Company may reasonably require, and (c) that such other steps, if any, as counsel for the Company shall consider necessary to comply with any law applicable to the issue of such shares by the Company shall have been taken by the Company or the Option Holder, or both.  The certificates representing the shares purchased under this Option may contain such legends as counsel for the Company shall consider necessary to comply with any applicable law.
 
 
 
 
 
options into account in the order in which they were granted.  For purposes of these rules, the Fair Market Value of stock shall be determined as of the time the Option with respect to such stock is granted.
 
 
 
 
 
The exercise price of the Execution Stock Option is the Fair Market Value of ArQules Common Stock (as defined below) as of the Effective Date as defined in Section 1 of the Employment Agreement between the Company and Executive.
 
The Fair Market Value of ArQules Common Stock shall be the closing price of the Common Stock as reported by the NASDAQ National Market on the trading day of the commencement of Executives employment with the Company.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to Section 5.1.1(a)(ii), the portion of Executives Severance Payment based on annual discretionary cash bonuses (Bonus Severance) awarded to Executive, if any, would be calculated in the following manner (in all examples, Executives Base Salary is assumed to be an annual rate of $325,000):
 
 Executive terminated in 2008.
Example #1
 
Bonus Severance = $113,750 (average of 35% deemed amount for two-year lookback period where Executive did not work for the Company).
 
 Executive awarded a 30% bonus for 2008, terminated during 2009.
Example #2
 
Bonus Severance = $105,625 (average of 30% Year 1 award ($97,500) and 35% deemed amount ($113,750) for the year during the two-year lookback period where Executive did not work for the Company).
 
 Executive awarded a 30% bonus for 2008, a 0% bonus for 2009, terminated during 2010.
Example #3
 
Bonus Severance = $48,750 (average of year 1 and year 2 bonuses actually awarded).
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
 
This Amendment to Employment Agreement (Amendment) is entered into by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the Company) with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Dr. Brian Schwartz, the Companys Chief Medical Officer (Executive).  The purpose of this Amendment is to amend the Employment Agreement dated as of June 17, 2008, between the Company and Executive (the Agreement).  This Amendment shall be effective as of the date of execution set forth below (the Effective Date).  Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Amendment shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Agreement.  In consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive (collectively, the Parties) hereby agree as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Agreement as of February 23, 2012.
 
 
 
                                                                         
                                                                                                                                          
                                                                          
                                                                
 
 
 
 
 
           The Performance-Based Stock Units described in Section 1 of the Amendment shall vest according to the following schedule:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This Stock Unit Agreement (this Agreement), dated as of February 23, 2012 (Grant Date) is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware Corporation (the Company), and Brian Schwartz (Executive).
 
1.             Operative Documents.
 
As stated herein, terms of this Agreement may be, subject to, make reference to, or incorporate, certain provisions of the following documents (collectively, the Operative Documents):
 
(a)       ArQule, Inc. Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the Plan);
(b)       Employment Agreement between the Company and Executive dated June 17, 2008 (the Employment Agreement);
(c)       Amendment to the Employment Agreement between the Company and Executive, dated February 23, 2012 (the Amendment); and
(d)       Votes taken on February, 2012 by the Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the Votes).
 
Capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the respective meanings given to them in, as the case may be, the relevant Operative Document.
 
2.             Grant of Performance-Based Stock Units.
 
In accordance with the Amendment and with reference to the Votes, the Company hereby awards to Executive 50,000 Performance-Based Stock Units, as provided for in Section 1 of the Amendment. The award of the Performance-Based Stock Units is made pursuant and subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan, and nothing herein shall be deemed to supersede such terms and conditions.  Upon execution of this Agreement, the Company shall cause the Performance-Based Stock Units to be recorded in a separate account maintained on the books of the Company.  The term Performance-Based Stock Units shall include any additional units issued to the Executive on account of the Performance-Based Stock Units awarded hereunder by reason of stock dividends, stock splits or recapitalizations (whether by way of mergers, consolidations, combinations or exchanges of shares or the like).  Each Performance-Based Stock Unit shall, upon vesting, entitle the Executive to receipt of one share of the Companys Common Stock as referred to in the Plan.
 
3.             Vesting Schedule; Forfeiture.
 
 
 
 
 
 
The interest of Executive in the Performance-Based Stock Units shall vest as set forth in the Amendment with reference to the Votes.  Subject to last sentence of Section 1 of the Amendment, if Executive ceases to be an employee of the Company for any reason, all Performance-Based Stock Units that have not yet vested shall be forfeited upon such termination of employment and Executive shall thereafter have no further rights or interest in such Performance-Based Stock Units.  For avoidance of any doubt, the Company and the Executive confirm that in no event shall the number of Performance-Based Stock Units or shares of the Companys Common Stock issued pursuant to the terms of the Operative Documents exceed 50,000.
4.             Restrictions.
 
Unless permitted under the terms of the Plan, Performance-Based Stock Units granted hereunder may not be sold, pledged or otherwise transferred and may not be subject to lien, garnishment, attachment or other legal process.
 
5.             Taxes.
 
Executive shall be liable for any and all taxes, including any withholding tax obligation, arising out of the vesting of Performance-Based Stock Units hereunder.  Executive may elect to satisfy such withholding tax obligation by having the Company retain shares of Common Stock underlying vested Performance-Based Stock Units having a fair market value equal to the Companys minimum withholding obligation.
 
6.             Miscellaneous.
 
(a)           Unless and until the Performance-Based Stock Units awarded hereunder have vested, the Executive will have no right of a shareholder with respect to the shares of Common Stock underlying the Performance-Based Stock Units including no right to vote or to receive any dividends paid with respect to such shares of Common Stock.
 
(b)           The parties agree to execute such further instruments and to take such action as may reasonably be necessary to carry out the intent of this Agreement.
 
(c)           Any notice required or permitted hereunder shall be given in writing and shall be deemed effectively given upon delivery to Executive at his address then on file with the Company.
 
(d)           Neither the Plan nor this Agreement nor any provisions under either shall be construed so as to grant Executive any right to remain in the employ of the Company.
 
(e)           This Agreement and the Amendment constitute the entire agreement of the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof.
 
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have executed this Agreement effective as of the Grant Date set forth above.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120227161620.txt.gz
TIME:20120227161620
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
 
 
                                                                                                            
                                                                                                                            
 
(Zip code)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
As previously reported, on February 24, 2012, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) filed a Current Report on Form 8-K (the Prior 8-K) to report an amendment to the employment agreement of its chief medical officer (the CMO Amendment).  This Amendment to the Prior 8-K has been filed to replace Exhibit 10.2 of the Prior 8-K with the correct version of the CMO Amendment.  In addition, Item 5.02(e) of the Prior 8-K is amended to reflect that the CMO Amendment was revised to delete the provision relating to the vesting of the units upon a termination without cause if certain other events had occurred.  This Amendment speaks as of the original filing date of the Prior 8-K and does not reflect events that may have occurred subsequent to the original filing date.
 
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 10.2   
Amendment to Employment Agreement, dated February 23, 2012, by and between the Registrant and Brian Schwartz.
 
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
February 27, 2012
 
 
3
 
 
 
 
 
 
4

Exhibit 10.2
 
 
 
 
This Amendment to Employment Agreement (Amendment) is entered into by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the Company) with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Dr. Brian Schwartz, the Companys Chief Medical Officer (Executive).  The purpose of this Amendment is to amend the Employment Agreement dated as of June 17, 2008, between the Company and Executive (the Agreement).  This Amendment shall be effective as of the date of execution set forth below (the Effective Date).  Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Amendment shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Agreement.  In consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive (collectively, the Parties) hereby agree as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Agreement as of February 23, 2012.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
           The Performance-Based Stock Units described in Section 1 of the Amendment shall vest according to the following schedule:
 
 
 
 
 
 
This Stock Unit Agreement (this Agreement), dated as of February 23, 2012, (Grant Date) is made by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware Corporation (the Company), and Brian Schwartz (Executive).
 
As stated herein, terms of this Agreement may be subject to, make reference to, or incorporate, certain provisions of the following documents (collectively, the Operative Documents):
 
 
 
 
Capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the respective meanings given to them in, as the case may be, the relevant Operative Document.
 
In accordance with the Amendment and with reference to the Votes, the Company hereby awards to Executive 50,000 Performance-Based Stock Units, as provided for in Section 1 of the Amendment.  The award of the Performance-Based Stock Units is made pursuant and subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan, and nothing herein shall be deemed to supersede such terms and conditions.  Upon execution of this Agreement, the Company shall cause the Performance-Based Stock Units to be recorded in a separate account maintained on the books of the Company.  The term Performance-Based Stock Units shall include any additional units issued to the Executive on account of the Performance-Based Stock Units awarded hereunder by reason of stock dividends, stock splits or recapitalizations (whether by way of mergers, consolidations, combinations or exchanges of shares or the like).  Each Performance-Based Stock Unit shall, upon vesting, entitle the Executive to receipt of one share of the Companys Common Stock as referred to in the Plan.
 
 
 
 
 
 
The interest of Executive in the Performance-Based Stock Units shall vest as set forth in the Amendment with reference to the Votes.  If Executive ceases to be an employee of the Company for any reason, all Performance-Based Stock Units that have not yet vested shall be forfeited upon such termination of employment and Executive shall thereafter have no further rights or interest in such Performance-Based Stock Units.
 
Unless permitted under the terms of the Plan, Performance-Based Stock Units granted hereunder may not be sold, pledged or otherwise transferred and may not be subject to lien, garnishment, attachment or other legal process.
 
 
Executive shall be liable for any and all taxes, including any withholding tax obligation, arising out of the vesting of Performance-Based Stock Units hereunder.  Executive may elect to satisfy such withholding tax obligation by having the Company retain shares of Common Stock underlying vested Performance-Based Stock Units having a fair market value equal to the Companys minimum withholding obligation.
 
(a)           Unless and until the Performance-Based Stock Units awarded hereunder have vested, the Executive will have no right of a stockholder with respect to the shares of Common Stock underlying the Performance-Based Stock Units including no right to vote or to receive any dividends paid with respect to such shares of Common Stock.
 
(b)           The parties agree to execute such further instruments and to take such action as may reasonably be necessary to carry out the intent of this Agreement.
 
(c)           Any notice required or permitted hereunder shall be given in writing and shall be deemed effectively given upon delivery to Executive at his address then on file with the Company.
 
(d)           Neither the Plan nor this Agreement nor any provisions under either shall be construed so as to grant Executive any right to remain in the employ of the Company.
 
(e)           This Agreement and the Amendment constitute the entire agreement of the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have executed this Agreement effective as of the Grant Date set forth above.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120301075007.txt.gz
TIME:20120301075007
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
(Zip code)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On March 1, 2012, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter and year ended December 31, 2011.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
 
 
 Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated March 1, 2012 announcing results of operations.
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
March 1, 2012
 
 
 
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
                                                                                     
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the year and for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2011.
Woburn, MA, March 1, 2012 
The Company reported a net loss of $10,762,000, or $0.20 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2011, compared with a net loss of $30,129,000, or $0.68 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2010.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2011, the Company reported net income of $3,768,000, or $0.07 per share, compared with a net loss of $5,756,000, or $0.13 per share, for the quarter ended December 31, 2010.
At December 31, 2011, the Company had a total of approximately $108,643,000 in cash and marketable securities.
Operational Highlights for 2011
Tivantinib (ARQ 197)
Pipeline / Discovery
 
 
 
 
 
Plans for 2012
Tivantinib
Patient enrollment in the MARQUEE trial is continuing as planned, and we are on schedule to meet our key timelines in non-small cell lung cancer and our other trials, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule. Our primary objectives with tivantinib in 2012 include:
Pipeline and Discovery Platform
Progress in other programs will focus on the following activities:
Financial Position
At the end of 2011, ArQule had $108.6 million in cash and marketable securities, said Mr. Pucci. During the past year we received non-dilutive milestone payments from Daiichi Sankyo related to dosing of the first patient in the MARQUEE trial, from Kyowa Hakko Kirin related to dosing of the first patient in the ATTENTION trial, and from Daiichi Sankyo in connection with the licensing of ARQ 092.  We expect that our available cash and marketable securities will be sufficient to finance our working capital requirements through 2013.
Revenues and Expenses
Revenues for the year ended December 31, 2011 were $47,310,000 compared with revenues of $29,221,000 for the year ended December 31, 2010.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2011, revenues were $16,504,000, compared with revenues of $7,520,000 for the quarter ended December 31, 2010.
 
 
 
 
 
The increase in revenues in 2011 was due to increases in revenues of $5.1 million from our AKIP collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo, $10.0 million from our license agreement for ARQ 092 with Daiichi Sankyo and $4.0 million from our license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kirin.  Offsetting these increases was a net decrease of $1.0 million in revenue from our Daiichi Sankyo tivantinib clinical development program.  Although gross revenue for that program increased by $15.2 million in 2011, the amount of contra-revenue increased by $16.2 million, reflecting an increase in our share of development costs associated with the MARQUEE trial.
TM
In the fourth quarter of 2011, for the first time since the inception of our tivantinib collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo, our cumulative share of Phase 3 collaboration costs exceeded the amount of milestones received to date.  Since these costs are payable solely from future milestones and royalties, costs in excess of milestones received were not recognized in the period.  These costs will be netted against future milestones and royalties when earned.  The increase in revenues in the fourth quarter of 2011 was principally due to the $10.0 million from our license agreement for ARQ 092 with Daiichi Sankyo.
Fiscal 2011 research and development expenses were $45,011,000, compared with $47,034,000 for fiscal 2010.  Fourth quarter 2011 research and development expenses were $9,674,000, compared with $10,797,000 for the fourth quarter 2010.  Research and development expenses decreased in fiscal 2011 primarily due to a decrease in outsourced clinical and product development costs related to our Phase 1 and Phase 2 programs for tivantinib.
General and administrative expenses for fiscal 2011 were $13,373,000, compared to $13,477,000 for fiscal 2010.  Fourth quarter 2011 general and administrative costs were $3,151,000, compared with $3,449,000 for the fourth quarter 2010.
2012 Financial Guidance
For 2012, ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $39 and $44 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $40 and $45 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $15 and $20 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.28) and $(0.37) for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2012 with between $65 and $70 million in cash and marketable securities.
Conference Call and Webcast
ArQule will hold a conference call today at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time.
Date:                                          Tuesday, March 1, 2012
Time:                                          9:00 a.m., Eastern Time
Conference Call Numbers
Domestic:                                   (877) 868-1831
International:                             (914) 495-8595
Webcast:                                   www.arqule.com
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning two hours after the completion of the call until March 8, 2012 and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (855) 859-2056 and outside the U.S. (404) 537-3406.  The confirmation code for replayed calls is 48056120.
 
 
 
 
 
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib, also known as ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Companys financial guidance for 2012 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2012), key corporate objectives for 2012, ability to fund operations with current cash and marketable securities, and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo, Inc.  These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 621, ARQ 736 and ARQ 092 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120410071604.txt.gz
TIME:20120410071604
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 10, 2012, we issued a press release announcing a proposed public offering of  shares of our common stock.  A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.  The following summary of our product candidates, clinical trials, pipeline, discovery platform and significant events and milestones appeared in our preliminary prospectus supplement.  
 
Overview
 
We are a clinical-stage biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of innovative cancer therapeutics. Our mission is to produce novel drugs with differentiated mechanisms of action that will extend the lives of our patients.  These drugs target biological pathways implicated in a wide range of cancers.  We employ technologies such as our ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) to design and develop drugs that have the potential to fulfill this mission.
Tivantinib (ARQ 197): Lead Product Candidate
We are developing our lead product candidate, tivantinib (ARQ 197), which has demonstrated anti-cancer activity across multiple types of tumors when administered in combination with approved cancer therapies and as a single agent.  Tivantinib is an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase, or c-Met, a molecule that has emerged in recent years as an important target for cancer therapy based on its multiple roles in cancerous cell proliferation, tumor spread, new blood vessel formation and resistance to certain drug therapies.
Patients are currently being enrolled in two Phase 3 registration trials, the MARQUEE Phase 3 Trial and the ATTENTION Phase 3 Trial, of tivantinib for non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) of non-squamous cell histology that cover global territories.  In addition, recently generated, randomized Phase 2 data with tivantinib in hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) are expected to form the basis of a decision this year regarding the possible initiation of Phase 3 clinical testing in this second disease indication.
Our partners for tivantinib include Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd., who we refer to as Daiichi Sankyo, in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan and certain other Asian countries, where we have licensed commercial rights to Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd., who we refer to as Kyowa Hakko Kirin.  With these partners, we are implementing a clinical program in multiple tumor types that is designed to realize the broad therapeutic potential of tivantinib.  Additionally, the National Institutes of Health (NIH) has selected tivantinib for a number of independent investigator-sponsored trials supported by the NIH.
 
MARQUEE Phase 3 Trial in NSCLC
 
(an inhibitor of the epidermal growth factor, or EGFR, tyrosine kinase marketed as Tarceva)
On January 12, 2011, we announced that the first patient had been enrolled in the Phase 3 MARQUEE trial of tivantinib in combination with erlotinib for patients with non-squamous NSCLC who have received one or two prior systemic anti-cancer therapies. The MARQUEE trial is a randomized, double-blinded, controlled study of previously treated patients with locally advanced or metastatic, non-squamous NSCLC who will receive tivantinib (360 milligrams twice daily) plus erlotinib or placebo plus erlotinib
. The primary objective is to evaluate overall survival in the intent-to-treat population. Secondary endpoints include overall survival in the subpopulation of patients with EGFR wild type, progression free survival in the intent-to-treat population and further assessment of the safety of tivantinib in combination with erlotinib.
 
 
2
 
 
Approximately 1,000 patients will be enrolled in MARQUEE from more than 200 sites in the U.S., Canada, Europe, Russia, Australia and Latin America. There is a planned interim analysis expected in the second half of 2012 after approximately 50% of survival events have occurred, and final data is expected in the middle part of 2013.  Patient enrollment to date since the initiation of this trial is consistent with the timing of these anticipated milestones, and we expect to complete enrollment in mid-2012.  As a result of the dosing of the first patient in this trial, in February 2011 we received a $25 million milestone payment from Daiichi Sankyo. Daiichi Sankyo, in collaboration with us, is conducting the Phase 3 trial.
 
The MARQUEE trial is being conducted under a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA), established following agreement reached with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) in October 2010. An SPA is an agreement establishing the design, endpoints and statistical analysis of a clinical trial intended to provide the necessary data, depending on the outcome of the trial, which could support the filing of a New Drug Application or NDA. Final marketing approval depends on the results of the trial.
 
We have incorporated into the SPA a broad genotyping and biomarker program designed to expand what is an evolving understanding of the biology of c-Met and of tivantinib. In addition, we continue to investigate and add to our understanding of the profile of tivantinib and its metabolites to better characterize their scope and effect as anti-cancer agents. These efforts include the generation and interpretation of clinical and pre-clinical data by us, our partners and third parties, which suggest potential anti-cancer activity in addition to c-Met inhibition. In this regard, certain preclinical experiments have demonstrated that tivantinib has activity against cells that harbor little or undetectable levels of c-Met, suggesting an additional mechanism or mechanisms in those settings, including mitotic arrest, or the possible involvement of cellular mechanisms and signaling pathways activated by c-Met. Although it is unclear what effect such activity may have in clinical settings, data from randomized, controlled clinical trials demonstrate that tivantinib has greater benefit for patients who have tested positive for high c-Met status while showing less activity in c-Met low populations. As a result, we believe that c-Met status remains the most significant biomarker for further development of the drug, and we, our partners and academic collaborators intend to focus on such patient populations in a number of tumor types. We will pursue these and future findings to inform our decisions regarding additional clinical settings and patient populations for tivantinib.
 
ATTENTION Phase 3 Trial in NSCLC
 
On August 9, 2011, Kyowa Hakko Kirin announced the dosing of the first patient in its Phase 3 ATTENTION trial in Asia of tivantinib and erlotinib in non-squamous NSCLC patients with wild-type EGFR. This trial will compare overall survival of patients treated with tivantinib and erlotinib to overall survival in patients treated with placebo and erlotinib. Approximately 460 patients will be enrolled at clinical centers in Japan, South Korea and Taiwan. The design of this trial is based on the results of clinical studies conducted by Kyowa Hakko Kirin in Japan and those conducted by Daiichi Sankyo and us in the U.S. and Europe. As a result of the dosing of the first patient in this trial, in August 2011 we received a $10 million milestone payment from Kyowa Hakko Kirin.
 
 
3
 
 
KRAS Mutation-Positive NSCLC Phase 2 Trial
 
In July 2011, we dosed the first patient in a Phase 2, randomized trial of tivantinib and erlotinib in NSCLC patients with a mutated form of the KRAS gene. We selected this patient population based on a strong signal of clinical benefit observed among KRAS-mutant patients who comprised a sub-group in our randomized Phase 2 NSCLC trial.  This trial will compare progression-free survival of patients treated with tivantinib and erlotinib to progression-free survival of patients treated with single agent chemotherapy. Approximately 100 patients will be enrolled at 14 clinical sites in the U.S.
 
Hepatocellular Carcinoma (HCC) Trials
 
Our therapeutic approaches to HCC include evaluating tivantinib as both a single agent and in combination with an approved targeted therapy, sorafenib. We recently completed enrollment of patients in a randomized, double-blind, placebo controlled, Phase 2 single agent trial in second-line HCC.  On January 17, 2012, we announced the results of this trial, which demonstrated that treatment with tivantinib as single agent therapy produced a statistically significant 56 percent improvement in time-to-progression in the intent-to-treat population, the primary endpoint in this trial (hazard ratio = 0.64; log rank p-value = 0.04).  Patients with higher levels of c-Met who were treated with tivantinib experienced pronounced benefit in prolonged time-to-progression.
The 107 patients in this trial had unresectable HCC and had experienced disease progression after first-line therapy or were unable to tolerate such therapy. Time-to-progression was defined as the time from patient randomization until objective tumor progression using RECIST (Response Evaluation Criteria in Solid Tumors) 1.1 criteria evaluated by central radiological review. We plan to present complete data from this trial, including secondary endpoint, sub-group and biomarker analyses, on June 2 at the American Society of Clinical Oncologists annual meeting.
nd
At the start of the Phase 2 trial, patients were randomized to receive tivantinib at 360 milligrams twice daily or placebo. Due to the rate of neutropenia, or an abnormally low count of white blood cells that help fight infections, the tivantinib dose was reduced to 240 milligrams twice daily for all patients. Adverse events were reported at similar rates in the treatment and placebo arms, except for a higher incidence of fatigue and hematologic events, including neutropenia and anemia, in tivantinib-treated patients. The incidence of these types of events declined following dose reduction.
 
We continue to monitor the safety profile of tivantinib in patients with HCC, among whom underlying cirrhosis and compromised liver function may limit the bodys ability to process tivantinib and thereby increase such toxicity. Among these patients, the recommended dose of tivantinib in HCC is 240 milligrams twice daily. The 360 milligram dose and the 240 milligram dose performed similarly with regard to efficacy in the intent-to-treat population.
 
We presented data from our ongoing Phase 1 tivantinib-sorafenib combination trial at the 2011 Annual Meeting of ASCO on June 6, 2011 that included cohorts of patients with HCC. These data reflected anti-cancer activity in this cohort, as measured by stable disease and duration of therapy. We plan to present final data in expanded cohorts of these patients in 2012 or early 2013.
 
Colorectal Cancer Trial
 
In February 2010, Daiichi Sankyo initiated a Phase 1/2 clinical trial designed to evaluate the safety of tivantinib administered in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab in approximately 150 patients with metastatic colorectal cancer who possess the wild-type form of the KRAS gene. Data from the Phase 1 safety run-in portion of this trial were presented at the ASCO 2011 Gastrointestinal Cancers Symposium in January 2011, showing that this combination was well tolerated and demonstrated encouraging anti-tumor activity in patients with relapsed metastatic colorectal cancer. Following the successful completion of Phase 1, the randomized, double-blind, placebo controlled Phase 2 portion of the trial was initiated in August 2010, comparing tivantinib in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab to placebo with the same two drugs. The primary objective of the Phase 2 trial is progression-free survival, and secondary objectives include overall survival and overall response rate. Patient enrollment in this trial has been completed, and data is expected to be available in the second half of 2012 or early 2013.
 
 
4
 
 
Combination Regimen Trials
 
The tivantinib clinical program includes two Phase 1 open-label trials evaluating tivantinib in combination therapy regimens. The first combination, with sorafenib, is being tested in NSCLC, HCC, renal cell carcinoma (RCC), malignant melanoma and breast cancer. The second combination, with gemcitabine, was tested in uterine, ovarian, bladder, NSCLC, pancreatic and breast cancer. Any potential plans for the further development of these combination therapies will be based on analysis of final results observed in expanded cohorts of patients within the Phase 1 trials.
 
We presented interim data from both combination trials at the 2011 Annual Meeting of ASCO on June 6, 2011. The tivantinib-sorafenib trial included cohorts of patients with HCC, melanoma and RCC, in whom preliminary evidence of anti-cancer activity was observed. Dosing in the cohort of HCC patients included both 360 milligrams twice daily and 240 milligrams twice daily, with the lower dose administered to patients with more compromised liver function. We expect to have final data in expanded cohorts of these patients in 2012.
 
National Institutes of Health Program
 
The National Cancer Institute (NCI), through its Cancer Therapy Evaluation Program (CTEP), has selected tivantinib for study under a Cooperative Research and Development Agreement (CRADA). The CRADA provides financial support for a number of independent investigator-sponsored clinical trials that will examine the safety and spectrum of tivantinibs anti-tumor activity, including new potential indications based on the profile of tivantinib and the role of c-Met in different diseases. Additionally, it provides support for pre-clinical studies designed to expand the basic understanding and development of tivantinib, including exploration of its potential activity beyond c-Met inhibition.  Patient enrollment is ongoing with tivantinib as a single agent and in combinations with other anti-cancer therapies in a number of CRADA-sponsored trials.  These include Phase 2 single agent trials in prostate cancer (randomized), multiple myeloma and breast cancer, with trial protocols in other indications under review. In addition, trials with tivantinib are ongoing or planned in combination with other agents, including pazopanib, bevacizumab and temsirolimus.
 
Gastric Cancer Trial Conducted by Kyowa Hakko Kirin
 
Following the completion of a Phase 1 safety trial in Japan, Kyowa Hakko Kirin initiated a Phase 2, single agent trial with tivantinib in gastric cancer. We received a $5 million payment related to this clinical milestone in September 2010. Approximately 30 patients were enrolled in this trial at clinical sites in Japan and S. Korea, and the primary objective was to determine disease control rate, defined as a combination of objective responses and stable disease.  We believe data from this trial will be presented by Kyowa Hakko Kirin later this year
 
Earlier Stage Product Candidates: ARQ 621, ARQ 736, ARQ 087, ARQ 761 and ARQ 092
 
Our proprietary early clinical-stage product pipeline encompasses ARQ 621, an inhibitor of the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, ARQ 736, an inhibitor of the RAF kinases, and ARQ 761, an activator of the E2F-1 damage response/checkpoint pathway. We have completed a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 621 and are in the later stages of conducting a Phase 1 trial with ARQ 736, while ARQ 761 is the subject of an investigator-sponsored Phase 1 clinical trial. Our pre-clinical pipeline includes  ARQ 087, an inhibitor of fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR) based on our AKIP technology for which we may file an Investigational New Drug application in 2012.
 
 
5
 
 
Our strategy with these product candidates is to generate pre-clinical and early clinical data that will inform decisions regarding possible initiation of Phase 2 testing with one or more of them either independently or on a partnered basis.  Eg5 is not yet validated as a therapeutic target, and we are seeking additional scientific evidence that the class of Eg5 inhibitors merits further clinical testing.  The barriers to entry in the field of RAF kinase inhibitors have become more difficult as vemurafinib has been recently approved for the treatment of late-stage melanoma patients with the BRAF V600 mutation, and additional members of this class are marketed or in development.  ARQ 761 is a second-generation compound from our E2F-1 DNA damage response/checkpoint pathway, the rights to which we retain following the termination of a license to Roche.
 
Our partnered early stage product pipeline includes ARQ 092, an AKT inhibitor discovered through our AKIP collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo.  On November 10, 2011, Daiichi Sankyo and we announced the execution of a license agreement for the development of ARQ 092, the first compound to emerge from this collaboration.  The license agreement provides exclusive rights to Daiichi Sankyo for the development, manufacturing and marketing of ARQ 092 on a worldwide basis.  Under this agreement, we received a $10 million upfront fee from Daiichi Sankyo in November 2011, as well as support for an ongoing Phase 1 clinical trial that we are conducting in the U.S.  The agreement provides for up to $265 million in potential development and sales milestone payment, as well as tiered, double-digit royalties on net sales.
 
Discovery Platform
We have discovered a novel binding mode of tivantinib to its target that effects inhibition of the c-Met receptor kinase without competing with adenosine triphosphate (ATP) for binding to that kinase.  We have completed a research program with the objective of querying the human kinome (consisting of 518 human kinase genes) for similar binding sites, and we have identified comparable sites in approximately 270 kinases, some having roles in different therapeutic areas, leading to the establishment of our proprietary drug discovery platform, AKIP.
We believe that this platform allows our scientists to rationally design novel kinase inhibitors that encompass new chemical spaces and provide for an expanding intellectual property estate. We are applying our drug discovery capabilities based on AKIP to generate novel, selective and potent compounds that target the inactive form of kinases. We have assessed AKIPs potential to target multiple kinases in oncology and other therapeutic areas, and we are generating and validating compounds that inhibit these kinase targets.
We are pursuing a drug discovery collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo that utilizes the capabilities of the AKIP technology to discover compounds for as many as three such kinase targets in the field of oncology (including AKT), with an option for a fourth, in the field of oncology.  We are also pursuing additional collaborations based on applications of AKIP in multiple therapeutic areas.
 
 
6
 
 
Significant Events and Milestones
 
announcing offering of common stock dated
Exhibit No. 99.1
   Text of press release
April 10, 2012.
 
 
7
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
8

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
April 10, 2012ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL)  today announced its intention to offer, subject to market and other conditions, 6 million shares of its common stock in an underwritten public offering. The Company also expects to grant the underwriters a 30-day option to purchase up to an additional 15% of the shares of common stock offered in the public offering. The offering is subject to market conditions, and there can be no assurance as to whether or when the offering may be completed, or as to the actual size or terms of the offering.
Woburn, MA,
Citigroup and Leerink Swann are acting as joint book-running managers for the offering.
The securities described above are being offered by ArQule pursuant to a registration statement previously filed and declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission. This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the securities in this offering, nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction. The offering may be made only by means of a prospectus, copies of which may be obtained, when available, from Citigroup, Brooklyn Army Terminal, 140 58 Street, 8 Floor, Brooklyn, New York 11220, telephone at 800-831-9146, or Leerink Swann LLC, Attention: Syndicate Prospectus Department, One Federal Street, 37 Floor, Boston, Massachusetts 02110, by telephone at 800-808-7525, or by facsimile at 617-918-4900.
th
th
th
This press release includes forward-looking statements. For these statements, ArQule claims the protection of the safe harbor for forward-looking statements provided by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. It should be noted that there are risks and uncertainties related to the public offering. A review of these risks can be found in ArQules Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, the prospectus to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission in connection with the offering and other reports and documents filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120411210928.txt.gz
TIME:20120411210928
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
 
 
 
 
 
ArQule, Inc.
 
 
 
 
19 Presidential Way,
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01.Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On April 10, 2012, we entered into an Underwriting Agreement (the ) with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and Leerink Swann LLC, acting as representatives of the several underwriters named in Schedule A thereto (collectively, the ) pursuant to which the Company agreed to offer and sell 7,150,000 shares of its common stock in an underwritten public offering at a public offering price of $7.30 per share (the ). Pursuant to the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, the Company granted the Underwriters a 30-day option to purchase up to an additional 1,072,500 shares.  The Company expects to receive approximately $48.7 million in net proceeds from the Offering, after underwriting fees and discounts and other offering expenses, or approximately $56.1 million if the Underwriters exercise their option to purchase additional shares in full.  The shares are expected to be delivered to the Underwriters on or about April 16, 2012, subject to the satisfaction of customary closing conditions. Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and Leerink Swann LLC are acting as joint book-running managers for the offering.  Lazard Capital Markets LLC, RBC Capital Markets, LLC and Oppenheimer & Company, Inc. are acting as co-managers.
Underwriting Agreement
Underwriters
Offering
 
The offering was made pursuant to our effective Registration Statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-166532) (the ), which was previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ), our Registration Statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-180635) filed with the SEC pursuant to Rule 462(b) on April 10, 2012, and a prospectus supplement filed with the SEC.
Registration Statement
SEC
 
We have made certain customary representations, warranties and covenants in the Underwriting Agreement concerning us and the Registration Statement related to the offering of the shares.  We also have agreed to indemnify the Underwriters against certain liabilities, including liabilities under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.  The representations, warranties and covenants contained in the Underwriting Agreement were made only for purposes of such agreement and as of specific dates, were solely for the benefit of the parties to such agreement, and may be subject to limitations agreed upon by the contracting parties.
 
Pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement, certain of our directors and executive officers entered into agreements in substantially the form agreed to by the Underwriters providing for a 90-day lock-up period with respect to sales of specified securities, subject to certain exceptions.
The foregoing description of the Underwriting Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Underwriting Agreement, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein.
We issued a press release on April 11, 2012 announcing the pricing of the offering, which is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9.01Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Dated: April 10, 2012
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
April 10, 2012
 
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
Leerink Swann LLC
 
 
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ), confirms its agreement with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. (Citigroup) and Leerink Swann LLC () and each of the other Underwriters named in hereto (collectively, the , which term shall also include any underwriter substituted as hereinafter provided in Section 10 hereof), for whom Citigroup and Leerink Swann are acting as representatives (in such capacity, the ), with respect to (i) the issue and sale by the Company and the purchase by the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, of the respective numbers of shares of Common Stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company () set forth in said , and (ii) the grant by the Company to the Underwriters, severally and not jointly, of the option described in Section 2(b) hereof to purchase all or any part of 1,072,500 additional shares of Common Stock. The aforesaid 7,150,000 shares of Common Stock (the ) to be purchased by the Underwriters and all or any part of the 1,072,500 shares of Common Stock subject to the option described in Section 2(b) hereof (the ) are hereinafter called, collectively, the .
Company
Leerink Swann
Schedule A
Underwriters
Representatives
Common Stock
Schedule A
Initial Securities
Option Securities
Securities
 
The Company understands that the Underwriters propose to make a public offering of the Securities as soon as the Representatives deem advisable after this Agreement has been executed and delivered.
 
The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ) a registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-166532), including the related preliminary prospectus or prospectuses, covering the registration of the Securities under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ). Promptly after execution and delivery of this Agreement, the Company will prepare and file a prospectus in accordance with the provisions of Rule 430B () of the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1933 Act (the ) and paragraph (b) of Rule 424 () of the 1933 Act Regulations. The information included in such prospectus that was omitted from such registration statement at the time it became effective but that is deemed to be part of and included in such registration statement at the time it became effective pursuant to Rule 430B (or Rule 430A of the 1933 Act Regulations, as applicable) is referred to as . Each prospectus used in connection with the offering of the Securities that omitted the Rule 430B Information is herein called a . Such registration statement, at any given time, including all exhibits, financial schedules and the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act, as amended or supplemented from time to time, and the documents otherwise deemed to be a part thereof or included therein by 1933 Act Regulations (including by Rules 430A or 430B, as applicable), is herein called the .   Any registration statement filed pursuant to Rule 462(b) of the 1933 Act Regulations is herein referred to as the , and after such filing, if applicable, the term  shall include the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement. The final prospectus in the form first furnished to the Underwriters for use in connection with the offering of the Securities, including the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act at the time of the execution of this Agreement and any preliminary prospectuses that form a part thereof, is herein called the . For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement to any of the foregoing shall be deemed to include the copy filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval system ().
Commission
1933 Act
Rule 430B
1933 Act Regulations
Rule 424(b)
Rule 430B Information
preliminary prospectus
Registration Statement
Rule 462(b) Registration Statement
Registration Statement
Prospectus
EDGAR
 
 
 
 
 
All references in this Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is contained, included or stated in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is incorporated by reference in or otherwise deemed by 1933 Act Regulations to be a part of or included in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be; and all references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include the filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ), which is incorporated by reference in or otherwise deemed by 1933 Act Regulations to be a part of or included in the Registration Statement, such preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be.
1934 Act
 
Section 1.
 
.
Representations and Warranties
 
(a)
   
. The Company represents and warrants to each Underwriter as of the date hereof, as of the Applicable Time referred to in Section 1(a)(i) hereof, as of the Closing Time referred to in Section 2(c) hereof, and as of each Date of Delivery (if any) referred to in Section 2(b) hereof, and agrees with each Underwriter, as follows:
Representations and Warranties by the Company
 
(i)
   
. The Company meets the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act, including the transaction requirements set forth in General Instruction I.B.1 of such form. Each of the Registration Statement, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto has become effective under the 1933 Act and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto has been issued under the 1933 Act and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, are contemplated by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information has been complied with.  The date of this Agreement is not more than three years subsequent to the initial effective date of the Registration Statement.
Compliance with Registration Requirements
 
At the respective times the Registration Statement, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any post-effective amendments thereto became effective and at the Closing Time (and, if any Option Securities are purchased, at the Date of Delivery), the Registration Statement, the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any amendments and supplements thereto complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and did not and, as amended, as applicable, will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading. Neither the Prospectus nor any amendments or supplements thereto (including any prospectus wrapper), at the time the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement was issued and at the Closing Time (and, if any Option Securities are purchased, at the Date of Delivery), included or, as amended or supplemented, as applicable, will include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or, as amended or supplemented, as applicable, will omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
 
As of the Applicable Time (as defined below), neither (x) the Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus(es) (as defined below) issued at or prior to the Applicable Time, the Statutory Prospectus (as defined below) and the information included on hereto (collectively, the ), nor (y) any individual Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the General Disclosure Package, included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Schedule B
General Disclosure Package
 
 
2
 
 
As used in this subsection and elsewhere in this Agreement:
 
 means 8:00 p.m. (Eastern time) on April 10, 2012 or such other time as agreed upon in writing by the Company and the Representatives.
Applicable Time
 
 means any issuer free writing prospectus, as defined in Rule 433 of the 1933 Act Regulations (), relating to the Securities that (i) is required to be filed with the Commission by the Company, (ii) is a road show for an offering that is a written communication within the meaning of Rule 433(d)(8)(i) whether or not required to be filed with the Commission or (iii) is exempt from filing pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(i) because it contains a description of the Securities or of the offering that does not reflect the final terms, in each case in the form filed or required to be filed with the Commission or, if not required to be filed, in the form required to be retained in the Companys records pursuant to Rule 433(g).
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
Rule 433
 
 means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is intended for general distribution to prospective investors (other than a electronic road show, as defined in Rule 433), as evidenced by its being specified in hereto.
Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus
bona fide
Schedule C
 
 means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not an Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus.
Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus
 
 as of any time means the prospectus relating to the Securities that is included in the Registration Statement immediately prior to that time, including any document incorporated by reference therein and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof.
Statutory Prospectus
 
Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the public offer and sale of the Securities or until any earlier date that the issuer notified or notifies the Representatives as described in Section 3(e), did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, including any document incorporated by reference therein, and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified.
 
The representations and warranties in this subsection shall not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement to the foregoing, made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
 
Each preliminary prospectus (including the prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statement as originally filed or as part of any amendment thereto) complied when so filed in all material respects with the 1933 Act Regulations and each preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus delivered to the Underwriters for use in connection with this offering was identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
 
At the time of filing the Registration Statement, any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement and any post-effective amendments thereto and at the date hereof, the Company was not and is not an ineligible issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the 1933 Act Regulations.
 
(ii)
   
. The documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, when they became effective or at the time they were or hereafter are filed with the Commission, complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1934 Act, and the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1934 Act (the ).  There is no document, contract or other agreement required to be described in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement which is not described or filed as required by the 1933 Act or the 1933 Act Regulations.
Incorporated Documents and Material Agreements
1934 Act Regulations
 
 
3
 
 
(iii)
   
.  The interactive data in eXtensible Business Reporting Language incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus fairly presents the information called for in all material respects and has been prepared in accordance with the Commissions rules and guidelines applicable thereto.
eXtensible Business Reporting Language
 
(iv)
   
. The accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement are an independent registered public accounting firm as required by the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and Rule 3600T of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.
Independent Accountants
 
(v)
   
. The financial statements and schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus present fairly the financial condition of the Company as of the respective dates thereof and the results of operations and cash flows of the Company for the respective periods covered thereby, all in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles () applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved. The summary and selected consolidated financial data included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus present fairly the information shown therein and have been derived on a basis consistent with the audited financial statements presented therein.  The Company does not have any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent (including any off-balance sheet obligations), not disclosed in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. There are no financial statements (historical or pro forma) that are required to be included in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus that are not included as required.
Financial Statements
GAAP
 
(vi)
   
. Subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, except as set forth in or contemplated thereby (exclusive of any amendments or supplements thereto subsequent to the date of this Agreement), (i) there has not occurred any material adverse change, or any development involving a prospective material adverse change, in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business or operations of the Company (a ), (ii) there has not been and will not have been any change in the capitalization of the Company (other than in connection with the grant or exercise of options or other awards to purchase the Common Stock granted pursuant to the Companys stock incentive plans from the shares reserved therefor), (iii) the Company has not incurred and will not incur, except in the ordinary course of business as described in the General Disclosure Package, any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, (iv) the Company has not entered into and will not enter into, except in the ordinary course of business as described in the General Disclosure Package, any material transactions other than pursuant to this Agreement and the transactions referred to herein and (v) the Company has not and will not have paid or declared any dividends or other distributions of any kind on any class of its capital stock.
No Material Adverse Change in Business
Material Adverse Effect
 
(vii)
   
. The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, with corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; and is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business, except to the extent that the failure to be so qualified or be in good standing would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
Good Standing of the Company
 
(viii)         
. The Company has no subsidiaries.
No Subsidiaries
 
(ix)
   
. The authorized, issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company is as set forth in the Prospectus (except for subsequent issuances, if any, pursuant to this Agreement, pursuant to reservations, agreements or employee, director and/or consultant benefit or equity incentive plans referred to in the Prospectus or pursuant to the exercise or conversion of convertible securities or options referred to in the Prospectus). The shares of issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable; the stockholders of the Company have no statutory, contractual preemptive or similar rights with respect to its Common Stock; none of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company are or will have been issued in violation of any statutory, contractual preemptive or similar rights of any security holder of the Company.
Capitalization
 
 
4
 
 
(x)   
   
. This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
Authorization of Agreement
 
(xi)  
   
. The Securities to be purchased by the Underwriters from the Company have been duly authorized for issuance and sale to the Underwriters pursuant to this Agreement and, when issued and delivered by the Company pursuant to this Agreement against payment of the consideration set forth herein, will be validly issued and fully paid and non-assessable; the Common Stock conforms as to legal matters in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and such description conforms to the rights set forth in the instruments defining the same; no holder of the Securities will be subject to personal liability by reason of being such a holder; and the issuance of the Securities is not subject to any preemptive or other similar rights of any security holder of the Company that have not been validly waived.
Authorization and Description of Securities
 
(xii)
   
. The Company is not (i) in violation of its charter or by-laws or (ii) in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan or credit agreement, note, lease or other agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party or by which it may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company is subject (collectively, ), except for any such violation or default that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; and the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein (including the issuance and sale of the Securities and the use of the proceeds from the sale of the Securities as described in the Prospectus under the caption Use of Proceeds) and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action by the Company and do not and will not, whether with or without the giving of notice or passage of time or both, conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default or Repayment Event (as defined below) under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company pursuant to, the Agreements and Instruments, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the charter or by-laws of the Company or any applicable law, statute, rule, regulation, judgment, order, writ or decree of any government, government instrumentality or court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its assets, properties or operations, except for any such conflict, breach, violation or default that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. As used herein, a  means any event or condition which gives the holder of any note, debenture or other evidence of indebtedness (or any person acting on such holders behalf) the right to require the repurchase, redemption or repayment of all or a portion of such indebtedness by the Company.
Absence of Defaults and Conflicts
Agreements and Instruments
Repayment Event
 
(xiii)
   
. No labor problem or dispute with the employees of the Company exist or, to the Companys knowledge, is threatened or imminent, except for any such labor problem or dispute that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Absence of Labor Dispute
 
(xiv)
   
. There are no legal or governmental proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, to which the Company is a party or to which any of the properties of the Company is subject (i) other than proceedings accurately described in all material respects in the General Disclosure Package and proceedings that would not have a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, taken as a whole, or, if determined adversely to the Company, would not materially and adversely affect the power or ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement or to consummate the transactions contemplated by the General Disclosure Package or (ii) that are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the General Disclosure Package and are not so described; and there are no statutes, regulations, contracts or other documents that are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the General Disclosure Package or to be filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement that are not described or filed as required.  The General Disclosure Package contains in all material respects the same description of the foregoing matters contained in the Prospectus.
Absence of Proceedings
 
 
5
 
 
(xv)  
   
.  The Company is subject to and in compliance in all material respects with the reporting requirements of Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the 1934 Act. The Common Stock is registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the 1934 Act and is listed on the Nasdaq Global Market, and the Company has taken no action designed to, or reasonably likely to have the effect of, terminating the registration of the Common Stock under the 1934 Act or delisting the Common Stock from the Nasdaq Global Market, nor has the Company received any notification that the Commission or the Nasdaq Stock Market LLC (Nasdaq) is contemplating terminating such registration or listing. No consent, approval, authorization or order of, or filing, notification or registration with, the Nasdaq Global Market is required for the listing and trading of the Securities on the Nasdaq Global Market, except for (i) a Notification Form: Listing of Additional Shares and (ii) a Notification Form: Change in the Number of Shares Outstanding. The Company is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable corporate governance requirements set forth in the Nasdaq Marketplace Rules.
Nasdaq and 1934 Act
 
(xvi)
   
. The Company owns, possesses or has valid, binding and enforceable rights to use the Company Intellectual Property (as defined below).  Except as described in the Registration Statement, General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, (A)  the Company has not received any written notice, nor to the Companys knowledge, any other notice, of any infringement by the Company with respect to any Intellectual Property (as defined below) of any third party, (B) the discoveries, inventions, products or processes of the Company described in the Registration Statement, General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus do not, to the Companys knowledge, infringe or interfere with any right or valid patent claim of any third party, (C) the Company is not obligated to pay a royalty, grant a license or provide other consideration to any third party in connection with the Company Intellectual Property, (D) no third party has any ownership rights in or to any Company Intellectual Property.  All Company Intellectual Property consisting of patents and patent applications (the ) has been duly and properly filed; the Company is not aware of any facts required to be disclosed to the United States Patent and Trademark Office (the ) that were not disclosed to the PTO and which would preclude the grant of a patent for the Company Patents; and the Company is not aware of any facts which would preclude it from having clear title to the Company Patents that have been identified by the Company as being owned by the Company.  For purposes of this Agreement,  means patents, patent rights, trademarks, servicemarks, trade dress rights, copyrights, trade names and domain names, and all registrations and applications for each of the foregoing, trade secrets, know-how (including other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures), inventions and technology, and  means Intellectual Property that is reasonably necessary or used in any material respect to conduct the business of the Company, as described in the Registration Statement, General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
Possession of Intellectual Property
Company Patents
PTO
Intellectual Property
Company Intellectual Property
 
(xvii)
   
.  No approval of the shareholders of the Company under the rules and regulations of Nasdaq is required for the Company to issue and deliver to the Underwriters the Securities.
No Shareholder Approval Required
 
(xviii)
  
. No consent, approval, authorization or order of, or any filing or declaration with, any court or governmental agency or body is required for the consummation by the Company of the transactions on its part contemplated herein, including the offering and sale of the Securities, except such as have been obtained or as may be required under the 1933 Act, the 1933 Act Regulations, state securities laws or the rules and regulations of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. () or The Nasdaq Stock Market.
Absence of Further Requirements
FINRA
 
(xix)  
   
. The Company has not taken, nor will the Company take, directly or indirectly, any action which is designed to or which has constituted or which would be expected to cause or result in stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Securities.
Absence of Manipulation
 
(xx)  
   
. The Company possesses all certificates, authorizations, registrations, permits, licenses, approvals and consents (collectively, ) issued by the appropriate federal, state, local or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business of the Company as described in the Registration Statement, General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, including without limitation, all such certificates, authorizations, registrations, permits, licenses, approvals and consents required by the United States Food and Drug Administration (the ), the United States Drug Enforcement Administration (the ) or any other federal, state, local or foreign agencies with jurisdiction over the types of products being developed by the Company, except where the failure so to possess such Governmental Licenses would not, singly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; the Company is in compliance with the terms and conditions of all such Governmental Licenses, except where the failure so to comply would not, singly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; all of the Governmental Licenses are valid and in full force and effect, except when the invalidity of such Governmental Licenses or the failure of such Governmental Licenses to be in full force and effect would not, singly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; and the Company has not received any notice of and has no knowledge of any proceedings or threatened proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such Governmental Licenses which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would have a Material Adverse Effect.
Possession of Licenses and Permits
Governmental Licenses
FDA
DEA
 
 
6
 
 
(xxi)
   
 
. The Company has operated and currently is in compliance in all material respects with the United States Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, all applicable rules and regulations of the FDA, the DEA and other federal, state, local and foreign governmental bodies exercising comparable authority;the non-clinical studies  and clinical trials conducted by or on behalf of the Company that are described in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus were, and, if still pending, are being, conducted in all material respects in accordance with experimental protocols, procedures and controls pursuant to, where applicable, accepted professional and scientific standards for products or product candidates comparable to those being developed by the Company and the protocols submitted to the FDA and all applicable laws and regulations; the descriptions of such  non-clinical studies and clinical trials, and the results thereof, conducted by or on behalf of the Company described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus are accurate and complete in all material respects; the Company has submitted to the FDA an Investigational New Drug Application () for each new drug for which it is sponsoring or conducting clinical trials and has updated such INDs as required by the FDA; the Company is not aware of any tests, studies or trials not described or referred to in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, the results of which reasonably call into question the results of the  studies and trials described or referred to in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; and the Company has not received any written or oral notice from the FDA or any foreign, state or local governmental body exercising comparable authority, requiring the termination, suspension, clinical hold or material modification of any non-clinical study or clinical trial, which termination, suspension or clinical hold or material modification would have a Material Adverse Effect;  the Company is and at all times has been in material compliance with all statutes, rules and regulations applicable to the ownership, testing, development, manufacturing, packaging, processing, use, distribution, marketing, labeling, promotion, storage, import, export and disposal () of any product or product candidate being developed by, manufactured by or for or distributed by the Company; has not received an FDA Form 483, warning letter or other notice from the FDA or any other federal, state, local or foreign governmental authority alleging material noncompliance with any Applicable Laws; and has submitted all material reports, records, and other  information required by any Applicable Law and all such reports, records and other information were materially complete and accurate on the date filed; except where, being in contravention of any of the foregoing representations or warranties, either singularly or in the aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
Non-clinical Studies and Tests and Clinical Trials
IND
Applicable Laws
 
(xxii)
   
. The Company has good and marketable title to all real property owned by the Company and good title to all other properties owned by it that are material to the business of the Company, in each case, free and clear of all mortgages, pledges, liens, security interests, claims, restrictions or encumbrances of any kind except such as (a) are described in the Registration Statement, General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus or (b) do not singly or in the aggregate, materially affect the value of such property and do not materially interfere with the use made and proposed to be made of such property by the Company; and all of the leases and subleases material to the business of the Company and under which the Company holds properties described in the Registration Statement, General Disclosure Package or the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, are in full force and effect, and, except as described in the Prospectus, the Company has no notice of any material claim of any sort that has been asserted by anyone adverse to the rights of the Company under any of the leases or subleases mentioned above, or affecting or questioning the rights of the Company to the continued possession of the leased or subleased premises under any such lease or sublease.
Title to Property
 
(xxiii)
   
. The Company is not required, and upon the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated and the application of the net proceeds therefrom as described in the Prospectus will not be required, to register as an investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the 1940 Act).
Investment Company Act
 
 
7
 
 
(xxiv)     
. The Company (a) is in compliance with any and all applicable federal, state, local and foreign laws, rules, regulations, decisions and orders relating to the protection of human health and safety, the environment or hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants (collectively, ); (b) has received and is in compliance with all permits, licenses or other approvals required of it under applicable Environmental Laws to conduct its business; and (c) has not received notice of any actual or potential liability for the investigation or remediation of any disposal or release of hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants, except in each case would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Environmental Laws
Environmental Laws
 
(xxv)      
. There are no persons with rights to have any securities registered pursuant to the Registration Statement, which rights have not been waived or complied with, nor, except as set forth in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, are there any persons with rights to have any securities otherwise registered by the Company under the 1933 Act.
Registration Rights
 
(xxvi)
  
Accounting Controls and Disclosure Controls.
 
 
 
(xxvii)
 
  Solely to the extent that the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission and the Nasdaq Global Market thereunder () has been applicable to the Company, there is and has been no failure on the part of the Company or any of the Companys directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply in all material respects with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, including Section 402 related to loans and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
Compliance with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
 
(xxviii)   
. Except as disclosed in writing to the Representatives, neither the Company nor, to the Companys knowledge, the Companys officers, directors or affiliates (within the meaning of FINRA Conduct Rule 2720(f)), directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, or is an associated person (within the meaning of Article I, paragraph (ff) of the By-laws of FINRA) of any member firm of FINRA.
FINRA Matters
 
 
8
 
 
(xxix)
   
. The Company has filed all United States federal income tax returns that have been required to be filed and has paid all taxes shown thereon or otherwise assessed, which are due and payable, except assessments against which appeals have been or will be promptly taken and as to which adequate reserves have been provided. The Company has filed all other tax returns that are required to have been filed by it pursuant to applicable state, local or foreign law, except insofar as the failure to file such returns would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and has paid all taxes shown thereon or otherwise assessed, which are due and payable, except assessments against which appeals have been or will be promptly taken and as to which adequate reserves have been provided.  The Company has no tax deficiency that has been or, to the best knowledge of the Company, might be asserted or threatened against it that could have a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Taxes
 
(xxx)  
   
. The Company carries or is entitled to the benefits of insurance, with financially sound and reputable insurers, in such amounts and covering such risks as are appropriate in the judgment of management to protect the Company and its business, and all such insurance is in full force and effect. The Company has no reason to believe that it will not be able (a) to renew its existing insurance coverage as and when such policies expire or (b) to obtain comparable coverage from similar institutions as may be necessary or appropriate to conduct its business as now conducted and at a cost that would not have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company has not been denied any insurance coverage which it has sought or for which it has applied.
Insurance
 
(xxxi)
   
. Any statistical and market-related data included in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus are based on or derived from sources that the Company believes to be reliable and accurate, and, to the extent required by such sources, the Company has obtained the written consent to the use of such data from such sources.
Statistical and Market-Related Data
 
(xxxii)
   
. Neither the Company nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee, affiliate or other person acting on behalf of the Company is aware of or has taken any action, directly or indirectly, that would result in a violation by such persons of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (the ), including, without limitation, making use of the mails or any means or instrumentality of interstate commerce corruptly in furtherance of an offer, payment, promise to pay or authorization of the payment of any money, or other property, gift, promise to give, or authorization of the giving of anything of value to any foreign official (as such term is defined in the FCPA) or any foreign political party or official thereof or any candidate for foreign political office, in contravention of the FCPA; and the Company, and, to the knowledge of the Company, its affiliates have conducted their businesses in compliance with the FCPA, and have instituted and maintain policies and procedures designed to ensure, and which are reasonably expected to continue to ensure, continued compliance therewith.
Foreign Corrupt Practices Act
FCPA
 
(xxxiii)
   
. The operations of the Company are and have been conducted at all times in material compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, the money laundering statutes of all applicable jurisdictions, the rules and regulations thereunder and any related or similar rules, regulations or guidelines, issued, administered or enforced by any governmental agency (collectively, the ), and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator involving the Company with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened.
Money Laundering Laws
Money Laundering Laws
 
(xxxiv)
   
. Neither the Company nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee, affiliate or person acting on behalf of the Company is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Treasury Department (); and the Company will not directly or indirectly use the proceeds of the offering, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any subsidiary, joint venture partner or other person or entity, for the purpose of financing the activities of any person currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC.
OFAC
OFAC
 
(xxxv)
   
. The Company is in compliance in all material respects with all presently applicable provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, including the regulations and published interpretations thereunder (); no reportable event (as defined in ERISA) has occurred with respect to any pension plan (as defined in ERISA) for which the Company would have any liability; the Company has not incurred and does not expect to incur any material liability under (i) Title IV of ERISA with respect to termination of, or withdrawal from any pension plan or (ii) Sections 412 or 4971 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, including the regulations and published interpretations thereunder (the Code); and each pension plan for which the Company would have any liability that is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code is so qualified in all material respects and nothing has occurred, whether by action or by failure to act, which could reasonably be expected to cause the loss of such qualification.
ERISA
ERISA
 
 
9
 
 
(xxxvi)
   
. The Company has (i) orally, to the Underwriters or to counsel to the Underwriters, fairly summarized in all material respects the substance of all of its material communications with representatives of the FDA; and (ii) no knowledge of any actual or pending communication from the FDA, that would cause the Company to revise its strategy for seeking marketing approval from the FDA for ARQ 197 or any of the Companys other products under development as described in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
Regulatory Status
 
(xxxvii)
   
.  Except for this Agreement, the Company is not a party to any contract, agreement or understanding with any person that would give rise to a valid claim against the Company or the Underwriters for a brokerage commission, finders fee or like payment in connection with the offering and sale of the Securities.
Brokerage Fees
 
(xxxviii)
   
. No forward-looking statement (within the meaning of Section 27A of the 1933 Act and Section 21E of the 1934 Act) contained in either the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus has been made or reaffirmed without a reasonable basis or has been disclosed other than in good faith.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
(b)
   
. Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company delivered to the Representatives or to counsel for the Underwriters shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company to each Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby.
Officers Certificates
 
Section 2.
 
.
Sale and Delivery to Underwriters; Closing
 
(a)
   
. On the basis of the representations and warranties herein contained and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to sell to each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, and each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, agrees to purchase from the Company, at the price per share set forth in , the number of Initial Securities set forth in opposite the name of such Underwriter, plus any additional number of Initial Securities which such Underwriter may become obligated to purchase pursuant to the provisions of Section 10 hereof.
Initial Securities
Schedule B
Schedule A
 
(b)
   
. In addition, on the basis of the representations and warranties herein contained and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company hereby grants an option to the Underwriters, severally and not jointly, to purchase up to an additional 1,072,500 shares of Common Stock, at the price per share set forth in , less an amount per share equal to any dividends or distributions declared by the Company and payable on the Initial Securities but not payable on the Option Securities. The option hereby granted will expire 30 days after the date hereof and may be exercised in whole or in part from time to time upon notice by the Representatives to the Company setting forth the number of Option Securities as to which the several Underwriters are then exercising the option and the time and date of payment and delivery for such Option Securities. Any such time and date of delivery (a ) shall be determined by the Representatives, but shall not be later than seven full business days after the exercise of said option, nor in any event prior to the Closing Time, as hereinafter defined. If the option is exercised as to all or any portion of the Option Securities, each of the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, will purchase that proportion of the total number of Option Securities then being purchased which the number of Initial Securities set forth in opposite the name of such Underwriter bears to the total number of Initial Securities, subject in each case to such adjustments as the Representatives in their discretion shall make to eliminate any sales or purchases of fractional shares.
Option Securities
Schedule B
Date of Delivery
Schedule A
 
(c)
   
. Payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of certificates for, the Initial Securities shall be made at the offices of Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., Chrysler Center, 666 Third Avenue, New York, NY 10017, or at such other place as shall be agreed upon by the Representatives and the Company, at 9:00 A.M. (Eastern time) on the fourth (third, if the pricing occurs before 4:30 P.M. (Eastern time) on any given day) business day after the date hereof (unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of Section 10), or such other time not later than ten business days after such date as shall be agreed upon by the Representatives and the Company (such time and date of payment and delivery being herein called ).
Payment
Closing Time
 
 
10
 
 
In addition, in the event that any or all of the Option Securities are purchased by the Underwriters, payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of certificates for, such Option Securities shall be made at the above-mentioned offices, or at such other place as shall be agreed upon by the Representatives and the Company, on each Date of Delivery as specified in the notice from the Representatives to the Company.
 
Payment shall be made to the Company by wire transfer of immediately available funds to a bank account designated by the Company against delivery to the Representatives for the respective accounts of the Underwriters of certificates for the Securities to be purchased by them. It is understood that each Underwriter has authorized the Representatives, for its account, to accept delivery of, receipt for, and make payment of the purchase price for, the Initial Securities and the Option Securities, if any, which it has agreed to purchase. Subject to Section 10, Citigroup or Leerink Swann, individually and not as representative of the Underwriters, may (but shall not be obligated to) make payment of the purchase price for the Initial Securities or the Option Securities, if any, to be purchased by any Underwriter whose funds have not been received by the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, as the case may be, but such payment shall not relieve such Underwriter from its obligations hereunder.
 
(d)
   
. Certificates for the Initial Securities and the Option Securities, if any, shall be in such denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request in writing at least one full business day before the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, as the case may be. The certificates for the Initial Securities and the Option Securities, if any, will be made available for examination and packaging by the Representatives in The City of Boston not later than 10:00 A.M. (Eastern time) on the business day prior to the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, as the case may be.
Denominations; Registration
 
Section 3.
 
. The Company covenants with each Underwriter as follows:
Covenants of the Company
 
(a)
   
. The Company, subject to Section 3(b), will comply with the requirements of Rule 430B, and will notify the Representatives immediately, and confirm the notice in writing, (i) when any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement shall become effective, or any supplement to the Prospectus or any amended Prospectus shall have been filed, (ii) of the receipt of any comments from the Commission, (iii) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or any document incorporated by reference therein or otherwise deemed to be a part thereof or for additional information, (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of any order preventing or suspending the use of any preliminary prospectus, or of the suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or of the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for any of such purposes or of any examination pursuant to Section 8(e) of the 1933 Act concerning the Registration Statement and (v) if the Company becomes the subject of a proceeding under Section 8A of the 1933 Act in connection with the offering of the Securities. The Company will effect the filings required under Rule 424(b), in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8)), and will take such steps as it deems necessary to ascertain promptly whether the form of prospectus transmitted for filing under Rule 424(b) was received for filing by the Commission and, in the event that it was not, it will promptly file such prospectus. The Company will make every reasonable effort to prevent the issuance of any stop order and, if any stop order is issued, to obtain the lifting thereof at the earliest possible moment.
Compliance with Securities Regulations and Commission Requests
 
(b)
   
. The Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to file or prepare any amendment to the Registration Statement (including any filing under Rule 462(b)) or any amendment, supplement or revision to either any preliminary prospectus (including any prospectus included in the Registration Statement at the time it became effective) or to the Prospectus, and will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such documents a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing or use, as the case may be, and will not file or use any such document to which the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters shall object. The Company has given the Representatives notice of any filings made pursuant to the 1934 Act or the 1934 Act Regulations within 48 hours prior to the Applicable Time; the Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to make any such filing from the Applicable Time to the Closing Time and will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such documents a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing, as the case may be, and will not file or use any such document to which the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters shall object.
Filing of Amendments and Exchange Act Documents
 
 
11
 
 
(c)
   
. The Company has furnished or will deliver to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters, without charge, signed copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (including exhibits filed therewith ) and signed copies of all consents and certificates of experts, and will also deliver to the Representatives, without charge, a conformed copy of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (without exhibits) for each of the Underwriters. The copies of the Registration Statement and each amendment thereto furnished to the Underwriters will be identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
Delivery of Registration Statements
 
(d)
   
. The Company has delivered to each Underwriter, without charge, as many copies of each preliminary prospectus as such Underwriter reasonably requested, and the Company hereby consents to the use of such copies for purposes permitted by the 1933 Act. The Company will furnish to each Underwriter, without charge, during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act, such number of copies of the Prospectus (as amended or supplemented) as such Underwriter may reasonably request. The Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto furnished to the Underwriters will be identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
Delivery of Prospectuses
 
(e)
   
. The Company will comply with the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1934 Act and 1934 Act Regulations so as to permit the completion of the distribution of the Securities as contemplated in this Agreement and in the Prospectus. If at any time when a prospectus is required by the 1933 Act to be delivered in connection with sales of the Securities, any event shall occur or condition shall exist as a result of which it is necessary, in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters or for the Company, to amend the Registration Statement or amend or supplement the Prospectus in order that the Prospectus will not include any untrue statements of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances existing at the time it is delivered to a purchaser, or if it shall be necessary, in the opinion of such counsel, at any such time to amend the Registration Statement or amend or supplement the Prospectus in order to comply with the requirements of the 1933 Act or the 1933 Act Regulations, the Company will promptly prepare and file with the Commission, subject to Section 3(b), such amendment or supplement as may be necessary to correct such statement or omission or to make the Registration Statement or the Prospectus comply with such requirements, and the Company will furnish to the Underwriters such number of copies of such amendment or supplement as the Underwriters may reasonably request. If at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement relating to the Securities or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances, prevailing at that subsequent time, not misleading, the Company will promptly notify the Representatives and will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict, untrue statement or omission.
Continued Compliance with Securities Laws
 
(f)
   
. The Company will use its best efforts, in cooperation with the Underwriters, to qualify the Securities for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions (domestic or foreign) as the Representatives may designate and to maintain such qualifications in effect for a period of not less than one year from the later of the effective date of the Registration Statement and any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement; provided, however, that the Company shall not be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign corporation or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to subject itself to taxation in respect of doing business in any jurisdiction in which it is not otherwise so subject.
Blue Sky Qualifications
 
(g)
   
. The Company will timely file such reports pursuant to the 1934 Act as are necessary in order to make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable an earnings statement for the purposes of, and to provide to the Underwriters the benefits contemplated by, the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act.
Rule 158
 
 
12
 
 
(h)
   
. The Company will use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities in substantially the manner specified in the Prospectus under Use of Proceeds.
Use of Proceeds
 
(i)
   
. The Company will use its best efforts to effect and maintain the listing of the Securities on the Nasdaq Global Market.
Listing
 
(j)
   
. For the period specified below (the ), the Company will not, directly or indirectly, take any of the following actions with respect to its Common Stock or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for its Common Stock (): (i) offer, sell, issue, contract to sell, pledge or otherwise dispose of, Lock-Up Securities, (ii) offer, sell, issue, contract to sell, contract to purchase or grant any option, right or warrant to purchase Lock-Up Securities, (iii) enter into any swap, hedge or any other agreement that transfers, in whole or in part, the economic consequences of ownership of Lock-Up Securities or (iv) establish or increase a put equivalent position or liquidate or decrease a call equivalent position in Lock-Up Securities within the meaning of Section 16 of the 1934 Act relating to Lock-Up Securities, or publicly disclose the intention to take any such action, without the prior written consent of Citigroup and Leerink Swann, except (a) the Securities to be sold hereunder, (b) the issuance by the Company of shares of Lock-Up Securities upon the exercise of an option or warrant or the conversion of a security outstanding on the date hereof of which the Representatives have been advised in writing or (c) the issuance of stock options and other stock-based awards (or the issuance of shares of Common Stock upon exercise thereof) to eligible participants pursuant to stock incentive plans of the Company described in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus. The initial Lock-Up Period will commence on the date hereof and continue for ninety (90) days after the date of the commencement of the public offering of the Securities or such earlier date that Citigroup and Leerink Swann consent to in writing.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, if (A) during the last 17 days of the initial 90-day Lock-Up Period, the Company issues an earnings release or material news or a material event relating to the Company occurs; or (B) prior to the expiration of the initial 90-day Lock-Up Period, the Company announces that it will release earnings results during the 16-day period beginning on the last day of the 90-day period, the Lock-Up Period shall continue until the expiration of the 18-day period beginning on the issuance of the earnings release or the occurrence of the material news or material event.  The Company shall promptly notify the Representatives of any earnings release, news or event that may give rise to an extension of the initial 90-day Lock-Up Period.
Restriction on Sale of Securities
Lock-Up Period
Lock-Up Securities
 
(k)
   
. The Company, during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act, will file all documents required to be filed with the Commission pursuant to the 1934 Act within the time periods required by the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
Reporting Requirements
 
(l)
   
. The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Representatives, and each Underwriter represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Company and the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute an issuer free writing prospectus, as defined in Rule 433, or that would otherwise constitute a free writing prospectus, as defined in Rule 405, required to be filed with the Commission. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Representatives or by the Company and the Representatives, as the case may be, is hereinafter referred to as a . The Company represents that it has treated and agrees that it will treat each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an issuer free writing prospectus, as defined in Rule 433, and has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission where required, legending and record keeping.
Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses
Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
 
 
13
 
 
Section 4.
 
.
Payment of Expenses
 
(a)
   
. The Company will pay or cause to be paid all expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (i) the preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statement (including financial statements and exhibits) as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (ii) the preparation, printing and delivery to the Underwriters of this Agreement, any Agreement among Underwriters and such other documents as may be required in connection with the offering, purchase, sale, issuance or delivery of the Securities, (iii) the preparation, issuance and delivery of the certificates for the Securities to the Underwriters, including any stock or other transfer taxes and any stamp or other duties payable upon the sale, issuance or delivery of the Securities to the Underwriters, (iv) the fees and disbursements of the Companys counsel, accountants and other advisors, (v) the qualification of the Securities under securities laws in accordance with the provisions of Section 3(f) hereof, including filing fees and the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters in connection therewith and in connection with the preparation of the Blue Sky Survey and any supplement thereto, (vi) the printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of each preliminary prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus and of the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto and any costs associated with electronic delivery of any of the foregoing by the Underwriters to investors, (vii) the preparation, printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of the Blue Sky Survey and any supplement thereto, (viii) the fees and expenses of any transfer agent or registrar for the Securities, (ix) the costs and expenses of the Company relating to investor presentations on any road show undertaken in connection with the marketing of the Securities, including without limitation, expenses associated with the production of road show slides and graphics, fees and expenses of any consultants engaged in connection with the road show presentations, travel and lodging expenses of the representatives and officers of the Company and any such consultants, and the cost of aircraft and other transportation chartered in connection with the road show, (x) any filing fees, to the extent applicable, incident to, and the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel to the Underwriters in connection with, the review by FINRA of the terms of the sale of the Securities, (xi) the fees and expenses incurred in connection with the listing of the Securities on the Nasdaq Global Market, and (xii) the costs and expenses (including without limitation any damages or other amounts payable in connection with legal or contractual liability) associated with the reforming of any contracts for sale of the Securities made by the Underwriter caused by a breach of the representation contained in the third paragraph of Section 1(a)(i).  It is understood that, subject to this Section and Section 4(b) hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their costs and expenses, including fees and disbursements of their counsel not payable by the Company pursuant to the preceding sentence.
Expenses
 
(b)
   
. If this Agreement is terminated by the Representatives in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 or Section 9(a)(i) hereof, the Company shall reimburse the Underwriters for all of their accountable out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters.
Termination of Agreement
 
Section 5.
 
. The obligations of the several Underwriters hereunder are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the Company contained in Section 1 hereof and in certificates of any officer of the Company delivered pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its covenants and other obligations hereunder that are required to be performed or satisfied by it at or prior to the Closing Time, and to the following further conditions:
Conditions of Underwriters Obligations
 
(a)
   
. The Registration Statement, including any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, has become effective and at the Closing Time no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued under the 1933 Act or proceedings therefor initiated or threatened by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of counsel to the Underwriters. A prospectus containing the Rule 430B Information shall have been filed with the Commission in the manner and within the time frame required by Rule 424(b) without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8) or a post-effective amendment providing such information shall have been filed and declared effective in accordance with the requirements of Rule 430B.
Effectiveness of Registration Statement
 
(b)
   
. At the Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received the favorable opinion and negative assurance letter, dated as of the Closing Time, of (i) Arnold & Porter LLP, counsel for the Company, (ii) Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., intellectual property counsel to the Company, and (iii) Sunstein Kann Murphy & Timbers LLP, intellectual property counsel to the Company, each in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters, together with signed or reproduced copies of such letters for each of the other Underwriters with respect to such matters as the Representatives may reasonably request.
Opinion of Counsel for the Company
 
(c)
   
. At Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received the favorable opinion and negative assurance letter, dated as of the Closing Time, of Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., counsel for the Underwriters, together with signed or reproduced copies of such letter for each of the other Underwriters with respect to such matters as the Representatives may reasonably request.
Opinion of Counsel for Underwriters
 
 
14
 
 
(d)
   
. At Closing Time, there shall not have been, since the date hereof or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus or the General Disclosure Package, any Material Adverse Effect, and the Representatives shall have received a certificate of the President or another executive officer of the Company and of the principal financial or principal accounting officer of the Company, dated as of Closing Time, to the effect that (i) there has been no such Material Adverse Effect, (ii) the representations and warranties in Section 1(a) hereof are true and correct with the same force and effect as though expressly made at and as of Closing Time, (iii) the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to Closing Time, and (iv) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to their knowledge, contemplated by the Commission.
Officers Certificate
 
(e)
   
. At the time of the execution of this Agreement, the Representatives shall have received from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP a letter dated such date, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives and PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, together with signed or reproduced copies of such letter for each of the other Underwriters containing statements and information of the type ordinarily included in accountants comfort letters to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
Accountants Comfort Letter
 
(f)
   
. At Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP a letter, dated as of Closing Time, to the effect that they reaffirm the statements made in the letter furnished pursuant to subsection (e) of this Section, except that the specified date referred to shall be a date not more than three business days prior to Closing Time.
Bring-down Comfort Letter
 
(g)
   
. At Closing Time, the Securities shall have been approved for inclusion in the NASDAQ Global Market, subject only to official notice of issuance.
Approval of Listing
 
(h)
   
. At the date of this Agreement, the Representatives shall have received a lock-up agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives signed by the persons listed on hereto.
Lock-up Agreements
Schedule C
 
(i)
   
. FINRA shall not have raised any objection with respect to the fairness and reasonableness of the underwriting terms and arrangements.
No Objection
 
(j)
   
. In the event that the Underwriters exercise their option provided in Section 2(b) hereof to purchase all or any portion of the Option Securities, the representations and warranties of the Company contained herein and the statements in any certificates furnished by the Company shall be true and correct as of each Date of Delivery and, at the relevant Date of Delivery, the Representatives shall have received:
Conditions to Purchase of Option Securities
 
(i)
   
. A certificate, dated such Date of Delivery, of the President or another executive officer of the Company and of the principal financial or principal accounting officer of the Company confirming that the certificate delivered at the Closing Time pursuant to Section 5(d) hereof remains true and correct as of such Date of Delivery.
Officers Certificate
 
(ii)
   
. The favorable opinion and negative assurance letter of (a) Arnold & Porter LLP, counsel for the Company, (b) Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., intellectual property counsel to the Company, and (c) Sunstein Kann Murphy & Timbers LLP, intellectual property counsel to the Company, each dated such Date of Delivery, relating to the Option Securities to be purchased on such Date of Delivery and otherwise to the same effect as the opinions required by Section 5(b).
Opinion of Counsel for Company
 
(iii)
   
. The favorable opinion and negative assurance letter of Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., counsel for the Underwriters, dated such Date of Delivery, relating to the Option Securities to be purchased on such Date of Delivery and otherwise to the same effect as the opinion required by Section 5(c) hereof.
Opinion of Counsel for Underwriters
 
 
15
 
 
(iv)
   
. A letter from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives and PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP and dated such Date of Delivery, substantially in the same form and substance as the letter furnished to the Representatives pursuant to Section 5(f) hereof, except that the specified date in the letter furnished pursuant to this paragraph shall be a date not more than five days prior to such Date of Delivery.
Bring-down Comfort Letter
 
(k)
   
. At Closing Time and at each Date of Delivery counsel for the Underwriters shall have been furnished with such documents and opinions as they may require for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated, or in order to evidence the accuracy of any of the representations or warranties, or the fulfillment of any of the conditions, herein contained; and all proceedings taken by the Company in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters.
Additional Documents
 
(l)
   
. If any condition specified in this Section shall not have been fulfilled when and as required to be fulfilled, this Agreement, or, in the case of any condition to the purchase of Option Securities on a Date of Delivery which is after the Closing Time, the obligations of the several Underwriters to purchase the relevant Option Securities, may be terminated by the Representatives by notice to the Company at any time at or prior to Closing Time or such Date of Delivery, as the case may be, and such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 and except that Sections 1, 6, 7 and 8 shall survive any such termination and remain in full force and effect.
Termination of Agreement
 
Section 6.
 
.
Indemnification
 
(a)
   
. The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, each of its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the 1933 Act (each, an ), and each of its and their respective directors, officers, members, employees, representatives and agents and each person, if any, who controls such Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act of or Section 20of the 1934 Act as follows:
Indemnification of Underwriters
Affiliate
 
 
(i)
   
against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430B Information or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact included in any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
 
(ii)
   
against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission; provided that (subject to Section 6(d) below) any such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company; and
 
(iii)
   
against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including the fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by the Representatives), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under (i) or (ii) above;
 
, , that this indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, liability, claim, damage or expense to the extent, but only to the extent, arising out of any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430B Information, or any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
provided
however
 
 
16
 
 
(b)
   
. Each Underwriter severally agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, its directors, each of its officers who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense described in the indemnity contained in Section 6(a) above, as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430B Information or any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter through the Representatives consists of the following information in the Prospectus: (i) the list of Underwriters and their respective participation in the sale of the Securities and (ii) the paragraphs related to stabilization, syndicate covering transactions and penalty bids, all under the caption Underwriting; provided, however, that the obligation of each Underwriter to indemnify the Company (including any controlling person, director or officer thereof) shall be limited to the net proceeds received by the Company from such Underwriter.
Indemnification of Company, Directors and Officers
 
(c)
   
. Each indemnified party shall give notice as promptly as reasonably practicable to each indemnifying party of any action commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve such indemnifying party from any liability hereunder to the extent it is not materially prejudiced as a result thereof and in any event shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than on account of this indemnity agreement. In the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(a) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the Representatives and, in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(b) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the Company. An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of any such action and, to the extent it shall elect, jointly with any other indemnifying party, assume the defense thereof, with counsel reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified parties; , , that counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party. In no event shall the indemnifying parties be liable for fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to any local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances; , , that after notice from the indemnifying party to an indemnified party that the indemnifying party has elected to assume the defense of any action, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party for any legal fees or expenses of any other counsel or any other expenses, in each case subsequently incurred by such indemnified party, in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. The indemnified party will have the right to employ its own counsel in any such action, but the fees, expenses and other charges of such counsel will be at the expense of such indemnified party unless (i) the employment of counsel by the indemnified party has been authorized in writing by the indemnifying party, (ii) the named parties to any such proceeding (including any impleaded parties) include both the indemnifying party and the indemnified party and representation of both parties by the same counsel would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between them (in which case the indemnifying party will not have the right to direct the defense of such action on behalf of the indemnified party), or (iii) the indemnifying party has not in fact employed counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party to assume the defense of such action within a reasonable time after receiving notice of the commencement of the action, in each of which cases the reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of counsel will be at the expense of the indemnifying party or parties.  No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified parties, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever in respect of which indemnification or contribution could be sought under this Section 6 or Section 7 hereof (whether or not the indemnified parties are actual or potential parties thereto), unless such settlement, compromise or consent (x) includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such litigation, investigation, proceeding or claim and (y) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
Actions against Parties; Notification
provided
however
provided
further
however
 
 
17
 
 
(d)
   
. If at any time an indemnified party shall have requested an indemnifying party to reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel to which it is entitled hereunder, such indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of the nature contemplated by Section 6(a)(ii) effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 45 days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the aforesaid request, (ii) such indemnifying party shall have received notice of the terms of such settlement at least 30 days prior to such settlement being entered into and (iii) such indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed such indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement (other than with respect to fees and expenses that the indemnifying party is contesting in good faith).
Settlement without Consent if Failure to Reimburse
 
Section 7.
 
. If the indemnification provided for in Section 6 hereof is for any reason unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount of such losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by such indemnified party, as incurred, (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other hand from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and of the Underwriters on the other hand in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations.
Contribution
 
The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other hand in connection with the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total net proceeds from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the total underwriting discount received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus bear to the aggregate initial public offering price of the Securities as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus.
 
The relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other hand shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether any such untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or by the Underwriters and the parties relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
 
The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 7 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Section 7. The aggregate amount of losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by an indemnified party and referred to above in this Section 7 shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
 
Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
 
No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
 
For purposes of this Section 7, each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act and each Underwriters Affiliates and selling agents shall have the same rights to contribution as such Underwriter, and each director of the Company, each officer of the Company who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company. The Underwriters respective obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 7 are several in proportion to the number of Initial Securities set forth opposite their respective names in hereto and not joint.
Schedule A
 
 
18
 
 
Section 8.
 
. All representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement or in certificates of officers of the Company submitted pursuant hereto, shall remain operative and in full force and effect regardless of (i) any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or its Affiliates or selling agents, any person controlling any Underwriter, its officers or directors, or any person controlling the Company and (ii) delivery of and payment for the Securities.
Representations, Warranties and Agreements to Survive
 
Section 9.
 
.
Termination of Agreement
 
(a)
   
. The Representatives may terminate this Agreement, by notice to the Company, at any time at or prior to Closing Time (i) if there has been, since the time of execution of this Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus or General Disclosure Package, any Material Adverse Effect, which, in the judgment of the Representatives is material and adverse and makes it impractical or inadvisable to market the Securities, (ii) if there has occurred any material adverse change in the financial markets in the United States or the international financial markets, any outbreak of hostilities or escalation thereof or other calamity or crisis or any change or development involving a prospective change in national or international political, financial or economic conditions, in each case the effect of which is such as to make it, in the judgment of the Representatives, impracticable or inadvisable to market the Securities or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Securities, or (iii) if trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended or materially limited by the Commission or the NASDAQ Global Market, or if trading generally on the American Stock Exchange or the New York Stock Exchange or in the NASDAQ Global Market has been suspended or materially limited, or minimum or maximum prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices have been required, by any of said exchanges or by such system or by order of the Commission, FINRA or any other governmental authority, or (iv) a material disruption has occurred in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States, or (v) if a banking moratorium has been declared by either Federal or New York authorities.
Termination; General
 
(b)
   
. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to this Section, such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 hereof, and provided further that Sections 1, 6, 7 and 8 shall survive such termination and remain in full force and effect.
Liabilities
 
(c)
   
In the event this Agreement is terminated for any reason, the Representatives shall contemporaneously terminate or waive in their entirety the agreements referred to in Section 5(h).
Termination of Lock-Up Agreements and Non-distribution Agreements.
 
Section 10.
 
. If one or more of the Underwriters shall fail at Closing Time or a Date of Delivery to purchase the Securities which it or they are obligated to purchase under this Agreement (the ), the Representatives shall have the right, within 24 hours thereafter, to make arrangements for one or more of the non-defaulting Underwriters, or any other underwriters, to purchase all, but not less than all, of the Defaulted Securities in such amounts as may be agreed upon and upon the terms herein set forth; if, however, the Representatives shall not have completed such arrangements within such 24-hour period, then:
Default by One or More of the Underwriters
Defaulted Securities
 
(i)
   
if the number of Defaulted Securities does not exceed 10% of the number of Securities to be purchased on such date, each of the non-defaulting Underwriters shall be obligated, severally and not jointly, to purchase the full amount thereof in the proportions that their respective underwriting obligations hereunder bear to the underwriting obligations of all non-defaulting Underwriters, or
 
(ii)
   
if the number of Defaulted Securities exceeds 10% of the number of Securities to be purchased on such date, this Agreement or, with respect to any Date of Delivery which occurs after the Closing Time, the obligation of the Underwriters to purchase and of the Company to sell the Option Securities to be purchased and sold on such Date of Delivery shall terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter.
 
 
19
 
 
No action taken pursuant to this Section shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of its default.
 
In the event of any such default which does not result in a termination of this Agreement or, in the case of a Date of Delivery which is after the Closing Time, which does not result in a termination of the obligation of the Underwriters to purchase and the Company to sell the relevant Option Securities, as the case may be, either the (i) Representatives or (ii) the Company shall have the right to postpone Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, as the case may be, for a period not exceeding seven days in order to effect any required changes in the Registration Statement or Prospectus or in any other documents or arrangements. As used herein, the term  includes any person substituted for an Underwriter under this Section 10.
Underwriter
 
Section 11.
   
. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, immediately upon commencement of discussions with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby, the Company (and each employee, representative or other agent of the Company) may disclose to any and all persons, without limitation of any kind, the tax treatment and tax structure of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to the Company relating to such tax treatment and tax structure. For purposes of the foregoing, the term  is the purported or claimed federal income tax treatment of the transactions contemplated hereby, and the term  includes any fact that may be relevant to understanding the purported or claimed federal income tax treatment of the transactions contemplated hereby.
Tax Disclosure
tax treatment
tax structure
 
Section 12.
   
. All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to the Underwriters shall be directed to the Representatives, c/o Citigroup Global Markets Inc., 388 Greenwich Street, New York, NY 10013, Attn: General Counsel, Fax: 212-816-7912 and c/o Leerink Swann LLC, One Federal Street, 37th Floor, Boston, MA 02110, with copies to (i) Timothy A.G. Gerhold, Leerink Swann LLC, One Federal Street, 37th Floor, Boston, MA 02110, (ii) Attn: General Counsel, 388 Greenwich Street, New York, NY 10013, Fax: 212-816-7912, and (iii) Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C., Chrysler Center, 666 Third Avenue, New York, NY 10017, Attention: William C. Hicks, Esq.; notices to the Company shall be directed to it at ArQule, Inc., 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, MA 01801-5140, Attention: President and Chief Operating Officer, with a copy to Arnold & Porter LLP, 555 12 Street, NW, Washington, DC 20004-1206, Attention: Richard E. Baltz, Esq.
Notices
th
 
Section 13.
   
. The Company acknowledges and agrees that (a) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the public offering price of the Securities and any related discounts and commissions, is an arms-length commercial transaction between the Company, on the one hand, and the several Underwriters, on the other hand, (b) in connection with the offering contemplated hereby and the process leading to such transaction each Underwriter is and has been acting solely as a principal and is not the agent or fiduciary of the Company or its respective stockholders, creditors, employees or any other party, (c) no Underwriter has assumed or will assume an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) and no Underwriter has any obligation to the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (d) the Underwriters and their respective affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company, and (e) the Underwriters have not provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering contemplated hereby and the Company has consulted its own respective legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate.
No Advisory or Fiduciary Relationship
 
Section 14.
   
. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Underwriters, the Company and their respective successors.  Nothing expressed or mentioned in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any person, firm or corporation, other than the Underwriters, the Company and their respective successors and the controlling persons and officers and directors referred to in Sections 6 and 7 and their heirs and legal representatives, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision herein contained. This Agreement and all conditions and provisions hereof are intended to be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Underwriters, the Company and their respective successors, and said controlling persons and officers and directors and their heirs and legal representatives, and for the benefit of no other person, firm or corporation. No purchaser of Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed to be a successor by reason merely of such purchase.
Parties
 
 
20
 
 
Section 15.
   
. THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
GOVERNING LAW
 
Section 16.
   
. TIME SHALL BE OF THE ESSENCE OF THIS AGREEMENT. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE SET FORTH HEREIN, SPECIFIED TIMES OF DAY REFER TO NEW YORK CITY TIME.
TIME
 
Section 17.
   
.  THE COMPANY HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
Section 18.
   
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same Agreement.
Counterparts
 
Section 19.
   
. The Section headings herein are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
Effect of Headings
 
 
 
21
 
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to the Company a counterpart hereof, whereupon this instrument, along with all counterparts, will become a binding agreement among the Underwriters and the Company in accordance with its terms.
 
 
CONFIRMED AND ACCEPTED,
as of the date first above written:
 
 
 
 
LEERINK SWANN LLC
 
 
For themselves and as Representatives of the other Underwriters named in hereto.
Schedule A
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1.           The initial public offering price per share for the Securities shall be $7.30.
 
2.           The purchase price per share for the Securities to be paid by the several Underwriters shall be $6.862, being an amount equal to the initial public offering price set forth above less $0.438 per share.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
 
 
 
April 11, 2012
 
 
 
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
You have requested our opinion with respect to certain matters in connection with the offering by ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ), of up to 8,222,500 shares of the Companys common stock, par value $0.01 (the ), including 1,072,500 shares of common stock issued upon exercise of the underwriters over-allotment option, pursuant to the Companys Shelf Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166532) and declared effective  by the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ), on May 24, 2010 and a Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-180635) filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 462(b) of Regulation C and declared effective on April 10, 2012.
Company
Shares
Commission
Act
 
The offering and sale of the Shares are being made pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement (the Underwriting Agreement), dated as of April 10, 2012, by and between the Company and Citigroup and Leerink Swann, as representatives of the several Underwriters.
 
In connection with this opinion, we have examined and relied upon copies of the Underwriting Agreement, the Registration Statements, the base prospectus that forms a part thereof and the prospectus supplement thereto related to the offering of the Shares, which prospectus supplement is dated as of the date hereof and will be filed by the Company in accordance with Rule 424(b) promulgated under the Act.  We have also examined instruments, documents and records which we deemed relevant and necessary for the basis of our opinion hereinafter expressed.  In such examination, we have assumed (i) the authenticity of original documents and the genuineness of all signatures, (ii) the conformity to the originals of all documents submitted to us as copies, and (iii) the truth, accuracy, and completeness of the information, representations and warranties contained in the records, documents, instruments and certificates we have reviewed.
 
 
 
 
 
ArQule, Inc.
April 11, 2012
Page 2
 
 
 Our opinion herein is expressed solely with respect to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.  As to matters governed by the laws specified in the foregoing sentence, we have relied exclusively on the latest standard compilations of such statutes and laws as reproduced in commonly accepted unofficial publications available to us.  We are not members of the Bar of the State of Delaware and have not obtained any opinions of local counsel.
 
 On the basis of the foregoing, and in reliance thereon, we are of the opinion that the Shares, when issued and delivered by the Company against payment therefor in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
 
This letter does not address any matters other than those expressly addressed herein.  This letter speaks only as of the date hereof.  We undertake no responsibility to update or supplement it after such date.
This opinion is being furnished to you for submission to the Commission as an exhibit to the Companys Current Report on Form 8-K relating to the offering of the Shares (the ), which is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement. We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the Current Report and the said incorporation by reference and to the use of the name of our firm therein. In giving this consent, we do not admit that we are within the category of persons whose consent is required by Section 7 of the Act. or the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
Current Report
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced the pricing of an underwritten public offering of 7,150,000 shares of its common stock at a price of $7.30 per share.  The net proceeds to ArQule from the sale of the shares, after deducting underwriting discounts and commissions and estimated expenses, are expected to be approximately $48.7 million.  The offering is expected to close on or about April 16, 2012, subject to customary closing conditions. Citigroup and Leerink Swann are acting as joint book-running managers for the offering.  Lazard Capital Markets, RBC Capital Markets and Oppenheimer & Co. are acting as co-managers.
Woburn, MA, April 11, 2012 
ArQule has granted the underwriters a 30-day option to purchase up to an additional 1,072,500 shares of common stock.  The expected net proceeds to ArQule referenced above do not include any net proceeds that ArQule would receive if the underwriters exercise such option to purchase additional shares.
The offering is being made by ArQule pursuant to a registration statement previously filed and declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The offering may be made only by means of a prospectus, copies of which may be obtained, when available, from Citigroup, Brooklyn Army Terminal, 140 58 Street, 8 Floor, Brooklyn, New York 11220, telephone at 800-831-9146, or Leerink Swann LLC, Attention: Syndicate Prospectus Department, One Federal Street, 37 Floor, Boston, Massachusetts 02110, by telephone at 800-808-7525, or by facsimile at 617-918-4900.
th
th
th
This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the securities in this offering, nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction.
This press release includes forward-looking statements, including without limitation, statements about the completion, timing and size of ArQules proposed public offering. For these statements, ArQule claims the protection of the safe harbor for forward-looking statements provided by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. It should be noted that there are risks and uncertainties related to the public offering that could cause actual results to differ from those expressed or implied by and forward looking statements, including without limitation risks and uncertainties related to ArQules business and financial condition, general market conditions and the satisfaction of customary closing conditions associated with the proposed public offering.. A review of risks faced by the Company can be found in ArQules Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, the prospectus to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission in connection with the offering and other reports and documents filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120503084428.txt.gz
TIME:20120503084428
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
                                                                                                         
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On May 3, 2012 ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2012.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
 
 Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated May 3, 2012 announcing results of operations.
 
 
2
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2012.
Woburn, MA, May 3, 2012 
 
For the quarter ended March 31, 2012, the Company reported a net loss of $4,260,000, or $0.08 per share, compared to a net loss of $1,466,000, or $0.03 per share, for the first quarter of 2011.
At March 31, 2012, the Company had a total of $100,358,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities.
Operational Update
The top-line Phase 2 findings with tivantinib in HCC announced in January, 2012 represent the first randomized data with a c-Met inhibitor administered as a single agent in this disease, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule. We look forward to presenting additional data from this trial at the Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology in June, including secondary endpoint, sub-group and biomarker analyses.
 
In April, 2012, the Company completed a common stock offering, which combined with the full exercise of an over-allotment option resulted in net proceeds of approximately $56 million, an amount not reflected in our first quarter financials, said Mr. Pucci.
 
 
 
 
 
Revenues and Expenses
The Company reported revenues of $8,498,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2012, compared with $13,405,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2011. The revenue decrease in the quarter ended March 31, 2012 is primarily due to the timing of revenue recognized from the $25 million milestone payment received in the quarter ended March 31, 2011 from Daiichi Sankyo triggered by the dosing of the first patient in the Phase 3 NSCLC clinical trial. In the quarter ended March 31, 2011, we recognized revenue of $11.4 million related to this milestone, compared with $1.2 million in the quarter ended March 31, 2012. This decrease was partially offset by revenue increases from our Daiichi Sankyo AKIP  and ARQ 092 agreements, as well as lower contra revenue of $1.6 million.
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 were $12,902,000, compared to $14,936,000 for the first quarter of 2011. Research and development costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 were $9,303,000, compared to $11,393,000 for the first quarter of 2011. These decreases were primarily due to lower outsourced clinical and product development costs related to Phase 1 and 2 clinical programs for tivantinib.
General and administrative costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 were $3,599,000, compared to $3,543,000 for the first quarter of 2011.
Updated Financial Guidance
As previously stated, for 2012 ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $39 and $44 million. Revenues are expected to range between $40 and $45 million. Net loss is expected to range between $15 and $20 million. To reflect the April 16, 2012 common stock offering, net loss per share is now expected to range between $(0.25) and $(0.33) for 2012. As a result of the approximately $56 million of net proceeds from this offering, ArQule now expects to end 2012 with between $121 and $126 million in cash and marketable securities.
Conference Call and Webcast
Conference call details
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 855-859-2056 and outside the U.S. 404-537-3406. The confirmation code for replayed calls is 73469325.
 
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics. The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers. ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib, also known as ARQ 197, an inhibitor of the c-Met receptor tyrosine kinase. The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
 
 
 
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Companys financial guidance for 2012 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2012), key corporate objectives for 2012, its ability to fund operations with current cash and marketable securities, and its agreements with its partner, Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially. Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 621, ARQ 736 and ARQ 092 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development. Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies. In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of the Company as well as Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome technical hurdles and other issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible. There is a risk that these issues may not be successfully resolved. Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product. Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development. Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, with respect to partnered programs, even if certain compounds show initial promise, Daiichi Sankyo or Kyoma Hakko Kirin may decide not to license or continue to develop them, as the case may be. In addition, Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin have certain rights to unilaterally terminate their agreements with ArQule. If either company were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of the applicable licensed products on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
ArQule, Inc.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120517075421.txt.gz
TIME:20120517075421
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
                                                                                                         
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On May 17, 2012, ArQule, Inc. (ArQule or the Registrant) issued a press release announcing clinical data from a recent randomized, controlled Phase 2 clinical trial of its drug candidate, tivantinib, as a single agent in previously treated patients with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC).  Tivantinib is an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.
ArQule also announced that tivantinib will be the subject of five presentations at the Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO).  Abstracts of these presentations are available on . The presentations and the abstracts will include data from the Phase 2 clinical trial and ArQules Phase 1 clinical trial evaluating tivantinib in combination with sorafenib in cohorts of patients with HCC, renal cell carcinoma and melanoma. These data regarding the Phase 2 trial supplement results of the trial previously reported by ArQule.
www.asco.org
HCC Trial Summary: c-MET high patients
Data from the HCC trial demonstrated a statistically significant improvement in time-to-progression (HR=0.43, log rank p-value=0.03), accompanied by significant improvements in progression-free survival and disease control rate among second-line patients with c-MET high tumors who were treated with tivantinib.  In addition, overall survival data were observed favoring tivantinib-treated patients in this population.  Efficacy was similar in the two tivantinib dosing subgroups (360 milligrams twice daily and 240 milligrams twice daily), with less frequent neutropenia in the lower dose.
 
Previously announced top-line data from the HCC trial demonstrate that treatment with tivantinib produced a statistically significant 56 percent improvement in time-to-progression in the intent-to-treat population as determined by central radiology review, the primary endpoint (HR = 0.64, log rank p-value = 0.04) for this trial.  Adverse events were reported at similar rates in the treatment and placebo arms, except for a higher incidence of fatigue and hematologic events, including neutropenia and anemia, in tivantinib-treated patients. The incidence of hematologic events declined following dose reduction of tivantinib from 360 milligrams twice daily to 240 milligrams twice daily.
 
ASCO Presentations
      Beginning on June 2, 2012, ArQule will make the following presentations of clinical data for tivantinib at the 2012 American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) Annual Meeting, which will be held from June 2 to June 8, 2010 in Chicago, Illinois:
Oral Presentation
Date and time: Saturday, June 2, 2012, 5:00 PM  5:15 PM
Abstract number: 4006
Poster title: Tivantinib (ARQ 197) versus placebo in patients (Pts) with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) who failed one systemic therapy: Results of a randomized controlled phase II trial (RCT)
Presenter: Lorenza Rimassa, MD
Location: E Hall D1
 
 
2
 
 
Poster Discussion Sessions
Date and time: Saturday, June 2, 2012, 8:00 AM  12:00 PM
Abstract number: 4545
Poster title: Safety and efficacy of MET inhibitor tivantinib (ARQ 197) combined with sorafenib in patients (pts) with renal cell carcinoma (RCC) from a phase 1 study
Poster board # 24
Presenter: Igor Puzanov, MD
Location: E450a
Date and time: Saturday, June 2, 2012, 1:15 PM  5:15 PM
Abstract number: 8519
Poster title: Safety and efficacy of MET inhibitor tivantinib (ARQ 197) combined with sorafenib in patients (pts) with NRAS wild-type or mutant melanoma from a phase 1 study
Poster board # 8
Presenter: Julie A. Means-Powell, MD
Location: E450b
General Poster Session
Date and time: Monday, June 4, 2012, 8:00 AM  12:00 PM
Abstract number: 4117
Poster title: Safety and efficacy of MET inhibitor tivantinib (ARQ 197) combined with sorafenib in patients (pts) with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) from a phase 1 study
Poster board # 50D
Presenter: Robert E. Martell, MD, PhD
Location: S Hall A2
Date and time: Monday, June 4, 2012, 8:00 AM  12:00 PM
Abstract number: 4082
Poster title: A phase II study of tivantinib monotherapy in patients with previously treated advanced or recurrent gastric cancer
Poster board # 46A
Presenter: Kei Muro, MD
Location: S Hall A2
 
ArQules press release dated May 17, 2012 is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.  Sections of the press release describing the presentations and providing additional information regarding presentation sites and times shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
3
 
 
Section 9-Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1 Press release announcing clinical data to be presented at the 2012 American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) Annual Meeting.
 
 
4
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
5

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd. (TSE 4568) today announced that an oral presentation at the Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) will feature Phase 2 trial data with tivantinib as a single agent investigational second-line treatment in hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC).  ArQule announced that this randomized, double-blind study met its primary endpoint in January and will now present the full results from this trial, including positive data in the pre-defined c-MET high population.  Additional clinical data with tivantinib will be featured in two poster discussions and two general poster sessions.   Abstracts of these presentations with tivantinib have been published on .
Woburn, MA and Japan Tokyo, May 17, 2012 
www.asco.org
These findings represent the first randomized data reported with an investigational c-MET inhibitor administered as a single agent second-line treatment in HCC, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  They clearly define c-MET high patients as a biological subgroup for potential targeted therapy with tivantinib.  The robust statistical significance achieved in this trial reflects the anti-cancer activity of tivantinib alone and expands its therapeutic potential.
HCC Trial Summary: c-MET high patients
Data from the HCC trial demonstrated a statistically significant improvement in time-to-progression (HR=0.43, log rank p-value=0.03), accompanied by significant improvements in progression-free survival and disease control rate among second-line patients with c-MET high tumors who were treated with tivantinib.  In addition, overall survival data were observed favoring tivantinib-treated patients in this population.  Efficacy was similar in the two tivantinib dosing subgroups (360 milligrams twice daily and 240 milligrams twice daily), with less frequent neutropenia in the lower dose.
 
 
 
 
Previously announced top-line data from the HCC trial demonstrate that treatment with tivantinib produced a statistically significant 56 percent improvement in TTP in the intent-to-treat (ITT) population by central radiology review, the primary endpoint (HR = 0.64, log rank p-value = 0.04) in this trial.  Adverse events were reported at similar rates in the treatment and placebo arms, except for a higher incidence of fatigue and hematologic events, including neutropenia and anemia, in tivantinib-treated patients. The incidence of hematologic events declined following dose reduction of tivantinib from 360 milligrams twice daily to 240 milligrams twice daily.
 
The schedule of this and other presentations of data with tivantinib is provided below.  All times are Central Daylight Time.
Oral Presentation
Date and time: Saturday, June 2, 2012, 5:00 PM  5:15 PM
Abstract number: 4006
Poster title: Tivantinib (ARQ 197) versus placebo in patients (Pts) with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) who failed one systemic therapy: Results of a randomized controlled phase II trial (RCT)
Presenter: Lorenza Rimassa, MD
Location: E Hall D1
Poster Discussion Sessions
Date and time: Saturday, June 2, 2012, 8:00 AM  12:00 PM
Abstract number: 4545
Poster title: Safety and efficacy of MET inhibitor tivantinib (ARQ 197) combined with sorafenib in patients (pts) with renal cell carcinoma (RCC) from a phase 1 study
Poster board # 24
Presenter: Igor Puzanov, MD
Location: E450a
Date and time: Saturday, June 2, 2012, 1:15 PM  5:15 PM
Abstract number: 8519
Poster title: Safety and efficacy of MET inhibitor tivantinib (ARQ 197) combined with sorafenib in patients (pts) with NRAS wild-type or mutant melanoma from a phase 1 study
Poster board # 8
Presenter: Julie A. Means-Powell, MD
Location: E450b
 
2
 
 
General Poster Session
Date and time: Monday, June 4, 2012, 8:00 AM  12:00 PM
Abstract number: 4117
Poster title: Safety and efficacy of MET inhibitor tivantinib (ARQ 197) combined with sorafenib in patients (pts) with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) from a phase 1 study
Poster board # 50D
Presenter: Robert E. Martell, MD, PhD
Location: S Hall A2
Date and time: Monday, June 4, 2012, 8:00 AM  12:00 PM
Abstract number: 4082
Poster title: A phase II study of tivantinib monotherapy in patients with previously treated advanced or recurrent gastric cancer
Poster board # 46A
Presenter: Kei Muro, MD
Location: S Hall A2
Tivantinib is currently in Phase 3 development and has not yet been approved for any indication.
 
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product candidate, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development together with development and commercialization partner, Daiichi Sankyo, Co. Ltd, is tivantinib, an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
About Daiichi Sankyo
The Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical products to address the diversified, unmet medical needs of patients in both mature and emerging markets. While maintaining its portfolio of marketed pharmaceuticals for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and bacterial infections, the Group is engaged in the development of treatments for thrombotic disorders and focused on the discovery of novel oncology and cardiovascular-metabolic therapies. Furthermore, the Daiichi Sankyo Group has created a "Hybrid Business Model," which will respond to market and customer diversity and optimize growth opportunities across the value chain. For more information, please visit .
www.daiichisankyo.com
 
3
 
 
This press release contains statements regarding the clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) by ArQule and its business partner, Daiichi Sankyo.  These statements are based on the current beliefs and expectations of both companies, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib may not demonstrate a promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead ArQule or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data.  Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authorities may disagree with ArQules view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of ArQule, Daiichi Sankyo, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome technical hurdles and other issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible.  There is a risk that these issues may not be successfully resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, with respect to partnered programs, even if certain compounds show initial promise, Daiichi Sankyo or Kyowa Hakko Kirin may decide not to license or continue to develop them, as the case may be.  In addition, Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin have certain rights to unilaterally terminate their agreements with ArQule. If either company were to do so, ArQule might not be able to complete development and commercialization of the applicable licensed products on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the ArQules drug development and other activities, see the ArQules periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Neither ArQule, nor Daiichi Sankyo undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
4
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120518074234.txt.gz
TIME:20120518074234
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
 
                                                                    
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
that recruitment of patients has been completed in the randomized, double-blind, controlled Phase 3 MARQUEE pivotal trial of its investigational selective c-MET inhibitor, tivantinib, in combination with erlotinib in previously treated patients with locally advanced or metastatic, non-squamous, non-small cell lung cancer. Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development of tivantinib is being carried out by the Registrant and its development and commercialization partner, Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd.
 On May 18, 2012, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) announced
   
 
 The Registrants press release dated May 18, 2012, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, is incorporated herein by reference.
   
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
May 18, 2012
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd. (TSE 4568) today announced that recruitment of patients has been completed in the randomized, double-blind, controlled Phase 3 MARQUEE pivotal trial of their investigational selective c-MET inhibitor, tivantinib, in combination with erlotinib in previously treated patients with locally advanced or metastatic, non-squamous, non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).
Woburn, MA and Tokyo, Japan, May 18, 2012 
The MARQUEE trial began enrollment in January 2011 and is being conducted under a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA), which was established following agreement with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA).
(
M
et inhibitor
ARQ
197 plus
E
rlotinib vs
E
rlotinib plus placebo in NSCLC)
Tivantinib is currently in Phase 3 development and has not yet been approved for any indication.
At the time of diagnosis with lung cancer, more than half of all patients have progressed to advanced stages of the disease, with a poor prognosis for long-term survival.  There is a high unmet need for additional effective treatment options for patients and their families, said Glenn Gormley, MD, PhD, Global Head, Research & Development and Senior Executive Officer, Daiichi Sankyo and President, Daiichi Sankyo Pharma Development.
Lung cancer is one of the most commonly diagnosed cancers around the globe,with an estimated 1.6 million new cases diagnosed worldwide each year. NSCLC is the most common form of lung cancer, accounting for approximately 85 percent of all cases.The majority of all lung cancers are non-squamous.
i
 
ii
iii
 
iv
 
 
 
 
 
We would like to thank the patients, investigators and clinical sites who are participating in the MARQUEE trial, said Brian Schwartz, chief medical officer of ArQule. Their commitment, diligence and care have been essential in the timely achievement of this important milestone in the development of tivantinib.
Approximately 1,000 patients have been recruited in MARQUEE from more than 200 clinical sites worldwide.  The primary endpoint in the trial is overall survival in the overall intent-to-treat population.  Professor
Giorgio Scagliotti, MD, PhD,
 
Head of the Department of Clinical and Biological Sciences at S. Luigi Hospital, Orbassano (Torino), Italy is the principal European investigator for MARQUEE, and the principal U.S. investigator is Alan Sandler, MD, Professor of Medicine in the Division of Hematology and Medical Oncology, Department of Medicine, at Oregon Health and Science University in Portland.
In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop tivantinib (ARQ 197) in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan.
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product candidate, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development together with its development and commercialization partner, Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd., is tivantinib, an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
About Daiichi Sankyo
The Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical products to address the diversified, unmet medical needs of patients in both mature and emerging markets. While maintaining its portfolio of marketed pharmaceuticals for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and bacterial infections, the Group is engaged in the development of treatments for thrombotic disorders and focused on the discovery of novel oncology and cardiovascular-metabolic therapies. Furthermore, the Daiichi Sankyo Group has created a "Hybrid Business Model," which will respond to market and customer diversity and optimize growth opportunities across the value chain. For more information, please visit www.daiichisankyo.com
.
 
 
2
 
 
This press release contains statements regarding the clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) by ArQule and its business partner, Daiichi Sankyo.  These statements are based on the current beliefs and expectations of both companies, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib may not demonstrate a promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead ArQule or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data.  Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authorities may disagree with ArQules view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of ArQule, Daiichi Sankyo, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome technical hurdles and other issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible.  There is a risk that these issues may not be successfully resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, with respect to partnered programs, even if certain compounds show initial promise, Daiichi Sankyo or Kyowa Hakko Kirin may decide not to license or continue to develop them, as the case may be.  In addition, Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin have certain rights to unilaterally terminate their agreements with ArQule. If either company were to do so, ArQule might not be able to complete development and commercialization of the applicable licensed products on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with ArQules drug development and other activities, see ArQules periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Neither ArQule nor Daiichi Sankyo undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 American Cancer Society. Global Cancer Facts & Figures 2nd Edition.
i
 
http://www.cancer.org/acs/groups/content/@epidemiologysurveilance/documents/document/acspc-027766.pdf
. Accessed April 11, 2012.
American Cancer Society. Global Cancer Facts & Figures 2nd Edition.
ii 
. Accessed April 11, 2012.
http://www.cancer.org/acs/groups/content/@epidemiologysurveilance/documents/document/acspc-027766.pdf
iii 
American Cancer Society. Non-Small Cell Lung Cancer.
http://www.cancer.org/acs/groups/cid/documents/webcontent/003115-pdf.pdf
. Accessed April 11, 2012.
American Cancer Society. Non-Small Cell Lung Cancer.
iv
http://www.cancer.org/acs/groups/cid/documents/webcontent/003115-pdf.pdf
. Accessed April 11, 2012.
 
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120529172023.txt.gz
TIME:20120529172023
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
 
19 Presidential Way
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 5Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.07.   Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
On May 24, 2012, at the 2012 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc. (the
Registrant) the Registrants stockholders voted:
 
 
 
The voting results are set forth in Exhibit 99.1 to this report and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
 
99.1  Report of Matters Voted Upon by Stockholders
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
May 29, 2012
 
2

Exhibit 99.1
1. The 2012 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc.  (the Annual Meeting) was held at the offices of ArQule, Inc. (the Company) at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, on May 24, 2012 commencing at 10:00 a.m. pursuant to notice properly given.
   
2. At the close of business on March 30, 2012, the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the Annual Meeting, the outstanding voting securities of the Company were shares of common stock, $0.01 par value.  Each of the outstanding shares was entitled to one vote on the matters before the Annual Meeting.
   
53,883,743
 
3. At the Annual Meeting shares of the Registrants issued and outstanding common stock, were represented in person or by proxy, constituting a quorum.
   
49,616,871
 
4. At the Annual Meeting, each of the following nominees for director received the respective number of votes set forth opposite his name, constituting a plurality of the votes cast, and was duly elected as a director of the Registrant:
   
 
 
 
8. The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to ratify the selection of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit our financial statements for the year ending December 31, 2012.
   
approve, by non-binding vote, the compensation of our named executive officers
9.
   
The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120604073829.txt.gz
TIME:20120604073829
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure..
 
announced final results from a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind, phase 2 clinical trial with the selective MET inhibitor tivantinib as a single-agent, investigational, second-line treatment in hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC).
On June 2, 2012, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant)
The results were the subject of an oral presentation at the Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology on June 2, 2012.  Copies of slides that accompanied the presentation may be accessed electronically at http://investors.arqule.com/data.cfm.
The Registrants press release dated June 2, 2012, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, is incorporated herein by reference.
 
he information in this Form 8-K and Exhibit 99.1 attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, in accordance with General Instruction B.2 to Form 8-K.
T
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1   Text of press release announcing clinical trial results dated June 2, 2012.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
   
June 4, 2012
 
2

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. (TSE: 4568) today announced final results from a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind, phase 2 clinical trial with the selective MET inhibitor tivantinib
Woburn, MA and Japan Tokyo, June 2, 2012 
as a single-agent, investigational, second-line treatment in hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC).  The data are to be presented today at the 48th Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) (abstract number 4006).
 
 
 
 
 
The 107 patients in the trial had unresectable HCC and had disease progression after first-line therapy or were unable to tolerate the first-line therapy. Patients were randomized to receive tivantinib at 360 milligrams (mg) twice daily or 240 mg twice daily or placebo (2:1 tivantinib:placebo). The primary endpoint was time to progression (TTP) in the intent to treat (ITT) population.  Other study endpoints were disease control rate (DCR), progression free survival (PFS), overall survival (OS), as well as safety for the ITT population and pre-defined MET-high or MET-low cohorts (as defined by immunohistochemistry).
A statistically significant 56 percent improvement as compared to placebo was seen in TTP in the ITT population (hazard ratio [HR] = 0.64; log rank p-value = 0.04).  In the MET-high cohort, there were also statistically significant improvements in TTP, PFS and OS:
 
Adverse events were reported at similar rates in the treatment and placebo arms of the trial, except for a higher incidence of fatigue and hematologic events, including neutropenia and anemia, in tivantinib-treated patients. The incidence of hematologic events decreased following dose reduction of tivantinib from 360 mg twice daily to 240 mg twice daily. Due to the incidence of neutropenia in the 360 mg treatment group, the tivantinib dose was reduced to 240 mg twice daily for all patients.
Patients living with this disease need more options to slow progression. The findings from this tivantinib study represent the first randomized data reported in HCC with an investigational MET inhibitor, as single-agent therapy in second-line treatment, said Lorenza Rimassa, Deputy Director, Medical Oncology Unit, Humanitas Cancer Center, Milan, Italy.  The data suggest that patients significantly benefited in time to progression and, importantly, those in a biologically relevant MET-high subgroup had an additional significant advantage in overall survival.
 
 
2
 
 
Research has shown that MET is a signaling pathway associated with poor outcomes in many cancers, including liver cancer and non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), said Glenn Gormley, MD, PhD, Global Head of Research & Development and Senior Executive Officer, Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd.  The strong overall survival results among HCC patients in this trial whose tumors were MET-high reinforce this previous research that defines MET as a critical pathway in cancer as well as the activity of tivantinib as a MET inhibitor.
About Hepatocellular Carcinoma (HCC)
Globally, liver cancer is the sixth most common cancer (749,000 new cases), accounting for 7 percent of all cancers, and is the third cause of cancer related death (692,000 cases). HCC represents more than 90 percent of primary liver cancers.  Chronic hepatitis B and C are recognized as the major factors worldwide increasing the risk of HCC, with risk being even greater in the presence of co-infection with these viruses. Cirrhosis is also a risk factor for development of HCC.
2
 
3
4
About Tivantinib and the MET pathway
Tivantinib is an orally administered, selective inhibitor of MET, a receptor tyrosine kinase.
In healthy adult cells, MET is present in normal levels to support natural cellular function, but in cancer cells MET is inappropriately and continuously activated for unknown reasons. When abnormally activated, MET plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.
Tivantinib is currently in phase 3 development and has not yet been approved for any indication.  Tivantinib has the potential to be a first-in-class MET inhibitor for the treatment of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and is currently being studied for other indications including liver and colorectal cancers.
About ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd.
In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement for tivantinib (ARQ 197) in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan.
 
 
3
 
 
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product candidate, in phase 2 and phase 3 clinical development together with development and commercialization partner, Daiichi Sankyo, Co. Ltd., is tivantinib, an oral, selective inhibitor of the MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
About Daiichi Sankyo
The Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical products to address the diversified, unmet medical needs of patients in both mature and emerging markets. While maintaining its portfolio of marketed pharmaceuticals for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and bacterial infections, the Group is engaged in the development of treatments for thrombotic disorders and focused on the discovery of novel oncology and cardiovascular-metabolic therapies. Furthermore, the Daiichi Sankyo Group has created a "Hybrid Business Model," which will respond to market and customer diversity and optimize growth opportunities across the value chain. For more information, please visit .
www.daiichisankyo.com
 
 
4
 
 
This press release contains statements regarding the clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) by ArQule and its business partner, Daiichi Sankyo.  These statements are based on the current beliefs and expectations of both companies, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib may not demonstrate a promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead ArQule or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data.  Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authhi Sankyo, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome technical hurdles and other issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible.  There is a risk that these issues may not be successfully resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, with respect to partnered programs, even if certain compounds show initial promise, Daiichi Sankyo or Kyowa Hakko Kirin may decide not to license or continue to develop them, as the case may be.  In addition, Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin have certain rights to unilaterally terminate their agreements with ArQule
orities may disagree with ArQules view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of ArQule, Daiic
. If either company were to do so, ArQule might not be able to complete development and commercialization of the applicable licensed products on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with ArQules drug development and other activities, see ArQules periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Neither ArQule nor Daiichi Sankyo undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
5
 
2
EASLEORTC Clinical Practice Guidelines: Management of hepatocellular carcinoma. Journal of Hepatology. 2012;56: 908-943
3
EASLEORTC Clinical Practice Guidelines: Management of hepatocellular carcinoma. Journal of Hepatology. 2012;56: 908-943
 
 
6


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120802072840.txt.gz
TIME:20120802072840
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 2, 2012 ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2012.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
 
 Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated August 2, 2012 announcing results of operations.
 
2
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
                                                                      

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2012.
Woburn, MA, August 2, 2012 
For the quarter ended June 30, 2012, the Company reported a net loss of $885,000 or $0.01 per share, compared with a net loss of $10,804,000 or $0.20 per share, for the second quarter of 2011.  For the six-month period ended June 30, 2012, the Company reported a net loss of $5,145,000 or $0.09 per share, compared to a net loss of $12,270,000 or $0.24 per share, for the six-month period ended June 30, 2011.
At June 30, 2012, the Company had a total of approximately $147,068,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities.
Operational Update
The timely completion of patient recruitment in the MARQUEE trial marks an important milestone in the development of tivantinib in non-squamous cell non-small cell lung cancer, a disease with a high unmet need for additional effective treatment options, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  Approximately 1,000 patients from more than 200 clinical sites worldwide are participating in this trial, which is being conducted under a Special Protocol Assessment in the U.S.
 
 
 
 
 
Findings presented recently at ASCO represent the first randomized data reported in HCC with an investigational MET inhibitor as single-agent therapy in second-line treatment, said Mr. Pucci.  Based on the positive clinical results in previously treated HCC patients with MET-high tumors, planning is underway for a Phase 3 trial in this population.
 
Revenues and Expenses
The Company reported total revenues of $11,829,000 for the quarter ended June 30, 2012, compared to revenues of $5,447,000 for the second quarter of 2011.  
Revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2012 were $20,327,000 compared to revenues of $18,852,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2011.
 
The $6.4 million revenue increase in the 2012 three month period is due to revenue increases of $1.7 million from the Companys Daiichi Sankyo AKIP
TM
agreement, $0.8 million from our Daiichi Sankyo ARQ 092 agreement, $0.2 million from our Kyowa Hakko Kirin tivantinib license agreement, and lower contra-revenue of $3.7 million.  
The $1.5 million revenue increase in the six month period is due to increases of $4.2 million from our Daiichi Sankyo AKIP agreement, $1.6 million from our Daiichi Sankyo ARQ 092 agreement, $0.6 million from our Kyowa Hakko Kirin license agreement and lower contra-revenue of $5.3 million. These increases were partially offset by a $10.2 million decrease in revenue recognized from the $25 million MARQUEE milestone payment received from Daiichi Sankyo in the first quarter of 2011.  In the six months ended June 30, 2011 when we received that milestone payment, we recognized revenue of $12.7 million compared with $2.5 million in the six months ended June 30, 2012, resulting in a revenue decrease of $10.2 million.
TM
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 were $12,785,000 compared to $16,388,000 for the second quarter of 2011.  Total costs and expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2012 were $25,687,000 compared to $31,324,000 for the same period in 2011.
Research and development costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2012 were $9,271,000 and $18,574,000 respectively, compared with $12,836,000 and $24,229,000 for the 2011 three and six-month periods.  The lower research and development costs and expenses in the 2012 periods were due to lower outsourced clinical and product development costs related to our Phase 1 and Phase 2 programs for tivantinib.
General and administrative costs for the three and six-month periods ended June 30, 2012 were $3,514,000 and $7,113,000 respectively, compared with $3,552,000 and $7,095,000 for the 2011 three and six-month periods.
 
 
 
 
 
Confirmed Financial Guidance
As previously stated, for 2012 ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $39 and $44 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $40 and $45 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $15 and $20 million.  Net loss per share is expected to range between $(0.25) and $(0.33) for 2012.  ArQule expects to end 2012 with between $121 and $126 million in cash and marketable securities.
 
Conference Call and Webcast
Date:                                                      Thursday, August 2, 2012
Time:                                                      9:00 a.m. Eastern Time
Conference Call Numbers
Domestic:                                           877-868-1831
International:                                           914-495-8595
Web cast:                                           
http://investors.arqule.com/events.cfm
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 855-859-2056 and outside the U.S. 404-537-3406.  The replay access code is 99910692.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Company has also initiated Phase 1 clinical testing with ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and with ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Companys financial guidance for 2012 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2012) and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin.  These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 621 (an Eg5 inhibitor) and ARQ 736 (a RAF kinases inhibitor) may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib is subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20120829084010.txt.gz
TIME:20120829084010
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. 
 
Other Events.
 
ArQule, Inc. (ArQule) has been informed by Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. (Kyowa), which has exclusive development rights to tivantinib in Japan and certain parts of Asia, of Kyowas decision to temporarily suspend patient enrollment in its ongoing Phase 3 ATTENTION (sian rial of ivantinib plus rlotinib for SCLC without EGFR Muta) trial.  The ATTENTION trial investigates the use of tivantinib and erlotinib versus erlotinib and placebo in second line non-squamous non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).  This trial is being conducted by Kyowa in Japan, South Korea and Taiwan.
A
T
T
E
N
tion
 
Kyowa has taken this action following the recommendation of an independent Safety Review Committee (SRC) in Japan after the reporting of suspected cases of interstitial lung disease (ILD) in the study.  The SRC has requested additional information and analyses regarding these cases of ILD which showed an imbalance between the arms of the trial.
 
During review of the additional information, treatment of patients already enrolled in the study is continuing pursuant to the protocol for the study.  Updates on the status of this review and a determination regarding whether to restart patient enrollment will be provided as warranted.
 
Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. (Daiichi Sankyo) and ArQule are developing tivantinib in the Americas, Europe and certain other regions of the world. The partners are conducting in those regions the Phase 3 MARQUEE trial (et Inhibitor 197 plus rlotinib vs rlotinib plus Placebo in NSCLC) that completed recruitment of approximately 1,000 patients in May 2012. Kyowas decision regarding the ATTENTION trial is unrelated to the MARQUEE trial.
M
ARQ
E
E
 
Erlotinib (Tarceva) was approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) in November, 2004 for the treatment of patients with locally advanced or metastatic NSCLC after failure of at least one prior chemotherapy regimen.   Tivantinib is an investigational selective c-MET inhibitor in Phase 3 clinical development in combination with erlotinib for non-squamous NSCLC in the U.S. under a Special Protocol Assessment agreed upon with the FDA.  Clinical trials of tivantinib and erlotinib reported to date have demonstrated that this combination was well tolerated by patients, without apparent drug-drug interaction.
 
In April, 2007, ArQule entered into an exclusive license agreement with Kyowa to develop and commercialize tivantinib in Japan and parts of Asia, including South Korea, Taiwan and China (including Hong Kong).  In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop tivantinib in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world excluding territories covered by ArQules agreement with Kyowa.
 
Forward Looking Statements
 
This Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements are generally identified by the words will, expects, anticipates, believes, estimates or similar expressions.  These forward-looking statements reflect managements view of future events and are subject to risks, uncertainties, assumptions and other important factors, many of which may be beyond our control, and could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied in these forward-looking statements.  Factors that could cause actual results to differ from such statements include, but are not limited to: an adverse decision or decisions following a review of additional safety information, or findings regarding a clinical benefit that are inconsistent with those of recent publications.  The forward- looking statements contained herein represent managements judgment of ArQule as of the date hereof.  We disclaim any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20121002073052.txt.gz
TIME:20121002073052
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd. discontinuation of the Phase 3 MARQUEE pivotal trial of tivantinib, in combination with erlotinib in previously treated patients with locally advanced or metastatic, non-squamous, non-small cell lung cancer. The Registrant and Daiichi Sankyo were conducting the trial as co-developers of tivantinib.
        On October 2, 2012, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) and
(Daiichi Sankyo) announced
 
The Registrants press release dated October 2, 2012, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1   Text of press release announcing interim clinical trial results dated October 2, 2012.
 
 
 
2
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
3
 
                                                                      

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd. (TSE 4568) today announced that the independent Data Monitoring Committee (DMC) of the Phase 3 MARQUEE trial recommended the study be stopped early following a planned interim analysis, when they concluded that the study would not meet its primary endpoint of improved overall survival.  Although the interim analysis showed a statistically significant improvement in progression-free survival (PFS) in the intent-to-treat (ITT) population, this benefit did not carry over to overall survival.  There were no safety concerns identified by the DMC to Daiichi Sankyo or ArQule during this interim analysis.
Woburn, MA and Tokyo, Japan, October 2, 2012 
(
M
et inhibitor
ARQ
197 plus
E
rlotinib vs
E
rlotinib plus placebo in NSCLC)
MARQUEE is a randomized, double-blind, controlled pivotal trial to evaluate the investigational selective MET inhibitor, tivantinib (ARQ 197), in combination with erlotinib in previously treated patients with locally advanced or metastatic, non-squamous NSCLC.
ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo are providing information regarding the study discontinuation to health authorities and those clinical investigators participating in studies of tivantinib. Data from this study will be presented at an upcoming scientific meeting.
 
 
 
 
We are disappointed that the MARQUEE trial did not provide statistically significant results for overall survival in a disease and treatment setting which remains a major unmet medical need, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.
Fighting cancer is a complex process in that therapies work differently in different tumor settings, so we will continue to investigate tivantinib in other tumor types, said Glenn Gormley, MD, PhD, global head, R&D and senior executive officer, Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd.
Approximately 1,000 patients were recruited in MARQUEE from more than 200 clinical sites worldwide.  The primary endpoint in the trial is overall survival (OS) in the overall intent-to-treat population.  Secondary endpoints include OS in the subpopulation of patients with epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) wild type, progression-free survival (PFS) in the ITT population, and further assessment of the safety of tivantinib in combination with erlotinib.  
Tivantinib has not been approved for any indication in any country.
In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop tivantinib in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan.
ArQule Conference Call and Webcast
 
A replay of the conference call will be available for seven days following the call and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (855) 859-2056 and outside the U.S. (404) 537-3406.  The replay access code is 37426625.
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product candidate, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development together with development and commercialization partner, Daiichi Sankyo, Co. Ltd., is tivantinib, an oral, selective inhibitor of the MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
2
 
 
About Daiichi Sankyo
The Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical products to address the diversified, unmet medical needs of patients in both mature and emerging markets. While maintaining its portfolio of marketed pharmaceuticals for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and bacterial infections, the Group is engaged in the development of treatments for thrombotic disorders and focused on the discovery of novel oncology and cardiovascular-metabolic therapies. Furthermore, the Daiichi Sankyo Group has created a "Hybrid Business Model," which will respond to market and customer diversity and optimize growth opportunities across the value chain. For more information, please visit www.daiichisankyo.com.
This press release contains statements regarding the clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) by ArQule and its business partner, Daiichi Sankyo.  These statements are based on the current beliefs and expectations of both companies, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical, early stage and interim clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib may not demonstrate a promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead ArQule or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data.  Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authorities may disagree with ArQules view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of ArQule, Daiichi Sankyo, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib in Asian territories, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome technical hurdles and other issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible.  There is a risk that these issues may not be successfully resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, with respect to partnered programs, even if certain compounds show initial promise, Daiichi Sankyo or Kyowa Hakko Kirin may decide not to license or continue to develop them, as the case may be.  In addition, Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin have certain rights to unilaterally terminate their agreements with ArQule. If either company were to do so, ArQule might not be able to complete development and commercialization of the applicable licensed products on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with ArQules drug development and other activities, see ArQules periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Neither ArQule nor Daiichi Sankyo undertakes any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20121016075937.txt.gz
TIME:20121016075937
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On October 16, 2012, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) announced a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) agreement with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for the design of a pivotal Phase 3 trial of tivantinib in patients with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC).
 
The SPA process is a procedure by which the FDA provides official evaluation and written guidance on the design and size of proposed protocols that are intended to form the basis for a new drug application.  Final marketing approval depends on the results of the trial.
 
The Phase 3 trial will be a randomized, double-blinded study of tivantinib as single agent therapy in previously treated patients with MET diagnostic-high inoperable HCC.  The primary endpoint is overall survival in the intent-to-treat population, and the secondary endpoint is progression free survival in the same population.  Approximately 300 patients are planned to be enrolled at approximately 120 centers worldwide.
 
A copy of the press release dated October 16, 2012 announcing the SPA is filed as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(d)  Exhibits
 
99.1  SPA Press release dated October 16, 2012
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
2

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) agreement with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for the design of a pivotal Phase 3 trial of tivantinib in patients with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC).
Woburn, MA, October 16, 2012 
The Phase 3 trial will be a randomized, double-blinded study of tivantinib as single agent therapy in previously treated patients with MET diagnostic-high inoperable HCC.  The primary endpoint is overall survival in the intent-to-treat population, and the secondary endpoint is progression free survival in the same population.  Approximately 300 patients are planned to be enrolled at approximately 120 centers worldwide.
The SPA process is a procedure by which the FDA provides official evaluation and written guidance on the design and size of proposed protocols that are intended to form the basis for a New Drug Application.  Final marketing approval depends on the results of the trial.
We are mindful of the high unmet need among patients suffering from this disease, and we are proceeding with our partner, Daiichi Sankyo, toward the timely initiation of this trial, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.
About Hepatocellular Carcinoma (HCC)
Globally, liver cancer is the sixth most common cancer (749,000 new cases), accounting for 7 percent of all cancers, and is the third cause of cancer related death (692,000 cases). HCC represents more than 90 percent of primary liver cancers.  Chronic hepatitis B and C are recognized as the major factors worldwide increasing the risk of HCC, with risk being even greater in the presence of co-infection with these viruses. Cirrhosis is also a risk factor for development of HCC.
1
 
2
3
 
1 
 
 
About Tivantinib and the MET pathway
Tivantinib is an orally administered, selective inhibitor of MET, a receptor tyrosine kinase.
In healthy adult cells, MET is present in normal levels to support natural cellular function, but in cancer cells MET is inappropriately and continuously activated for unknown reasons. When abnormally activated, MET plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.Tivantinib has not yet been approved for any indication in any country.
 
About ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd.
In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement for tivantinib (ARQ 197) in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan.
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product candidate, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development together with development and commercialization partner, Daiichi Sankyo, Co. Ltd., is tivantinib, an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
This press release contains statements regarding clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) by ArQule and its business partner, Daiichi Sankyo, including a planned Phase 3 trial in second-line hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) to be conducted under a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA).  These statements are based on the current beliefs and expectations of both companies, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib may not demonstrate a promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead ArQule or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data.  Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authorities may disagree with ArQules view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of ArQule, Daiichi Sankyo, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome technical hurdles and other issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible.  There is a risk that these issues may not be successfully resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, with respect to partnered programs, even if certain compounds show initial promise, Daiichi Sankyo or Kyowa Hakko Kirin may decide not to license or continue to develop them, as the case may be.  In addition, Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin have certain rights to unilaterally terminate their agreements with ArQule. If either company were to do so, ArQule might not be able to complete development and commercialization of the applicable licensed products on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with ArQules drug development and other activities, see ArQules periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Neither ArQule nor Daiichi Sankyo undertakes any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
   
i
 
EASLEORTC Clinical Practice Guidelines: Management of hepatocellular carcinoma. Journal of Hepatology. 2012;56: 908-943
 
  
ii 
EASLEORTC Clinical Practice Guidelines: Management of hepatocellular carcinoma. Journal of Hepatology. 2012;56: 908-943
 
 Chiaramonte M, Stroffolini T, Vian A, et al.: Rate of incidence of hepatocellular carcinoma in patients with compensated viral cirrhosis. Cancer 85 (10): 2132-37, 1999.
    iii
 
 
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20121030073643.txt.gz
TIME:20121030073643
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
has today issued a press release related to the discontinuation of its ongoing Phase 3 ATTENTION (Asian Trial of Tivantinib plus Erlotinib for NSCLC without EGFR Mutation) trial based on a recommendation by the trials Safety Review Committee.  This study is a randomized, double-blinded trial comparing tivantinib and erlotinib to placebo and erlotinib.
   
ArQule, Inc. (ArQule or the Registrant) reports that Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. (Kyowa), which has licensed from ArQule exclusive development rights to tivantinib in Japan and certain parts of Asia,
 Complete data from the ATTENTION trial are expected in the second half of 2013.  ArQule will discuss the further conduct of this trial at its previously announced third quarter fiscal 2012 conference call, scheduled for November 1, 2012 at 9:00 a.m. eastern time.  Conference call-in information is as follows:
   
Conference Call Dial-In Numbers
 A replay of the conference call will be available beginning approximately two hours after its completion for seven days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 1-855-859-2056 and 1-404-537-3406 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is 53861797.
   
Forward Looking Statements
 
 This Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements are generally identified by the words will, expects, anticipates, believes, estimates or similar expressions.  These forward-looking statements reflect managements view of future events and are subject to risks, uncertainties, assumptions and other important factors, many of which may be beyond our control, and could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied in these forward-looking statements.  Factors that could cause actual results to differ from such statements include, but are not limited to: an adverse decision or decisions following a review of additional safety information, or findings regarding a clinical benefit that are inconsistent with those of recent trials.  The forward- looking statements contained herein represent managements judgment of ArQule as of the date hereof.  We disclaim any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statement except to the extent required by law.
   
 
 
2
 
 
SIGNATURES
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
 
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20121101070614.txt.gz
TIME:20121101070614
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
19 Presidential Way
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 1, 2012 ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its results of operations for the fiscal quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2012.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated November 1, 2012 announcing results of operations.
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
 
For Immediate Release:
 
ARQULE ANNOUNCES THIRD QUARTER FISCAL 2012 RESULTS
 
 
Conference call scheduled today at 9:00 a.m. eastern time
 
-- ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today reported its results of operations for the fiscal quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2012.
Woburn, Mass., November 1, 2012
The Company reported a net loss of $431,000 or $0.01 per share for the quarter ended September 30, 2012, compared to a net loss of $2,260,000 or $0.04 per share for the quarter ended September 30, 2011.  For the nine-month period ended September 30, 2012, the Company reported a net loss of $5,576,000 or $0.09 per share, compared to a net loss of $14,530,000 or $0.28 per share for the same period in 2011.
At September 30, 2012, the Company had a total of $140,158,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities.
Recent Operational Developments
Tivantinib (ARQ 197)
 
 
 
 
 
 
Earlier-stage pipeline
Recent developments in the tivantinib non-small cell lung cancer clinical development program have re-focused our near-term efforts on the commencement of a Phase 3 trial with tivantinib as single agent therapy in second-line HCC, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule. We will be conducting this trial under the recently announced SPA, and our determination to pursue this trial in a timely fashion is fueled by the recognition of the high unmet need among patients suffering from this disease.
The MARQUEE trial, fully enrolled early this year, will be stopped for futility at the interim analysis following the recommendation of the DMC, which was focused on the primary endpoint of overall survival in the intent-to-treat population, said Mr. Pucci.  Data will continue to be compiled to a mature cut-off point, and patients who were on study drug treatment at the time of the DMC recommendation will have the opportunity to remain on treatment at their physicians discretion. Following final database compilation and analyses, complete trial results will be presented in a scientific forum.
With respect to the ATTENTION trial, Kyowa is discontinuing that study as announced earlier this week based on a recommendation by the trials Safety Review Committee, said Mr. Pucci.  Complete data from the trial are expected in the second half of 2013.
Our financial position continues to be strong, said Mr. Pucci, and we expect to conclude this year with between $127 million and $130 million in cash, equivalents and marketable securities.
Revenues and Expenses
The Company reported total revenues of $10,944,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2012, compared to revenues of $11,954,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2011.  Revenues for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 were $31,271,000, compared to revenues of $30,806,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2011.
The $1.0 million revenue decrease in the three month period is due to revenue decreases of $4.6 million from the $10 million milestone payment received from Kyowa Hakko in the third quarter of 2011 and $3.0 million from the Companys Daiichi Sankyo AKIP agreement, partially offset by an increase of $0.6 million from the Companys Daiichi Sankyo ARQ 092 agreement, and lower contra-revenue of $6.0 million associated with the Daiichi Sankyo tivantinib agreement.
 
The $0.5 million revenue increase in the nine month period is due to lower contra-revenue of $11.3 million associated with the Companys Daiichi Sankyo tivantinib agreement, and revenue increases of $1.2 million from the Daiichi Sankyo AKIP agreement and $2.2 million from the Daiichi Sankyo ARQ 092 agreement. These revenue increases were partially offset by a $10.2 million decrease in revenue recognized on the $25 million MARQUEE milestone payment received from Daiichi Sankyo in the first quarter of 2011 and a $4.0 million decrease in revenue recognized on the $10 million milestone payment received from Kyowa Hakko in the third quarter of 2011.
For the quarter ended September 30, 2012, the Company reported total costs and expenses of $11,533,000, compared to total costs and expenses of $14,235,000 for the quarter ended September 30, 2011.  Total costs and expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 were $37,220,000, compared to $45,559,000 for the same period in 2011.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Research and development costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2012 were $8,146,000 and $26,720,000 respectively, compared with $11,108,000 and $35,337,000 for the 2011 three and nine-month periods. Research and development expense in the three months ended September 30, 2012 decreased primarily due to lower spending of $1.6 million on outsourced clinical and product development costs related to our Phase 1 and 2 programs for tivantinib, $0.8 million on preclinical costs and $0.5 million on lower labor related costs. Research and development expense in the nine months ended September 30, 2012 decreased primarily due to lower spending of $5.2 million on outsourced clinical and product development costs related to our Phase 1 and 2 programs for tivantinib, $2.1 million on preclinical costs and $0.9 million on lower labor related costs.
General and administrative costs for the three and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2012 were $3,387,000 and $10,500,000, respectively, compared with $3,127,000 and $10,222,000 for the 2011 three and nine-month periods.
Financial Guidance
The Company is revising its financial guidance for 2012 based on the following considerations.  As a result of the October 2012 decision to terminate the MARQUEE trial, the development period for recognition of revenue from the Companys tivantinib collaboration agreement with Daiichi Sankyo has been extended to June 2015.  Consequently, commencing with the fourth quarter of 2012, revenue will be recognized over this new development period.  In addition, the Company anticipates a reduction in expenses in 2012 related primarily to lower outsourced costs related to tivantinib and pre-clinical development programs.
For 2012 ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $35 and $38 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $34 and $37 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $12 and $15 million.  Net loss per share is expected to range between $(0.20) and $(0.25) for 2012.  ArQule expects to end 2012 with between $127 and $130 million in cash and marketable securities.
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m.
 
                       
 
 
 
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning approximately two hours after its completion for seven days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 1-855-859-2056 and 1-404-537-3406 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is 53861797.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Companys financial guidance for 2012 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2012) and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd.  These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 092 (an AKT inhibitor), ARQ 621 (an Eg5 inhibitor), ARQ 736 (a RAF kinases inhibitor) and ARQ 087 (an FGFR inhibitor) may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib is subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
###


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20121108092312.txt.gz
TIME:20121108092312
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
19 Presidential Way
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
 
 
Item 5.02   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.                                        
 
 (b) and (e)On November 2, 2012, Dr. Thomas Chan, Chief Scientific Officer of ArQule, Inc. (ArQule or the Registrant) executed a separation agreement with ArQule under which his employment with ArQule will terminate on November 22, 2012.   Dr. Chan will receive no payments or benefits under his current employment agreement following his termination date; however, he will continue to receive his current salary and other benefits pursuant to the separation agreement through and including November 22, 2012.  Dr. Chans departure is not the result of any disagreement with management or the ArQule Board of Directors. His decision is related to his plans to establish a new company.
   
  
The separation agreement becomes effective on November 10, 2012 in accordance with statutory notice provisions under federal law. 
Under the separation agreement Dr. Chan waives any claim for compensation under his current  employment agreement and will release the Registrant from all liability related to his employment with the Registrant and otherwise and receive the following:
 
(i)      payment in 2013 of  a pro rata portion of his discretionary bonus for 2012 calculated by multiplying the amount of his bonus ; and
target times a percentage based on the scoring of achievement of ArQules 2012 corporate goals by the Registrants Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee with the endorsement of its board of directors
 
(ii)      extension of the period following his departure in which to exercise stock options for the purchase of 330,000 shares of common stock of the Registrant issued to him under the Registrants 1994 Amended and Restated Equity Incentive Plan and vested as of the separation date from February17, 2013 to December 31, 2013.
The foregoing summary of the material terms of Dr. Chans separation agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the agreement which is incorporated herein by reference and to the terms of his employment agreement dated as of November 21, 2008 filed as Exhibit 10.21 to the Registrants Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 filed on March 1, 2012 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)   Exhibits.
  
Employment agreement dated as of November 21, 2008 by and between ArQule, Inc. and Thomas C. K. Chan, filed as Exhibit 10.21 to the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 filed on March 1, 2012 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20130111080155.txt.gz
TIME:20130111080155
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
19 Presidential Way
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On January 11, 2013, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd. (Daiichi Sankyo) announced the top-line results of a randomized Phase 2 signal generation trial of tivantinib used in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab in patients with refractory or relapsed colorectal cancer. Daiichi Sankyo was conducting the trial as a licensee and co-developer of tivantinib with the Registrant.
A copy of the press release dated January 11, 2013 summarizing the results is filed as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits
 
99.1  Clinical trial results press release dated January 11, 2013
 
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
                                                                
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
Daiichi Sankyo Company, Limited (TSE 4568) and ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced the top-line results of a randomized Phase 2 signal generation trial of tivantinib (ARQ 197) used in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab in patients with refractory or relapsed colorectal cancer (CRC).  Although the trial did not meet its primary endpoint of Progression-Free Survival (PFS), the analysis of the patients enrolled (n=122) showed that median PFS was 8.3 months in the experimental arm (patients treated with irinotecan and cetuximab plus tivantinib), compared with 7.3 months in the control arm (patients treated with irinotecan and cetuximab plus placebo) (hazard ratio = 0.85, 95% CI: 0.55, 1.33).  Objective Response Rate (ORR), a secondary endpoint, was 45 percent in the experimental arm versus 33 percent in the control arm but was not statistically significant. The PFS results obtained in both the control arm and the experimental arm were longer than expected compared to previously published historical norms.
Tokyo, Japan and Woburn, MA  January 11, 2013 
Additional data and analyses from this trial are planned for presentation at a future medical meeting and will include mature OS data as well as analyses of patient sub-groups, biomarker status and regional variability, including pre- and post study treatments.
 
We are encouraged by these findings that expand the body of data for tivantinib in CRC and offer the potential for further exploration, said Reinhard von Roemeling, M.S., Vice President, Clinical Development - Oncology, Daiichi Sankyo.  We plan to continue discussions with key opinion leaders in the field of CRC to determine how best to proceed with further clinical development of tivantinib in this tumor type.
 
 
 
 
Adverse events were reported at similar rates in the experimental and control arms, except for increased neutropenia observed in the experimental arm, with no discontinuations of treatment for this reason.  No treatment-emergent adverse events leading to death were assessed as related to study treatment. Tivantinib was generally well tolerated in combination with the doses of cetuximab and irinotecan studied in this trial.
About the Phase 2 Trial
The 122 patients enrolled in this trial (US n=67; Russia n=39; Western Europe n=16) had unresectable CRC, progressed following first-line treatment and had tumors expressing the wild-type form of the KRAS gene. The primary objective of the trial was to assess the contribution of tivantinib to the irinotecan and cetuximab treatment regimen.  The primary endpoint of the study was PFS, and secondary objectives included OS and ORR.  Patients were randomized to receive tivantinib, 360 milligrams twice daily, plus irinotecan and cetuximab, or placebo plus irinotecan and cetuximab.  The trial was conducted by Daiichi Sankyo, the co-developer with ArQule of tivantinib in all regions outside of certain territories in Asia.
 
Investor Conference Call
ArQule will host an investor conference call today at 9:00 a.m.
 
 
Conference Call Dial-In Numbers
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning approximately two hours after its completion for seven days and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 1-855-859-2056 and 1-404-537-3406 from outside the U.S.  For archived calls, the access code is 88326775.
About Colorectal Cancer (CRC)
Colorectal cancer is the second leading cause of cancer-related deaths in the U.S.  and is the third most common cancer in men and women.  According to the National Cancer Institute, it is estimated that more than 140,000 new cases of colorectal cancer will be diagnosed in 2012, and an estimated 51,700 deaths from the disease will occur this year.  The estimated incidence rate was 46 per 100,000 people during the period 2005-2009.
 
2
 
 
About MET and Tivantinib (ARQ 197)
Tivantinib is an orally administered, selective inhibitor of MET, a receptor tyrosine kinase, which is currently in Phase 2 clinical trials.  In certain healthy adult cells, MET is present in low to normal levels to support natural cellular function, but in some cancer cells, MET is inappropriately and continuously activated. When abnormally activated, MET plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.
Pre-clinical data have demonstrated that tivantinib inhibits MET activation in a range of human tumor cell lines and shows anti-tumor activity against several human tumor xenografts.  In clinical trials to date, treatment with tivantinib has been generally well tolerated and has shown clinical activity in the tumors studied.  Tivantinib has not yet been approved for any indication in any country.
About ArQule, Inc. and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd.
 
On December 19, 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd. signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop tivantinib in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.
 
About Daiichi Sankyo
The Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical products to address the diversified, unmet medical needs of patients in both mature and emerging markets. While maintaining its portfolio of marketed pharmaceuticals for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and bacterial infections, the Group is engaged in the development of treatments for thrombotic disorders and focused on the discovery of novel oncology and cardiovascular-metabolic therapies. Furthermore, the Daiichi Sankyo Group has created a "Hybrid Business Model," which will respond to market and customer diversity and optimize growth opportunities across the value chain. For more information, please visit www.daiichisankyo.com.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
3
 
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the clinical trials with tivantinib in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab in colorectal cancer conducted by the Company and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. as well as the Companys agreement with Daiichi Sankyo. These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib alone or in a combination therapy may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects in such trials; in addition, such therapies may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profiles in later stage or larger scale clinical trials, including among patients with underlying cirrhosis and compromised liver function, as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing tivantinib or in obtaining irinotecan and cetuximab that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib alone or in a combination therapy is subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, its partner, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
4
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20130131081302.txt.gz
TIME:20130131081302
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
19 Presidential Way
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
  
On January 31, 2013, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. (Daiichi Sankyo) announced that the first patient has been enrolled in their pivotal Phase 3 METIV-HCC clinical trial of tivantinib (ARQ 197), an investigational selective inhibitor of MET, in patients diagnosed with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) who have received one or two prior systemic anti-cancer therapies.
As a result, the Registrant will receive a $15 million milestone payment from Daiichi Sankyo.
This payment is provided for under the terms of the license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement with Daiichi Sankyo previously disclosed by the Registrant (the Agreement).  The Agreement covers the co-development and commercialization of tivantinib by the parties in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for tivantinibs development and commercialization.
Under the terms of the agreement, Daiichi Sankyo and the Registrant share the costs of development of tivantnib. The Registrants share of Phase 3 development costs are payable exclusively out of milestones and royalties received from Daiichi Sankyo under the Agreement.  Because the Registrants cumulative share of Phase 3 costs incurred but not yet paid exceeds the milestone amount, the full $15 million will be repaid to Daiichi Sankyo.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1   Text of press release describing announcement of enrollment of patient and payment of milestone dated January 31, 2013.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
2

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
Daiichi Sankyo Company, Limited (TSE 4568) and ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced that the first patient has been enrolled in the pivotal Phase 3 METIV-HCC (-high patients with antinib in HCC) trial of tivantinib (ARQ 197).  Tivantinib, an investigational selective inhibitor of MET, a receptor tyrosine kinase, is being evaluated for the treatment of patients diagnosed with hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) who have received one or two prior systemic anti-cancer therapies.
Tokyo, Japan and Woburn, MA  January 31, 2013 
MET
tiv
The METIV-HCC trial is a randomized, double-blinded, controlled study of previously treated patients with MET-high inoperable HCC who will receive tivantinib or placebo.  The primary endpoint is overall survival (OS), and the secondary endpoint is progression-free survival (PFS).  Approximately 300 patients are planned to be enrolled at approximately 120 clinical centers worldwide.  Additional details of the trial are available on .
www.clinicaltrials.gov
We are very pleased to begin this Phase 3 trial to advance our understanding of the potential role of tivantinib in the treatment of HCC, said Glenn Gormley, MD, PhD, Global Head of Research and Development and Senior Executive Officer, Daiichi Sankyo. It is our hope that this late-stage study will confirm the positive results we saw in Phase 2 in time to progression (TTP) and overall survival (OS) observed in patients whose tumors were MET-high.
 
 
 
 
Hepatocellular carcinoma is a devastating disease, and patients with advanced HCC are in need of new therapies that can help extend their lives, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  The METIV-HCC trial follows positive Phase 2 results that demonstrated improvements in overall survival and time to progression observed among MET-high patients.
In October 2012, agreement was reached with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) on a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA) for this pivotal Phase 3 trial.  The SPA process is a procedure by which the FDA provides official evaluation and written guidance on the design and size of proposed protocols that are intended to form the basis for a New Drug Application.  Final marketing approval depends on the results of the trial.
About Hepatocellular Carcinoma (HCC)
Globally, liver cancer is the sixth most common cancer (749,000 new cases), accounting for 7 percent of all cancers, and is the third leading cause of cancer related death (692,000 cases). HCC represents more than 90 percent of primary liver cancers.  Chronic hepatitis B and C are recognized as the major factors worldwide increasing the risk of HCC, with risk being even greater in the presence of co-infection with these viruses. Cirrhosis is also a risk factor for development of HCC.
1
2
3
About Tivantinib and the MET pathway
multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.
Tivantinib is an orally administered, selective inhibitor of MET, a receptor tyrosine kinase. Tivantinib is currently in Phase 3 development and has not been approved in any market.  In healthy adult cells, MET is present in normal levels to support natural cellular function, but in cancer cells MET is inappropriately and continuously activated for unknown reasons. When abnormally activated, MET plays
 
About ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd.
In December 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement for tivantinib (ARQ 197) in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan.
About Daiichi Sankyo
The Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical products to address the diversified, unmet medical needs of patients in both mature and emerging markets.  While maintaining its portfolio of marketed pharmaceuticals for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and bacterial infections, the Group is engaged in the development of treatments for thrombotic disorders and focused on the discovery of novel oncology and cardiovascular-metabolic therapies. Furthermore, the Daiichi Sankyo Group has created a "Hybrid Business Model," which will respond to market and customer diversity and optimize growth opportunities across the value chain. For more information, please visit
www.daiichisankyo.com
.
 
 
2
 
 
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases, and ARQ 087, designed to inhibit fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR). ArQules current discovery efforts, based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
 
This press release contains statements regarding clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) by ArQule and its business partner, Daiichi Sankyo, including the Phase 3 METIV-HCC trial in second-line hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) conducted under a Special Protocol Assessment (SPA).  These statements are based on the current beliefs and expectations of both companies, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib may not demonstrate a promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead ArQule or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data.  Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authorities may disagree with ArQules view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of ArQule, Daiichi Sankyo, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome technical hurdles and other issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible.  There is a risk that these issues may not be successfully resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, with respect to partnered programs, even if certain compounds show initial promise, Daiichi Sankyo or Kyowa Hakko Kirin may decide not to license or continue to develop them, as the case may be.  In addition, Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin have certain rights to unilaterally terminate their agreements with ArQule. If either company were to do so, ArQule might not be able to complete development and commercialization of the applicable licensed products on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with ArQules drug development and other activities, see ArQules periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Neither ArQule nor Daiichi Sankyo undertakes any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
1
EASLEORTC Clinical Practice Guidelines: Management of hepatocellular carcinoma. Journal of Hepatology. 2012;56: 908-943
 
2
EASLEORTC Clinical Practice Guidelines: Management of hepatocellular carcinoma. Journal of Hepatology. 2012;56: 908-943
 
Chiaramonte M, Stroffolini T, Vian A, et al.: Rate of incidence of hepatocellular carcinoma in patients with compensated viral cirrhosis. Cancer 85 (10): 2132-37, 1999.
3
 
 
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20130311164512.txt.gz
TIME:20130311164512
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
19 Presidential Way
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e)           
Amendment and Extension of Employment Agreements
On March 8, 2013, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant or ArQule) amended certain terms of the following employment agreements:
CEO
Employment Agreement between the Registrant and Paolo Pucci, the Registrants Chief Executive Officer dated April 15, 2008 and amended on July 15, 2010 (as amended, the CEO Employment Agreement).
The March 8, 2013 amendment:  (i) extends the term of the CEO Employment Agreement from June 30, 2015 to March 8, 2017; and (ii) revises the vesting events pertaining to a previously disclosed award to Mr. Pucci of 390,000 performance-based stock units. Each of the stock units constitutes a contingent right to receive one share of the Registrants common stock, in tranches of 300,000 and 90,00 units that vest, respectively, upon the achievement of certain performance targets related to the development of the Registrants products and the average price of the Registrants common stock. The March 8, 2013 amendment extends the period for achievement of the product development goal and reduces the target price for the stock performance goal. In addition, the March 8, 2013 amendment stipulates that all performance-based stock units will be subject to accelerated vesting if Mr. Pucci is terminated or deemed terminated without cause in connection with a change of control of the Registrant.
 
All other material terms of the CEO Employment Agreement that were in effect prior to the Committees approval of the March 8, 2013 amendment remain in effect. The foregoing summary of the material terms of the March 8, 2013 amendment to the CEO Employment Agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the March 8, 2013 amendment which is included as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and to the terms of the CEO Employment Agreement.
COO
Employment Agreement between ArQule, Inc. and Peter S. Lawrence, the Registrants President and Chief Operating Officer, dated April 13, 2006 and amended October 4, 2007 and April 14, 2008 (as amended, the COO Employment Agreement).
March 8, 2013 In addition, the March 8, 2013 amendment stipulates that all performance-based stock units will be subject to accelerated vesting if Mr. Lawrence is terminated or deemed terminated without cause in connection with a change of control of the Registrant.
The
amendment provides for a term of employment through March 8, 2017 and gives effect to the award to Mr. Lawrence of 125,000 performance-based stock units, each of which constitutes a contingent right to receive one share of the Registrants common stock.  The units will vest if, during the course of Mr. Lawrences employment with the Registrant, a certain performance goal related to the development of the Registrants products is achieved by a date specified by the Committee.  
 
2
 
 
Prior to this change, Mr. Lawrence would have been entitled to receive accelerated vesting solely as a result of a change of control.
The March 8, 2013 amendment also adds a provision to the COO Employment Agreement requiring that Mr. Lawrence be terminated or deemed terminated without cause in connection with a change of control of the Registrant in order for him to receive accelerated vesting of stock options and restricted stock.
March 8, 2013March 8, 2013 March 8, 2013
All other material terms of the COO Employment Agreement that were in effect prior to the Committees approval of the
amendment remain in effect. The foregoing summary of the material terms of the
amendment to the COO Employment Agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the
amendment which is included as Exhibit 10.2 hereto and to the terms of the COO Employment Agreement.
CMO
Employment Agreement between ArQule, Inc. and Brian Schwartz, the Registrants Chief Medical Officer, dated June 17, 2008 and amended February 23, 2012 (as amended, the CMO Employment Agreement).
The March 8, 2013 gives effect to the award to Dr. Schwartz of 120,000 performance-based stock units, each of which constitutes a contingent right to receive one share of the Registrants common stock.  The units will vest if, during the course of Dr. Schwartzs employment with the Registrant, a performance goal related to the development of the Registrants products is achieved by a date specified by the Committee.  In addition, the March 8, 2013 amendment stipulates that all performance-based stock units will be subject to accelerated vesting if Dr. Schwartz is terminated or deemed terminated without cause in connection with a change of control of the Registrant.
amendment provides for a term of employment through March 8, 2017 and
All other material terms of the CMO Employment Agreement that were in effect prior to the Committees approval of the March 8, 2013 amendment remain in effect. March 8, 2013
The foregoing summary of the material terms of the
amendment to the CMO Employment Agreement is qualified by reference to the full text of the current amendment which is included as Exhibit 10.3 hereto and to the terms of the CMO Employment Agreement.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)           Exhibits.
10.1           Second Amendment to Employment Agreement dated as of March 8, 2013, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Paolo Pucci, filed herewith (File No. 000-21429).
 
3
 
 
10.2           Third Amendment to Employment Agreement dated as of March 8, 2013, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Peter S. Lawrence, filed herewith (File No. 000-21429). 
10.3           Second Amendment to Employment Agreement dated as of March 8, 2013, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Brian Schwartz, filed herewith (File No. 000-21429).
10.4           Employment Agreement, dated as of April 15, 2008, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Paolo Pucci. Filed as Exhibit 10.4 to the Registrants Current Report on Form 8-K, filed on April 18, 2008 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
10.5           Amendment to Employment Agreement, dated as of July 15, 2010, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Paolo Pucci. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrants Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2010 filed on August 4, 2010 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
10.6           Employment Agreement between ArQule, Inc. and Peter S. Lawrence, dated April 13, 2006. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrants Current Report on Form 8-K dated April 18, 2006 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
10.7           Amendment to Employment Agreement, dated as of October 4, 2007, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Peter S. Lawrence. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrants Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 10, 2007 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
10.8           Second Amendment to Employment Agreement, dated April 14, 2008, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Peter S. Lawrence. Filed as Exhibit 10.4 to the Registrants Current Report on Form 8-K, filed on April 18, 2008 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
10.9           Employment Agreement, dated as of June 17, 2008, by and between ArQule, Inc. and Brian Schwartz, filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrants Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 24, 2012 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference. 
10.10           Amendment to Employment Agreement dated as of February 23, 2012 by and between ArQule, Inc. and Brian Schwartz, filed as Exhibit 10.2 to Amendment No.1 to the Registrants Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 27, 2012 (File No. 000-21429) and incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
4
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
5
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
This Second Amendment to Employment Agreement (Second Amendment), effective as of March 8, 2013 (the Effective Date) is entered into by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Paolo Pucci ("Executive").  The purpose of this Second Amendment is to amend the Employment Agreement dated as of April 15, 2008 between the Company and Executive (the "Employment Agreement"), as previously amended by an agreement effective as of July 15, 2010 (the First Amendment).  Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Second Amendment shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Employment Agreement.
In consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive (collectively, the "Parties") hereby agree as follows:
The Company hereby agrees to continue to employ Executive, and Executive hereby accepts such continued employment with the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Employment Agreement, as amended.  The Parties agree that the employment term shall continue through March 8, 2017, unless earlier terminated in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 of the Employment Agreement (the Employment Term), provided that the Company shall provide Executive with no fewer than ninety (90) days advance written notice in the event it decides not to extend this Agreement beyond the Employment Term or negotiate in good faith a new agreement, and in the event the Company does not provide such 90-day advance notice, the Company shall pay Executive up to 90 days of his Base Salary in lieu of such advance notice.
 
In accordance with the approval of the Compensation, Nominating and Governance Committee (the "CNG Committee") of even date herewith and subject to the terms and conditions of the Amended and Restated 1994 Equity Incentive Plan (the Plan) and the Stock Unit Agreement that the Company shall provide to Executive (which shall be substantially in the form attached as to the Second Amendment), and in addition to any other equity awards for which Executive may be eligible, the CNG Committee hereby affirms the grant to Executive of 390,000 common stock units (the "Performance-Based Stock Units"), which shall vest in two tranches based on the Company's achievement of the milestones set forth on to this Second Amendment.  Executive must be employed by the Company as of the date each milestone is achieved to be entitled to the vesting of the Performance-Based Stock Units associated with that milestone. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if there is (i) a Change of Control as defined in Section 6 of the Employment Agreement, and (ii) the Company terminates Executives employment without Cause (as defined in Section 5.2 of the Employment Agreement), or is deemed to terminate Executives employment without Cause, within the period commencing three months prior to the latest possible date of a Change of Control and ending one year after the latest possible date of a Change of Control, then the Severance Package set forth in Section 5.1.1 of the Employment Agreement shall, to the extent not previously vested or paid, incrementally include 390,000 Performance-Based Stock Units, which shall vest on the Termination Date without regard to the milestones set forth on , provided that Executive satisfies all conditions precedent to receiving the Severance Package as set forth in Section 5.1.1 of the Employment Agreement.  For avoidance of doubt, a termination without Cause occurring during the period commencing three months prior to the latest possible date of a Change of Control and ending one year after the latest possible date of a Change of Control shall include a Deemed Termination as that term is defined in Section 5.1.2 of the Employment Agreement.  Payment of the Performance-Based Stock Units as part of the Severance Package shall cancel this award.
Exhibit B
Exhibit A
Exhibit A
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Second Amendment as of the date set forth above.
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
EXHIBIT A
 
Vesting Schedule for Performance-Based Stock Units
The Performance-Based Stock Units described in Section 2 of this Second Amendment shall vest in two tranches according to the following schedule:
3
 

Exhibit 10.2
This Third Amendment to Employment Agreement (Third Amendment), effective as of March 8, 2013, is entered into by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Peter Lawrence ("Executive").  The purpose of this Third Amendment is to amend the Employment Agreement dated as of April 13, 2006 between the Company and Executive (the "Employment Agreement"), as previously amended by an agreement effective as of October 4, 2007 (the First Amendment), and as further amended by an agreement effective as of April 14, 2008 (the Second Amendment). Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Third Amendment shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Employment Agreement.
In consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive (collectively, the "Parties") hereby agree as follows:
The Company hereby agrees to continue to employ Executive, and Executive hereby accepts such continued employment with the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Employment Agreement, as amended.  The Parties agree that the Employment Term shall continue through March 8, 2017, unless earlier terminated in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 of the Employment Agreement (the Employment Term).
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Third Amendment as of the date set forth above.
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
EXHIBIT A
 
Vesting Schedule for Performance-Based Stock Units
The Performance-Based Stock Units described in Section 2 of this Second Amendment shall vest in two tranches according to the following schedule:
 
 
4
 

Exhibit 10.3
 
 
This Second Amendment to Employment Agreement (Second Amendment), effective as of March 8, 2013 (the Effective Date) is entered into by and between ArQule, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") with its principal offices at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, and Brian Schwartz ("Executive").  The purpose of this Second Amendment is to amend the Employment Agreement dated as of June 17, 2008 between the Company and Executive (the "Employment Agreement"), as previously amended by an agreement effective as of February 23, 2012.  Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Second Amendment shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Employment Amendment.
In consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive (collectively, the "Parties") hereby agree as follows:
The Company hereby agrees to continue to employ Executive, and Executive hereby accepts such continued employment with the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Employment Agreement, as amended.  The Parties agree that the employment term shall continue through March 8, 2017, unless earlier terminated in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 of the Employment Agreement (the Employment Term).
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed or caused to be executed this Second Amendment as of the date set forth above.
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
EXHIBIT A
 
Vesting Schedule for Performance-Based Stock Units
The Performance-Based Stock Units described in Section 2 of this Second Amendment shall vest in two tranches according to the following schedule:
 
 
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20130314091917.txt.gz
TIME:20130314091917
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
19 Presidential Way
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On March 14, 2013, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fiscal quarter and year ended December 31, 2012.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
 
 Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated March 14, 2013 announcing results of operations.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
                                                                  
March 14, 2013

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the year and for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2012.
Woburn, MA, March 14, 2013 
The Company reported a net loss of $10,872,000 or $0.18 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2012, compared with a net loss of $10,762,000, or $0.20 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2011.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2012, the Company reported a net loss of $5,296,000 or $0.09 per share, compared with net income of $3,768,000, or $0.07 per share, for the quarter ended December 31, 2011.
At December 31, 2012, the Company had a total of approximately $130,599,000 in cash and marketable securities.
Operational Milestones
Tivantinib (ARQ 197)
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pipeline / Discovery
Plans for 2013
Tivantinib has re-emerged as a Phase 3 clinical-stage compound with the initiation of the METIV-HCC trial in second-line HCC early this year, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule. In 2013 we look forward to multiple data presentations that will inform our future development plans.  The primary objectives with tivantinib this year include:
Progress in other programs will focus on the following activities:
At the end of 2012, ArQule had $130.6 million in cash and marketable securities, said Mr. Pucci. We expect that these available financial resources will be sufficient to finance our working capital requirements well into 2015.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Revenues and Expenses
Revenues for the year ended December 31, 2012 were $36,414,000 compared with revenues of $47,310,000 for the year ended December 31, 2011.  For the quarter ended December 31, 2012, revenues were $5,143,000, compared with revenues of $16,504,000 for the quarter ended December 31, 2011.
The $10.9 million revenue decrease in 2012 was principally due to a $10.0 million decrease in revenue recognized from the Companys Daiichi Sankyo ARQ 092 upfront licensing payment received in 2011, a $4.4 million decrease in revenue recognized from the tivantinib license agreement with Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a $10.2 million decrease in revenue recognized on the milestone received from the Daiichi Sankyo tivantinib program in 2011, a $2.2 million revenue decrease from the Daiichi Sankyo AKIP agreement, and a $2.6 million decrease in revenue recognized resulting from the extension of the development period of the Daiichi Sankyo tivantinib agreement. These revenue decreases were partially offset by a $2.8 million increase from the Companys Daiichi Sankyo ARQ 092 agreement and lower contra-revenue of $15.7 million associated with the Daiichi Sankyo tivantinib program.
Fiscal 2012 research and development expenses were $33,966,000, compared with $45,011,000 for fiscal 2011.  Fourth quarter 2012 research and development expenses were $7,246,000, compared with $9,674,000 for the fourth quarter 2011.  Research and development expenses decreased in fiscal 2012 and in the fourth quarter of 2012 primarily due to the decrease in outsourced clinical and product development costs related to Phase 1 and 2 programs for tivantinib and other product candidates.
General and administrative expenses for fiscal 2012 were $13,852,000, compared to $13,373,000 for fiscal 2011.  Fourth quarter 2012 general and administrative costs were $3,352,000, compared with $3,151,000 for the fourth quarter 2011.
2013 Financial Guidance
For 2013, ArQule expects net use of cash to range between $40 and $45 million.  Revenues are expected to range between $12 and $15 million.  Net loss is expected to range between $28 and $31 million, and net loss per share to range between $(0.45) and $(0.50) for the year.  ArQule expects to end 2013 with between $85 and $90 million in cash and marketable securities.
Conference Call and Webcast
ArQule will hold a conference call today at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time.
Date:                                           Thursday, March 14, 2013
Time:                                           9:00 a.m., Eastern Time
Conference Call Numbers
Domestic:                                           (877) 868-1831
International:                                     (914) 495-8595
Webcast:                                           www.arqule.com
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning two hours after the completion of the call until March 16, 2013 and can be accessed by dialing toll-free (855) 859-2056 and outside the U.S. (404) 537-3406.  The confirmation code for replayed calls is 94647035.
 
 
 
 
 
 
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 087, designed to inhibit fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR), ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
 
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development, as well as forward-looking statements related to the Companys financial guidance for 2013 (including estimates of net use of cash, revenues, net loss, net loss per share and cash and marketable securities at the end of 2013), key corporate objectives for 2013, ability to fund operations with current cash and marketable securities, and its agreements with Daiichi Sankyo, Inc.  These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 087, ARQ 621, ARQ 736 and ARQ 092 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of the Company or Daiichi Sankyo, Inc., its partner, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs results in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, Daiichi Sankyo has certain rights to unilaterally terminate the tivantinib license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement.  If it were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of tivantinib on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
###
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20130401085611.txt.gz
TIME:20130401085611
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
19 Presidential Way
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
 
Item 1.02 Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
As previously reported, on November 10, 2011, ArQule, Inc. (ArQule or the Registrant) announced that it entered into a license and co-commercialization agreement (the License Agreement) with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. (Daiichi Sankyo) to develop and commercialize ARQ 092, an inhibitor of the serine/threonine kinase, AKT, and certain backup compounds.
On March 26, 2013, ArQule received formal notice that Daiichi Sankyo had elected to exercise its right to terminate the License Agreement.  Termination will be effective ninety days from receipt of the notice.
As a consequence of termination, worldwide rights for the development and commercialization of compounds covered under its AKT collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo including the lead compound emerging from this collaboration, ARQ 092, and associated research and clinical data will revert to the Registrant.
ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo will continue to collaborate to conduct research, clinical trials and the commercialization of tivantinib in human cancer indications in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1   Text of press release announcing contract termination and reversion of development and commercialization rights dated April 1, 2013.
 
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
                                                                  
April
1, 2013
 
2
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced it has regained worldwide rights for the development and commercialization of compounds covered under its AKT collaboration with Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd., including the lead compound emerging from this collaboration, ARQ 092.  Data from an ongoing Phase 1 trial with ARQ 092 will be presented at the AACR (American Association for Cancer Research) Annual Meeting on April 9, 2013.
Woburn, MA, April 1, 2013 
Regaining worldwide rights to the AKT program, including the novel oral agent, ARQ 092, adds  significant value for ArQule, as it expands our proprietary pipeline in an exciting area of therapeutic development, said Brian Schwartz, M.D., chief medical officer of ArQule.  AKT, also known as the serine/threonine kinase PKB, is believed to mediate a number of signal transduction processes and represents a potential therapeutic target for several cancers and other diseases.  We look forward to the AACR data presentation from the ongoing Phase 1 trial with ARQ 092.
ARQ 092 is a selective AKT inhibitor that was discovered through technology from the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP) and optimized through a structure-based drug design methodology.  The AKT signaling pathway, which plays a role in regulating cell growth, survival, migration and angiogenesis, is frequently dysregulated in cancer.
ArQule is regaining its rights to the AKT program and to ARQ 092 pursuant to Daiichi Sankyos decision to terminate a license and co-commercialization agreement with ArQule dated November 8, 2011.
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline consists of ARQ 092, designed to inhibit AKT, ARQ 087, designed to inhibit fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR), ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein, and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
 
 
 
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with ARQ 092, which is in Phase 1 clinical development.  These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, ARQ 092 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing ARQ 092 that could lead the Company to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities, and regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for ARQ 092 are subject to the ability of the Company to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome other technical hurdles and issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible that may not be resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs results in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20130508084839.txt.gz
TIME:20130508084839
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
                                                                                                         
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2
Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On May 8, 2013 ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant) issued a press release announcing its results of operations for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2013.  The press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
 
 Exhibit 99.1 Text of press release dated May 8, 2013 announcing results of operations.
 
 
2
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
3
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE:
 
ArQule, Inc. (NASDAQ: ARQL) today announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2013.
Woburn, MA, May 8, 2013 
For the quarter ended March 31, 2013, the Company reported a net loss of $5,775,000, or $0.09 per share, compared to a net loss of $4,260,000, or $0.08 per share, for the first quarter of 2012.
At March 31, 2013, the Company had a total of $119,641,000 in cash, equivalents and marketable securities.
Operational Update
With respect to our lead product, tivantinib, in January we enrolled the first patient in the pivotal Phase 3 METIV trial of tivantinib as a single agent in HCC, said Paolo Pucci, chief executive officer of ArQule.  Building upon the clinical benefits observed in MET-high patients in our Phase 2 trial, investigators in the METIV trial are enrolling previously treated patients with MET-high tumors. We have opened a number of sites in the U.S. and Europe during the past several months, and we look forward to building momentum in patient enrollment in the months to come.
In colorectal cancer, we plan to present final data from our Phase 2 trial of tivantinib in combination with irinotecan and cetuximab at the ASCO Annual Meeting in June, said Mr. Pucci.  The presentation will include mature overall survival data from this trial.
 
 
 
 
We are delighted to have regained worldwide rights to the AKT program, said Mr. Pucci.  The early Phase 1 clinical data for ARQ 092 presented recently at AACR is encouraging and potentially provides a basis for differentiating this compound in the class of AKT inhibitory agents.  We are continuing to enroll patients in this trial and have not yet declared a maximum tolerated dose, following which we plan to explore the activity of ARQ 092 in patients with AKT-driven tumors.
Revenues and Expenses
 
Revenue in the three months ended March 31, 2013 is comprised primarily of revenue from the Daiichi Sankyo tivantinib development agreement, the license agreement with Daiichi Sankyo for the development of ARQ 092, and the Kyowa Hakko Kirin exclusive license agreement for tivantinib.
The Company reported research and development revenue of $5,661,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2013, compared with $8,498,000 for the quarter ended March 31, 2012.
The $2.8 million revenue decrease in the quarter ended March 31, 2013 is primarily due to revenue decreases of $4.9 million from our Daiichi Sankyo AKIP agreement and $0.3 million from our Daiichi Sankyo ARQ 092 agreement, partially offset by a $0.5 million increase in revenue from our Daiichi Sankyo tivantinib program and $1.8 million from a one-time research project.
Total costs and expenses for the quarter ended March 31, 2013 were $11,581,000 compared to $12,902,000 for the first quarter of 2012.   Research and development costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2013 were $8,181,000 compared to $9,303,000 for the first quarter of 2012.   These decreases were primarily due to lower outsourced clinical and product development costs related to tivantinib and pipeline programs.  General and administrative costs for the quarter ended March 31, 2013 were $3,400,000, compared to $3,599,000 for the first quarter of 2012.
Conference Call and Webcast
 
Conference call details
 
A replay of the conference call will be available beginning two hours after the completion of the call until the end of May 10, 2013 and can be accessed by dialing toll-free 855-859-2056 and outside the U.S. 404-537-3406.  The confirmation code for replayed calls is 33189641.
 
 
 
 
About ArQule
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the c-MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline includes: ARQ 092, designed to inhibit the AKT serine/threonine kinase; ARQ 087, designed to inhibit fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR); ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein; and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements regarding the Companys clinical trials with tivantinib (ARQ 197) and other candidate compounds in earlier stages of development and its ability to fund operations with current cash and marketable securities. These statements are based on the Companys current beliefs and expectations, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib, ARQ 087, ARQ 092, ARQ 621 and ARQ 736 may not demonstrate promising therapeutic effects; in addition, they may not demonstrate appropriate safety profiles in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead the Company or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from subsequent analysis of data or from additional data. Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authorities may disagree with the Companys view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib is subject to the ability of the Company as well as Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome technical hurdles and other issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible.  There is a risk that these issues may not be successfully resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future.  Moreover, with respect to partnered programs, even if certain compounds show initial promise, Daiichi Sankyo or Kyowa Hakko Kirin may decide not to license or continue to develop them, as the case may be.  In addition, Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin have certain rights to unilaterally terminate their agreements with ArQule. If either company were to do so, the Company might not be able to complete development and commercialization of the applicable licensed products on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with the Companys drug development and other activities, see the Companys periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company does not undertake any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20130523163040.txt.gz
TIME:20130523163040
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
                                                                                                         
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 5
Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.07    
Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
 
On May 20, 2013, at the 2013 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc. (the
Registrant) the Registrants stockholders voted:
 
 
 
The voting results are set forth in Exhibit 99.1 to this report and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit 99.1 
Report of Matters Voted Upon by Stockholders
 
 
2
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
3
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
1.      The 2013 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of ArQule, Inc.  (the Annual Meeting) was held at the offices of ArQule, Inc. (the Company) at 19 Presidential Way, Woburn, Massachusetts 01801, on May 20, 2013 commencing at 10:00 a.m. pursuant to notice properly given.
2.      At the close of business on March 29, 2013, the record date for the determination of stockholders entitled to vote at the Annual Meeting, the outstanding voting securities of the Company were shares of common stock, $0.01 par value.  Each of the outstanding shares was entitled to one vote on the matters before the Annual Meeting.
62,381,085
 
 
3.      At the Annual Meeting, shares of the Company's issued and outstanding common stock were represented in person or by proxy, constituting a quorum.
51,575,918
 
4.      At the Annual Meeting, each of the following nominees for director received the respective number of votes set forth opposite his or her name, constituting a plurality of the votes cast, and was duly elected as a director of the Company:
 
 
 
                                                                         
                                                                               
                                                                        
 
Broker Non-votes:   shares
11,010,590
5.      The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to ratify the selection of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit the Company's financial statements for the year ending December 31, 2013.
 
Broker Non-votes:   shares
0
       approve, by non-binding vote, the compensation of our named executive officers
6.
The following table sets forth the tally of the votes cast on the proposal to
Broker Non-votes:  
11,010,590
shares


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ARQL/ARQL-8K-20130603082012.txt.gz
TIME:20130603082012
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
 
                                                                                                         
19 Presidential Way
Woburn, MA
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On June 1, 2013, ArQule, Inc. (the Registrant)
announced final results from a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind, phase 2 clinical trial with the selective MET inhibitor tivantinib in combination with cetuximab and irinotecan as an investigational, second-line treatment in KRAS wild-type metastatic colorectal cancer (CRC).
The results were the subject of an oral presentation at the Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology on June 1, 2013.  Copies of slides that accompanied the presentation may be accessed electronically at http://investors.arqule.com/data.cfm.
The Registrants press release dated June 1, 2013, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, is incorporated herein by reference.
 
T
he information in this Form 8-K and Exhibit 99.1 attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, in accordance with General Instruction B.2 to Form 8-K.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits.
 
Exhibit No. 99.1   Text of press release announcing clinical trial results dated June 1, 2013.
 
 
2
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
3
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
ArQule, Inc. (Nasdaq: ARQL) today announced final data from a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind, Phase 2 clinical trial with tivantinib in combination with cetuximab and irinotecan in patients with relapsed or refractory KRAS wild-type metastatic colorectal cancer (CRC).   These data were presented today at the 2013 Annual Meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology (ASCO) (abstract number 3508) by Dr. Cathy Eng, M.D., F.A.C.P., M.D. Anderson Cancer Center, Associate Director, Colorectal Center.
Woburn, MA, June 1, 2013 
The multiple encouraging signals of clinical benefit observed in this trial include consistent trends in improved progression free survival (PFS), overall response rate (ORR) and overall survival (OS) in patients who received tivantinib in combination with cetuximab and irinotecan, said Dr. Eng. Trends toward improvements in all of these outcomes were also seen in a small MET high sub-group, but a larger sample size is required to validate conclusively the treatment impact in this population.  The results also underscore the need to ensure standardized pretreatment regimens among enrolled patients and uniform tissue collection procedures at enrollment to allow for more robust correlative outcome assessments related to the MET pathway.
 
 
 
 
The primary endpoint of this trial was PFS in the intent to treat (ITT) population.  Other study endpoints were OS, ORR and safety for the ITT population.    Patient recruitment in the trial was discontinued prior to meeting the original goal of 150 patients.   As a result, the number of PFS events available for statistical analysis was decreased from 110 to 80.
As previously announced, the trial did not meet its primary endpoint, but data analyses showed that the median PFS in the treatment arm (patients treated with tivantinib plus irinotecan and cetuximab) was 8.3 months, compared with 7.3 months in the control arm (patients treated with placebo plus irinotecan and cetuximab) (hazard ratio = 0.85, 95% CI: 0.55, 1.33, stratified log-rank p = 0.38).
Median OS in the treatment arm was 19.8 months, compared with 16.9 months in the control arm (hazard ratio = 0.70, 95% CI: 0.42, 1.17, stratified log-rank p = 0.25). ORR in the treatment arm was 45 percent versus 33 percent in the control arm.  The PFS and ORR results obtained in both the treatment and control arms were substantially greater than expected compared to previously published historical norms.
Patients pre-treated with oxaliplatin in the treatment arm experienced favorable PFS and OS results.  Among these patients, median PFS was 8.3 months compared with 7.2 months in the oxaliplatin-treated control arm (hazard ratio = 0.66 CI: 0.41, 1.09, stratified log-rank p=0.10), and median OS was 22.3 months compared with 14.1 months (hazard ratio = 0.58, 95% CI: 0.33, 1.02, stratified log-rank p = 0.06).   ORR in oxaliplatin pre-treated patients who received tivantinib was 42.6 percent, compared with 27.1 percent in the placebo arm.  Efficacy observations in a small MET-high sub-group were inconclusive and would require further assessment with a larger sample size.
Adverse events were reported at similar rates in the treatment and control arms of the trial, except for increased neutropenia observed in the treatment arm, with no discontinuations of treatment for this reason.  No treatment-emergent adverse events leading to death were assessed as related to study treatment.  Tivantinib was generally well tolerated in combination with the approved doses of irinotecan and cetuximab studied in this trial.
 
 
 
 
(US n=67; Russia n=39; Western Europe n=16)
The 122 patients in the trial
had unresectable CRC and disease progression after first-line therapy.  Patients were randomized to receive tivantinib at 360 milligrams (mg) twice daily in combination with cetuximab at 500 mg/square meter every 14 days and irinotecan at 500 mg/square meter every 14 days or placebo twice daily with the same regimen of cetuximab and irinotecan.
The trial was conducted by Daiichi Sankyo, the co-developer with ArQule of tivantinib in all regions outside of certain territories in Asia.
About Colorectal Cancer (CRC)
Colorectal cancer is the second leading cause of cancer-related deaths in the U.S. and is the third most common cancer in men and women.  According to the National Cancer Institute, it is estimated that more than 140,000 new cases of colorectal cancer will be diagnosed in 2012, and an estimated 51,700 deaths from the disease will occur this year.  The estimated incidence rate was 46 per 100,000 people during the period 2005-2009.
About MET and Tivantinib (ARQ 197)
Tivantinib is an orally administered, selective inhibitor of MET, a receptor tyrosine kinase, which is currently in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical trials.  In certain healthy adult cells, MET is present in low to normal levels to support natural cellular function, but in some cancer cells, MET is inappropriately and continuously activated. When abnormally activated, c-Met plays multiple roles in aspects of human cancer, including cancer cell growth, survival, angiogenesis, invasion and metastasis.    The activation of certain cell signaling pathways, including MET, has also been associated with the development of resistance to EGFR (epidermal growth factor receptor) inhibitors such as cetuximab.
Pre-clinical data have demonstrated that tivantinib inhibits MET activation in a range of human tumor cell lines and shows anti-tumor activity against several human tumor xenografts.  In clinical trials to date, treatment with tivantinib has been generally well tolerated and has shown clinical activity in the tumors studied.  Tivantinib has not yet been approved for any indication in any country.
 
 
 
 
About ArQule, Inc. and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd.
 
On December 19, 2008, ArQule and Daiichi Sankyo, Co., Ltd. signed a license, co-development and co-commercialization agreement to co-develop tivantinib in the U.S., Europe, South America and the rest of the world, excluding Japan, China (including Hong Kong), South Korea and Taiwan, where Kyowa Hakko Kirin Co., Ltd. has exclusive rights for development and commercialization.
 
About ArQule
 
ArQule is a biotechnology company engaged in the research and development of next-generation, small-molecule cancer therapeutics.  The Companys targeted, broad-spectrum products and research programs are focused on key biological processes that are central to human cancers.  ArQules lead product, in Phase 2 and Phase 3 clinical development, is tivantinib (ARQ 197), an oral, selective inhibitor of the MET receptor tyrosine kinase.  The Companys pipeline includes: ARQ 092, designed to inhibit the AKT serine/threonine kinase; ARQ 087, designed to inhibit fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR); ARQ 621, designed to inhibit the Eg5 kinesin motor protein; and ARQ 736, designed to inhibit the RAF kinases. ArQules current discovery efforts, which are based on the ArQule Kinase Inhibitor Platform (AKIP), are focused on the identification of novel kinase inhibitors that are potent, selective and do not compete with ATP (adenosine triphosphate) for binding to the kinase.
 
 
 
 
This press release contains statements regarding clinical trials, particularly in colorectal cancer with tivantinib (ARQ 197) conducted by ArQule and its business partner, Daiichi Sankyo.  These statements are based on the current beliefs and expectations of both companies, and are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially.  Positive information about pre-clinical and early stage clinical trial results does not ensure that later stage or larger scale clinical trials will be successful. For example, tivantinib may not demonstrate a promising therapeutic effect; in addition, it may not demonstrate an appropriate safety profile in current or later stage or larger scale clinical trials as a result of known or as yet unanticipated side effects. The results achieved in later stage trials may not be sufficient to meet applicable regulatory standards or to justify further development. Problems or delays may arise during clinical trials or in the course of developing, testing or manufacturing these compounds that could lead ArQule or its partners to discontinue development.  Even if later stage clinical trials are successful, unexpected concerns may arise from analysis of data or from additional data.  Obstacles may arise or issues may be identified in connection with review of clinical data with regulatory authorities. Regulatory authorities may disagree with ArQules view of the data or require additional data or information or additional studies.  In addition, the planned timing of initiation and completion of clinical trials for tivantinib are subject to the ability of ArQule, Daiichi Sankyo, and Kyowa Hakko Kirin, a licensee of tivantinib, to enroll patients, enter into agreements with clinical trial sites and investigators, and overcome technical hurdles and other issues related to the conduct of the trials for which each of them is responsible.  There is a risk that these issues may not be successfully resolved.  Drug development involves a high degree of risk. Only a small
number of research and development programs result in the commercialization of a product.  Positive pre-clinical data may not be supported in later stages of development.  Furthermore, ArQule may not have the financial or human resources to successfully pursue drug discovery in the future. Moreover, with respect to partnered programs, even if certain compounds show initial promise, Daiichi Sankyo or Kyowa Hakko Kirin may decide not to license or continue to develop them, as the case may be.  In addition, Daiichi Sankyo and Kyowa Hakko Kirin have certain rights to unilaterally terminate their agreements with ArQule. If either company were to do so, ArQule might not be able to complete development and commercialization of the applicable licensed products on its own. For more detailed information on the risks and uncertainties associated with ArQules drug development and other activities, see ArQules periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Neither ArQule nor Daiichi Sankyo undertakes any obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statements.
 


</DOCUMENT>
